VOL. I. 1
CHAPTER I.
MASSACHUSETTS BAY.
A tempest
, which had for many days been sweeping over
land and sea, had at last subsided. The ocean was still tossing
in stormy surges beyond the two external pillars of the
Massachusetts
Bay; and even within its beautiful archipelago of tufted
islands, where the tempest's rage was comparatively powerless,
the dark and foaming waves broke violently against the shore.
A silent, dreary ocean, lashed a shore as silent and dreary as
itself. The storm, as it careered over the ocean, had found
hardly a wilder or more savage solitude than when it swept over
those silent, western deserts. As the boundless waste of waters,
rolling unchanged through ages, even so expanded that ancient
wilderness, unmarked and stern as on creation's morning.
It was the year 1628. A bright April morning had at last
dawned upon the Massachusetts Bay; by which designation was
at that epoch understood all the land and water, with the
scattered
islands, shut up within the two opposite headlands or
gateposts of Nahant and Nantasco.
Near a jutting promontory, within a deep indentation of the
coast stood at that day a solitary cottage.
It was in a secluded cove, with the bay in front, the
three-headed
hill of Shawmut in the distance, and the primeval forest
stretching out, in unfathomable shade, behind and all around.
On the right hand, the headland of the cove was continued far
into the bay, by the long, rocky peninsula, which had already
been baptized by the Puritans with the name of their faithful
friend, Tisquantum; on the left, the forest retreated a few
hundred
yards, leaving an open glade between the pebbly beach and
the wood crowned and rolling country beyond.
The cottage was simple and rude, but picturesque in its
effects. It was built of logs, which still retained their dark and
mossy bark. It covered a considerable extent of ground; the
thatched roof was low browed, with steep gables at the end,
and two or three windows were furnished with small diamond
panes of glass, a luxury which was at that day by no means
common even in England. Over the door, which opened on
the outside with a wooden latch, stood a pair of moose antlers,
and on the ends of the projecting rafters, under the eves, were
suspended the feet of wolves, the tails of foxes, raccoons, and
panthers, and other trophies of the chase. On the sward of
wild grass around the house lay a heap of game which had
recently
been thrown there,  pied brant-geese, blue and green
winged teal, two or three long-necked, long-billed cranes, with a
rabble rout of plump, slate colored pigeons, lay promiscuously
with striped bass, dappled sea trout and other fish. It was
evident
that, although the sporting season had nearly reached its
termination, there was yet no danger of starvation.
A fowling piece and shot pouch lay in the neighborhood,
accompanied, singularly enough, by a musical instrument
resembling
the modern guitar.
A fair faced youth, apparently of some eighteen or nineteen
years of age, sat by himself, near the closed door of the
cottage
,
mending a fishing net, two or three of which lay stretched
upon the beach to dry, while ever and anon he seemed to
relapse
into a profound reverie, singing to himself the while, in a
low, musical, but rather melancholy tone.
The appearance of the youth was striking. A few raven
locks escaped from a slouched hat of brown felt, around a face
which was very fair, with small, regular features, and deep violet
eyes. A loose, dark jerkin, buttoned to the throat, and confined
around his slender waist with a gay colored shawl, with nether
garments of the same sombre hue, completed his equipment.
He seemed to be mechanically pursuing his task, interrupting
his plaintive song occasionally to gaze with an air of abstraction
upon the scene around him. It was a lovely solitude. That
iced sirocco, the north-east wind, had paused, and the vast,
skeleton
trees showed throughout their leafless tracery the influence
of the genial warmth. The red flowering maples blushed with
blossoms, the birches were decked in their fragrant tassels, and
even from the sullen giants of the forest, the white and black
oaks, swung the small pendulous crimson flowers.
The youth looked wistfully out upon the ocean, when he was
suddenly startled by the report of a gun. He sprang to his
feet, threw down his net, and grasped eagerly the firearm which
lay near him upon the ground. The clumsy musket of the
period, almost always used with a rest, seemed altogether too
unwieldy for the slender boy, but he handled it with adroitness,
and his dark blue eye flashed in rapid glances to every side of
the forest, and then out upon the bay, in quest of apprehended
danger. The sound seemed to have proceeded from the deep
thickets on the edge of the promontory of Tisquantum, and
presently there was another report seeming to come from the
island opposite, at that time the abode of the Scotchman, David
Thompson, from whom it derives its name. The boy ran down
to the beach, and strained his eyes eagerly out upon the ocean.
At last he saw very plainly the white sail of a small boat
between
the island and the main, approaching rapidly towards him.
A dark object rose and fell upon the surface of the water some
hundred yards in front of the skiff, and as they drew nearer the
boy relaxed his grasp of the musket, and leaned leisurely upon
it, while he contemplated the scene. A large moose was
swimming
gallantly for his life, still unwounded, but hotly pursued
by the boat. It was obvious that the first shot which the youth
had heard, had been fired from the thicket, and that the animal
having been near the edge of the promontory, had taken to the
water with the intention of gaining the opposite island. He had
evidently been received, as he approached the shore, by another
enemy, who had fired unsuccessfully, but caused him to
relinquish
his attempt at landing. He was now making directly for
the cove, and was gaining perceptibly upon the boat, which
contained
four persons. It would have been easy for the lad,
hidden
as he was, to have destroyed him as he approached, but the
gentle youth seemed to be no sportsman, and on the contrary,
to be gazing with an intense interest upon the animal's
struggles
for life. The magnificent creature renewed his efforts, the
crest of the waves broken already as the water grew shoaler,
dashed in his large face and over his splendid antlers. Already
he was close to the entrance of the cove. A few rapid bounds,
and his foot would touch the beach. Nearer and nearer he
struggled, when suddenly, with an inexplicable impulse, he
doubled upon his pursuers. The cause was explained in a
moment
,
as a second sail floated round the other headland. Still
unhurt, but bewildered, he turned madly round, and dashed
straight as an arrow at the first boat. The sportsman, calm as
a clock, took aim at the animal's head. The deer dashed
onward
,
rushing desperately upon his fate, when, instead of the
expected report, a light click of the lock told that at the critical
1*
moment the firearm, wet with spray, had hung its fire. The
moose struggled slowly by, fairly worried and exhausted by the
chase, while the boatmen threw a cord rapidly around his
antlers, and in spite of his furious struggles at last captured him
alive.
Both the little skiffs were now near the cove. The youth had
returned to his seat near the door of the cottage, after
witnessing
the result of the chase, and had listlessly resumed his
occupation
.
In a few moments the keel of the first boat grated upon
the pebbly beach, and the commander sprang on shore.
Well shot, cried he, turning to the solitary occupant of the
second, who had already furled his sail and was making fast his
little cable to the gnarled trunk of an ancient oak.
Well shot, jolly smith of Mishawum, cried he, for I
should have been sorry had you taken better aim, and deprived
me of my lawful honors. Say what you will, 't is no easy matter
to hit a plunging devil of a moose, with nothing better than the
top of a wave for your rest.
The moose had in the mean time been dragged upon the
beach by two savages and an Englishman, all of whom appeared
to be subordinates of the speaker. The animal, which was of
gigantic stature, more than twenty hands high, with a short
body, long, powerful, but rather awkward legs, and an
enormous
head, adorned with magnificent antlers, struggled but
faintly with his captors, and, exhausted with his exertions,
submitted
to be thrown very summarily upon the ground with his
legs tied together, while his large, pathetic eye seemed mutely to
deprecate his fate.
Robert Bootefish was a short, squat looking individual of fifty,
with a pudding face, in which a pair of twinkling eyes were
almost extinguished by his shaggy brows, while a copper-colored
nose, pierced like a flaming beacon, through a fog of greyish
yellow beard, which smothered all the other glories of his
physiognomy
.
He was attired in a coarse doublet and hose of bright
crimson, which, with his long crooked arms, and short legs,
gave him something of the look of a boiled lobster. This
worthy seated himself upon a stone, at the head of the prostrate
prisoner, amusing himself in an infantine and guileless manner
by tickling the victim's nose with the point of his long hunting
knife. His master, in the mean time, was exchanging greetings
with the other Englishman who had just stepped upon the
beach.
Well, Master Walford, he cried, a sight of you is as rare
as the sight of the sun in this perverse New England April.
What brought you to the cove?
My skiff, returned the other, sententiously.
See what it is to live by oneself in the forest. Your skiff
brought your tongue, as well as yourself, I suppose; or is it still
frozen up, like a dead reindeer's, with the rest of your winter
provisions, at Mishawum?
To say the truth, Master Morton, said the smith, I only
floated down with the tide to look in upon Sir Christopher, this
morning, to see if he had returned from his expedition to the
psalm singers. If I had not met you and your moose by the
way, perhaps I should have extended my voyage as far as the
Merry Mountain, as you call it.
Come when you like, and as often as you like, cried the
other; with your tongue, or without it  you shall always be
welcome. We will rub off the rust from it I warrant you. You
shall find it run more glibly when oiled with a drop of right
rosa solis. And that reminds me, said he, interrupting
himself
,
while he filled a little tin can from a hunting flask in his
pouch, and presented it to his companion  Drink a drop of
his own nectar to salute the orb of day; 't is not often that you
have seen the one or the other of late. The smith, nothing
loth, pledged his jovial companion, who continued, as he
refilled
the cup for himself  To our better friendship, Master
Walford, and trusting you may find more jolly companions than
your friends the wolves, ere another spring cuts our throats with
her double-edged east winds. But I wrong you sweet
south-western
zephyrs, breathing upon me so wooingly, cried he,
taking off his cap, and snuffing the air with affected ecstasy.
`Frigora mitescunt Zephyris  ver proterit stas,' as our
friend Horatius Flaccus hath it;  ah! I beg your pardon, you
have no acquaintance with Horatius Flaccus.
Never met the gentleman in my life, returned the smith;
but a Pokanoket I should think, by his language. I never
could make head or tail of their lingo in my life.
A Pokanoket! Hear him not, shade of the laurelled bard
of soft Venusia! A Pokanoket! a Roman  thou eremite
Vulcan! A Roman, thou two-fold anchorite, in that thou art
both solitary and a forger of anchors!
And good anchors too; aye, and picks and spades; no
better
in all New England, Master Morton, cried the burly smith,
somewhat nettled at this storm of hard names, which his
classical
companion was rattling like hail upon his head.
Shall I slit his weasand, your worship, said the
contemplative
Bootefish, towards whom the two had now approached,
and who still remained in his reposing attitude by the side of
his prisoner. It would make him comfortable, I think. He
seems impatient to have it done. His eye says, as plain as
mortal
tongue could speak, `Robert Bootefish, no more words, but
slit my wizen and have done with it.'
Slit his weasand! if you do I'll slit your nose, cried
Morton
;
and yet that pure and perfect carbuncle should remain,
an indivisible gem forever. But stay! The blessings of Flora
upon your head  the softest plume from the wing of Zephyrus
for your velvet cheek.
These latter invocations were not showered by the classical
Morton, as it might seem, upon the head and velvet cheek of his
henchman Bootefish, but were intended solely for the benefit of
the slender youth, who, finding the party holding, as it were, a
court martial upon their sylvan prisoner, had advanced towards
them to advocate his cause.
Good morrow, Master Morton; and good morrow to you,
Master Walford. I have been waiting impatiently for you to
find the way from the beach to the cottage, but you have
apparently
found matter more important.
Your knightly cousin, Sir Christopher, is he returned from
our Puritanical friends of the nether bay? asked Morton, as
he took off his cap and made a fantastic, half jocular salute to
the stripling.
Sir Christopher has not yet found his way back, answered
the youth, but I think the first shot fired was from his gun. I
think I should know its crack among a thousand, though I
suppose
you will hold that a foolish fancy. At any rate, I claim the
game as lawful prize.
'T is yours before you ask it.
Then, thus do I take possession of my prize; and with this
the youth bounded forward and snatched the knife from the
hands of Bootefish. That worthy individual looked on with
profound astonishment, while the lad rapidly cut the cords which
bound the feet of the prisoner, and then clapped his hands, and
uttered a musical halloo, as the animal, freed from his bondage,
sprang to his feet, tossed his branched head high in air, and
with a mighty bound disappeared in the thick recesses of the
forest.
You are quite right, Signor Jaspar, said Morton; I
assure
you that no true lover of the gentle craft but would have
done as you have done. 'T is murder to shoot a buck so out of
season.
And I am ashamed that the worshipful Master Morton,
Lord of Misrule and Sachem of Merry-Mount, should have been
obliged to receive a rebuke from one wholly a tyro in the
science
,
answered Jaspar  stay; I hear a footstep in the
thicket. And with the graceful bound of a panther, he flew
towards the wood.
CHAPTER II.
THE LORD OF MERRY-MOUNT.
During
Jaspar's absence, the others seated themselves
composedly
upon the rocks near the shore.
The first comer, Thomas Morton, was a man of middling
height, and might have numbered some forty years. His
features were regular, his hazel eye was large and laughing,
his complexion fair but sunburned, his hair and beard auburn.
His mustachios were curled upwards, and his long love locks
were arranged with the coquetry of a man, who, even in the
wilderness, seemed to value the graces of his person. His well
knit figure was arrayed in a buff colored jerkin, with slashed
sleeves, buttoned to the throat, and surmounted with a linen
ruff. Dark colored trunk hose and boots of tawny leather
completed his dress. In his girdle he wore a long sheathed
knife, with his other hunting accoutrements, and in the hollow
of his arm the fowling piece which had been so merciful to the
departed moose. His companion, Thomas Walford, was a big,
burly fellow, somewhat younger than himself, considerably
more than six feet in height, with a swart complexion and harsh
features, which were redeemed by a frank and manly
expression
.
He was carelessly dressed in a hunting shirt and leggings
of deerskin, and in his whole appearance presented a marked
contrast to his friend.
Thomas Morton, who was a prominent actor in the veritable
history which I have to relate, was a gentleman by birth and
education. His father, an officer in the English army, had
served with some distinction in the auxiliary legions under the
banner of Henry of Navarre, and losing his life on the plains
of Normandy, had bequeathed a small patrimony to his son.
The youth had, after a careful and classical preliminary
education
,
entered himself at Clifford's Inn, and after completing his
studies had been called to the bar. Here he might have
prospered
,
and for aught we know have risen to be Lord Keeper,
if, as he facetiously expressed it, he had been blessed with the
faculty of keeping any thing  or rather, he would add, if he
had not been addicted to keeping too much. He kept horses,
hounds, and hawks, every thing in short, but his terms and
his money. His career was brilliant but brief. His
patrimony
was soon exhausted. His creditors became impatient.
Endowed with a teeming imagination, a sanguine temperament,
and a vigorous constitution, he was suddenly inflamed with the
desire of making a bold dash at fortune in the El Dorado of
the west. The adventures of Raleigh, the romantic
achievements
of that poetical captain with the prosaic name of John
Smith, all the accounts brought by hundreds of nameless
voyagers to the new world, captivated his fancy. To a man
beset by Jews at home, the Gentiles of the wilderness had no
terrors. He had but few guineas left to sow, and he found
England growing barren and fallow. He determined to
transplant
himself for a season into a new atmosphere and a new soil.
Bright visions fluttered like golden singing birds around his
midnight pillow. It was the fever of the age. It is difficult to
realize the infatuation of certain classes of men at that day.
The chimeras which were rampant in that century have been
destroyed. Each age, like Saturn, devours its own children.
The feudal sovereignties, palatinates, bishoprics, manorial
lordships
,
with all the tinsel and glittering circumstance which are
getting to be but threadbare patchwork even in olden countries,
have left hardly a rag upon a bush in the western wilderness.
When Beauchamp Plantagenet,
[1]
[1]
See Note I.
of Belvil, in New Albion or
New England, Esquire, published his letters to his suzerain
lord, the right honorable and mighty Lord Edmond, by Divine
Providence lord proprietor, earl palatine, governor and
captain-general
of the Province of New Albion, and gave the most
minute directions towards planting and establishing a
magnificient
piece of secondhand feudality in the wilderness, he did not
seem a whit ridiculous. Neither Beauchamp Plantagenet nor
Thomas Morton were ridiculous, because they misapprehended
the character of the movement which was setting towards
America. They were wrong, and Thomas Morton suffered for
his misapprehension of time, place, and circumstance, but
these dreams spun their cobweb meshes around many vivid
brains. Morton grew tired of Clifford's Inn, the charms of the
Lord Keepership were dwarfed in long perspective. His debts
harassed him. His mistresses and his friends went off with
each other, leaving him to muse upon the instability of love and
friendship. An unlucky duel, in which he was so unfortunate
as desperately to wound an antagonist, whose friends were more
powerful than his sword, came to add to his difficulties. He
saw himself plunging from one scrape to another, with no hope
of extrication. And so, rapidly converting all that was left of
his patrimony into money, he suddenly embarked for America,
some half dozen years before the period at which we have
presented him to the reader.
He had at first found himself in Virginia; thence he had
wandered in a northerly direction  had visited and quarrelled
with the colonists of New Plymouth  had been with Mr.
Weston's
colony at Wessaguscus  with Captain Gorges  and
afterwards
with Captain Wollaston, at Mount Wollaston. Wollaston,
who was a man of station, had engaged with him, in his
undertaking
,
a few adventurers of his own rank, among whom was
Morton, and had brought with him a large number of persons
bound to servitude, after the manner of the day, besides
artificers
,
VOL. I. 2
mechanics and agriculturists, sufficient in his estimation to
establish a colony upon a large scale. It is needless to say that
religion had no part in this movement; and it is a striking fact,
that of the many colonies attempted in Massachusetts, none
succeeded except those which were planned and supported by
religious enthusiasm. Mr. Weston's colony had dissolved within
a year from its origination.
Captain Wollaston, who had planted himself very near his
predecessors, in the neighborhood of the hill which still
perpetuates
his name, and who had been joined by the stragglers still
remaining from previous settlements in the vicinity, found
himself
at the head of a disorderly and somewhat unmanageable
crew, and becoming discouraged, soon retired to Virginia,
taking with him a portion of his servants. The others
remained
under the nominal jurisdiction of one Filcher, whom
he had appointed as his lieutenant, for the express purpose of
conducting them to Virginia. It was now that Morton
displayed
his genius. Possessing a certain share in the adventure,
he determined to make himself master of the whole colony.
Inflaming the colonists with artful speeches, in which he warned
them that they were about to be transported to Virginia, to be
sold as slaves, and held out to them alluring prospects of wealth
and good living if they rallied under his dominion, and
remained
where they were, he easily made them the instruments
of his plan. Morton was eloquent, adroit, bold, good-humored,
and luxurious and loose in his habits and principles. The
motley
troop of adventurers desired nothing better than to serve
such a commander. They therefore exchanged their servitude
to Captain Wollaston for a nondescript vassalage to Esquire
Morton. He ruled them absolutely, for they were accustomed
to be governed, and he possessed a superiority of intellect,
education
and character, which soon gave him unbounded dominion
over them. His establishment at Mount Wollaston, the name
of which, upon his elevation to the sovereignty, he had changed
to Merry-Mount, became a central point of attraction for all the
straggling survivors of the different trading plantations which
had been begun and abandoned during the previous few years.
But while he seemed only bent upon the accumulation of wealth,
by means principally of the beaver trade and of the fisheries,
which he proposed to establish; and while his days were passed
at Merry-Mount in a round of hunting and carousing; he in
fact, in company with some other kindred spirits, was
nourishing
still bolder and more subtle schemes.
Among the original and most ardent encouragers of
plantations
in America, was a certain Sir Ferdinando Gorges, at that
time Governor of Plymouth in old England. He was a knight
of ancient family and large possessions, a devoted royalist, a
bigot for church and state, and an ardent believer in the
possibility
of establishing vast and flourishing manorial and
proprietary
colonies in America, and particularly in New England. He
had already expended large sums in attempts at colonization,
the only fruit of which, then apparent, was an infant colony at
Piscataqua, which he had founded in company with a Captain
John Mason, and whither David Thompson, a Scottish
gentleman
of education, had been sent as governor, some years
previously
to the period in which our story opens. Thompson,
however, not fascinated by the savage charms of Sagadehock,
had soon retired from his satrapcy and established himself upon
the island which still bears his name. Not only Morton,
Gardiner
,
Thompson, of Thompson's Island, and Walford, but still
other inhabitants of Massachusetts, of widely differing characters
and pursuits, seemed united in some common purpose, and bound
by a secret tie to Sir Ferdinando.
To the Plymouth brethren, Morton was a thorn which they
endeavored incessantly to pluck out and cast from them. His
whole existence seemed to them an insult, so utterly were his
character and principles opposed to their own, while at the
same time their uneasiness seemed to have a deeper cause.
His manner of dealing with the Indians, also, gave the Puritans
great annoyance. Fully impressed with that grand
characteristic
of most Englishmen, a self-relying consciousness of national
superiority, he treated the aborigines with a frank and cheerful
contempt, which was not without its philosophy. Where two
nations are mixed together, he would say, one or the other
must rule. He therefore assumed, at starting, a careless,
graceful
superiority, which rather astonished the natives, but in
the end convinced them that he was a great sachem, whom they
ought willingly to obey. He was never deluded into any
enthusiasm
for savage dignity or poetry, but found the Rising Moon,
the Floating Cloud of the North-west, and the indomitable
Buffalo
,
all very useful fellows to supply him with beaver and
deerskins
,
and rewarded them according to their activity in his
service
,
without any regard to the splendor of their lineage, or their
private exploits of heroism.
The Indians, in the vicinity of Morton's residence, were
peaceable in the main, well disposed towards the English, and
more afraid of the encroachments of the Tarentines of the
East, and the Pequods of the West, than of the pale-faced
strangers, to whom they looked up for protection as to superior
beings. Morton took the best advantage of this disposition. He
taught a few of them the use of fire-arms. But a still more
potent
agent in his scheme of dominion, he found in that gigantic
engine of mischief which was so destructive to these children
of the forest. That wizard power, like the genie of the
Arabian
fisherman, was imprisoned in a bottle. By these means
Morton had extended his system of semi-vassalage from his
white subordinates over the Indians also. His horizon opened
as he advanced. He was already grown to be a man of power
and consequence. The Indians brought him in great store of
beaver, and he began to think himself likely to realize a
colossal
fortune at last in this most lucrative trade. His more
extensive
plans of dominion were associated with those of the Knight
of Devonshire.
The other personage, Thomas Walford, was a bold
blacksmith
,
who like Morton had originally emigrated to Virginia,
but, becoming dissatisfied, had dwelt awhile with Weston's
people. Being however a man of rather solitary disposition, he
had struck out a pathway through the wilderness, and at the
period when the reader makes his acquaintance he had seated
himself at Mishawum. Upon the narrow peninsula between
Mystic and Charles rivers, and directly opposite to the
triple-headed
promontory of Shawmut, the burly blacksmith built
himself
a thatched house, which he surrounded with a palisade to
keep out the wolves and Indians. There he lived with his old
woman, as he affectionately termed the bride who had followed
his fortunes from the mother country, snapping his fingers at the
Puritans, whom, like an orthodox Episcopalian as he was, he
looked upon with aversion; and occasionally visiting his allies,
the lord of Merry-Mount, the sachem of Squantum, and the
man of mystery, at whose residence we found him at the
beginning
of the chapter, the impenetrable Sir Christopher Gardiner.
His land at Mishawum was held by a grant from the Gorges
family. He was, like Morton, an object of suspicion to the
brethren at Plymouth, and was moreover a stumbling-block in
the path of those who were contemplating the establishment of
a new and large colony in Massachusetts Bay. The grant of the
New England council to Gorges of thirty miles of land in length,
and ten in breadth, on the north-eastern side of Massachusetts
Bay, although loosely worded, was an awkward and stubborn
fact not to be circumvented, and, like his own sledge-hammer,
not likely to lose any of its weight in the hands of Walford.
2*
CHAPTER III.
THE KNIGHT OF THE SEPULCHRE.
Walford
and Morton had remained composedly upon the
beach for a few moments, when Jaspar reappeared, leaning
affectionately
upon the arm of an individual of striking appearance.
He was tall and thin, and wore a steeple-crowned hat, a short
black cloak, with a white band about his throat, and other
habiliments, of the sad color most cherished by the Puritans.
He threw off his hat, however, as he approached, looking at it
as he did so, with an expression of any thing but respect, and
displaying, upon being uncovered, a head of remarkable beauty.
His physiognomy was one of that rare character with which
time seems powerless. It was impossible from his face, any
more than from his spare but sinewy figure, and the Arab
litheness of his movements, to guess at the number of years
which had flown over him, without leaving a trace of their
passage. Thick, Antinous-like curls hung in raven masses
about a dark and thoughtful brow,  an eye, dark and
commanding
,
but whose mysterious and changeful expression
inevitably
inspired the beholder with a sentiment both of interest
and distrust, a complexion by nature or by exposure more
swarthy than belongs to his race, severely chiselled features,
and teeth glittering like a hound's through his coal black beard,
were the characteristics of his countenance. It was certain that
he had past through the ambush of young days, but how far
it was impossible to judge. Such was the individual whom men
called Sir Christopher Gardiner.
The boy was hanging upon his arm and looking fondly up
into his face, and he was followed closely by an enormous
staghound, evidently wearied with a long tramp through the
forest, but whose graceful and dignified activity seemed like his
master's to triumph over fatigue.
Good morrow, Master Merry-Mount, said he, extending his
hand to Morton; and good morning to you, worthy hermit of
Mishawum, I am sorry that my absence should have lost me
any portion of your visit to my humble abode. And how are
the revellers of Passanogessit, Master Morton? Have a care, the
shaven heads of Plymouth are keeping a sharp watch upon you.
'T is a pity you could not borrow a little of the caution of our
phlegmatic friend here, worthy Tom Walford.
To say the truth, Sir Christopher, answered Morton, I
have long since exhausted my talent at borrowing, and I doubt
if I could thrive much even upon any advance from our friend
St. Thomas the silentiary. His silence and his sledge-hammer
are both very useful tools to himself, whose only companions are
his wife and the wolves, not to speak irreverently of the virtuous
Goodwife Walford; but we must all work with the implements of
our trade, you know, and I must keep my tongue whetted, or
my brains will rust with it.
I repeat my warning, answered Gardiner, that all our
pains will be fruitless, if you are not disposed to govern yourself
and your confederates a little more rigidly. I tell you, man,
that there is great uneasiness at Plymouth.
But they certainly are not aware that your humble servant,
and their particular nightmare, Thomas Morton, the `pettifogger
of Clifford's Inn,' (as they call the most rising young barrister
who ever turned his back upon the woolsack,) has the honor of
your acquaintance.
Certainly not, answered Gardiner, you may be sure that
the mention of your name always inspires me with holy horror.
They have no suspicion that the pious Gardiner, who seeks
comfort in the refreshing bosom of their austere church
Cold comfort indeed, cried Morton, interrupting him with
an affected shudder.
That such a man as they know me to be, stooping under
the burthen of his sins, and anxious only to seat himself by the
outer door-post of the Temple of the Elect, can have sympathy
or even acquaintance with the Godless Lord of Misrule, the
disturber of the peace of Canaan, the din of whose revelry
sounds so hideously upon the ears of the saints.
As if this wide and boundless new world was discovered,
cried Morton, only that its forests might resound with their
eternal trumpets and their shawms. But let them come to
Merry-Mount themselves, they shall have better fare than
parched corn and ditch water. Let them wet their beards and
vinegar faces in our sparkling claret jugs, let them listen to a
catch led off by the mellifluous tongue of Robert Bootefish
yonder, let them look upon a wild dance of beaver coated
nymphs .
Perhaps they will make you a visit sooner than you think,
interrupted Gardiner, as Morton, after having relieved his mind
by this ebullition of spleen, lay kicking up his heels upon the
grass  now humming a snatch of a drinking song, now
muttering
to himself a quotation from his favorite Horace  perhaps
your hospitality may be put sooner to the test than you suppose;
I see you prick up your ears; take care that you keep them
where they belong. The psalm singers have got a pillory, you
know, and they are mightily expert at slicing off all superfluous
appendages.
Thank ye, Sir Kit, replied Morton. But if my tongue
endangers my ears, I have a hand, thank fortune, that shall
protect them all. I know their fingers itch for my ears  nay,
have they not already ornamented their accursed whipping-post
with one of the capital excrescences of my loyal subject,
Humprey Rednape? Does he not suffer obloquy enough at the
hands of his confederates Bootefish and Cakebread, and all the
other unfeeling varlets? Does not that content them, but would
they extend their sacrilegious shears even to the august
cartilage
of the suzerain of Merry-Mount?
I tell you, Morton, that they are no respecter of persons.
They consider you a nuisance, and they long to have you in
their power. Your ears are not worth a wolf's bounty, if they
once get you into their clutches.
The sacrilegious iconoclasts! cried the imperturbable
Morton. Verily they carry their hatred of ornaments too far.
Are not these distracted Puritans satisfied with having abolished
copes and tippets and corner caps, that they rage so carnally
even against such trifling ornaments as your humble servant's
ears? Truly their love of simplicity is unbecoming. Their
hatred of ceremony carries them too far.
You will find they will use little ceremony if they once
proceed to extremities with you.
But I tell thee, Sir Kit, they shall have nothing to do with
my extremities. I will neither lend mine ears to their counsels,
nor make a present of them to their pillories. Hang them, let
them trim their own heads, the crop-eared Israelites! Let
them purify Canaan,  but, by Plutus and Rhadamanthus, let
them beware of entering the precincts of Merry-Mount! My
Cerberus never sleeps on his post, and a single growl of his
would frighten them back to their dingy kennels, aye, even if
they were led on by the valorous Captain Shrimp himself.
If you speak of Captain Standish, interposed the
phlegmatic
Walford, who had hitherto taken but little part in the
conversation, if you speak of Captain Standish, mayhap you
may find him no baby, small as he is. He carries a two-fisted
rapier, would split your skull as easy as I could crack a
cocoanut
with my sledge-hammer, and he wears an iron pot on his
head  I know it, for I have had the tinkering of the same
would take a swinging thump as easy as my anvil, and never
the worse.
Vulcan, Vulcan, replied the unabashed Morton, your
remarks are unsavory  they smell of the shop  what is all
this about anvils and sledge-hammers? Let little Captain
Shrimp not venture to Merry-Mount. He shall find no
Wittewamotts
nor Pecksuots, I promise you  he shall be boiled in
his own iron pot, boiled, aye, and eaten too as sauce to my
salmon, the pungent little shrimp.
Mayhap you may find him a bit too peppery for your taste,
answered the honest blacksmith.
And I have a mind, interposed Sir Christopher, that
better things may be done with Captain Standish, or Captain
Shrimp, as you call him, than eating him. I have had no
interview with him yet, but such an ally as he would be
invaluable
at all events, I agree in the warning of our honest
Walford here. Be cautious, keep quiet for the present, do n't
stir up these grim fellows before the time.
Trust me for defending my strong hold, answered Morton,
more seriously. Trust me for keeping, for the present, out
of the clutches even of the puissant Shrimp.
Marry do so, said the blunt blacksmith; you'll find the
hug of a bear as soft as a young maid's arms in comparison.
But Sir Christopher has not yet informed us when he left
Plymouth
,
nor how he travelled thence.
I preferred, as you know, to travel by land and on foot,
said Sir Christopher.
The post-roads being much out of repair, interrupted the
facetious Morton.
I have been sojourning a week among the saints,
continued
Gardiner, leaving Jaspar and the faithful Sketwarroes
to keep house in my absence. I am still an humble candidate
for admission to their sanctuary, but I have ventured to broach
but little of our scheme of transplanting their colony to
Shawmut
.
Besides, I am still waiting for dispatches from Sir
Ferdinando in reply to my last letters.
As for the Indians, continued Gardiner, musingly, they
are the best friends we have  I mean in any considerable
numbers
of course  and very useful instruments I intend to make
them. I have as much reliance on a savage's sagacity and
friendship
as on a white man's. They are easily led, if you make
them look up to you as a protector and a God.
And I will say, said Morton, of my own knowledge, that
they are better fellows, and will make better Christians, than the
Puritans. Have I not converted more of the heathen, every
year, by reading the liturgy to them, than the saints will convert
in a century?
Say, rather, perverted, said Gardiner.
I say, continued Morton, warmly, that my savage
subjects
are rapidly becoming as civilized and as respectable a body
of rascals as my Christian ones.
And no such difficult matter either, said the blunt
blacksmith
,
if a body may judge from that lobster Bootefish,
yonder
.
Bootefish  Bootefish! cried Morton, in so loud a tone as
to arouse that worthy individual from the innocent slumber
which he had been enjoying in the sunshine during this
protracted
conversation. I say, Robin, he continued, with
affected
indignation, as the red faced and red coated worthy
advanced
,
stretching his long arms and his bandy legs to shake off
his lethargy; this mechanical son of Jupiter has the audacity
to call you a lobster, and moreover denies that you are a
Christian
;
what do you think of that?
Son of Jupiter, your worship  Christian, your worship!
exclaimed Bootefish, his brain evidently laboring to take in at one
effort the incongruous images suddenly presented to him, and his
small elephant eyes drowsily rolling from one of his companions
to the other; I hope I despise Christians  I mean Puritans
as a Christian Episcopalian should. Down with the Puritans!
down with the lobsters! at any rate, your worship, grumbled
the veteran, now thoroughly awake. Tell Master Walford that
if I am a lobster he had better keep out of my claws.
Bravo, Bootefish! cried Morton. Let me echo his
warning
,
Master Vulcan, in fair payment for the one you gave me
just now. A lobster is as dangerous as a shrimp, you may find;
aye, and wears as good a coat of mail to his back.
And so the sovereign of Merry-Mount, who was never so
happy as when he could quibble upon the redoubtable Miles
Standish, the hero of Plymouth, to whom he had an invincible
dislike, rubbed his hands triumphantly, as he looked at the
blacksmith.
That gigantic individual looked down with the most
benignant
expression at the ludicrous indignation of Bootefish,
without
troubling himself much about the claws to which he alluded
in so threatening a manner.
This is one of your instruments for turning savages into
Christians, then, I suppose, said he to Morton.
Christians, I defy you! said the indignant Robert; I am
head clerk and precentor at Merry-Mount, Master Walford, I
would have you to know. Head clerk and chief butler too, and
not a man to be looked down upon by a blacksmith. Who sets
all the psalms at Merry-Mount, I should like to know, but
Robert Bootefish? Who makes the responses, I humbly ask,
but Bootefish again? Who taps all the ale casks but
Bootefish
?
And Robert Bootefish, concluding his observations,
smote his breast, and looked daggers at the undisturbed
blacksmith
.
Well, well, lobster! said he, not heeding the frown which
gathered like a cloud around the shaggy brows of the clerk of
Merry-Mount at the repetition of the offensive epithet. Well,
well, said he, innocently continuing his bantering, I dare to
say, you will redden even the noses of the red men with your
liquor. As for your psalms and responses, I have n't much more
faith in such forms than the Puritans themselves, if your church
and cellar be all one, as it seems. Tell the poor devils of
savages
to follow your nose to heaven. 'T is a burning and shining
light, a beacon that is never quenched!
Bootefish's wrath was thoroughly aroused. His nose, which
might be said to be his only feature, flashed with indignation.
Plucking his knife from his sheath, he rushed, as furiously as his
duck legs would carry him, towards his provoking antagonist.
The phlegmatic blacksmith, even at that moment hardly
aware that his victim was really out of temper, looked for a few
seconds in utter astonishment at his ferocious onset, jumped
back with agility, in time to escape with only a wound on his
gigantic thumb, from a furious blow aimed at him with the
hunting knife; and then, rushing forward with the ponderous
velocity of a bull, seized his squat assailant in his iron grasp,
lifted him bodily from the ground, pitched him heels over head
some half a dozen yards through the air, and then, recovering
his composure, looked tranquilly on, as the unfortunate head
butler, after describing his parabola through the air, alighted in
a most undignified posture, directly between his two Indian
proselytes
.
These individuals, whom the facetious Morton called his serfs,
it will be remembered were the oarsmen of his boat, and had
been gravely squatting upon their hams and smoking their pipes
on the same spot, and in the same attitude, ever since their
arrival. Upon the sudden descent of the luckless Bootefish
between
them, one of them assisted him to his feet, while the
VOL. I. 3
other, with unperturbed visage, took his pipe from his mouth
and ejaculated, Ugh, is my brother hurt? and without
pausing
for a reply, he grunted  The Thunder-cloud of Mishawum
is strong; my brother is fat; he cannot wrestle with the
Thunder-cloud
of Mishawum.
Thunder-cloud be damned! muttered the pious precentor
of Merry-Mount, who, finding himself unhurt, although
marvellously
discomfitted, thought it necessary, on being picked up
and set on his legs again, to manifest a show of hostility,
although taking care to keep at a convenient distance from the
stalwart smith. The Thunder-cloud of Mishawum may thank
his stars that my foot slipped upon the grass as it did, else I
would have stuck him like a pig.
Morton, who had been enjoying the scene amazingly, while
Gardiner, hardly heeding what was going forward, had been
conversing
in an under tone with Jaspar, now stepped forward and
addressed the brooding Bootefish.
Faith, thy hand is out at wrestling, Robin, said he.
Where is thy boasted Indian hug, of which we hear so much
when there are no Indians, nor bears, nor blacksmiths, to
practise
it upon? Never did I see a man fly through the air so
buoyantly. `Ddaleo ocyor Icaro.' By my soul, the blacksmith
has given thee wings, man.
Never you mind, never you mind, your worship, muttered
his satellite, in a gloomy and threatening manner; the time
will come. Revenge I will have, as sure as he lives. The man
who injures Bootefish never went unpunished yet.
Tush, tush, man, said the good-humored Morton. Never
make such a pother about a tumble on the green sward. Never
nourish ill blood, man; 't will only make your nose redder, and
the blacksmith's jibes still saucier. Shake hands, and be friends
with him again.
Aye, said the hearty blacksmith, proffering his mighty
hand, shake hands and be friends again, Robin Bootefish.
Give us thy claw, hang me  give us thy fist, man. A body
must defend his bread basket, you know.
Does he withdraw the lobster? asked Bootefish, in a
stately manner.
He does, he does, every claw of him, answered Morton.
And if not, what is a lobster, but a church dignitary  a
red-robed
cardinal? So make haste, for I am in a hurry to be off;
and a quarrel between two such trusty friends of mine I could
never endure. So, I say, make haste  kiss, and be friends.
The worthy Bootefish relented, seizing the proffered hand of
his late antagonist with such cordiality, that it might have been
thought he intended to have literally obeyed the injunction of
his superior. The blacksmith, however, apparently not desirous
of the actual osculation he contemplated, kept him at
metaphorical
distance, and shaking his hand with an honest effusion of
friendship, bade him forgive and forget, with a good-humored
expression of countenance, which was reflected back in a sunny
glow from the face of the chief butler.
You propose visiting Master Blaxton, you say. If you do
so, please convey this packet to him, said the knight, extending
a carefully sealed paper to the blacksmith.
Willingly, Sir Christopher. It is about the turn of the tide
now, and I may as well take the parson on my way homeward.
Good day, my masters all  and good day, worthy Bootefish.
No malice now, I suppose?
None, Goodman Walford, said the pacified lobster, waving
both his claws amicably to the departing smith.
Walford's little boat was soon tossing upon the tide, and his
sail had disappeared behind the headlands of the cove, when
Gardiner observed to Morton,
A sinewy fellow, that Walford, and as tough and as true as
his own sledge-hammer. With a hundred or two of such giants,
one might conquer a world. If Standish were but upon our
side, .
I tell you, you might as well expect to turn yonder river
backwards, and make it flow to its fountain again. There is no
turning nor twisting that sturdy little shrimp. I will say that of
him, small as is the love I bear him, answered Morton.
It has been a fixed notion with Sir Ferdinando, said
Gardiner
,
that the Plymouth company, who have already been much
indebted to his exertions, might be induced to transplant
themselves
to a position which they acknowledge to be vastly more
attractive, and to settle under his jurisdiction. This would be
an immense advantage at starting, and our rivals in England,
who are bent upon outwitting him, and upon sending another
and a powerful colony to these parts, might be foiled. Let but
his charter and his commission pass the seals, with a
flourishing
colony already established, in a most admirable position,
as a nucleus, and with the reinforcements that Sir Ferdinando
and his powerful and wealthy kinsmen (to say nothing of Mason
and Lord Arundel) have promised, and leave the rest to me.
But Southcote and Rosewell, and the Vassalls, and
Saltonstalls
,
have an amazing influence; and more potent than all, are
Mr. Humphrey and Isaac Johnson, the brothers-in-law of the
powerful Earl of Lincoln. 'T is said that they actually
contemplate
removing hither themselves; and that Lady Arabella and
Lady Susan are fanatical enough to follow their husbands into
the wilderness, said Morton.
Aye, replied Gardiner, but Lord Lincoln's influence is
not so certain.
At all events, said Morton, the old Gorges patent is good
as far as it goes. I have studied at Clifford's Inn long enough
to know that.
Yes, replied the other, and it furnishes moreover, added
to actual possession, a sufficient ground for enlarging it. Trust
me, we shall yet outwit the Puritans, and if they settle at all,
they shall settle under us. Give me but men, money, and a
little time, and trust me, I will build a colony such as the world
has never seen. A powerful metropolis in the bottom of this
bay, and flourishing commercial towns at Mishawum and
Naumkeak
,
to say nothing of your Passanogessit, extensive fisheries,
and an exclusive trade with the Indians, a strong proprietary
government, a new order of nobility, a peasantry with a
bountiful
soil, and a strong government to protect them  these seem
but dreams, but they are visions which shall be history, before
many years have rolled over our heads. The Lord Palatine
of Massachusetts will soon hold his head high at home. Aye,
they shall find, perhaps, continued Gardiner, with flashing eyes,
that the worm which they thought to tread out of existence
shall turn upon them yet  the serpent is not crushed  and
they shall find his fangs have grown.
Morton, who was apparently accustomed to these occasional
ebullitions of passion from Gardiner, although he was not perhaps
thoroughly aware of all their causes, waited coolly till his
companion
was more composed, when he observed,
Your future Majesty of Massachusetts will not forget the
claims of your faithful ally and prime minister. Remember the
services of a jurisconsult, and more particularly of one familiar
with the codes of the conquered nations, will be invaluable in
our nascent empire.
I never forget friend or foe, said Gardiner, and you are
a tried and trusty friend. I would to God you were a little
more cautious one. By the way, added he, is Harry
Maudsley
still dwelling at Merry-Mount?
He is, said Morton; but he is an impracticable fellow
brave, but wayward  moody, sometimes, and passionate  and
at other times gay, and as full of reckless fun as the best, or
worst of us. I sometimes hardly know what to think of the lad.
3*
Maudsley is dangerous, said Gardiner, and I will tell you
moreover, whatever he seems, that he has a purpose here in this
wilderness, sometimes he seems to me inclined to fanaticism,
and yet I hardly know, there is something about him I should
like to fathom.
Why, do you know him so well? asked Morton, I hardly
thought you were acquainted with the lad. Have you known
him in England?
I know what I know, said Sir Christopher in a gloomy
voice, with a scowl darkening his brow  I tell you he is
dangerous  ask me no further.
The sun had by this time past far below the zenith, and thick
clouds were rolling themselves in dark and cumulous masses
from the north. The short-lived glory of an April day was
rapidly becoming obscured, the sea was black and troubled, and
the fickle breath of the sweet south-west had already sighed its
last among the leafless oaks around them.
The devil take these assassin spring days, cried Morton,
smiling hypocritically in your face, and whipping you through
the lungs with an east wind, as sharp as your rapier. I had
twenty times rather face an honest tempest, with its fog, rain, or
snow. A warm friend and a bitter enemy for me. There may
be something congenial to a Puritan's ideas in these days of
sanctimonious sunshine, chilled all the while by an east wind as
sour as their tempers, and eternal as their sermons, but not to
mine, by Jupiter.
Nor to mine, said Gardiner abstractedly.
But while I am talking of sunshine, continued Morton,
the sun is sinking into yonder mass of clouds, and the
north-easter
is beginning to pipe among the pines  I must be off.
So I say, you, Robin Bootefish, get the boat off, and look lively,
man, we have no time to lose, if the black snout of yonder
grim monster of a cloud, which has already swallowed the sun,
is not to open upon and devour us also. So be alive, Robert!
`tu, nisi ventis
Debes ludibrium, cave,'
which being interpreted, is, stir your fins, O Bootefish, if you
would escape a wet jacket.
The worthy precentor, butler, and boatswain, of the eccentric
Morton, being thus exhorted, got the boat expeditiously under
weigh, with the assistance of his two savage proselytes, and the
Lord of Merry-Mount jumped briskly aboard, having shaken
hands and warmly bade farewell to his companions.
CHAPTER IV.
THE LUDLOWS AT NAUMKEAK.
The
low, flat, narrow tongue of land, formed by two estuaries
of the Atlantic, upon which stands at this day the venerable
and wealthy city of Salem, had been, until about two years
previously to the commencement of our story, entirely without
inhabitants. The great and singular mortality, called by some
contemporary writers, the plague, which had swept away the
Indians so fearfully, at a period just previous to the arrival of
the pilgrims at Plymouth, as to prostrate their strength, and to
open their territories, as it were, to the footsteps of the white
men, had been equally terrible in its devastations along the
whole coast, and far into the interior of Massachusetts.
Naumkeak
,
if it had ever been occupied by the Indians, had, at any
rate, lost its native population, whether by death or desertion,
and was in 1626 a silent and savage wilderness, untenanted save
by the wolf and the bear.
Among those persons, numerous at that time in England, of
good quality, figure, and estate, who were disheartened by
the movement towards papacy of the English hierarchy under
the new reign of Charles I., was a certain Walter Ludlow.
Sprung of an ancient lineage, and inheriting a respectable
fortune
,
he had for the first few years of his manhood taken but
little interest in affairs, either of church or state. In that age,
however, of religious excitement, apathy upon such matters was
rare. Religion was the heart and soul of the times. The long
smothered fires lighted with torches, snatched from the funeral
piles of a thousand martyrs, were at last breaking out with
devastating fury throughout the breadth of Europe. The
flaming sword of God seemed, in the eyes of bigots and
enthusiasts
,
to wave the human race on to battle, and armies of
Christians crusading against Christians filled the air with their
hostile shouts, and shook the soil of Christendom to its centre.
From many a sacked and burning city, smoking like a sacrifice
of blood and fire to the savage Deity, whom they worshipped in
the name of Jesus of Nazareth, arose the wail of outraged
women  the shrieks of butchered age or helpless infancy,
mingled with the roar of cannon, the yells of triumph, the
curses of the dying  a confused and hideous din, by which was
manifested the baleful presence of religious war.
In such an age, to be indifferent in religious matters was
difficult. It was almost impossible to avoid being a bigot, or
enthusiast, or, what was most usual, both. Walter Ludlow,
whose soul was first awakened to deep religious contemplation,
upon the death of the wife of his youth, who was taken from
him, after they had laid their two children in the grave, became
converted to the principles of Puritanism during a brief and
accidental visit made by him at Leyden.
Ludlow was naturally a man of a melancholy and enthusiastic
character, to which his domestic affliction, and his subsequent
religious conversion, had imparted a deeper and a sterner tinge.
He despaired of seeing the day-star of a brighter morning
ever rise upon the land, and his thoughts turned to the
wilderness
.
With his young and beautiful sister, the only person near of
kin to him, who had been his sole companion at his desolate
fire-side, who had been willing to share his sorrow, as she had
shared his joy, and who deeply and enthusiastically sympathized
in his despondency as to the prospects of their religion, he had
at last embarked for New England.
Belonging to no particular religious association, he had at
first visited and sojourned awhile at the infant colony of
Plymouth
,
but, from a variety of reasons, not being satisfied with
his residence there, he had removed not a great while before the
period of our tale to the neighborhood of Naumkeak, to which
place the scanty remnant of the Cape Ann colony had removed.
It was a few days after the events recorded in the last chapter,
that Walter Ludlow and his sister Esther were wandering upon
the wild and wooded peninsula, near which they had established
their temporary home.
This chill breath from the sea, these gloomy and leafless
forests, this silent solitude which enwraps us as with a mighty
funeral pall, said Ludlow, are but a sad exchange for the soft
airs and the opening blossoms of your old home, Esther. I fear
you will bitterly repent, ere long, that you followed the fortunes
of one whom God hath stricken, and sent into the wilderness to
die.
Alas! said Esther, if the returning spring could
but warm the freezing current of your heart; if but a few
faded flowers could but revive again, which in old and happy
times blossomed about your pathway, I should regret nothing,
not even the garden flowers of England. Say rather that I
should regret only for your sake, that we have taken the
pilgrim's staff and scrip  for indeed you should have a bolder,
or at least a more elastic and hopeful heart, to struggle among
the heathen in this land of dark shadows.
Your existence was not broken like mine, said Ludlow,
your future was not like mine, a pathway through eternal snow.
Let the broken-hearted and world-weary man wear the cowl of
his solitude  let him wrap the desert about him even as a
garment of sackcloth. But I had forgotten, even thou hast
sorrow of thine own, said Ludlow, pausing for a moment,
while his sister answered him with a suppressed sigh
No, Walter, said she, I have no sorrows, no regrets of
mine own. I know to what you allude, but I have cast from
my heart an image which strove to impress itself there against
my will. A worldling, a scorner of our religion, shall never
hold the humblest place in my heart. One, who had dared to
mock at my faith, and even to sneer at your melancholy
madness
and fanaticism, as he termed it, shall never cause me one
tear of regret at leaving the land of my fathers.
Alas! said the moralizing Ludlow, the world, like the
sea, engulphs our treasures. Beneath the tossing waters of the
world how sink our proudest hopes! There, sunk forever, lie
our joys, our ambition, our love, all the ingots of our heart cast
from us in the storm, even as glittering robes, heaps of
uncounted
gold and priceless gems lie buried in the depths of
ocean! But think you, Esther, that Maudsley hath already
forgotten and forsworn you? I always thought there was much
good in him, and he might have been yet saved even as a brand
from the burning. Think you never to behold his face again?
Never, said Esther, sternly conquering an emotion which
seemed to have more power over her heart than her spirit.
Never, said she firmly, for I have set up my staff forever in
this wilderness, and have bade farewell forever to our ancient
home, and you surely cannot believe that the gay and careless
Henry Maudsley, caressed by the world, and loving its caresses,
is likely to abandon the pleasures of his youth and station in
England, to take up his abode in the deserts of the new world.
I know not, Esther, Maudsley is of an adventurous
disposition
,
impressionable, wayward, but of a deeper and a stronger
nature, I think, than you believe.
You judge him too generously, I fear, said Esther. But
what is he to us? We have looked our last upon him  for
believe me, the wilderness is no place for him  the ocean rolls
between us forever.
The conversation here ended abruptly  Ludlow saying that
he had papers to examine, turned back to their residence. This
was a rude but extensive log-house, which stood on the edge of
the forest, surrounded by a small plot of garden ground. In
its neighborhood were two smaller buildings of the same
character
,
appropriated to the half dozen bound servants whom
Ludlow had brought with him, and the whole precinct was
inclosed with a ten foot palisade, formed by unbarked trees
driven close together into the earth, presenting an humble but
picturesque appearance.
Esther sat musing long and deeply upon the rustic seat,
formed upon the stump of a gigantic oak, where she had been
conversing with her brother. It seemed a strange effect of
destiny, that so beautiful a creature, well born, accomplished,
and gifted with higher and stronger intellectual powers than
often falls to the lot of woman, should thus be seated musing
alone in that wild forest. Esther was beautiful. Her features,
although distinguished by an extreme purity of outline, possessed
great mobility and variety of expression; her fair hair was
smoothed placidly from a forehead, which, as in all classic faces,
was rather low, but of madonna-like breadth and pensiveness;
her eyes were long and full, and thoughtful rather than
passionate
.
Her sad-colored garments, of the unadorned simplicity
affected by the Puritan women of England, were not
unbecoming
to a figure slightly exceeding middle height, and possessing
the robust, healthful, but eminently feminine development
characteristic
of English beauty, and heightened her resemblance to
those types of virgin grace and purity, the early madonnas,
painted by Raphael, while something of Perrugino's severity still
lingered around his pencil.
Wearied with her solitary reflections, she at last arose and
wandered through the open glade which stretched from the edge
of the pine forest near their residence, and was ornamented
with magnificent oaks of many a century's growth, and covered
with strong coarse grass, springing in wild luxuriance from the
virgin soil. She amused herself with gathering a few violets,
almost buried in the rank verdure, and sighed as she compared
their almost scentless petals with the delicious fragrance of their
sister flowers at home.
The oaks which studded the waving sea of turf around her,
brought to her remembrance the bosky parks and ancestral trees
of England, and the early birds of spring, filling the air with
their clamorous melody, as they darted from the ground, or made
the leafless spray vocal with their love songs, soothed her
thoughts, and bore them far away to softer and fondly
remembered
scenes.
She had wandered insensibly farther from her palisaded home
than she intended, and was approaching a thickly wooded and
swampy forest of maples and birches, in which the glade was
terminated, when she was suddenly startled from her reverie, by
a low, suppressed noise, which strangely resembled the angry
growling of a dog. What was her horror upon looking up, to
behold a large wolf upon the verge of the thicket, standing
motionless with eyes glaring full upon her, twenty paces from
the spot where she stood.
The animal was as large as the largest sized dog, and might
have been mistaken for one, but for his small erect ears, pointed
snout, and long bushy tail, resembling that of a fox. Grisly
grey in color, broad breasted, lean paunched, with yellow green
eyes flashing savage fire upon her, he sat upon his haunches,
motionless, as if carved in stone, and fascinating the lonely
girl by his fixed and terrible stare.
The American wolf is a ferocious, but comparatively a
cowardly animal, and except impelled by famine is slow to
attack the human race. The winter had, however, been long
and stern, and these savage creatures had often hunted in droves
VOL. I. 4
about the neighborhood, preying upon the few domestic animals,
which the planters had brought with them, and filling the air at
midnight with their howlings. Esther was aware that the
courageous men, who inhabited that lonely wilderness, were
accustomed to encounter these brutes, single-handed, without
fear, and she had often been told that the animal would shrink
like a whipped cur from the attack of man. But thus, solitary,
and far from help, to be confronted with a ferocious beast of the
forest, was a fearful thing for a maiden nurtured all her life in
the security of a civilized land. Frozen almost to a statue with
terror, with marble cheek, rigid lips, suppressed breath, and
eyes almost starting from their sockets, she instinctively, and as
if impelled by an irresistible fascination, gazed full into the
eyes of her ferocious antagonist. The lion is fabled to crouch
submissively at a virgin's feet, but the wolf who cowers before
the strong man was never thought to be generous to the helpless.
Was it then the mysterious power of the human eye, which
seemed to exert its subtle and unfathomable influence upon that
compact mass of savage sinew, bone, and muscle, subjugating
the will which they should have instinctively obeyed, and
checking
the wild impulse which would have driven the brute, with
one savage bound, upon its prey? Could it be fear that kept the
monster motionless, crouching, but glaring still with those
eyeballs
of fire? Was it all real, or was her fearful foe but a
phantom of her heated imagination?
Her brain reeled, the vast and leafless oaks seemed to whirl
and dance around her; the mighty forest, swaying before the
rising wind, seemed to rush through the air, sweeping and
shifting from earth to heaven, as in the mad and bewildering
changes of a dream. The incessant and shrill notes of a
thousand singing birds thrilled in her ears like the warning cry
of invisible spirits. Every thing seemed to move and change
around her; there was a rushing in her ears, as of a mighty
wind, and then all seemed growing black as a funeral pall.
She roused herself from the swoon which she felt was coming
over her. It was no dream, the woods had ceased to move, save
to the gentle impulse of the morning breeze; she was alone in
the wilderness, and there stood the gaunt wolf, with his
glittering
teeth and fearful stare, motionless and threatening as
before.
She roused herself at last, and became perfectly calm. She
reflected that the beast who shrunk from the conflict with a
man, might even cower before the attack of a determined
woman.
She had a slight branch in her hand, which she had
accidentally
picked from the ground in her walk  a dried, leafless,
last year's shoot, feeble as a rush, and held in the weak hand of
a woman. But she had aroused her spirit now; her heart
throbbed
high with excitement, and the blood which had been chilled
bounded like impetuous fire through her veins. She advanced
a step forward, brandishing the weapon above her head, with her
eyes flashing full upon her adversary. The wolf sprang to his
feet, glared fixedly upon her, but stood motionless as before.
He seemed irresolute, whether to advance upon his antagonist,
or to retreat into the forest. She moved a step nearer, her nerves
quivering with strange excitement. It was a contest not of
strength, but of nerve; not of muscle, but of spirit. Her foe
remained motionless upon his feet. She advanced another step.
She was near enough to hear his suppressed breathing.
Another
,
and the wolf with a furious glare opened his armed jaws,
and uttered a long, dismal howl, which resounded fearfully
through the forest, and struck renewed terror to the heart of
the unprotected girl.
She paused again, as if paralyzed, and stood unable to
advance
or to retreat, within ten yards of the ferocious brute, who
remained still glaring, and motionless, but seeming less
intimidated
than enraged. Esther's strength began to fail her  her
prayers froze upon her lips  her eyes grew dim  but, even as
they glazed, she saw the wolf springing towards her. Suddenly
the bushes of a remote thicket cracked beneath an advancing
step; the report of a firearm rang through the wood, and the
furious beast, bounding high in air, fell stone dead at her feet.
Exhausted by emotion, overwhelmed by the sudden change
from imminent and fearful death, to life and safety again, Esther
sank insensible upon the ground. The hunter, to whose sure
but distant aim her preservation was owing, struggled slowly
through the tangled and swampy thicket through which he had
plunged to her rescue, when suddenly a tall form, in a short,
dark cloak, and steeple-crowned hat, strode down the glade from
the opposite quarter, lifted the unconscious maiden in his
arms, and bore her towards her residence. That man was Sir
Christopher Gardiner.
A moment afterwards, a young man, in hunting attire, emerged
breathless from the thicket, and stood upon the spot where
Esther Ludlow had for a few moments endured such speechless
agony, and where, but for his prompt assistance, she must have
died a fearful death.
The youth was tall and slender, but active and muscular.
His chestnut love-locks, long enough to distract the whole
congregation
at Plymouth, his clear, hazel eye, and regular features,
proclaimed his Anglo Saxon blood, which his bronzed cheek and
wild attire might have almost rendered doubtful.
Esther was gone, and there was nothing upon the sward save
the bleeding carcass of the wolf. The hunter spurned it
contemptuously
with his foot, and then leaned, lost in thought, upon
his fowling-piece.
CHAPTER V.
THE MISRULE OF MERRY-MOUNT.
We
must now shift the scene again to Massachusetts Bay; for
Naumkeak, being without the semicircle inclosed between the
points Nahant and Nantasco, was not a part of the territory
which then bore that denomination.
Upon the southern side of the bay, and a little westerly from
the mouth of Wessaguscus river, upon which the unsuccessful
plantations of Weston and Captain Gorges had been seated,
stands Mount Wollaston. It was here that the reader's
acquaintance
,
Thomas Morton, after the spot had been deserted
by the original founder of the settlement, had established his
whimsical sovereignty.
A miscellaneous collection of settlers, some of them servants
of the original proprietors, and some of them adventurers of
various degree, had crystallized about this point as a common
centre. These, with a small number of vagabond, peaceable
Indians, the broken remnant of a tribe almost annihilated by the
pestilence, and who entertained much the same kind of
veneration
for their white superior, which the savage caliban did for
Stephano and his bottle, composed the rabble rout which the
worthy Morton was fond of calling his subjects.
Merry-Mount  for by that cheerful title, most grating to the
ears of the Plymouth people, was the place now designated
was as agreeable a place for an exile's residence as could have
been found in the Bay. In the centre of a half moon, the two
horns of which curved outward to the sea, forming a broad and
sheltered basin, was a singularly shaped, long, elevated mound,
4*
rising some fifty feet above the level of the tide. It was a
natural
knoll of gravel, resembling in its uniformity an artificial
embankment
;
and although fringed about its base and its sides
by white pines and red cedars, it was in its centre entirely bare
of wood, and presented a bold front to the sea, which was
separated
from it only by a narrow strip of marsh. Beyond this
cliff, upon the right, as you looked from the hill towards the
ocean, was the broad mouth of Wessaguscus river; upon the
left, a slender creek wound its tortuous way, through a
considerable
extent of salt marsh to the sea. Beyond the creek and
the marsh, was a line of prettily indented coast, with the
picturesque
promontory of Squantum bending sharply towards the
ocean, near which, on the landward side, was a large, wooded,
island-like hammock, called Massachusetts, or the Arrow Head,
the residence, previously to the plague, of Chickatabot, sagamore
of the adjacent territory called the Massachusetts Fields. Many
gently swelling hills rose, one upon the other, beyond, thickly
crowned with white oak, hickory, and ash, whose gigantic, but
still leafless tracery, was clearly defined upon the sombre
back-ground
of the shadowy pine forests, which closed the view
towards Shawmut, and completely shut out that peninsula.
On the inland side, the eye was delighted with a soft and
beautiful panorama. As the region had long been inhabited, at
previous epochs, by the Indians, there were many open
clearings
;
and the underbrush and thicket having been, according to
their custom, constantly burned, the tall oaks and chestnuts
grew every where in unincumbered magnificence, and decorated
a sylvan scene, of rolling hills, wide expanses, and woody
dells, more tranquil and less savage than could have been
looked for in the wilderness. Seaward, from the Mount, the
view was enchanting. Round islands, tufted with ancient trees,
and looking like broken links from the chain of hills around,
seemed to float far out upon the waves, till they were one
beyond
another lost in the blue distance; while a low, but
beautifully
broken line of coast, fringed the purple expanse of the
surrounding ocean, and completed the wilderness picture, fresh
from the hand of Nature.
In a sheltered nook, at the base of the cliff, with the river on
the right, an inlet from the Atlantic in front, and embowered
with ancient oaks, stood a very large, rambling, picturesque
house, built of the unbarked trunks of colossal trees, squared,
and cemented together with clay. Adjacent was a large plot of
garden ground, and scattered around, in pretty close proximity,
were some twenty smaller log huts, interspersed occasionally
with rude Indian wigwams. A space of a dozen acres,
including
the Mount, was inclosed by a strong palisade, and upon
the summit of the hill was a small fort, provided with a couple
of murtherers, or demi-culverins.
Such was Merry-Mount, and such the domain of Thomas
Morton, suzerain of Merry-Mount, as he styled himself, and
Master of Misrule as he was designated by the Plymouth people,
to whom he was an abomination.
It was late in the afternoon of a foggy and ungenial day. A
noise of merriment within the Palace, as Morton
denominated
his log-house, caused the ancient forest to ring again. In
the principal apartment, was spread a long and ample table.
Upon the rude but capacious hearth blazed a mighty pile of
hickory logs, crackling defiance to the rain and wind that were
beating and howling without; while, for additional illumination,
were huge torches of pitch pine, stuck in pewter sconces, and
emitting a shifting but brilliant flare, which lighted up the
gathering twilight of the perverse April evening.
Seated at the head of his rude table, with pipe in mouth, and
a vast tankard at his elbow, was seated the Lord of
Merry-Mount
.
At some distance below, was seated his lieutenant,
Robin Bootefish, of the purple proboscis. Next to him was
seated a thin, spare individual, with a face like a roasted apple,
brown and puckered, with a thousand wrinkles--with glittering
black eyes--and with wild, staring, iron-grey hair, rising above
his head like a halo.
Opposite to him was a swarthy, sprawling, good-for-nothing
looking vagabond, with long legs, a short body, and monstrously
long hair, ostentatiously combed down towards his shoulders,
surmounted with a cap, slouched very much upon one side, and
ornamented with an eagle's feather. Next to him was a little
man with a yellow jerkin, yellow hose, a
yellow beard, and a yellow complexion, with a piping voice, a pointed nose,
and a restless demeanor, who was forever hopping on and off his stool,
and bobbing about from one place to another, with such
smirking
vivacity, that, in view of all these qualities, the master of
Merry-Mount had christened him the Canary Bird, although his
true name, as he would frequently aver, in the shrillest and most
chirping tones, was in reality Bernaby Doryfall. Besides these
individuals, were a few others, not worthy of being
particularized,
who were pretty much of the same stamp, all careless,
jovial vagabonds, all with pipes in their mouths, and all occupied
very indefatigably in pushing about a forum, brewed in some
magnificent, but to common minds utterly incomprehensible
manner, by the master hand of Robert Bootefish, chief butler,
head clerk and preceptor of Merry-Mount. Apart from the rest,
and very near the master of revels, sat an extremely handsom
young man, of an elegance of person and demeanor totally
distinguishing him from the principal part of the company.
Squatted upon their hams within the ample fire-place, were the
two Indians whom the reader has seen in the first chapter, and
who were grunting to each other occasionally, in some
nondescript
gutturals, which they evidently mistook for language, in
a very boosy and dignified manner.
"Robin Bootefish," said the suzerain, addressing the reader's
old acquaintance, thou deservest to be installed forever as chief
priest of the fountain of Merry-Mount. You are aware, Master
Maudsley, continued he, turning to the young man who sat on
his right, you are aware that there are many fountains of rare
and curious merit in this wilderness; so that the future Moses
who shall lead the Puritans to this Canaan, will need to smite no
rock for their water.
Truly, Master Morton, answered the young gentleman,
the fountain presided over by your butler and friend, Robert
Bootjack .
Bootefish, your honor, interposed the worthy butler with
calm dignity.
A thousand pardons, Robert Bootefish, resumed Maudsley,
is a fountain of quite sufficient merit to find in the wilderness,
and one quite equal to assuage the thirst of all the Puritans of
New Canaan. But of what other fountains do you speak?
Marry at Winnesimit, answered Morton, is a fountain of
wonderful virtue for the fair sex. 'T is said and proved that one
glass cures the most obstinate barrenness; so that we may be
sure, if the place ever comes to be settled, 't will be blessed with
a most redundant population.
A fountain haunted not by Egeria, but Lucina, said
Maudsley
;
and to what others do you allude?
Next, and in this neighborhood, replied Morton, over at
Squanto's chapel yonder, is a fountain of a most remarkable
power; for its waters cause a dead sleep of forty-eight hours to
those who drink forty-eight ounces at a draught, and so on
proportionably
.
[2]
[2]
See Note II.
And are you chymist enough to solve the mystery of its
waters? asked Maudsley.
No, truly, said the Lord of Merry-Mount, unless it be
that the Puritans of Plymouth have buried their oldest and most
soporific sermons within the grave of their honored and
red-legged
friend Squantum, who is entombed there. But,
whatever
be the cause, the fact is unquestionable. The great Powahs
were accustomed to go thither to drink of the fountain, and
when filled with its inspiration they would astonish their disciples
with the multitude and magnificence of their visions. But after
all, as you say, Master Maudsley, the fountain of Merry-Mount
for me. The worst crime that the brethren can find in me is
my merriment; but by Jupiter, 't is a complaint they will never
catch, however contagious. So what harm can I do their
saint-ships
?
Truly you seem to be a martyr indeed, Master Morton,
said Maudsley; and, considering that the brethren have no
more jurisdiction over your territory than the Khan of Tartary,
one would think they might let you alone.
And so they might; for, as you say, the devil a bit of
territory
does their patent, which they have got at last, give to them
north of yonder river of Wessaguscus. But my noise and my
mirth offends them, it seems  s'death, have they ever inquired
whether their gravity offendeth me or not? What would they
say, think you, should I issue a proclamation from this my palace
of Merry-Mount, forbidding all prophesying at Plymouth
cutting
of all anthems, and putting them upon a rigid allowance of
sermons, say one yard to the hour?
Why, I think they would be very likely, answered
Maudsley
,
to send your herald back to you abridged of his ears.
And yet I have as much lawful jurisdiction over them, as
they over the sovereign of Merry-Mount; and in the eye of
reason and equity I should be more justifiable than themselves.
Is not mirth more philosophical than tears? A plague on their
doleful dumps. You are a scholar, Master Maudsley  what
says our friend Horatius Flaccus on this point?
`Misce stultitiam consiliis brevem.'
Yes indeed, says Maudsley, to the infinite satisfaction of
Morton, adding the concluding line of the ode,
`Dulce est desipere in loco.'
So pass round the tankard, Master Morton  the jaws of
Bootefish are gaping like a stranded codfish.
How can I express my delight to you, most excellent young
man, cried Morton, almost falling upon Maudsley's neck.
You know not how I pine in these illiterate deserts for a
companion
skilled in the humanities. Saving and excepting the
grim Sir Christopher, who is a scholar as he is every thing else
on the earth beneath, there is no human being to consort with
me who has read the first book of Horace, or knows it from the
first of Chronicles. Truly, like the clown in the wilderness, in
worthy Will Shakspeare's comedy, do I resemble that most
capricious poet, honest Ovid, among the Goths. Judge, then,
of my delight in meeting with you in the wilderness.
Master Maudsley's health, cried the worthy butler, taking
a mighty pull at the tankard, wiping the froth from his beard
and handing it to his neighbor.
Master Maudsley's health, said the gentleman with the
roast-apple physiognomy, plunging his face into the flagon, and
becoming so immersed, either in the fluid or profound thought,
that he forgot to take it out again till the tankard was dry.
I say, Peter Cakebread, none of that, said the lengthy
individual with the cap and feather, taking up the empty flagon,
and ringing it discontentedly upon the table,  I never saw
such a pump. The suction of your skinny varlets passeth
indeed
.
Robin Bootefish, I'll trouble thee to supply the tank
again. After Cakebread, 't is nobody's turn, thou knowest, till
that be done. Why Peter, the Red Sea would be nothing to
thee  and thou might'st drink it up for the new Canaanites to
pass over, dry shod.
Yes, said the gentleman addressed, with his little beady
eyes, glittering like a toad's upon his brown, wrinkled face. I
thank my stars that I can look to the bottom of a tankard through
all obstacles. But thou art mighty scriptural, Humphrey
Rednape
;
anybody can see that thou hast not sojourned at Plymouth
for nothing. Marry thou hast lent an ear to the brethren indeed.
The face of the lengthy individual, who had left an ear upon
the Plymouth pillory, was suffused with passion in an instant at
the phrase. Clapping his hat still more firmly upon the side of
his head, and shaking his clenched fist at the speaker, he
vociferated
,
Peter Cakebread, have a care  if thou canst swallow every
thing, marry so cannot I. Another such cowardly allusion to
a .
As the unfortunate Rednape was chafing under the gibes of
the unpitying Cakebread, the replenished tankard was placed
before him, and, without more ado, he buried his face and his
rage together in the comforting fluid, seeking to drown the voice
of his savage tormentor. As his countenance emerged from the
tankard after a very satisfactory and refreshing pull, the taunting
voice of Cakebread, repeating his mockery, struck on his solitary
ear, and again awakened his wrath.
Take that, thou malicious old baboon, to stop thy infernal
chattering, roared he, dashing the flagon full in his enemy's
face, and then hurling the flagon itself at his head.
Cakebread escaped with the shower bath, for, ducking his
head with agility, he avoided the huge missile, which would
have assuredly put an end to his joking, if it had hit the mark at
which with hearty good-will it was aimed.
His countenance, when he again ventured to lift it from the
table, was sloppy and woe-begone enough; but the malice of his
beady eyes was not quite extinguished.
Hallo!  What is all this? cried Morton, rapping upon
the table with the hilt of his dagger. Rednape  Cakebread
what mean ye by these quarrels and cuffings Cannot ye
indulge
in the good things provided by my paternal care, without
riot?
`Natis in usum ltiti scyphis
Pugnare, Thracum est,'
which in the vernacular is, `None but blackguards break heads
with the jolly tankard'  so hold your tongues, and give ear to
my counsel.
He has but one to give, muttered the incorrigible
Cakebread
,
but in so low a tone that it escaped the attention of
Rednape
.
And what is to become of us, I should like to be informed?
chirped the Canary Bird, hopping off his stool, and running to
pick up the fallen flagon  what is to become of us, I ask?
Here be these twain  Rednape and Cakebread  have
consumed
the lining of two tankards, and the devil a drop have the
rest of us to wet our whistles withal.
Get on thy perch again, Canary, said the master of the
revels, and shut thy bill; Bootefish shall administer to thy
wants. Robert, be lively, man.
Certainly, if your honor commands, said that important
personage; but if I had my own way, not another drop
should be set on the table for a quarter of an hour. A pretty
thing, forsooth, if I, Robert Bootefish, butler, precentor, and
head clerk, am to do nothing but run to and fro, at the
command
of these wasteful vagabonds. If the good liquor, prepared
by these skilful hands, had gone to its lawful and proper place,
never a word would I say; but when I see these roystering sots
sprinkling each other's heads like cabbages, and as if the flagon
were a watering-pot, I will take it upon me to pronounce them
worse than Indians, or pagans, or heathen Puritans themselves.
VOL. I. 5
Well, well, old puncheon, chirped the impatient Doryfall,
do n't grumble any more, but stir thy stumps and the liquor. I
am as dry as an exhortation; I shall evaporate unless thou
wettest me. Life is dust, but the clay must be moistened  so
get along, old hogshead.
Take care I don't wring thy neck, Master Canary, and
spoil thy drinking forever, said the irascible Bootefish, feeling
his dignity invaded, but stumping solemnly off in search of the
desired liquor.
My name is Bernaby Doryfall, and a very good name too,
piped the good-humored Canary Bird, but call me what thou
likest, so thou starvest us not. To the health and long life of
Master Maudsley, concluded he, thrusting his bill into the
tankard which the chief butler soon placed upon the table.
The toast and tankard went round, and then other toasts and
other tankards went round and round again. The mirth grew
loud and furious. Songs to which nobody listened, glees of
discordant and unhappy sound, and catches in which every
thing was caught but the tune, succeeded each other in
bewildering
and still increasing confusion. Faster and faster flew
the flagon, louder and louder grew the uproar, thicker and
thicker rose the unceasing tobacco smoke, till it hung all over
them like a thick grey fog, through which the pine torches
wildly flashed and flared. It was a picture of wildly contrasted
light and shadow, that evening scene of frantic revelry. That
strange, rude banquet, that roughly raftered and uncouth
apartment
,
those parti-colored and half savage costumes, those swart
and bearded faces now flashing with fierce laughter, now black
with sudden anger, now softening with drunken tenderness,
were worthy of a Caravaggio's pencil.
Maudsley sat in his place, a spectator, not an actor in the
merriment. He went to the window and looked forth, and then
returned to contemplate the scene. The uproar sounded
unnaturally
in that wilderness-spot, the frequent oath, the ribald
jest, the deafening and incessant song, and shout, and yell,
broke strangely forth upon the solemn night  rang through the
stern and mirky forest, and awoke but to overpower the hooting
owl, and the howling wolf, with the wilder and more discordant
notes of humanity.
Are these the men, said Maudsley to himself, are these
the men to found an empire? Are these the pioneers of
civilization
and Christianity in this benighted but virgin world?
By such ribalds as these are colonies torn from the parent trunk,
and planted in the wilderness to blossom and grow strong?
While he was musing, the storm had increased without, and
now howled fearfully around the quaking house, the rain beat in
torrents upon the roof, while the uproar of the elements seemed
but to add fresh excitement to the furious riot of that revelling
crew within.
Suddenly a faint knocking was heard at the outer door. A
visitor, and at this time of night, and in this foul weather too!
exclaimed Morton. Bootefish, to the door, man, and admit the
wanderer.
Please your honor's worship, replied the chief butler,
very reluctant to disturb himself, 't is none of our own
company, 't is probably some tipsy heathen of an Indian or
vagrant Puritan.
Robert Bootefish, interrupted Morton, with a solemn,
theatrical, but slightly tipsy expression, it is a night, as the
worthy deer stealer of Stratford hath it,
`Wherein the cubdrawn bear would crouch,
The lion and the belly pinched wolf
Keep their fur dry .'
Aye, interrupted Maudsley in his turn, and yet perhaps
as for this poor devil,
`Unbonneted he runs.'
But the wanderer to night, unbonneted or unbreeched, sachem,
or settler, powah or Puritan, shall dry his fur at yonder fire,
while I can undo the latch; and with this the good-natured
youth anticipated the slow movements of Bootefish, and threw
the door open. Who knocks, cried he, for not a soul was
visible in the pitchy darkness.
Lo, it is I, a wanderer in the wilderness, answered a feeble
voice near the door.
Come in, wanderer of the wilderness, and shut the door
after thee, roared the jolly voice of the suzerain. Come to
the hospitable hearth of Merry-Mount
dissolve frigus
and
take a pull at the Bootefish panacea  come in man  why,
excellent well, concluded he, as Maudsley introduced a slender,
middle aged individual, in sad colored Puritanic habiliments,
faded, patched, and travel stained, who advanced bashfully
through the horde of revellers, till he arrived at the ample
fire-place
,
where he stood, in most dismally drenched condition,
with the water dripping from his thin peaked beard, oozing
from every corner of his dress, and running like a little rivulet
from the top of the tall hat which he held in his hand.
Welcome to Merry-Mount, most worthy wanderer, said
Morton, and pray whom have I the honor of addressing?
The thin, half drowned little man looked bewildered enough,
being thus suddenly brought from the wild and stormy darkness
without, into the glaring, hot, and fantastic scene, where he
now stood, a most striking and almost pathetic contrast to the
other actors of the scene. For a moment he seemed to have
lost the faculty of speech.
Take a drop of this fluid, said Bootefish, officially
waddling
forward with his tankard, mayhap it may loosen the rust
from that tongue of yours, if so be you have a tongue, and
have'nt worn it to a stump with preaching and prophecying.
The Puritan put his lips meekly to the tankard, moistened his
throat with a very little of the liquid, and then looked wistfully
at the company around him, with much the same sort of
expression
,
which a kid might wear at being suddenly introduced to a
select circle of hyenas.
Might I again solicit information touching thy baptismal
and patronymic denominations? said Morton. In other
words, might I again ask thy name? Zounds, man, don't look
as if we were all rattlesnakes  who art thou?
Lo! it is I, a poor worm and not a man, a reproach of men
and despised of the people, at last answered the wanderer in
a plaintive voice.
And that, I suppose, we are to consider a most lucid
explanation
of your appearance and present position, said Morton.
Well, well, sit down by the fire, dry your hide, and take
another pull at the jorum.
How the poor worm, as he calls himself, wriggles and
twists, said Peter Cakebread to the Canary Bird. Zounds,
I think some of the fishers of men down at new Canaan have
thrust a hook through him, and thrown him as a bait among us
here. Don't expect to catch an old sinner like me, Master
worm of the wilderness, concluded the brown faced,
beady-eyed
Peter, addressing himself to the Puritan.
Nonsense, Peter Cakebread, answered the Canary Bird,
don't suppose he comes angling for such slippery old eels as
you  your're half singed already in the devil's frying pan.
But look at the blushing Bootefish yonder, hang me, if he does
not look at the bait longingly, he is growing serious. Halloo,
Bootefish, take care, man  let not our precentor and head
clerk give attention to the wiles of the artful enemy  no
nonconformity
at Merry-Mount, you know. The liturgy and good
liquor forever!
Am I not precentor and head clerk of Merry-Mount, I
presume
to ask, said Bootefish, reddening with importance. Do
5*
I not convert the heathen Turk and Pagan Indian? Well then,
why not the heathen Puritan also? I shall catechise this stray
crop ear and illuminate his darkness, always with the leave of
your honor's worship, concluded he, looking towards Master
Morton.
Certainly, Robin, certainly, said the master of the revels,
whose delight it was to indulge his subjects in all their whims,
and to keep them merry and good natured; make as many
proselytes as thou canst, but my life for it, thou 'lt find a Puritan
more stiff necked than a sagamore, but far be it from me to
discourage your virtuous efforts.
In the meantime the poor wanderer, who evidently seemed to
feel himself more uncomfortable among these mad and riotous
vagabonds, than he had done amid the raging tempest and the
midnight gloom, from which he had recently emerged, sat by
the fire, his hands meekly clasped, his eyes piously elevated, and
an inaudible prayer upon his lips.
Take this cloak, old fellow, and cast off that drenched and
tattered garment of yours, said Maudsley, bringing a warm
cloak of ample dimensions, and wrapping it snugly about the
poor pilgrim's shivering form.
Thanks, most worthy youth, said the wanderer, looking
gratefully into the face of the young man, in whose
physiognomy
alone, of all the strange faces which surrounded him, he
seemed to read sympathy and protection. Truly my garments
are not of the driest, for lo! I am poured out like water, and
all my bones are out of joint, my heart is like wax, it is melted
in the midst of my bowels.
Then, began Bootefish, with oracular gravity, then, thou
perverse contemner of the holy mother church  then, thou
apostate from her, who would have suckled thee with her wings,
and sheltered thee in the shadow of her paps  then, if thy
bones are out of joint, here am I, Robin Bootefish, to put them
all in again, with the help of my blessed exhortations, and
with this, the veteran plucked a greasy little prayer-book, very
tattered and liquor stained, from his pocket, opened it at hap
hazard, and holding it upside down, began piously to con it
inaudibly, but with apparently great self-edification.
While this drunken foolery was going on, Maudsley and
Morton, something weary of the folly, and who wished some
private conversation, had retired into the adjoining apartment,
the suzerain having appointed Peter Cakebread to officiate in
his absence.
The rioting and folly went on still more madly, now that the
restraint of their superiors was removed from the rest of the
revellers.
Now wanderer and worm of the wilderness! exclaimed
Peter Cakebread, flinging his thin, spider legs upon the table, and
then taking a mighty pull at the flagon, now thou drunken
miscreant with the melted bowels, and the broken bones, please
inform this righteous and pious company thy name, location,
and destination  answer, and at once, Croppy, on pain of my
instantaneous displeasure.
My name, answered the Puritan meekly, is Mellowes
Faintnot Mellowes. I was some time an unworthy weaver of
Suffolkshire, in Old England  now a pilgrim in the land of
Canaan, and a sojourner in New Plymouth. I am journeying to
Naumkeak upon urgent business; after which I look intently to
return to my helpmeet and my blessed babes, whom I have left
in the wilderness.
A home in the wilderness, said Bootefish, waving his
prayer-book solemnly to and fro  a home in the wilderness,
where the altars of the blessed mother church are to be
over-thrown
before they are set up. Alas, for this benighted land!
Listen to me, thou apostate, to me Robert Bootefish,  for am I
not a babe still hanging on the refreshing bosom of the mother
church?
Lord bless him! Thou canst see the cherub was born for
hanging, interrupted Cakebread. Don't blush, Bootefish,
concluded he, with his toad-like eyes glittering with mischief,
while the solemn Bootefish grew purple with indignation at this
interference with his exhortations.
Hah, hah, hah, suddenly roared the sprawling, long-legged
Humphrey Rednape, who had been silently imbibing vast draughts
from the Merry-Mount fountain, and who had been placidly
contemplating
the gambols of his companions, without any active
participation therein.  Hah, hah, hah, he roared with
ringing
,
drunken laughter  Bootefish a cherub!  a capital jest,
'ifecks!  Bootefish, a blessed cherub! Hah, hah, hah!
Halloo, halloo  here is Rednape waked up at last, piped
the shrill voice of Canary  I thought he had got a bottle of
Squanto's fountain, and was dead to the world for eight and
forty hours! But here he is alive and kicking, and laughing too
from ear to ear at Bootefish's exhortations.
What an extensive hilarity must that be! cried the
reinstated
Cakebread  Rednape laughing from ear to ear!
Why, 't is a laugh forty miles broad, as the crow flies  since
from Merry-Mount to Plymouth .
Hold thy peace, hold thy peace! cried the peace-making
Bernaby Doryfall, stopping the mouth of the malicious
Cakebread
;
while the luckless Rednape, with his merriment changed
to wrath by the jibes of his ceaseless tormentor, was looking
round the table for some suitable missile of revenge  Hold
thy foolish tongue, Peter; and thou Humphrey Rednape, stop
thy rash hand. Here are we all, forgetting the business in hand.
Here, Faintnot Mellowes, continued he, turning to the poor
weaver, who had kept his seat in the chimney corner, shrinking
as far as possible from observation, and hoping that the attention
of his riotous companions would, by their own bickering, be
directed altogether from himself, at least till the anxiously desired
re-appearance of Master Maudsley  Here, Master Faintnot
Mellowes, some time weaver, and now an unworthy brother of
Plymouth, I propose, as thou hast forsworn connection with
New Canaan, as thou hast thyself informed us, although the
reasons are not yet communicated,  that thou be now admitted
a member of the Merry-Mount society, with the customary
ceremonies
.
The suggestion of Bernaby Doryfall was received with shouts
of applause by the drunken crew. The luckless Faintnot was
dragged from the chimney corner, by the united exertions of
Rednape, Bootefish, and the Canary Bird, and elevated, chair
and all, upon the table, where he sat, presenting, with his peaked
hat, draggled dress, and rueful countenance, an extraordinary
contrast to the wild, bacchanalian figures who surrounded him.
There he sat pilloried upon the centre of the table, mocked and
tormented by the grinning imps, who were dancing, whooping,
and chattering in mad and noisy confusion about the table.
Suddenly Bernaby Doryfall, with a shrill halloo, leaped like a
frog upon the table just behind his chair, placed both hands
upon the victim's shoulders, and vaulted over him in masterly
style, only upsetting half a score of pewter mugs and flagons as
he descended, and making an infernal clatter as he reached the
ground. He was followed by the temporary master of revels,
the wizzened, little old Cakebread, who took the leap with the
nimbleness of an ape, mopping and mowing at the Puritan as he
flew over him, and alighting upon the ground with a malicious
chuckle of triumph. The sprawling Rednape succeeded, who,
after clearing the victim's shoulders in rather a clumsy manner,
floundered upon his nose, among the cups and dishes, nearly
upset the table, and then measured his length upon the floor.
His cap and feather fell off as he did so, his long hair fell back,
and exposed the mutilated portion of his countenance to the
derision
of his companions. The clumsy Bootefish followed, who
with great difficulty was hoisted upon the table by the assistance
of his companions, and who, after waddling with ponderous but
uncertain footing a step or two forward, with the air of an
intoxicated
hippopotamus, came to a dead pause, refused the leap,
closed his eyes, gathered himself into a ball, and dropped heavily
upon the floor. The game was kept up, however, with
breathless
rapidity by the Canary Bird, Peter Cakebread and Rednape,
with one or two other subordinate and anonymous individuals;
the ceremony being concluded by the active Cakebread, who
turned half a dozen cart wheels upon the table, and then threw
a final somerset over Faintnot's head, in most brilliant and
inimitable
style.
The company now refreshed themselves with another pull at
the Merry-Mount fountain. Master Bootefish then stepped
forward
with bland dignity, presented the flagon to the poor
badgered victim, and requested him to drink it off to the health
of the Merry-Mount society. The meek weaver declined the
draught; whereat the chief butler, in great dudgeon, drank off
the larger portion himself, and threw the slops over the
prisoner's
head.
Thou art sprinkled now from the fountain of Merry-Mount,
said he solemnly, and we propose that thou shouldst henceforth
become a member of this honorable society.
Alas, alas! cried the almost exhausted and thoroughly
bewildered
Faintnot, who really believed himself in the power of
demons, and the whole scene before him one of witchcraft and
delusion; alas, alas! the dogs have compassed me  the
assembly
of the wicked have inclosed me. Is there none to help
me? No, not one.
Did I hear aright? blustered Bootefish. Dogs compass
you, indeed! and a wicked assembly, too! Why, thou canting,
heathen dog, dost dare to call the worshipful and virtuous society
of Merry-Mount a wicked assembly! Thou roystering, drunken
knave thou, how shall such insolence be punished? Humphrey
Rednape, Peter Cakebread, Bernaby Doryfall,  are ye all an
assembly of the wicked? What vengeance shall we inflict upon
this perverse slanderer?
Faintnot looked wistfully towards the door, and with
bewilderment
and fear at the threatening faces of his tormentors.
Alas, alas! he again exclaimed, is there none to save me
from the power of the dog? Whither is the kind young man
departed, and where is he, who sat but lately in authority over
ye? Shame on ye!  shame, that ye should wear the semblance
of men, and yet be as fiends and ravening wolves to destroy and
persecute the helpless and the unoffending. Put me forth again,
I beseech ye, if ye indeed be men, and not fiends; put me forth
again into the tempest and the outer darkness, and the Lord,
even the God of Jacob, shall reward ye.
Put thee forth again into this terrible storm! piped the
Canary Bird, how canst thou think it? What a blot upon the
hospitable fame of Merry-Mount; and sooth to say, thou judgest
of the free hearted revellers of Passanogessit as of the gloomy
crop-ears of New Canaan. No, my good fellow, not yet shalt
thou be dismissed into the wailing and teeth-gnashing of the
outer wilderness. Pledge us to the prosperity of Passanogessit,
and to the confusion of Canaan! he concluded, again
tendering
the oft-rejected flagon.
The poor Puritan reached the cup with evident loathing to
his lips, and looked beseechingly, as he exclaimed in broken
accents,
Truly, trouble is near me, and there is none to help. Many
bulls have compassed me,  strong bulls of Bashan have beset
me round. Men, men, have ye no pity  no charity  no
bowels of compassion? Behold, my soul and body are wearied
with travel and fasting. Is there none to save me from the lion's
mouth? Is there no help from the horns of the unicorns?
Hah, hah, hah! shouted the baboon-faced Cakebread. Hah,
hah, hah! Master Humphrey, who would have thought that the
sly dog of a Puritan psalm-singer had been an old acquaintance
of thine. Why, man, he knows thy name as well as the best of
us. Didst hear him pray for deliverance from unicorns? Can
flesh and blood bear such gibes from a Puritan? Look at him
well Humphrey, my lad, dost recognize an acquaintance? By
the lord, perhaps 't is thy executioner himself. To him, to him!
Numps, my lad. Quote him text for text; take an ear for an
ear. Crop his ears for him on the spot, Numps, roundly and
soundly  crop his ears for him, Humphrey Rednape, and thou
shalt never be jeered again by Peter Cakebread!
The long-legged unicorn sprang into the air with rapture at
Cakebread's suggestion. His hatred of the Plymouth brethren
was ancient, deep-rooted, savage, and not ungrounded. He had,
as we have stated, been dealt with by the Puritans after the
severest
fashion. For the petty offence of reviling their
magistrates
and denying their authority, during a temporary and
vagabond
residence in their neighborhood, he had, according to their
sanguinary practice, been pilloried, mutilated and banished. He
had fled to Merry-Mount for refuge; where, during his long
association
with vagabonds of similar habits to his own, he had
fed fat the grudge he owed the Plymouth people, and where
his hatred had been burned indelibly into his soul by the
ceaseless mockery of his companions. The opportunity for
revenge
,
for which he had so long panted, seemed now within his
grasp. Determined to wipe out the memory of his own
ignominy
by the heroic achievement artfully suggested by Cakebread,
smarting under the memory of his own irremediable wrong,
inflamed
by the taunting laugh of his companions, furiously drunk,
and blindly following the savage impulse of the moment, he
whipped out his sharp hunting knife, sprang with a wild halloo
upon the table, and seized the neck of the unoffending,
unresisting
weaver.
The rest of the drunken crew flocked around, encouraging
and applauding his purpose. The savage Rednape, his eyes
half starting from his head, his hands quivering with rage and
intoxication, his mouth uttering ferocious imprecations, had
already
torn off the Puritan's hat and neck-band, had seized him
by his right ear, with his knife brandished above him, when the
victim, appalled by this ignominious cruelty, uttered a yell of
horror, in so loud and piercing a tone, that even the executioner
paused for an instant, while at the same moment the door flew
violently open, and Henry Maudsley bounded into the room.
What means this mummery? he cried, in loud and angry
tones, which rang through that riotous apartment, and infused a
thrill of hope into the heart of the poor victim. Rednape
paused a moment, holding his knife suspended in the air, and
looked with an expression of cowardly ferocity, worthy of a
vulture, disturbed when feeding upon a carcase, at the angry
countenance of Maudsley.
What means this mummery? he repeated, looking fiercely
at the mob of rioters. Have ye no shame, no manly blood in
your veins, that ye stand by, like grinning apes, while this
drunken ruffian is playing such pranks as these? Leave your
hold of his neck, Master Cut-throat, and let him descend from
the place where you have pilloried him.
Hey-day, hey-day, Master Maudsley! exclaimed the
ferocious
Rednape, retaining his position upon the table, and his
hold upon his victim's neck. Hey-day! what is this
exhortation
about? Who gave you authority over me, or any of us, I
should like to be informed? Death and damnation! here goes
the psalm-singer's ear.
The victim struggled  the rioters cheered and yelled.
Rednape
brandished his knife, and would assuredly have executed
his purpose, when Maudsley sprang upon him like a tiger,
fastened
his knuckles in his throat, and hurled him headlong and
VOL. I. 6
sprawling upon the floor. Then turning to the wanderer, who
was half dead with exhaustion, excitement and mortification, he
humanely and carefully assisted him to descend from the ground,
and led him off through the mob of rioters to the door. The
revellers, confounded by his rapid and imperious style of
proceeding
,
ashamed of their excesses, and feeling a little tardy
sympathy with the persecuted pilgrim, offered but little
resistance
.
Soon after Maudsley had left the room with the weaver, whom
he had taken under his protection, the sovereign of Merry-Mount
entered, with marks of dissatisfaction upon his countenance.
How is this, my children, my lieges, he cried, how is this,
that the back of your suzerain cannot for a moment be turned, but
that his absence is a signal for riot and uproar? I am ashamed
at your conduct. I have just been succinctly informed by Master
Maudsley,  who is worth a hundred of ye, `homo ad unguem
factus'  a gentleman and a scholar, who has the bard of
Stratford
at his tongue's end, and is as familiar with Flaccus as
myself
,
I say, I have just been informed that outrages have been
attempted upon the person of this poor wayfarer which are
shocking to an ingenuous mind. I would blush for ye, but that
I see Robert Bootefish is blushing for the whole company.
Retire
,
the whole of ye! 'T is long past midnight; the butt is dry,
the torches are burnt to the sockets, and ye are all as tipsy as
wild boars.
As he concluded this oration, the despotic lord of
Merry-Mount
opened wide the door, and his obedient subjects, very
drunk and very much ashamed, trooped forth, helter-skelter, into
the darkness, bearing lighted torches in their hands, and
looking
,
as their wild figures broke vividly and fitfully upon the
midnight gloom, like a horde of gnomes about to vanish into
the bowels of the earth.
The rain had ceased, but the darkness still continued.
Morton
watched at the door till the party had dispersed into the
various cabins which were inclosed within the palisade. He
then sallied forth personally, to examine the security of his outer
defences, and having completed his rounds, returned into his
house.
In the mean time, Maudsley, who had taken the poor weaver
in charge, had conducted him to his own cottage, where he had
spread before him a supper of dried venison and Indian bread,
and had then insisted upon his reposing his weary limbs upon
his own couch, which, notwithstanding the protestations of the
humble Faintnot, he resolutely resigned to him.
The weary wanderer was soon enjoying the slumber which he
so much needed, while Maudsley, lost in thought, remained
gazing out upon the starless night. Feeling a little chilled as
he stood by the open door, he turned and took up the cloak,
which he had so good-naturedly thrown about the wanderer,
upon his first appearance at the banqueting hall of the palace.
As he he lifted the garment from the heap of tattered raiment,
which the wearer had cast from him upon retiring to rest, a
sealed letter fell upon the ground. He mechanically took it up,
and looked at the superscription. The packet was addressed,
To the honored hands of Esther Ludlow.  These with
dispatch
.
He gazed at the writing, till the waning light of the
torch expired, and left him in darkness.
CHAPTER VI.
THE BAFFLED KNIGHT.
When
Sir Christopher Gardiner lifted the prostrate form of
Esther Ludlow from the ground, and bore her to the house, he
was not aware to whose prompt assistance the preservation of
the maiden was owing. He had from a distance observed the
danger to which she was exposed, but having unluckily no
fire-arm
,
he was unable to rescue her immediately, and was rushing
down the slope to attack her enemy with his dagger, when
Maudsley's bullet laid the ferocious animal lifeless at Esther's
feet. Annoyed at being thus prevented from rendering a signal
service to the fair Puritan, he did not pause to investigate the
circumstances of the case, but while Maudsley was struggling
through the swamp, which intervened between Esther's position
and the point from which he had fired, and while his form was
still concealed by the bushes, the knight had rapidly raised the
fainting girl in his arms, and borne her to her home.
When Maudsley arrived, he was somewhat surprised to find
the unknown damsel, whom he had rescued, thus spirited away,
and his first impulse was to search for her. He observed,
however, but very indistinctly, the figure of a man in puritanic
habiliments, disappearing through the pine forest, and he then
remembered, that in the neighborhood of this spot, which he
had never before visited, was the residence of several religious
settlers. The society of such people was not congenial to him.
The only Puritan for whom, in the whole breadth of New
England
,
he had the faintest sensation of sympathy, the Puritan who
seemed to hold the thread of his fate in her hands, although
she had, in his estimation, slighted and scorned him  that
Puritan
was, as he believed, many miles away in the settlement of
New Plymouth. He had been but a short time in New
England
,
and he had not yet chosen to visit the Ludlows in their
retreat. It was partly shame at being obliged to acknowledge
the weakness of his heart, partly doubt, whether his presence
might be pleasing or not, and partly a lingering feeling of
resentment, which had restrained him from flying across the
narrow strip of wilderness, which as he deemed still separated
them, even as he had already traversed the stormy and wintry
Atlantic.
Supposing the Ludlows some sixty miles distant, he, of
course, could hardly associate the idea of his Esther with the
damsel whom, concealed by bushes and dimmed by distance, he
had seen encountering the wolf, and when he arrived at the
spot, and found that she had been carried away in safety by a
man of her own faith, her father, husband, brother, lover, he
cared not which, he was on the whole rather gratified than
otherwise. He thought, to be sure, that it would have been
rather more courteous, had the Puritan gentleman stayed till his
arrival, but he reflected that their rapid retreat had probably
saved him from listening to a thanksgiving, concluding with an
exhortation, which would have been too long for his patience,
and he felt grateful for their departure. As we have seen, he
mused a little on the circumstances, and then dismissing the
whole matter from his thoughts, he went his way.
In the mean time Gardiner had borne Esther Ludlow to her
house, where he found her brother. He was somewhat alarmed
at the situation of his sister, but the explanation of Gardiner
satisfied him, that there was no danger to be apprehended, and the
exertions of a faithful waiting woman, whom Esther had brought
with her from England, having very soon restored her exhausted
senses, he pressed Gardiner to remain at his house for the
6*
present. He had occasionally seen the knight at Plymouth,
where he was regarded as a man weary of the world, a man who
had led a life perhaps of adventure and of passion, but whose
spirit was now changed, and who had as it were taken the cowl,
and gone into the wilderness as into a convent, where he might
atone, during the rest of his days, for the follies of his worldly
career.
And it is to your prompt assistance then, said Esther, who
was now perfectly restored, and who felt almost ashamed of
having had the weakness to faint  it is to your assistance
that I am indebted for deliverance, said she, suppressing a
slight shudder, and addressing herself to Gardiner.
Alas! no, he replied; I was about to render you
assistance
,
which would have been a very easy as well as a most
welcome task, but even as I was hastening towards you, an
unknown hand from a distant thicket, Roger Conant's, perhaps,
or that of some other of your neighbors, anticipated my
intention
and destroyed your enemy. No great achievement to be
sure, for the wolf is a cowardly cur, and would certainly not
have waited for my arrival, before taking himself to flight, even
if this unknown champion had been absent.
It is strange, said Esther, that the man to whose prompt
assistance I am so much indebted, should not at least present
himself at our cottage. Was Roger Conant at his own hut,
Walter, she inquired, turning to Ludlow.
No, he had been absent since daybreak  and there was
none about his household who knew whither  I think it likely
that it was he who assisted you, and I hope I shall soon have
an opportunity, if it be so, to offer him my warmest thanks.
If it be Conant, said Esther, you may be sure that he
will absent himself, to avoid our thanks. Such an every-day
matter as destroying a wolf, he will hardly deem a matter of
triumph.
He were a more savage brute himself, exclaimed Gardiner
with enthusiasm, and looking with flashing eyes at Esther, he
were worse than a wolf himself, did he not triumph in being the
chosen instrument to rescue so precious and cherished a life
from the threatening danger  I would it had been my lot
instead of his. But Providence decreed otherwise, he
concluded
,
slightly elevating his eyes to heaven, and fearing that his
manner might have expressed more warmth than would be
acceptable.
I thank you for your kindness, said Esther, and I
certainly
do not forget, that your arm was ready and willing to
preserve me, even if no other assistance had been near.
Have you received news from England? asked Gardiner,
turning abruptly to Ludlow.
I am expecting dispatches by the way of Plymouth, was
the reply. There has been an arrival in that harbor, and one
too, by which important news have come to hand. My own
letters, which would have been addressed to me at Plymouth, are,
I trust, already on their way across the intervening wilderness,
but I am not yet in possession of them.
You are not yet aware of any details, said Gardiner, but
I think I understand you to state, that you have learned already
something of importance.
Truly, said Ludlow, of much interest to me, and to you
likewise.
Appertaining to affairs at home, or regarding our own
matters here in the wilderness? asked Gardiner.
They regard ourselves, our own colony and prospects, said
Ludlow.
And our oppressed religion no doubt? added Gardiner,
but I am anxious to know something more  I too am entirely
without advices, and pray you to impart to me whatever you
have learned.
Briefly then, said Ludlow, I am informed that a new,
serious effort is making to colonize these parts, by people of a
wholly different stamp from those who have hitherto attempted
the enterprise.
Differing from our brethren of New Plymouth, I apprehend
you to mean, said Gardiner.
Truly, said Ludlow, I did not so intend, although, to be
sure, the new colonists are different in many of their principles
from the brethren of New Plymouth. As I understand, they
are such who retain still a deep and yearning affection for our
holy mother church, and who would see her reclaimed from
her errors, and purified of her Popish gewgaws. Like my sister
and yourself and me, they would still remain in communion and
sweet fellowship with their ancient mother, and not like the
Separatists of Plymouth, tear themselves too rudely from her
arms, and fiercely refuse holy intercourse with her.
In short, said Esther, who felt a deeper and livelier
interest
than her brother in these matters, in short, the new comers
are said to be rather Puritans than Separatists. They are
nonconformists
,
who seek to establish a purified church on this side
the ocean. Separated by the mighty Atlantic, from the land of
their fathers, they would not separate in heart and spirit from
the church of their affection  but only wipe away the stain of
its errors from their own garments.
They are then Puritans, these new comers? said Gardiner,
with apparent calmness, but with a savage scowl for an instant
darkening his forehead.
They are so, said Esther, answering his question, and not
observing the expression of his face. But my brother meant,
when he called them men of a different stamp from the former
settlers in this wilderness, that they differed widely from the idle
and dissolute, who have sought these shores, not for conscience
sake, but in the sordid hope of gain and worldly advantage.
Let us not speak of them, said Gardiner, but of the new
comers. You say they are Puritans and not Separatist
can you tell me by what right they come into this
neighborhood
?
We have not yet, as my brother has mentioned, learned the
details, but we hear that a company of pious and energetic
people has been formed, numbering among them many men of
station and fortune, and that this company has obtained from
the council of New England, a grant of the whole territory of
Massachusetts Bay.
Aha, muttered Gardiner to himself, grinding his teeth
savagely, and looking black as a demon, upon the madonna face
of the beautiful Puritan, to whom he was listening. Aha,
then Sir Ferdinando has been baffled indeed. And pray can
you inform me, added he aloud, and in the blandest tones,
can you inform me whether such a grant has actually been
obtained, and the patent already executed?
Such is the story, answered Esther. But if your own
letters do not reach you sooner, I trust we shall soon be able to
give you more ample information, when our messenger from
New Plymouth shall have arrived.
'T is very strange, muttered the knight to himself, that I
am left thus in the dark. Either Blaxton must have dispatches
for me, or they have miscarried altogether. Sir Ferdinando
could never have intended that I should be thus groping in
ignorance
of such important matters. I crave your pardon, lady,
said he aloud, for having given you so much trouble by my
earnest desire for information. An exile, you know, as well as
any other, thirsts for knowledge of affairs at home. I thank
you for your kindness, and with your permission will now wish
you good morrow. So saying, Sir Christopher courteously
saluted Ludlow and his sister, passed rapidly across the glade,
and disappeared in the forest.
The knight seems troubled and disconcerted, said Ludlow
to his sister, after their guest had departed.
He seemed perplexed and strangely affected, answered
Esther, at the information which we have received from
England  why his anxiety should be thus excited, I hardly
know. 'T is a strange, moody man, whose mind seems to
me as impenetrable as his visage. I know not why, but he
inspires me with any thing but confidence.
Nay, you judge him harshly, said Walter Ludlow;
Gardiner
is, like myself, perhaps, a broken-spirited man,
melancholy
and solitary, but not therefore to be distrusted.
It is unnecessary to make further record of the Ludlows'
conversation, as we have at this time more to do with the knight
who had left the cottage.
CHAPTER VII.
BIOGRAPHICAL AND HISTORICAL.
It
was very natural that Sir Christopher Gardiner should have
been exceedingly perplexed at the information which he had
received
,
in such a fragmentary manner, from the Ludlows. He
had received nothing by the recent arrival from England, and
according to the tenor of his former letters, affairs had been in
a very hopeful train for the advancement of his own plans.
Just previously to Gardiner's arrival in New England, Sir
Ferdinando had meditated a great change in his schemes. His
fertile imagination suggested to him, that one great obstacle to
his success, lay in the New England Council  of which,
although he was one of its most influential members, he was,
after all, only a fraction, and consequently often hampered in
his plans by want of sympathy, or by direct opposition on the
part of his associates. Another difficulty with which he had to
contend, lay in the instruments with which he had been obliged
to work. He had been disappointed that he had been unable to
inspire his son with any of his enthusiasm. The pictures which
he painted to him did not dazzle him at all. But, while Sir
Ferdinando was casting anxiously about him, and regretting that
the character of his son altogether unfitted him from taking any
part in his design, it so happened that circumstances took him
to the continent, and he chanced one day to meet Sir
Christopher
Gardiner at Madrid. Circumstances which we have not
yet time to explain, and an intimate connection with the Gorges
family, which will probably develop itself more fully as this
history
proceeds, had made the elder and younger knights familiar
with each other. Gardiner had then but recently appeared, after
nearly twenty years' absence in foreign climes, during which he
had been disinherited. Strange adventures, in which he had
been an actor, had from time to time been whispered in
England
.
He had been a pilgrim to the Holy Land  he had been
in many battles, by sea and land, and in the service of many
states. He had dwelt long in Venice, that marble portal
through which so long had flowed the commerce of the world,
and dwelt there in some important, but mysterious capacity. It
was certain that he had been engaged in the celebrated mock
conspiracy of the Duke d'Ossuna against the Republic, in which
the subordinates all lost their lives, while he preserved not only
his head, but increased both his credit and his fortune.
Disguised
as a barefooted friar, he had repeatedly passed between
Naples and Venice, without even exciting a suspicion; and
throughout the whole drama, even to the explosion of the
conspiracy
,
he had been the right hand and most trusty agent of the
Duke, in all his daring, subtle, but unsuccessful schemes. At
this juncture he had suddenly disappeared, as if the earth had
swallowed him. And after men had done speculating, whether
he had been sunk in the lagoons, or whether his friend, the
Viceroy
of the Sicilies, had popped him into the crater of Etna, to
prevent any inconvenient blabbing, he had suddenly, after a
long interval, re-appeared in England, which he had left a boy,
and where no man knew his face. Some said he had not always
borne the name he bore. Some whispered that there were
potent
reasons for disguise. That he had commanded a band of
Uscoques, or Dalmatian pirates, was believed by some; while
others were perfectly certain that he had distinguished himself
in a memorable action, in which the gallies of the Knights of
St. John had utterly routed and destroyed these scourges of the
Adriatic. He was indeed generally believed to have been a
Knight of Malta; and if so, he was probably not an Uscoque.
At the same time, it was currently reported that he had married
an English woman of rank and fortune in Rome, and repudiated
her soon afterward for a Cardinal's hat, with the Pope's triple
crown in perspective. Missing the election to St. Peter's chair
by a single vote, they said he had thrown down his hat in a rage,
and had suddenly bolted to the East. Here he was known to
have resided a long time, and was suspected by many wiseacres
of having adopted the koran and the turban, and to have been
rewarded with the pachalic over a dozen different provinces,
whence he was only removed to occupy the station of grand
vizier. Hence he was again driven, by a wild passion which
the chief sultana conceived for him. Reciprocating the
sentiment
,
but averse to the bowstring, he had made his escape with
the assistance of the chief eunuch; and while the unfortunate
Fatima was sinking to the bottom of the Bosphorus, he was
heartlessly skimming across its surface in the swiftest of feluccas.
The thread of his adventures was snapped again at this moment;
but the wiseacres, tracking him like bloodhounds, came up some
how or other with him in Spain, where he had gone to visit his
friend, the Duke d'Ossuna, who had returned to his country and
made his peace at court. Thence, people said he had been
startled by the unlooked for appearance of his wife, who, after
dodging him through all his windings, from Venice through the
Cardinal's college to the Levant, and so across the
Mediterranean
to Spain, had suddenly confronted him in the Escurial.
Giving her the slip, he appeared to have found the seven-leagued
boots, and to have dashed off again to the world's end. The
wiseacres were once more baffled.
A little only of the nonsense which had been talked about him,
may indicate the estimation in which he had at one time been
held, and even shadow forth the probable character of the man
about whom so much mysterious folly had been engendered.
And yet there were undoubtedly a good many truths mixed with
VOL. I. 7
the absurd gossip which was so greedily swallowed. This
history
may probably eliminate the real from the fanciful;  but
at present we are only concerned to account for his intimacy
with Sir Ferdinando Gorges. That doughty old knight, and
most brilliant of schemers, almost fainted upon Gardiner's neck
when he discovered him. He had known him long and well;
and without stating at present the precise relation in which they
stood, let it suffice, that never were two persons better adapted
to be useful and serviceable to each other. Gardiner was very
ready to recommence his adventures on a new scene. His
battered
fortunes, he thought, would be admirably recruited by the
creation of a magnificent county palatine in the El Dorado; and
his jaded imagination, palled by his varied and chequered
adventures
in the moss-grown world, where he had run his race,
plumed her wings, and soared high again as the visions of a
new empire in a virgin world flashed across him for the first
time.
As for Sir Ferdinando, he probably knew how much to
believe
of the various adventures reported  not by Sir Christopher
himself, however, for he was silent and impenetrable  of that
adventurous personage. He cared not whether he was monk or
martyr, Turk or Christian, Knight of Malta or Dalmatian pirate,
cardinal, pope, or vizier. He knew his character thoroughly;
knew that no better man could possibly be found in the breadth
of England for his purposes. Trained from boyhood to the use
of every weapon, insensible to fatigue, calm in danger, subtle
in scheming, prompt in action, commanding in person, and
above all, untroubled with that inconvenient companion, a
conscience
,
Sir Christopher seemed to have been expressly
compounded
for his great designs.
Gardiner's patience had however been severely tried. To a
man of his impetuous nature, the languor which seemed to
characterize all the proceedings of his English confederates
caused much annoyance, and the inactivity to which it
doomed him became inexpressibly galling. Saving the society
of Jaspar, and the occasional companionship of the suzerain of
Merry-Mount, to which potentate he imparted just as much, or
as little as he chose, of his own thoughts, his life was passed
either in solitude or in masquerade.
Gardiner, however, possessed a deep knowledge of human
nature, and reading Morton's character at a glance, he saw how
much assistance might be derived from his various qualities and
accomplishments, although his flippancy and recklessness caused
him great uneasiness. In his intercourse with the brethren
at I lymouth, whom he visited in the demure character of a
spiritually-minded and contrite man, he had found how much
irritation existed in the minds of those holy men at the madcap
freaks of Morton and his ragamuffin subjects.
The news which Gardiner had just gathered was very
perplexing
.
The vessel which brought the intelligence seemed to
have arrived at Plymouth directly after his last visit to that place,
and he now found that by hurrying away he had only gained an
increase of anxiety. As the Ludlows informed him that a new
company of Puritans had obtained a patent from the New
England
Council, it seemed pretty certain that Sir Ferdinando's
efforts had been foiled, and that the contemplated dissolution
of the New England Council and division of its territory was
as far off as ever. This new movement disconcerted all his
schemes. His plan, which to a sanguine and scheming nature
like his, seemed not impracticable, of transferring the Plymouth
company to Shawmut, to hold their territory  although that,
of course, was to be kept a secret from them at present
under a grant from himself, when he should have become lord
proprietor of the whole province; and of occupying all the
important points upon the coast with colonists upon whom he
could rely, required a considerable reinforcement in men,
money, and every kind of material from England. Concerning
this matter he had repeatedly written to Sir Ferdinando, and
he was anxiously expecting the arrival, during the summer, of at
least a thousand picked men  fellows who had served abroad,
and had been accustomed to a life of adventure  who were to
be occupied in building fortifications at first, and afterwards in
agriculture, fishing, and Indian trading.
Gardiner was at a loss how to act at present. Sir Ferdinando
must have written to him, but his letters might be still at
Plymouth
;
or they might have been intrusted to some messenger;
or they might have been inclosed, as for particular reasons had
sometimes been done, under cover to William Blaxton, the
Solitary
of Shawmut.
While the knight was ruminating upon these matters, the day
was fast declining. At the moment when he had parted from
the Ludlows, he had intended to proceed immediately to his
boat, which he had moored in a little cove about a mile from
their residence. Lost in meditation, however, he had loitered
in the forest longer than he had intended, and he was aroused at
last upon perceiving the almost level beams of the sun piercing
through the mighty pines around. Finding, moreover, that his
thoughts were occasionally wandering from the grave matters
which immediately engaged his attention, to the marble brow
and chiselled features of the beautiful Esther, he checked the
vagrant current of his reflections, and hurried with a rapid and
impatient step to the shore. He found his faithful Indian
attendant
seated in the boat, and wondering what had become of
his master. Sketwarroes was an invaluable acquisition, which
Gardiner had made in England. He had been one of a number
of savages kidnapped in the south-eastern region of New
England
,
by the infamous captain Hunt, and by him sold into slavery.
He had been, however, rescued, brought to England, and
protected
by Sir Ferdinando Gorges, in whose service he had
remained several years; so that the English language being
familiar to him, his services as an interpreter were very valuable
to Gardiner, to whom his friend Sir Ferdinando had intrusted
him.
The sun went down, as the little boat, spreading her light sail
to a faint easterly breeze, slowly cleft her way across the purple
waves. It was already dusk when the first great headland which
interposes itself between Naumkeak and the outer promontory
of Massachusetts Bay was rounded, and within an hour
afterward
it fell a flat calm, before a quarter of the little voyage had
been completed.
After watching the stars till past midnight, and waiting in vain
for the faintest breath of wind from any quarter of the horizon,
Gardiner abandoned the helm to Sketwarroes, wrapped himself
in his cloak, and stretched himself calmly to sleep in the bottom
of the boat.
7*
CHAPTER VIII.
THE SOLITARY OF SHAWMUT.
Upon
the afternoon of that same day, a single figure sat upon
the highest peak of the triple-headed promontory of Shawmut.
Around him was spread the lovely panorama, which still, but
with diminished beauty, surrounds the picturesque city of
Boston.
A solitary figure sat upon the summit of Shawmut. He was
a man of about thirty years of age, somewhat above the middle
height, slender in form, with a pale, thoughtful face. He wore
a confused, dark-colored, half canonical dress, with a grey
broad-leaved hat strung with shells, like an ancient palmer's,
and slouched back from his pensive brow, around which his
prematurely grey hair fell in heavy curls, far down upon his
neck. He had a wallet at his side, a hammer in his girdle, and
a long staff in his hand. The hermit of Shawmut looked out
upon a scene of winning beauty. The promontory resembled
rather two islands than a peninsula, although it was anchored to
the continent by a long slender thread of land, which seemed
hardly to restrain it from floating out to join its sister islands,
which were thickly strewn about the bay. The peak upon
which the hermit sat, was the highest of the three cliffs of the
peninsula; upon the south-east, and very near him, rose another
hill of lesser height and more rounded form, and upon the other
side, and towards the north, a third craggy peak presented its
bold and elevated front to the ocean. Thus the whole peninsula
was made up of three lofty crags. It was from this triple
conformation
of the promontory of Shawmut, that was derived the
appellation of Trimountain, or Tremont, which it soon
afterwards
received.
The vast conical shadows were projected eastwardly, as the
hermit, with his back to the declining sun, looked out upon the
sea.
The bay was spread out at his feet in a broad semicircle,
with its extreme headlands vanishing in the hazy distance, while
beyond rolled the vast expanse of ocean, with no spot of
habitable
earth beyond those outermost barriers, and that far distant
fatherland, which the exile had left forever. Not a solitary sail
whitened those purple waves, and saving the wing of the sea
gull, which now and then flashed in the sunshine, or gleamed
across the dimness of the eastern horizon, the solitude was at
the moment unbroken by a single movement of animated nature.
An intense and breathless silence enwrapped the scene with a
vast and mystic veil. The bay presented a spectacle of great
beauty. It was not that the outlines of the coast around it were
broken into those jagged and cloud-like masses, that picturesque
and startling scenery where precipitous crag, infinite abyss, and
roaring surge unite to awaken stern and sublime emotions; on
the contrary, the gentle loveliness of this transatlantic scene
inspired a soothing melancholy, more congenial to the
contemplative
character of its solitary occupant. The bay secluded
within its forest-crowned hills, decorated with its necklace of
emerald islands, with its dark blue waters gilded with the rays of
the western sun, and its shadowy forests of unknown antiquity,
expanding into infinite depths around, was an image of fresh
and virgin beauty, a fitting type of a new world, unadorned by
art, unploughed by industry, unscathed by war, wearing none of
the thousand priceless jewels of civilization, and unpolluted by
its thousand crimes  springing, as it were, from the bosom of
the ocean, cool, dripping, sparkling, and fresh from the hand of
its Creator.
On the left, as the pilgrim sat with his face to the east, the
outlines of the coast were comparatively low, but broken into
gentle and pleasing forms. Immediately at his feet lay a larger
island, in extent nearly equal to the peninsula of Shawmut,
covered with mighty forest trees, and, at that day, untenanted
by a human being  although but a short time afterwards it
became the residence of a distinguished pioneer. Outside this
bulwark, a chain of thickly wooded islets, stretched across
from shore to shore, with but one or two narrow channels
between, presenting a picturesque and effectual barrier to the
boisterous storms of ocean. They seemed like naiads, those
islets lifting above the billows their gentle heads, crowned with
the budding garlands of the spring, and circling hand in hand,
like protective deities about the scene.
On the south, beyond the narrow tongue of land, which
bound the peninsula to the main, and which was so slender
that the spray from the eastern side was often dashed across it
into the calmer cove of the west, rose in the immediate
distance
,
that long boldly broken, purple-colored ridge, called
the Massachusetts, or Mount Arrow Head, by the natives, and
by the first English discoverer baptized the Cheviot Hills.
[3]
[3]
See Note III.
On
their left, and within the deep curve of the coast, were the
slightly elevated heights of Passanogessit or Merry-Mount, and
on their right stretched the broad forest, hill beyond hill, away.
Towards the west and north-west, the eye wandered over a vast
undulating panorama of gently rolling heights, upon whose
summits the gigantic pine forests, with their towering tops
piercing the clouds, were darkly shadowed upon the western
sky, while in the dim distance, far above, and beyond the whole,
visible only through a cloudless atmosphere, rose the airy
summits
of the Wachusett, Watatick, and Monadnock Mountains.
Upon the inland side, at the base of the hill, the Quinobequin
River, which Smith had already christened with the royal name
of his unhappy patron, Charles, might be seen writhing in its
slow and tortuous course, like a wounded serpent, till it lost
itself in the blue and beautiful cove which spread around the
whole western edge of the peninsula, and within the same
basin, directly opposite the northern peak of Shawmut, advanced
the bold and craggy promontory of Mishawum, where Walford,
the solitary smith, had built his thatched and palisaded house.
The blue thread of the River Mystic, which here mingled its
waters with the Charles, gleamed for a moment beyond the
heights of Mishawum, and then vanished into the frowning forest.
Such was the scene, upon a bright afternoon of spring, which
spread before the eyes of the solitary William Blaxton, the
hermit of Shawmut. It was a simple but sublime image, that
gentle exile in his sylvan solitude. It was a simple but sublime
thought which placed him and sustained him in his lone retreat.
In all ages, there seem to exist men who have no appointed
place in the world. They are before their age in their
aspirations
,
above it in their contemplation, but behind it in their
capacity for action. Keen to detect the follies and the
inconsistencies
which surround them, shrinking from the contact and
the friction of the rough and boisterous world without, and
building within the solitude of their meditations the airy fabric
of a regenerated and purified existence, they pass their nights in
unproductive study, and their days in dreams. With
intelligence
bright and copious enough to illuminate and to warm the
chill atmosphere of the surrounding world, if the scattered rays
were concentrated, but with an inability or disinclination to
impress themselves upon other minds, they pass their lives
without obtaining a result, and their characters dwarfed by their
distance from the actual universe, acquire an apparent
indistinctness
and feebleness, which in reality does not belong to them.
The impending revolution in church and state, which hung
like a gathering thundercloud above England's devoted head,
was exciting to the stronger spirits, whether of mischief or of
virtue, who rejoiced to mingle in the elemental war, and to
plunge into the rolling surge of the world's events, while to the
timid, the hesitating, and the languid, it rose like a dark and
threatening phantom, scaring them into solitude, or urging them
to seek repose and safety in obscurity. Thus there may be
men whose spirits are in advance of their age, while still the
current of the world flows rapidly past them.
Of such men, and of such instincts, was the solitary who sat
on the cliffs of Shawmut. Forswearing the country of his birth
and early manhood, where there seemed in the present state of
her affairs no possibility that minds like his could develop or
sustain themselves  dropping as it were, like a premature and
unripened fruit, from the bough where its blossoms had first
unfolded
he had wandered into voluntary exile, with hardly a
regret. Debarred from ministering at the altar to which he had
consecrated his youth, because unable to comply with mummery
at which his soul revolted, he had become a high-priest of
nature, and had reared a pure and solitary altar in the
wilderness
.
He had dwelt in this solitude for three or four years, and
had found in the contemplation of nature, in the liberty of
conscience
,
in solitary study and self-communing, a solace for the
ills he had suffered, and a recompense for the world he had
turned his back upon forever.
His spirit was a prophetic spirit, and his virtues belonged not
to his times. In an age which regarded toleration as a crime,
he had the courage to cultivate it as a virtue. In an age in
which liberty of conscience was considered fearful
licentiousness
,
he left his fatherland to obtain it, and was as ready to
rebuke the intolerant tyranny of the nonconformist of the
wilderness
,
as he had been to resist the bigotry and persecution of
the prelacy at home. In short, the soul of the gentle hermit flew
upon pure white wings before its age, but it flew, like the dove,
to the wilderness. Wanting both power and inclination to act
upon others, he became, not a reformer, but a recluse. Having
enjoyed and improved a classical education at the university of
Cambridge, he was a thorough and an elegant scholar. He was
likewise a profound observer, and a student of nature in all her
external manifestations, and loved to theorize and to dream in
the various walks of science. The botanical and mineralogical
wonders of the new world were to him the objects of unceasing
speculation, and he loved to proceed from the known to the
unknown
,
and to weave fine chains of thought, which to his soaring
fancy served to bind the actual to the unseen and the spiritual,
and upon which, as upon the celestial ladder in the patriarch's
vision, he could dream that the angels of the Lord were
descending
to earth from heaven.
The day was fast declining, as the solitary still sat upon the
peak and mused. He arose as the sun was sinking below the
forest-crowned hills which girt his sylvan hermitage, and gazed
steadfastly towards the west.
Another day, he said, hath shone upon my lonely path,
another day hath joined the buried ages which have folded their
wings beneath yon glowing west, leaving in their noiseless flight
across this virgin world no trace nor relic of their passage.
'T is strange  't is fearful  this eternal and unbroken silence.
Upon what fitful and checkered scenes hath yonder sun looked
down in other lands, even in the course of this single day's
career. Events, as thickly studded as the stars of heaven, have
clustered and shone forth beneath his rays, even as his glowing
chariot-wheels performed their daily course; and here, in this
mysterious and speechless world, as if a spell of
enchantment
lay upon it, the silence is unbroken, the whole face of
nature still dewy and fresh. The step of civilization hath not
adorned nor polluted the surface of this wilderness. No stately
temples gleam in yonder valleys, no storied monument nor
aspiring
shaft pierce yonder floating clouds  no mighty cities,
swarming with life, filled to bursting with the ten thousand
attendants
of civilized humanity, luxury and want, pampered sloth,
struggling industry, disease, crime, riot, pestilence, death  all
hotly pent within their narrow precincts  encumber yon
sweeping
plains; no peaceful villages, clinging to ancient, ivy-mantled
churches  no teeming fields, spreading their vast and
nourishing
bosoms to the toiling thousands,  meet this wandering
gaze. No cheerful chime of vesper bell, no peaceful low of the
returning kine, no watch-dog's bark, no merry shout of
children's
innocent voices, no floating music from the shepherd's
pipe, no old familiar sounds of humanity, break on this listening
ear. No snowy sail shines on yon eternal ocean, its blue
expanse
unruffled and unmarred as the azure heaven; and ah
no crimson banners float the sky, and no embattled hosts shake
with their martial tread this silent earth. 'T is silence and
mystery
all. Shall it be ever thus? Shall this green and beautiful
world, which so long hath slept invisibly at the side of its ancient
sister, still wear its virgin wreath unsoiled by passion and
pollution
?
Shall this new, vast page in the broad history of man,
remain unsullied, or shall it soon flutter in the storm-winds of
fate, and be stamped with the same iron record, the same dreary
catalogue of misery and crime, which fills the chronicle of the
elder world? 'T is passing strange, this sudden apocalypse!
Lo is it not as if the universe, the narrow universe which
bounded men's thoughts in ages past, had swung open, as if by
an almighty fiat, and spread wide its eastern and western wings
at once, to shelter the myriads of the human race?
The hermit arose, slowly collected a few simples which he had
culled from the wilderness, a few roots of early spring flowers
which he destined for his garden, and stored them in his wallet,
and then grasping his long staff, began slowly to descend the
hill.
As the slender form of the exile, with his sad-colored garb
and pilgrim's scrip and staff, stood out in dark relief against the
western sky, the only human figure in that solitude, he seemed
almost a creation of the fancy, a pathetic but sublime image,
contrasting and yet harmonizing in a wild and mystic sense with
the wilderness scene around. He slowly descended the steep
south-western declivity of the hill where he had so long been
musing, and which, broken with crags, and here and there
thickly overgrown with large trees, whose ponderous branches
stretched across his path, presented a rough and uncertain
footing
to the wanderer. After a few minutes' walk, he reached a
wide and open glade, which was spread out at the base of the
hill and along the secluded basin which received the waters of
the Charles. The undulating surface of this grassy expanse
was studded with many detached and magnificent forest trees,
principally white oaks, hickory, and elms, and presented the
appearance of a natural park of some fifty acres, fringed towards
the water with a thick growth of maples, alders, and birches.
At the base of the hill which rose abruptly to the north and
east, facing southwardly upon the open park, and having the
broad and beautiful cove upon its right, stood the cottage of
Blaxton.
It was a startling and impressive picture of cultivation and
refinement that little cottage, embowered in freshly budding
vines, surrounded by a garden laid out with artistic elegance,
and backed by a young and thrifty orchard. It was an English
homestead, starting as if by magic out of the bosom of that
vast wilderness, and stirring the deepest fountains of feeling
with its placid beauty. It was the first gladdening footsteps of
culture; it was as if Minerva, mother of all humanizing arts,
had according to the ancient fable, just stamped her foot upon
VOL. I. 8
the virgin soil and the olive of civilization had leaped forth to
greet her coming.
The house was built in those picturesque forms which were
then so common in England. It was low-browed, irregular,
rambling, with sharp-pointed gables, a red-tiled roof, small
lattice windows with diamond panes, and a porch covered thickly
with woodbines. The materials of which it had been
constructed
had been brought from England, and it resembled in
its general character a miniature parsonage. The early swallows
built their nests under its eaves, and the ancient crows with
sable stole and solemn note circled about the surrounding pines,
or rested in dark clusters upon their umbrageous tops. The
young orchard had but just come into bearing, indicating the
length of time during which the exile had made his abode here,
and the spring being earlier than common in that region, the
pink flakes of the peach blossoms were strewn already upon the
ground, while from the young and blushing buds upon the apple
boughs a faint fragrance diffused itself upon the evening breeze.
Between the cottage and the water's edge stood a single pine of
enormous height, the growth of centuries, its massive but
tapering
trunk, rising like a colossal shaft to a dizzy height, bare of
branches till near the summit, and then throwing out those wild,
wizard boughs, crowned with eternal verdure, and murmuring
unceasing music, which make this tree so picturesque and
remarkable
.
In the fork of one of these arms was the large and
rudely raftered nest of an osprey or fish-hawk, who haunted the
same spot year after year, unscared by the gentle hermit who
had made him one of his most cherished companions. The
precinct around the house, garden, and orchard was separated
from the water and the great park in front, by a wild and
impenetrable
fence of upturned roots, the skeleton remains of the
forest giants which had been felled, or had fallen in natural
decay, and was thus protected from the wolves and other enemies
by a natural and very effective barrier. Upon the western confine
of this inclosure,
[4]
[4]
See Note IV.
and very near the pebbly margin of the shore,
a pure and sparkling fountain, the silver spring from which the
whole promontory of Shawmut derived its name, welled forth
from the deep black mould, amid a thicket of shrubs and
interlacing
vines, and was overshadowed by a rustic arbor, which
the graceful care of Blaxton had raised as a temple to the
water nymph whom he looked upon as the presiding deity of his
rural domain.
Blaxton passed through the entrance to his hermitage,
lingered
a moment in his garden, and entered the house.
A cheerful fire of hickory logs looked invitingly to him as he
came in from the chill atmosphere. The room in which he sat
was his innermost sanctuary. He had brought with him what in
those days was no contemptible library, and the tall dark folios,
some two hundred in number, were ranged in a dark, antique,
bookcase against the walls of the silent apartment. A large
table, encumbered with books and manuscripts, stood in a
corner, and an ample cabinet, stored with a considerable number
of specimens of natural history, occupied a whole side of the
room.
Welcome, friends of my solitude, he exclaimed, as his eye
looked complacently upon his dumb but eloquent companions.
Welcome, ye sages of the olden time; welcome, ye bards whose
strains, enshrined in the eternal crystal of a buried language,
are ever redolent of youth and joy, breathing as freshly here
upon this silent wilderness as once, attuned to classic lyres and
gushing from the reedy voices of garlanded youths or dancing
nymphs, amid shouts of martial triumph or bacchanalian
rapture
,
they did thousands of years ago. Waked by the music of
your immortal strains, these savage and solitary realms become
instinct with fabulous life. A gentle nymph rises from yonder
fountain, and pours the sparkling water from her silver urn.
Forth from the dim recesses of yon ancient wood, behold the
graceful fawns trooping in mystic dances, beating the earth to
the wild harmony of their clashing cymbals. In every tangled
thicket lurk the leaping satyrs, through all the forest floats the
rustic music of the hairy Pan, from every ancient oak or drooping
elm starts forth a green-robed Dryad. What is it to me, that
the solitude is unbroken by the voice of man? Led by your
hand, am I not surrounded and entranced by visions of a long
vanished world? And you, ye stern, rude chroniclers of later
and darker ages, ye dark-cowled, cloistered monks, holding
aloft, above the wild and barbarous deluge, ingulphing the
world around you, the sacred torch of reason and of science,
do ye not read to me a lesson of undying wisdom? As I shudder
at the dark tale of rapine, and the ceaseless conflict between
brother men, the eternal and almost hopeless striving of the
good, the unholy triumph of the evil spirits of our race, am I
not taught to seek in solitude and self-communion for the solace
which the world denies. And most of all, to thee, holy and
blessed talisman, which alone art powerful to guide my tottering
steps; to thee, ever-gushing fountain of divine revelation; to
thee, comforter in sorrow, guide in danger, all-sufficient
companion
in the solitary valley of dark shadows, to thee do I look
for support and consolation; and most of all do I bless his holy
name that hath vouchsafed to me this treasure. The Lord is my
shepherd. I shall not want.
The yellow light of the fire fell fitfully upon the meek head of
the recluse, as he sat upon his antique chair, bending over his
clasped and illuminated bible. Late he sat within that secluded
cell, immersed in sacred study, or indulging ever and anon in
profound and enraptured reverie. The long, distorted shadows,
projected by the various objects in the apartment, wavered upon
the walls and ceiling, while the deep-toned, monotonous ticking
of an ancient clock which stood by the door, seemed to moralize
with its iron tongue upon the steady but unheeded flight of time.
The fire burned low, the wind of night sighed gently through
the pine tops, and there was a faintly audible whisper, as the
thin skeleton arms of the drooping elms which hung around
the house, swept mournfully across the roof.
Blaxton shut the book and gazed, lost in meditation, upon the
smouldering firebrands. In the oppressive silence of that
midnight
solitude, the slightest sounds of nature seemed to acquire
a vague importance. The dropping of a brand upon the hearth,
the low hissing of the sap in the green logs, or the sigh of the
breeze around the lattice, which sounded like an articulate,
disembodied
voice, would ever and anon cause the solitary to start
and listen as if unseen spirits were holding communion with
him. In that age of superstition, when a belief in supernatural
visitation was universal, it was not to be expected that a man of
imaginative mind and nervous temperament like Blaxton, leading
such a life of seclusion and study, being himself, as it were, an
unreal and almost impossible phantom in the wild scene through
which he seemed rather to flit like an apparition than to inhabit
it like an earthly resident, should be free from the prevailing
conviction of his times. Suddenly, as he mused by his fireside,
there seemed to be a faint, inexplicable sound, as if a finger
were drawn across the window-pane. His heart stood stock
still, and for an instant he dared not raise his eyes towards the
casement. He aroused himself, however, in a moment, and,
without moving from his seat, strained his eyes upon the glass
from whence the sound seemed to have proceeded. There was
nothing there, save the wandering spray of a woodbine, moved
by the wind and flickering in the sickly light of the late risen
moon. It must have been his imagination. He composed
himself
again, and forcibly directed his thoughts to other matters.
8*
Yet the sound had been distinct, though gentle, and seemed not
to have been produced by the swaying of the delicate vine.
Presently the sound was repeated, and this time more audibly
than before. He could not be mistaken, the glass of his
casement
was swept gently by human fingers. It was a low, strange
sound, or something resembling rather the phantom of a
sound, which jarred upon his nerves, and sent a shiver through
his frame. It was as if spectral fingers were beckoning him to
the window to look out perhaps upon some nameless horror
which should freeze his blood. His heart, which had stood
still before, now beat audibly in his bosom. He could hear its
pulsations as distinctly as he could the slow tick of the clock
which had been sounding monotonously on, and which now by its
deep-throated, premonitory gurgle, seemed about to strike the
hour of midnight. Again the sweeping spirit fingers stole along
the glass. He sprang to his feet, gazed hurriedly at the window,
and then stood as if changed to stone. A face of ashy
paleness
was gazing at him from without. He could see its features
distinctly, and recognised them but too well, The phantom of
one, too dearly loved, too early lost, was gazing upon him. The
countenance wore a sad and warning expression, and the large,
mournful eyes spoke of guilt and late remorse. Two white
hands clung to the lattice and seemed to implore his forgiveness
and pity with their mute supplication. It was a fearful thing
for the solitary, thus at deep midnight, in the midst of that
boundless desert, with his mind already filled with mystic
fancies
,
engendered by his late reading and his prolonged reveries,
to be confronted with what he could not but deem a visitant
from the world of spirits. There is nothing more startling in
the midnight solitude, than even the fancied apparition of a face
looking in through our window from the external gloom, and to
this lonely man there seemed not a doubt that this was an
apparition
.
He stood as if transfixed. He essayed to speak, but his
tongue clove to the roof of his mouth. He strove to move, to
shake off, if he could, what perhaps was an incubus, a creation
of a disordered fancy. His limbs refused to obey his will, his
knees shook, but would neither advance or recede. How long
he stood gazing at the phantom he could not tell, but after a
time it seemed to clasp its hands above its head, and then to
melt away into the darkness. What meant this visitation? Did
it bid him forth, for some mysterious reason, into the midnight
wilderness? He breathed more freely now that those sorrowful
eyes were no longer gazing upon him; his blood, which had
been chilled in its current, now throbbed freely from his heart,
his limbs regained their elasticity, his soul resumed its mastery.
Impelled by an irresistible impulse, he sprang towards the
door, breathing a fervent prayer for protection as he went. He
passed rapidly through the little porch, emerged from its shadow
into the moonlight, and then gazed hurriedly around. The
sickly rays of the waning moon shed a mystic light upon the
scene. An unaccountable and oppressive influence seemed to
pervade the air. A sensation of being the victim of unseen
mockery stole over him. The weird fantastic shapes of the
vast roots, which inclosed his domain, looked, in the shifting
and uncertain light, like a troop of squat and jeering demons.
The owl shrieked, the boding whippoorwill uttered her ceaseless
plaint, and the shrill, piercing cry of the tree toad struck
upon his ear like the yell of a fiend. He strained his eyes in
every direction, but nothing met his gaze that seemed to have
connection or sympathy with his late mysterious visitant. The
moonlight lay in faint patches among the shadows of the trees,
but no semblance of humanity seemed to be stirring throughout
the breathless solitude. After remaining in the cold night air
for a few moments, he was turning back to his cottage, feeling
more and more convinced that he had been the prey of some
wild delusion, when suddenly, far down in the dim distance,
just on the edge of the alder thicket, and not far from the
margin of the bay, he beheld the dim outline of a human figure,
wildly extending its arms for an instant, and then hurriedly
clasping its hands above its head, as it glanced swiftly as a flash
through the moonlight, and then faded away into the dark
shadow of the forest. For a moment, the hermit, who was
excited, but less perturbed, by this second apparition, was
inclined to follow the phantom into the morass, where it had
seemed to melt away. He restrained himself, however, and
stood still upon the spot, gazing steadfastly upon the dark and
tangled thicket where the mysterious figure had disappeared.
But there was no farther indication of its presence. After
remaining till he was chilled with the bleak night air, and
exhausted with excitement, he became convinced that, whatever
it might betoken, the phantom had at last vanished. He fell
upon his knees to offer a devout prayer for guidance and
support
,
and then, overcome by the tumultuous sensations of those
midnight moments, he walked languidly into the house.
As the door closed after him, the faint plash of an oar seemed
to float, for an instant, from the cove, and then all was still
again.
CHAPTER IX.
SYMPATHY AND ANTIPATHY.
It
was natural that Esther should be looking with as much
eagerness, although with widely different motives, for a
confirmation
of the intelligence by their own private letters, as did
Sir Christopher Gardiner. Truly it seemed a strange destiny
which had brought these two powerful spirits, so contrasted, into
such recent and accidental conjunction. An imaginative temper
might have figured these two personages, thus, as it were,
hovering
about the cradle of an infant state, the mysterious and
threatening form of the knight, the angelic figure of the maiden,
thus floating in strange proximity, as the embodiments of the
two great conflicting elements of our nature. Like a dark
enchanter and a beneficent fairy, like an evil genius and a
halo-crowned
saint, these two opposite but powerful influences
seemed fated to some mystic conflict  who could foretell its
duration or its result?
As Esther looked forth from the door-step along the glade,
which had so recently witnessed her conflict with the wolf, and
her rescue by some unknown but unforgotten deliverer, she saw
the figure of a man in Puritan habiliments, just emerging from
the corner of the forest. She supposed at first that it was Sir
Christopher Gardiner coming to renew his inquiries, but before
she had time to call to her brother, whose presence she desired
at all their future interviews, she observed that she was
mistaken
.
The new comer, although above the middle height, was
by no means so tall as Gardiner, and moved with a languid gait,
very different from the knight's lithe movements. His
steeple-crowned
hat was slouched deeply upon his brows, so as almost
entirely to conceal his features  his garments were old and
travel stained, and he supported his feeble steps upon a staff.
He appeared, however, to be more oppressed with fatigue than
with age, and his frame, muscular and well knit, seemed to belie
his drooping deportment.
He gravely saluted Esther as he approached.
Is this the residence of Walter Ludlow? he asked in a
husky voice.
It is, said Esther; have you business with my brother?
And you are Esther Ludlow, he continued, in a low
hesitating
tone, looking upon the ground as he spoke, and, as it
would seem, laboring under some kind of embarrassment.
I am Esther Ludlow, replied the maiden, but you seem
fatigued, good brother. By your garb you should be from
Plymouth  and you must have travelled far to-day. Enter, I
pray you, into the house; my brother is now in the
neighborhood
,
and will insist that a travelling stranger like yourself
should partake his hospitality.
You are very kind, good maiden, but my frame is, perhaps,
not so languid as it seems  I have still far to travel, and the
sun hath already set.
The twilight, said Esther, will soon be upon us. Enter
our house and refresh yourself. It is the hour of our evening
meal, and my brother will soon be here.
The stranger seemed reluctant to enter the house. He
lingered near the door-step, unwilling to accept Esther's
proffered
hospitality, and yet seeming slow to declare his errand.
He seemed oppressed by some secret emotion.
My brother will deem himself ill treated, if you decline the
shelter of our humble roof this night, continued Esther, The
night is approaching, the air is already growing keen, the
wilderness is full of danger to a lonely wayfarer.
The dangers of the wilderness are not those which I most
fear, answered the stranger enigmatically, and in the same
husky tone. But I have forgotten myself strangely, he
continued
,
as he observed something like suspicion floating about
the clear brow of his companion. My business is a brief
one, and concerns as much Esther Ludlow as her brother. A
vessel has arrived at Plymouth, and I have been intrusted by
the man of God, our worthy governor and brother, to deliver one
or two packets to the scattered indwellers of the wilderness.
Lo! here is that which beareth the superscription of Esther
Ludlow.
The humble and toil-worn stranger drew two parcels from his
bosom, as he spoke, and handed them respectfully to the maiden.
Esther with eager thanks snatched the proffered epistles, one of
which was addressed to herself, and one to her brother, and
hastily breaking the seals of her own dispatch, she found, with
delight, that it inclosed four different letters. She hurriedly
examined the handwriting of each, and then laid them all down
with a heavy sigh.
From him alone not one line of remembrance, not one word
of regret, she murmured.
The tears came into the proud eyes of Esther, and with the
letters all unopened upon her lap, she sat like a beautiful statue,
all her animation fled, her cheek pale as marble, and her
features working with the expression of subdued but deep
emotion. For a moment she seemed totally unaware of the
presence of the stranger. The eagerness with which she had
opened the dispatch vanished, her anxiety to hear all the
details of the great movement, in which she felt so intense an
interest, had apparently subsided into indifference, and, lost in
sorrowful thought, she seemed heedless of all, save the one
feeling, which exclusively occupied her mind.
While she remained apparently unconscious of all that was
passing before her, the stranger stood, gazing intently upon her,
from beneath the slouched hat which concealed his features.
His presence seemed to have been wholly forgotten, or she
might have perhaps felt some surprise that the feeble, toil-worn
wanderer should prefer to stand thus transfixed and motionless
before her, rather than seek repose and refreshment in the house.
She aroused herself at last with an effort, mechanically lifted
one of her letters, and broke the seal. The trifling physical
exertion seemed for a moment to change the current of her
thoughts, and to arouse her interest in the weighty matters
which had so recently occupied her mind. She began to read
one of the letters with avidity, when suddenly she remembered
the stranger, and turned her eyes full upon him. She blushed,
she knew not why, as she saw him thus immovably gazing upon
her; but as he seemed embarrassed and unwilling to meet her
glance, she merely attributed the strangeness of his deportment
to awkwardness.
In sooth, said she, I have strangely forgotten my duty.
You will have but a lame account to give of the hospitality of
Naumkeak when you return to the brethren of Plymouth. If
you persist in refusing the shelter of our roof, at least suffer me
to bring you some trifling refreshment; and I pray you to repose
your wearied limbs on yonder bench for a little time before you
proceed upon your journey.
A crust of bread and a cup of cold water, continued the
stranger in the same husky tones which had first marked his voice;
a crust of bread and a cup of cold water is all that I require,
and I shall crave your pardon if I take this refreshment upon
the outside of your domicil. I have yet far to travel to night,
and I will repose for a moment upon this bench.
With this the stranger seated himself, and Esther went for a
moment into the house. She soon re-appeared, bringing the
simple food which he had desired, and placed it upon the bench
beside him.
With your leave, said she, I will even glance over the
contents of this letter, while you are reposing and refreshing
yourself.
As she spoke, Esther again resumed the letter which she had
opened, and became absorbed in the contents.
Meanwhile the stranger sat with untasted bread, hiding his
face with his hands, and gazing upon the excited features of
the beautiful Puritan, as if he would have read her soul.
Then they have not yet sailed, she murmured half audibly,
as she hastily turned the pages of her letters. Endicott is to
set forth in June, and with him Gott and Brakenbury and
Davenport
,
and other good and true men  and much opposition is
expected from certain friends of Sir Ferdinando Gorges  the
knight and his powerful party are supposed to be moving heaven
and earth to prevent the king's grant of a charter  he is thought
already to have sent his emissaries to this country  two worthy
and learned clergymen, Master Higginson and Master Skelton
have agreed to embark in the ; Holy Father of Mercy!
Henry Maudsley in New England! The letter dropped from
her hands as she uttered this exclamation; and her eyes filled
with tears as she murmured, Then I did him wrong; one
cause alone could bring Henry Maudsley to New England.
Aye, Esther, but one cause, said a deep, familiar voice
at her side.
Esther started, grew pale as ashes, and trembled like a leaf.
She looked towards the stranger. He was no longer reclining
upon the bench, but had advanced very near to her, his tattered
cloak was thrown aside, his hat had fallen to the ground,
revealing
the well-remembered face of Harry Maudsley.
Aye, Esther, but one cause, he cried, while she seemed
contending with a variety of emotions, among which pride
seemed at length to gain the mastery, suppressing her tears,
smoothing her agitated brow and restoring a faint tinge to her
VOL. I. 9
marble cheek. Forgive me, he continued in an impassioned
tone, that I have dared to appear in this disguise before you.
It was accident which prompted it, as it was accident which
first revealed to me the place of your residence, when I deemed
you an inhabitant of the Plymouth Colony.
And was it accident, too, replied Esther, who had by a
strong effort recovered a portion of her calmness, and was it
accident that brought Henry Maudsley into these wild deserts?
No, Esther, was the reply. Your own heart tells you
why I am here. Yet believe me, that although impelled across
half a world by a passion which I have struggled to conquer,
till at last it has conquered me, although brought to your feet by
an impulse which I could no longer resist, yet, believe me, I had
no unmanly, no unworthy motives in this disguise.
And yet, answered Esther, false robes should never hide
a true heart. If, as I am willing to believe, I was the motive of
your exile, why steal thus masked into my presence, why
treacherously
surprise my unguarded thoughts?
Again I implore you to forgive me, Esther, replied
Maudsley
.
I had been longer than you think a resident in this
neighborhood, not dreaming that you were so near me. A poor
wayfaring pilgrim, whom I chanced to rescue from indignity,
had been intrusted with letters addressed to you and to others.
Learning thus unexpectedly the place of your residence, I
could not resist the temptation to look once more upon your
face.
And yet it would have been easy for you, answered Esther,
to have made your appearance long ago, and without
disguise
.
Aye, answered Maudsley, and one constituted as you,
cannot perhaps conceive of the wayward and perverse impulses
of a temperament like mine. Although I had crossed a winter's
sea in a miserable bark, only that I might throw myself once
more at your feet, yet no sooner did I find myself in the
same wilderness with you, then I began almost to shrink from
our interview.
This is indeed strange, said Esther calmly.
And it is strange, too, continued Maudsley, that a miser
should starve among uncounted riches. Why did I hoard, like
a treasure, the golden moments of our meeting? I know not.
At last, influenced by a rebellious feeling at the power which I
felt you exercised over my whole nature, and assisted by the
singular accident which I have explained, I determined to look
upon you once more, once more to listen to your voice, and then
to tear myself away forever.
Maudsley, replied Esther sorrowfully, your character
remains as wilful and as enigmatical as ever. Why then did
you not execute your purpose?
Because, was the passionate reply, because
unintentionally
I had surprised a secret dearer to me than the whole world
beside. When I found that I had not been entirely forgotten,
when I heard your gentle voice breathing my name, when, as
you believed, there was not an ear in the whole wilderness to
hear you, judge if it were then in my power to tear myself
away.
It is unnecessary to record at length the conversation of the
lovers. It may be believed that the displeasure of Esther at
Maudsley's disguise was not very difficult to appease; and it may
be believed, too, that she was deeply affected by the evidence
which he had given of his constancy and his devotion to herself.
In this interview, the first which had occurred between them for
years, there were a thousand matters to excite their interest,
about which Esther, who had now been so long in exile, was
desirous
to be informed.
You have told me nothing of yourself, Henry, said she,
nor of your friends. You have not told me how the world
hath prospered with those who are nearest and dearest to you at
home. Your sister, is she still so sad and broken-spirited, or
doth she recover from the heavy blow?
My sister is dead, answered Maudsley, mechanically, but
in a deep and gloomy voice.
Dead! is Edith dead? so young  so beautiful  so gentle
so virtuous. Has she so soon gone down in sorrow to her
grave! Though I never enjoyed but a slight and passing
acquaintance
with her, yet I could weep with you, Henry, for I
know how much you were to each other, and I know how much
affection, and how many pure womanly graces are buried in her
tomb.
I do not weep for her, said her companion, in a moody but
composed tone. You see I do not weep for her. She has
been released from a life of suffering; nay, more, added
Maudsley
,
in a hoarser tone, she has been released from a life of
unmerited but deep disgrace. Virtuous, high-spirited, as she
was, it was better that she should sink at once into her grave,
rather than creep through an obscure life, bowed to the earth
with shame that was not hers, and with tears of blood lamenting
that she had ever seen the light of day.
And her husband?
Her husband, cried Maudsley, grinding his teeth with a
passionate expression, and uttering his words slowly, one by one,
as if they fell like drops of blood from his heart  her husband
has fled. The villain has escaped me. I have sought him long,
but he has still eluded my pursuit. But vengeance, though it
sleeps, doth not die; and if he be still upon the living earth, I
will yet track him to his lair. The blood of my murdered sister
cries out to me from the ground. My heart is not deaf to the
appeal.
Alas, Henry, said Esther, vengeance belongeth only to
God. Vengeance is his, and he will repay. Believe me, that it
is not wise nor well thus to constitute yourself the avenger even
of one so deeply injured. Think you, that he who hath been
the wicked cause of all this misery shall escape God's wrath?
But tell me, Henry, was the fearful mystery ever solved, which
rendered your sister's marriage a nullity, and thus blasted her
happiness and laid her in an untimely grave?
It was so, answered Maudsley, in the same calm but gloomy
tone. The mystery was solved, at least in part; solved
sufficiently
to teach my sister that there was no relief except beyond
the grave. But the tale is long, and at this time and place need
not be repeated; but you shall know it all. Suffice it now,
when I inform you, that their marriage was indeed a nullity
because  and as he spoke, Maudsley's voice subsided into
a hoarse whisper, which, however, fell distinctly upon Esther's
ear, because there was another gentle and earlier claimant for
the honored hand of her husband.
As he spoke these words, Maudsley laughed with a low,
savage
laugh, that chilled the blood of his companion. There
were other matters too, but I will not now spread aught of the
foul mass before your eyes. Suffice it, that the villain has
escaped, for you know that I was unfortunately absent during
the whole of these transactions, but while he exists, the fires of
hell could not burn out the record of his guilt. Let us speak
no more of this, dear Esther, continued Maudsley, shaking off
the dark shadow from his mind, and speaking again in the
earnest, but more vivacious tone which was natural to him. Let
us speak no more of this, but of you. The dead are in their
graves, where the broken-hearted sleep well. But do not, in
mercy do not, persist in your sad determination to entomb
yourself
thus body and soul together in these gloomy deserts. With
every day which finds your stay prolonged, the cold enchantment
seems to wind itself more and more about your senses. Arouse
yourself ere your blood be chilled and your brain bewildered.
9*
Promise me, dearest Esther, that I may return and bear you
from this fearful world.
I had hoped, said Esther, that we had done with this
subject, upon which it is impossible that our hearts should ever
beat in unison. Distress me, I beseech you, no farther, and
believe that my decision is irrevocable.
It will appear from these last observations, that the lovers, in
spite of the knowledge of their mutual affections, were as far
from a real understanding, as when they last separated in
England
.
The impetuosity and wilfulness of Maudsley's character were
as incorrigible as the calm but almost infatuated enthusiasm of
Esther was inflexible.
It had been her lover's object throughout their whole
interview
,
to induce her to forswear the purpose to which she had
devoted her life. He represented to her in the most passionate
terms the cruelty to herself, to him, to her brother, to all the
world, of which she was guilty in thus encloistering herself for
life in that dreary wilderness. He painted in the most glowing
colors, which a lively fancy could suggest, the delights which
might yet be theirs, surrounded at home by all the enjoyments
of affluence in a civilized land.
His words fell coldly, more than coldly upon Esther's ear. It
was not that she was an enthusiast, and therefore, like many
enthusiasts, a bigot; for this her nature was too feminine. But
she was more and more convinced that the dissimilarity of their
characters and ruling motives, was so absolute, that happiness
together was impossible. All that she deemed most high and
holy upon earth in his eyes was trivial or false. While he could
not help respecting her enthusiasm, he looked upon it as
madness
,
and could not avoid expressing, in indignant language, his
abhorrence of the influences by which her whole existence was
sacrificed to the maintenance of a pernicious and an absurd idea.
All his social relations, his whole education, all the influences
under which he had existed since boyhood, had taught him to look
upon Puritanism as an uncouth and uncomfortable fanaticism.
His mind revolted at the thought that a woman like Esther
Ludlow
,
partly in deference to the feelings of a moody and
weak-minded
brother, partly in sympathy with a perverse movement of
the age, should bury all her graces in this living sepulchre.
His pride too had been aroused, and in crossing the ocean his
purpose had been fixed  he had vowed in his heart to tear
Esther from the wilderness to which she had devoted herself,
and to bear her home in triumph. He looked upon her as a
martyr, chained to a funereal pyre, as a victim exposed in the
desert to appease the wrath of a fabulous dragon, and he felt a
thousand hearts swelling within him, as he swore to rescue her
from her impending fate.
The quarrel which had occurred between them long before in
England, was of a nature which was almost irremediable, because
it had for the first time torn aside the veil from both their hearts,
and revealed to each other the gulf which in reality flowed
between
them. The sneering indignation which Maudsley had
allowed himself to express against the infatuation of Walter
Ludlow, and the influence which it had exercised upon the mind
of his sister, had led to a more full development of their feelings,
and Maudsley learned for the first time, with anger and dismay,
the extent of what he designated Esther's fanaticism.
Between two natures, both proud, while the determination of
the one was fully matched by the impetuosity of the other, it
may be easily imagined that the chasm must have grown each
day wider. It is unnecessary, therefore, at this time, to relate
much more of their present interview, farther than to say, that
they found each other unchanged in feelings, and yet unchanged
in purpose. Esther's nature revolted at the sacrifice of all her
convictions and purposes, which was demanded of her almost
imperiously by her wilful lover; while he, despite the words of
affection which had fallen from her lips when there could have
been no intention to deceive, felt his pride engaged in the
contest
,
and could not help arguing to himself, that, after all, that
affection must be calm and passionless, which possessed not
sufficient power to conquer her religious fanaticism.
Suddenly, while these thoughts were passing through his
mind, another thought suggested itself to him. With startling
abruptness he requested to know who was the fortunate
personage
in Puritan habiliments, who had lifted her from the
ground at the time when she had so nearly escaped destruction
by the wolf.
Although at the moment when the adventure happened
Maudsley had not the slightest suspicion whose life was in his
hands, yet he now felt a certainty under the circumstances that
the female whom he had rescued from danger could have been
no other than Esther.
Esther was almost overpowered, when she was thus suddenly
informed that it was to Maudsley's arm that her safety upon that
occasion had been owing; but even while she was murmuring
her broken expressions of gratitude, Maudsley impetuously
repeated
his question.
Led hither, said he, by a mysterious fate, I was yet too
far removed to recognise either your own countenance or that
of your sable-suited admirer. It was not your brother  the
stranger was far taller than Walter Ludlow. Rebuke my
impetuosity
,
if you like, but you cannot wonder that I should be
desirous of learning the name of one who appeared to stand
toward you in such near and dear relationship.
Master Maudsley, replied Esther, with cold dignity, I
have no hesitation in informing you, that the individual whom
you saw upon this spot is not in near or dear relationship with
me. He is a casual acquaintance, brought hither upon that day
by some trifling business with my brother. He is, I believe, a
member of no church community, although he seems a man of
a religious and even ascetic disposition. He is a person,
however
,
whose society I am very far from affecting.
How call you his name? asked Maudsley, eagerly.
He is called Sir Christopher Gardiner, answered Esther.
Sir Christopher Gardiner, cried Maudsley, with a strange
sharp cry, as if a dagger had been plunged into his heart. Sir
Christopher Gardiner, the associate of Esther Ludlow! Idiot
that I was, not to have suspected this before, continued he to
himself, in an undertone.
He mastered his emotion, however, by a strong effort, and
forcibly directed the conversation, for a few moments, into other
channels. There was, however, a baleful and inexplicable spell
exercised upon his nature, by the very name of Sir Christopher
Gardiner. Suspicions, vaguely defined, and yet insurmountable,
united with a real knowledge of certain matters which inspired
distrust and even hatred, filled his soul whenever the image of the
mysterious knight was presented to him. It would be premature
at this time, to say more than that he felt a strong, although, to
a certain degree, a mysterious repugnance, to the character of
that adventurer, and a sensation of horror at finding him in
communion with Esther Ludlow. His disordered fancy would
not, for a long time, obey the dictates of his reason, and after
a few moments of broken and incoherent conversation, during
which the wonder, indignation, and pity of Esther were
alternately
excited, he found at last that it was impossible for him
any longer to repress his agitation. Muttering a curse upon
his weakness, and upon the folly which had led him across the
ocean, only to exhibit and proclaim it the more, he uttered
aloud a few hasty and common-place expressions of farewell, and
then abruptly quitted the presence of Esther, whom he left
profoundly afflicted at the character and the result of this
singular interview.
The dark shadows of evening were already descending upon
the earth, as Maudsley, yielding to the tumultuous torrent of his
emotions, strode down the glade with wild rapidity, as if lashed
forth into the outer darkness by furies. He dashed violently
across the open space which lay immediately before him, and
plunged into the gloomy arches of the pine forest. The eternal
shade, the cold and fragrant breath of the mighty grove,
conveyed
no coolness to his heated brow, no soothing balm to the
fever in his soul. Stung by a multitude of torturing fancies,
which writhed and coiled like serpents from his heart, he swept
rapidly through the dim and silent wood. He fled like a coward
before the phantom shapes of his excited imagination. Was it
for this, that he had sacrificed or was ready to sacrifice his all,
home, country, friends, ease, wealth, ambition, pleasure? Was
it for this, that he had been ready, though he avowed it not, to
forsake the bright sunshine of the world, and bury himself in
the vast cloisters of the secluded wilderness? Was it for this,
that he had struggled so long and so bravely with his feelings,
only to find himself at last, the laughing-stock of a hypocritical,
mysterious adventurer, whom he had found to his horror, or
whom he imagined that he had found his successful rival. It
was strange, but with only the most casual acquaintance with
Gardiner, Maudsley had, from the first, conceived an
indefinable
hatred for him, which, moreover, as he fancied, had been as
cordially reciprocated. He had, when occasionally in his
presence, been overcome by a singular and unaccountable
sensation
,
and had found himself, urged by he knew not what
strange fascination, gazing intently upon his face, and striving
to call up some dim, vague, long faded impression of earlier
years. In such times, he had been oppressed by a supernatural
sense of previous existence, fantastically united with a boding
presentiment of the future, a mysterious blending in his mind of
the forgotten past, and the unknown hereafter, which troubled
him, he knew not how or why, and which seemed as it were, a
spell exercised upon him by the dark physiognomy of the
knight. But his sensations now were real, or he deemed them
such. Here was the mystery of Gardiner's existence solved;
here was the hidden reason of his enigmatical and apparently
aimless residence in this wilderness; here was the cause of all
this masquerading, his double-faced contradictory mode of life,
his solitary journeys, his sudden absences. It was plain as
light. He had wondered at his Puritanism, or at what he had
always considered his affectation of Puritanism  he wondered
no longer. It was the love of Esther Ludlow, which he sought
in the depths of these deserts. It was the love of Esther
Ludlow which worked these sudden and bewildering
transformations
.
Was it strange? Was it unnatural? Did he not
himself
acknowledge but too truly the potency of the spell? He
shuddered when he contemplated the picture. If Esther loved
him, what a fate was hers. In what a gulf of desolation would
her trusting heart be wrecked!
He checked himself for a moment as he was speeding
breathlessly
on, curbed the career of his insane thoughts, and
endeavored
forcibly to dismiss the subject from his mind. What was
it all to him? He had torn himself from the presence of
Esther, and he had internally vowed, that the charm should be
forever broken, which had bound him so long. What then to
him was Gardiner's character, or his mystery, or his way of life?
Let him be the devil if he would, and if the pure-hearted
Puritan maiden chose to devote her white soul to the fiend, what
mattered it to him, when, how, or why, the unholy contract
should be completed?
On, on the fled once more through the mirky night, a fugitive
from his own thoughts, which seemed like spectres to people the
gloomy glades of the forest.
CHAPTER X.
THE MISHAWUM GIANT RECEIVES COMPANY.
Upon
that same morning, Thomas Walford, the smith of
Mishawum, was standing alone at his wilderness forge. The
promontory of Mishawum was a narrow tongue of land, thrust
boldly out into the bay, having the Mystic River on its northern,
and the Charles River on its southern side, and advancing very
closely to the craggy heights of Shawmut. Like its neighbor
peninsula, Mishawum was a rough, precipitous spot of ground,
with vast granite rocks frowning here and there through the
masses of pine and cedar, which with white and black oak,
hickory, birch, and maple, covered its sides with wild and
ancient verdure. Thomas Walford has already been presented
to the reader's acquaintance. His residence, consisting of a
thatched log-house, with a kind of shed or shanty which he
called his forge, was surrounded by a strong palisade of cedar
trunks, ten feet in height and driven deeply into the earth. The
general aspect of the place, as may be easily conceived, was
wild, rugged, and solitary. The house stood not far from the
water's edge, upon the southern declivity of a high and
precipitous
hill which sloped boldly down into the bay, and the
prospect
,
excepting the remarkable feature of the triple-headed,
craggy peninsula opposite, which of course presented a more
striking and picturesque effect, when seen from this distance,
was very much the same as that which was spread before the
eyes of the solitary of Shawmut.
The burly smith stood in his half-subterranean and rustic
shanty, whose low thatched roof was supported by the twisted
and rugged stems of cedars. The glare of a brilliant fire
fell upon his bull-fronted, shaggy head, his rude and swarthy
features, and his massive half-naked bust, while the rest of his
leathern clad person was in dark and heavy shadow. He was
striking millions of sparks from a ponderous and red-hot bar
of iron, at every stroke of his heavy sledge-hammer, and as
he stood there in his hairy strength, the only human figure in
that solitary retreat, he looked more like some gigantic creature
of heathen mythology, some half fabulous Cyclops forging in his
mountainous cavern the thunderbolts of Jupiter, than a real and
tangible mass of human flesh. Although Walford was the only
European inhabitant of the little peninsula where we find him,
and which, as has been seen, he held under the Gorges patent,
the place and the neighborhood were frequented from time to
time by straggling parties of Indians, who were under the
nominal
jurisdiction of a peaceable and amiable young sagamore,
who had already formed friendly connections with the scattered
residents of the bay. The natives generally entertained a
considerable
respect for the blacksmith, who, although very
good-natured
,
and never disposed to quarrel with them unnecessarily,
had yet occasionally been known to inflict severe chastisement
upon some of their number who had presumed to meddle
with him.
The smith paused for a moment, as the plash of oars sounded
from the water immediately below him, and listened to learn
if perchance any visitors were about to claim his hospitality that
morning. He supposed, however, for he did not take the trouble
to go to the verge of the cliff to look, that some stray Indians
were landing from their canoes upon the beach below, for the
sake of baking clams, frying fish, boiling lobsters, or for some
other peaceful and culinary purpose, and he had ceased to
trouble himself any more about the matter, when all at once he
heard footsteps scrambling up the steep ascent, and the sound
VOL. I. 10
of several English voices sounding nearer and nearer to his
own precincts. Presently there was a loud rapping at his outer
gate.
Hillo, hillo, hillo, Master Walford! sounded through the
palisades.
Hillo, hillo, answered the smith, without stirring from his
anvil. Who makes such a pother at this early hour in the
morning?
Open thy gates, thou inhospitable smith, said a deep,
muddy voice, which evidently had soaked through the frowzy
beard of Robert Bootefish. Dost mean to treat thy loving
friends and Christian neighbors as pagan Indians or heathen
Puritans? Here be I, firstly, and secondly Master Humphrey
Rednape, with your friends Cakebread and the Canary Bird, all
come to visit you.
They will call me Canary Bird, Master Smith, whistled a
shrill voice through the palisade, though they know as well as
you that my name is Bernaby Doryfall. But for the love of
good fellowship let us in. Fear nothing here; we are but honest
friends and Christian white men.
Walk in, my masters, said the burly smith, in a
good-humored
voice, swinging wide open the gate to admit his
visitors.
Good morrow, Master Smith, said Bootefish, saluting his
host with great dignity, as, followed by his three companions, he
waddled through the gates, with the stately importance of a
plethoric duck. You have, I think, met with these worthy
gentlemen before. Look you, this be Rednape, a swashing
knave, and a godly but a drunken sot, and a quarreller in his
liquor. And this be Peter Cakebread, a wise fellow, I promise
you, and well-instructed and witty, but a vile coward, who
would cut his shadow from his heels if he could, to prevent
it from following and frightening him forever. And here, this
yellow-coated, piping, whistling little gentleman, is the Canary
Bird.
They call me Cana
Hold your tongue, sot, interposed the chief butler of
Merry-Mount
,
indignant at the interruption, as the poor little Canary
Bird was beginning to chirp his favorite tune.
Ye are all heartily welcome, my masters, said the smith
after the ceremonious Bootefish had concluded his introductory
harangue; and now, if each of you will seat himself upon the
softest stump he can find, we will, if you like, proceed to
business
.
What brings you here so early in the morning, Master
Bootefish?
Master Morton of Merry-Mount, began the Canary Bird.
Hold your tongue, again, thou impudent yellow-breasted
biped, interrupted the butler, and allow your superior to
answer all questions directed to him. Is it thus I am to be
rewarded for my indulgence in taking you out a pleasuring this
fine morning? Have I not bountifully permitted you the
healthful
recreation of rowing all the way from Passanogessit? for the
devil an oar have I pulled that you might all be gratified, and now
is this my reward? Be silent all. Good master smith, I pray
your indulgence upon these malapert young followers of mine.
A truce to your apologies, said the blacksmith, and now
if there be one among you who hath brains enough, I pray to be
informed of the purpose of your visit to my humble abode this
morning. What would ye of me, Master Bootefish, for in truth
thou alone seemest possessed of a sufficient amount of gravity
and sobriety to answer a grave and sober question?
I praise Heaven, answered the respectable Bootefish, in
answer to this address, I praise Heaven that I am grave and
sober, and, as you remark, the only person of gravity and
sobriety
in this worshipful company. Know then, Master
Blacksmith
,
or in other words, good Master Thomas Walford, that we
have been specially deputed by his worship, Master Thomas
Morton, armigero and lord of the manor of Merry-Mount, to bid
you to certain mid-summer night revels, which we propose to
keep at the said manor of Merry-Mount, to begin at five of the
clock upon the morrow evening, and to continue throughout the
May-day, which immediately succeedeth, and as many hours
longer as the butt holdeth out.
And be this all which bringeth you here this morning, ye
devil's crew? said the courteous blacksmith to his guests.
Have I not already been bidden to your mid-summer revels for
May-day, as this pudding-brained Bootefish hath it, and must my
privacy be disturbed for such a marvellous piece of information?
Know, then, that I have already promised your Master of Misrule
to visit him to-morrow, and with that take yourselves off. Away,
ye buffoons; yet stop awhile, your throats shall be moistened
before you go.
So saying, he thrust his colossal thumb and fore-finger into an
iron ring which was fastened into a large square stone in the
corner of his shanty, and lifting the rough and ponderous granite
slab as easily as if it had been the lid of a snuff-box, he
suddenly
disappeared, like some eastern enchanter, into the entrails
of the earth.
When he returned, he bore an earthen jug in his hand, out of
which he filled a pewter can of ample dimensions for each of
his guests, and pledging them himself from the mouth of the
jug, he exclaimed,
There, my merrymen all, taste ye the rosa solis, which hath
been ripened in the bowels of the wilderness. What sayest thou,
Robin Bootefish, is it potent?
Truly good, Master Walford, said the pompous butler, his
elephant eyes twinkling with delight, truly thou hast laid bare
a fountain of unequalled purity; thou hast laid up a treasure in
the earth; thou hast found a mine of virgin gold in the
entrails of the desert. Good master smith, I honor thee and
love thee.
Peter Cakebread drained his measure of the potent fluid at a
single draught, gasped for breath as if he had swallowed a
sword, according to his paternal avocation, and then with his
toad-like eyes, glittering and almost darting from his leathern
face, he exclaimed,
Thou marvellous ogre of Mishawum! Thou potent enchanter!
Let me worship thee. Truly it is comforting to see so sweet
and spiritual a resurrection from beneath you mighty tombstone.
Come then to Merry-Mount, and be king over us, most stalwart
smith, for truly he who can compel such spirits from the bosom
of the earth should fitly rule his fellows.
To this spontaneous indication of fealty to himself, or rather
to his subterranean treasures, the blacksmith made no further
answer than by filling each man's goblet again, and bidding
them drink it off and begone.
Thus conjured, the respectable party of visitors, having
again done due honor to the blacksmith's cellar, bade their
host farewell.
The blacksmith closed and barred the door as they departed,
and then, after listening for a moment to their confused shouting
and hallooing as they descended the precipitous hills,
helter-skelter
,
now tumbling over each other, now quarrelling, now
laughing, now cursing, he stepped calmly back to his forge.
Truly an ill-begotten pack of drunken knaves, said he to
himself, as he lustily plied the bellows and resumed the
occupation
which had been interrupted. This Master Morton is like
to raise trouble now for himself, by keeping such a nest of
buzzing hornets to swarm about the country, disturbing every
honest man in his business. Small love do I bear yonder
Plymouth crop-ears, yet I swear by my stedge-hammer, I had
rather consort with psalm-singers than with such brawling,
10*
drunken vermin. Thank fortune, I am fairly rid of them for
to-day; but stay  what mean these shouts yonder? Heaven
forefend the hornets be not all buzzing back again about mine
ears. Stay, that was the yell of a red-breech.
In truth, during the worthy blacksmith's soliloquy, a
complication
of noises had been faintly audible in his sylvan retreat.
For a few moments after the last shouts of his departing visitors
had died away beneath the hill, there had been an absolute
silence. It was, however, soon broken by a confused din of
angry shouts, ferocious execrations, clashing weapons, reports of
fire-arms, and that shrill, unearthly, fiendlike yell of the savage,
which seems to blend into one cry the guttural trill of a
Tyrolese
mountaineer with the long howl of a famished wolf.
The drunken varlets are squabbling with the savages, said
the smith, after listening attentively. Have a care, my
masters
,
or mayhap ye may find the Mishawum red-skins not so
easily tamed as your Passanogessit savages! Yonder
coppernosed
Bootefish may chance to find himself without a scalp to
his wooden head before he gets home to his ale butt. By my
beard, he would gain by the loss of it, for methinks his wits be
mightily in need of airing, and I marvel how the fog is to be
ever cleared from his brain, unless a little daylight be let into it
with a tomahawk. Fore George! but there be swinging blows
and bloody coxcombs passing about by this time, I warrant me,
concluded the smith, as the noise of the scuffle became gradually
louder and more distinct, while the contending parties appeared
to be struggling nearer to the blacksmith's abode.
The worthy blacksmith, who had no particular desire that his
solitude should again be interrupted by the drunken foolery of
his late visitors, was yet something curious as to the cause of
the uproar. As he was, however, about sallying forth to
investigate
the matter, the sounds seemed suddenly to cease. Either
the contest, whatever it might have been, was terminated, or the
scene had been shifted to a more distant spot. He accordingly
relinquished his intention, and went on with his work for a few
minutes, until he was again aroused by confused shouts, yells,
and a variety of other disturbing sounds, which again arrested
his attention.
CHAPTER XI.
THE BATTLE OF MISHAWUM.
Beshrew
me, said Walford to himself, suddenly
abandoning
his forge, and advancing towards a look-out which he had
built for himself within the precincts; beshrew me, but there
seems to be warm work going on yonder. Of a surety yon
vagabonds have incensed by their devil's tricks, some straggling
party of my red-legged friends. Peaceable they be and well
disposed to those whom they have learned to respect; but the
Lord preserve the scalps of such as meddle with them without
need.
With these words he ascended his rustic watch-tower, and
looked out upon every side. He was apparently not long in
arriving at a conclusion as to the state of the case, for after
remaining but a few moments in his elevated position, he
descended
with great rapidity, put on a huge iron head-piece, and
arming himself with his sledge-hammer, strode resolutely
towards
his gate, unbarred its fastening, and sallied forth in the
direction of the din which had now subsided again into a
confused
and discordant murmur.
He strode through the craggy and unsteady pathway which
led along the heights, descended from the elevation upon which
his solitary abode was situated, and after tearing his way through
the tangled thickets which obstructed his passage, he emerged
at length upon a low, open plain, which, studded with a few
large oak trees, expanded itself upon the southern and
south-eastern
base of the crag where his hermitage was placed. When
he arrived there, he found a very peculiar scene exhibited to his
observation.
Upon the plain were assembled some half dozen savages,
belonging, as he well knew by their costume, to the scattered
tribe who inhabited the neighborhood of his peninsula. They
had evidently that morning established a temporary encampment,
as a single wigwam, hastily constructed of oak saplings
fastened
into the earth, with their boughs bent together at the top,
and covered over with coarse matting, formed the central point
of the scene. The savages were all young, active, clean-limbed
men. Although tall, stout, and evidently excelling both in
activity and strength, their limbs possessed that smooth, rounded,
harmonious proportion, in which a general diffusion of bodily
force over the whole frame, rather than any local development of
striking and exaggerated muscular power, indicated the
remarkable
adaptation of the race to encounter the life of constant
endurance and danger to which their climate and their habits
subjected them. Their glossy black hair was shorn straight
across their foreheads, with a long tuft streaming like a horse's
tail behind, except in the case of one who seemed to be a kind
of chief, and who wore his shaggy locks turned up over his
head like a helmet, with the wing of a hawk fantastically twisted
into the crest. They were dressed in deer-skin mantles,
picturesquely
hanging from their shoulders, wore leather sandals
upon their feet, and were all armed with tomahawks, and one
with bow and arrows. Their bare and robust chests were
daubed with rude, hieroglyphical emblems, among which the
impression of a bloody hand seemed the most favorite device,
probably because it was the most easily depicted.
As the blacksmith supposed, there had been a contest between
the savages and his late visitors, which had evidently terminated
in favor of the red skins, who had borne their enemies captive
from the scene of the affray to their encampment. Rednape,
who had received an ugly gash upon the shoulder, was seated on
the ground with a very ghastly and woe-begone expression upon
his sinister phisiognomy, near the entrance to the hut. The
helpless Canary Bird was ruefully contemplating an arrow
which had struck him in the calf of the leg, without inflicting a
very severe wound, and which he was painfully attempting to
extract, to the manifest gratification and amusement of his
captors
,
who looked upon his struggles with the most ironical and
irritating expressions of condolence. As for the dignified
Bootefish
,
who seemed to have escaped without bodily harm from the
contest, the savages had bound him fast to the trunk of an oak,
where he stood the butt of his merciless tormentors, looking,
however, upon their grimacing visages, and enduring their
painful
,
practical gibes with stoical fortitude.
Grin away, ye horse-faced, painted devils, said he, with his
copper nose flashing defiance at his captors, as one of them, who
seemed to take an especial delight in administering to his
discomfort
,
was solacing himself by pricking the worthy precentor's
massive cheeks with the point of his knife till the blood flowed
at each successive puncture; Grin away, ye ugly villains. Prick
away, ye black-snouted, red-legged vermin. Do ye think a
white man and an Englishman is afraid of his own blood? By
the bones of my father, had yonder sneaking cowards but stood
their ground like men, ye should have had another tale to tell
when ye got back, if ye ever did get back to your hovel here.
Whoop away, and split your throats, an' it please ye, he
continued
,
as the savage uttered a fiendish and discordant yell close
in his ear, which was elicited not by the chief butler's remarks,
as he supposed, but by the sudden appearance of the blacksmith
upon the scene of action.
Walford had advanced with a good deal of caution after
entering
upon the open ground, and had posted himself behind a tree
for a few moments, while he took a rapid survey of the spectacle
before him. He had entertained no doubt from the first, that
the Englishmen had in some manner or other originally provoked
the savages, and he had been at first disposed to let them finish
the quarrel for themselves as they had begun it. Finding,
however, that the odds were so unequal, or rather observing that
the contest had in reality ceased, and that his countrymen and
late turbulent visitors were likely to suffer a great deal of injury
from their captors, even if they escaped with their lives, his
blood was roused; and having great reliance on the personal
strength and unparalleled audacity which had hitherto supported
him so well during his solitary existence in these deserts, he had
resolved to come to their rescue if possible. While the savages,
one or two of whom had already entered into their hut intent
upon domestic and culinary affairs, while the rest were playfully
indulging themselves in a variety of pretty and humorous sports
at the expense of their victims, pricking their ears, pulling their
noses, and punching their sides with the points of their sharp
knives, were thus comparatively inattentive to all but the
business
before them, he had stolen silently and cautiously, but with
rapidity from one tree to another, till at last, with a sudden
bound he had thrown himself among them, cutting the cords
which bound the valorous Bootefish at two blows of his hunting
knife, and then waving his sledge-hammer about his head with
an imposing air of defiance.
Meanwhile the savages, two or three of whom had thrown
their arms upon the ground, and were busily occupied with a
great heap of clams, upon which they were proposing to hold a
triumphal feast in honor of their victory, sprang suddenly to
their feet, uttering a shrill halloo of mingled surprise and rage.
The doughty butler, finding himself no longer a prisoner,
seized a tomahawk which lay providentially near him upon
the ground, and rushed like an enraged bull upon the nearest
Indian.
The savage, after receiving a severe blow upon the head,
which seemed, however, not even to stun him, closed with his
foe in a fierce and close embrace, which lasted for a few minutes,
till both the combatants, furious with rage and hatred, rolled
together upon the ground, dealing each other blows with hands,
teeth and feet, neither seeming capable of relinquishing his
deadly hold upon the other so long as life or breath remained.
While these two were thus engaged in desperate struggle, the
savage who had taken the lead in tormenting the butler while he
was bound, infuriated at his escape, and quivering all over with
disappointed malice, now turned upon the blacksmith, who had
thus come so unexpectedly to the rescue. He was a tall,
powerful
creature, less in stature than his gigantic antagonist, but
wonderfully active and supple in his movements. He had thrown
off the deer-skin mantle from his shoulders, and now advanced
to the conflict, wielding aloft his tomahawk, his eye flaming with
fury, and his yell ringing through the plain like the cry of a
wild beast.
The blacksmith saw that there was no child's play before him.
He was unwilling to engage at first in close hug with his enemy,
for he knew, by experience, that his anointed and slippery skin,
the snake-like movements of his body, and his practical
adroitness
,
would counteract somewhat the advantages of his own
enormous strength. He retreated a little space to a tree, while
the savage standing at about six yards' distance paused a moment
with his tomahawk brandished high in air, and apparently
deliberating
in his own mind, whether he would close with him at
once, or assail him from that distance. His decision was
apparently
soon made, for whirling his heavy tomahawk twice or
thrice around his head, he suddenly hurled it with the velocity
of a thunderbolt at the head of his enemy. If the smith had
not providentially donned his head-piece before sallying forth
that morning, his days had been numbered, for the weapon
struck full upon his forehead, glanced from the rounded iron
surface of his cap, and then buried itself in the trunk of the
tree against which he was leaning. The bull-fronted smith
shook his head slightly, as if a wasp had been buzzing in his
ears, and stood as unmoved and impassible as before. The
savage, furious at having been foiled, uttered a yell, and then
plucking his long, sharp knife from its sheath, rushed madly
upon him. Walford calmly awaited his onset till his enemy's
hands were almost at his throat, and then swinging his mighty
sledge-hammer high in the air, he dealt the savage a single blow
upon the skull. It was enough. The wretch dropped like a
log, without a single cry or motion, and lay stone dead at his
feet.
While this rapid tragedy was acting, Bootefish and his foe still
lay coiled together in ferocious embrace, while the other four
savages had been engaged in an attempt to secure Rednape and
the Canary Bird. They had been but half successful, however,
for Rednape, having caught up a knife which one of the savages
had left upon the ground, had struck about him so vigorously as
to disable one of them, and to free himself entirely from their
grasp. Finding himself clear, and not troubling himself much
about the general issue of the combat, he had taken to his
long legs, and was skimming across the open plain with great
celerity.
The unfortunate Doryfall, however, was securely bound hand
and foot, and fastened to the same tree which had just before
held Bootefish in captivity. He was of course unable to render
assistance to the blacksmith, who now found himself opposed
single handed to three vigorous and unwounded enemies, not
counting the fourth who had received several ugly blows from
Rednape, and who now seemed crawling towards Bootefish and
his foe, for the apparent purpose of expending his remaining
strength in behalf of his red brother, who appeared in danger
VOL. I 11
of yielding up the last breath in the hands of the truculent
butler.
The three now made a concerted and wary attack upon the
Thunder-cloud of Mishawum, who had just given such
impressive
proof of his strength and courage. The smith maintained
his post, with his back securely planted against the tree, and
daring his enemies to the assault with calm but contemptuous
gestures. The savages had, however, evidently no inclination
to trust themselves to close quarters with their colossal foe, any
sooner than was absolutely necessary. They stood at some
twenty paces' distance from him, and as they saw that he was
unprovided with any missile weapons, they knew themselves in
safety so long as he remained in his quiet attitude against the
tree. So many and so fabulous were the reports, that had been
related among the scattered dwellers of the neighborhood,
concerning
the strength of the solitary blacksmith, that the Indians,
as we have seen, had long stood in wholesome awe of his
prowess, and had generally been inclined rather to cultivate his
friendship than to encounter his enmity. Being now engaged
in actual contest with him, they were resolved, if possible, to
deal with him warily and at advantage. Fortunately for the
blacksmith, not one of his enemies was provided with fire-arms,
then very rare among the savages, and but one of them was
armed with bow and arrows. They were in fact not accoutred
for battle, and had accidently become engaged in conflict, after
having sought the peninsula that morning with entirely pacific
purposes. They had indeed, as will hereafter appear, been first
provoked by their enemies to the contest.
The Indian who appeared to be the leader of the party, and
who wore the hawk's wing in his head, now suddenly drew his
bow, while the blacksmith's attention had been momentarily
withdrawn from his enemies by an unexpected noise in an
opposite direction, and taking a rapid aim, discharged an arrow
at the solitary champion. The shaft sped with such precision
that it struck his left shoulder, pierced through the fleshy part of
the arm, and pinned it to the tree.
At the same time, the two other savages were cautiously
stealing, each in an opposite direction, towards their intended
victim, both armed with knife and tomahawk.
Beshrew me, said the blacksmith to himself, as without
wincing he tore the arrow from his arm, but this be no time
to stand pinned like a scarecrow to a tree. Am I to stay longer
here as a butt for yon clumsy red-breech, may I be damned?
Look to thyself, thou greasy villain, for, by the Lord, there is a
bloody nose in store for thee, and that before thou'rt thirty
seconds older.
As he spoke he waved his sledge-hammer, and was about
rushing single-handed upon his foe, when a shrill whisper in the
air above him suddenly arrested his attention, and for an instant
almost caused his stout heart to tremble.
Now may the foul fiend burn ye all, he shouted, for if
mortal man must fight single-handed with three painted devils
upon the earth, and with the powers of the air beside, the odds
be too unequal.
Hist, hist, hist, Thomas Walford, cried a shrill voice
above him, which seemed to have something unearthly, and yet
familiar in its tones. Stop where thou art, mine honest and
most valorous Smith, dodge about the tree for a few minutes
longer, and thou art safe. Take my word for it, and stick to the
tree.
Thy word, in sooth, thou invisible devil, answered the
simple-minded blacksmith, somewhat puzzled by this counsel
from an aerial source, and yet involuntarily obeying the
command
.
Thy word, in sooth, thou mocking goblin, and why
should I obey thy counsel, if I would keep my scalp under my
iron-pot, and not leave it dangling at yonder slippery villain's
girdle? What art thou, speak?
The blacksmith had dodged around the tree as he made this
address to his invisible companion, and had thus avoided a
second arrow from his most troublesome enemy, while, at the
same time, the other two savages had paused in their advance
upon him, for reasons which soon appeared.
The pugnacious Bootefish, who had clung to his foe with the
tenacity of a bull-dog, and who might have been cut into a
hundred pieces before his hands and teeth would have
relinquished
their hold while life remained, had at last succeeded in
exhausting his enemy and obtaining the upper hand.
Extricating
himself from his savage clutches, he had planted his knee
upon his breast, and plunged his knife into his throat. Being
thus delivered from the mortal struggle in which he had borne
himself so manfully, he had, although somewhat fatigued by his
short but ferocious encounter, found no difficulty in dispatching
the savage whom Rednape had wounded, and who had well nigh
crept upon him, before he had completely vanquished his first
antagonist.
Under these circumstances, the contest assumed a totally
different aspect. There were now but three of the six Indians
remaining, and they were opposed by two Englishmen, not
sufficient odds for the savages, in the estimation of the bold
blacksmith.
Who art thou, thou voice without body or legs? asked
Walford, pausing, in spite of himself, to listen to the
admonitions
of his mysterious companion.
Body enough, Master Bootefish, and legs more than enough,
or my name's not Peter, cried the voice. Look up here,
man, 't is no devil in the air, but simply your friend Peter
Cakebread
,
roosting and cooing like an innocent dove upon the
branches of this protective oak.
Roosting like an innocent dove, sneaking and squealing like
a villainous tree-toad rather, said the blacksmith indignantly,
as he looked up and saw the wizzened and preternatural visage
of Cakebread, grinning at him through the leafless spray of the
tree, while, with his long, ape-like arms and legs, he swung
himself from one limb to another. Why thou lily-livered,
toad-faced coward thou, had'st thou had one particle of
manhood
in thee, thou would'st have been down here like the brave
old Bootefish yonder, whom, by heaven, I will never quarrel
with again, the longest day I have to live, helping me to punish
these greasy red-skins, and not roosting there like an unclean
bird among the branches of a tree.
Fair words, fair words, I pray thee, master blacksmith,
replied the unabashed Cakebread from his commanding position.
Truly, am I not sitting here like a guardian angel, directing
your endeavors, and praying devoutly for your success? I tell
thee, there be succor approaching, for from the summit of this
tree I have just seen a boat approaching yonder beach.
Succor indeed, thou miserable varlet! answered Walford,
why seest thou not, that three of the six enemies be lumps of
dead clay already, and that if I stay here now talking to thee, it
is that the other poor devils may run away if they will, for by
the Lord, I have marvellously more desire to trounce thee for
thy cowardice, than to chastise these red-legged creatures.
In effect the combat seemed to have ended. The three
savages had withdrawn to the neighborhood of their wigwam,
dragging the two bodies of their slaughtered friends with them,
but not daring to meddle with the one which lay at the feet of
the blacksmith. They seemed now to limit their ambition to
securing their captive, the luckless Doryfall, who, as soon as
they had again arrived within ear-shot, had not ceased in his
vociferous attempts to set them right as to his real name, and to
assure them that Canary Bird was only his totem, or war
name, in Indian phraseology.
Whether the savages supposed that this appellation, derived
11*
from so valiant a bird, indicated the extraordinary heroism of its
wearer, whether they were particularly acquainted with the
habits of his feathered sponsor, which was not then often to be
found in New England, or whether indeed they understood or
attended to any thing which fell from their captive's lips, did
not distinctly appear. They contented themselves simply in
answer to each successive exclamation, with the normal grunt of
their race, which might have indicated approbation, dissent,
reproof, or any thing else that happened to be in their minds.
At all events, the unfortunate Doryfall did not seem likely at
that moment to effect his liberation, which probably was the
object to which tended his incessant vociferations.
While these matters were going on more rapidly than has
been related, for indeed the whole contest which has taken us so
long to recite, had occupied but a few minutes, Peter
Cakebread
had again scrambled to the top of the oak, upon which he
was perched, to take a survey of the surrounding country,
while one of the savages, he, namely, who had so adroitly nailed
the blacksmith to the tree with his arrow, crept cautiously to the
edge of the thicket, and placed his ear to the ground. Scarcely
had he done so, when he started to his feet again with a yell of
triumph, and dashed furiously back, hatchet in hand, towards
the wigwam. At the same moment Cakebread uttered a shrill
cry of disappointment and terror from the summit of the tree.
What ails thee now, thou liverless child of Satan? cried
the blacksmith, standing upon the defensive again, while
Bootefish
seized the tomahawk which had been discharged at the
commencement of the conflict and buried in the tree.
What ails thee now, that thou howlest so dismally? What
seest thou in yonder thicket to scare thee out of thy senses
again?
Before Cakebread had time to reply to the blacksmith's
interrogation, the cause of his dismay and of the savage's
exultation
was explained. A party of Indians, numbering eight or
ten, commanded by a chief who appeared to be of considerable
importance, broke suddenly from the thicket which fringed the
plain, and advanced rapidly towards the scene of action. At
this unexpected reinforcement, the three savages, who had been
quite satisfied with the length of the contest, and who would
have been well pleased to have got rid of the blacksmith and
his truculent friend, now plucked up heart again, and leaving
the captive Doryfall to guard himself at the entrance to their
wigmam, they renewed the attack with the assurance of an
easy victory. Bootefish and the blacksmith, each placed
himself
against a tree, prepared to sell their lives as dearly as
possible. Retreat was out of the question, for the party who
had just emerged from the wood which extended along the
western and northern verge of the plain, and crowned the
neighboring
heights, effectually surrounded them in the rear, and the
sea which spread before them upon the southern and eastern
side, cut off all escape in front. One of the three savages now
advanced very near to the blacksmith, executing a very furious
and warlike dance before his face, yelling with ferocity, and
taunting him with a variety of irritating gestures. The smith,
convinced that there was nothing to be gained by remaining
stationary any longer, feeling a far stronger inclination to
exchange his own life for that of two or three of his foes, than
to stand still to become the captive and the laughing-stock of
creatures for whom he had a hearty contempt, desperate at this
evil stroke of fortune after he had considered his victory secure,
and lashed into fury by the insulting grimaces of the savage,
now abandoned all idea of defence, and leaving the covert of
the tree, rushed madly at his antagonist, waving aloft his
sledge-hammer.
The savage, whose brains would have been dashed out if he
had stood still an instant longer, took to his heels as Walford
advanced, and fled in the direction of the wood. The smith
pursued, but with less rapidity, his fugitive foe, and in so
doing, found himself directly in the centre of the plain, separated
from any protecting tree, and offering a mark for half a dozen
arrows, which were immediately discharged at him by the new
comers, and which inflicted two or three flesh wounds. He
paused, foaming with rage, and eyeing his antagonists, who were
thus goading him at the same time that they remained out of
his reach, with the fury of a baited and wounded bull. His
career seemed at an end; the savage who had provoked him was
already surrounded by his friends, an arrow in the leg impeded
the smith's advance, and as he stood there a defenceless mark,
one of the new comers, who was the only one provided with a
fire-arm, suddenly advanced to within twenty yards of him, and
levelled his piece at his breast. The smith's hour was come.
He was to die at last like a wolf in the wilderness, and what
would become of the old woman on the hill yonder. He cursed
his folly, which had tempted him forth from his fortress in behalf
of the riotous crew, who had disturbed his solitude that
morning
;
he cursed the fate which had sent the new party of
red-skins
thither, when he had so fairly routed the first; he cursed
ten thousand times the carelessness which had sent him out
without his trusty fire-arm, which alone would have made him
more than a match for the whole of them.
Fire away, he roared with the voice of a lion, ye greasy
villains, and stop your chattering; 't is a brave deed surely,
for a dozen Indians to get the better of two Englishmen, for as
to yon trussed chicken yonder  The report of a
matchlock
interrupted him as he shouted his defiance. Strange to
say, it seemed to come from an opposite direction, and scarcely
had the sound broken upon his ear, when the savage who was
so nearly threatening his life, suddenly sprang high into the air,
uttering a quick, sharp cry, and then rolled dead upon the
plain, his gun exploding harmlessly as he fell. At the same
instant two figures sprang rapidly forward from the eastern edge
of the plain, both armed with long, heavy matchlocks, and
advancing near enough to be easily recognised, stationed
themselves
each behind a tree at a short distance from the
blacksmith
.
Fairly shot, Sir Kit, by Jupiter Diespiter, said the shorter
of the two as he coolly took aim at the nearest savage, who was
however several hundred yards' distant; while Sir Christopher,
to whose ready hand and skilful eye the blacksmith's
preservation
was owing, rapidly re-loaded his piece. At the same moment
Walford darted gallantly forward, and notwithstanding the
discharge
of a half dozen arrows, succeeded in seizing the musket
of the savage whom Gardiner had slain, and in tearing his
ammunition
pouch from his body. Armed with these, and without
receiving a single additional wound, he hastily took up a position
behind an oak, not far removed from his two confederates.
Hold your hand, Morton, for an instant, said the knight,
as he saw Morton preparing to fire. 'T is but a waste of
powder  yonder fellows are out of your reach at present, and
unless I mistake the matter, will be in no hurry to come to
nearer quarters; my life for it, they have been provoked to this,
for I know their temper well. At all events, here be three of us,
with good weapons in our hands, and a fit match, I take it, for
yonder round dozen of painted vagabonds. Pause a moment
and observe their motions  you know how deeply important I
consider it to secure the good-will of the savages in this
neighborhood
.
Had not our trusty giant yonder been in such
imminent peril, I would not have hurt a hair of their heads.
Pause a moment and watch their conduct. By saint John,
methinks
they show a marvellous inclination to skulk into the
covert yonder.
They are deliberating, Sir Christopher  taking grave and
deep counsel; I obey you, and await the result of their
cogitations
.
With this the Lord of Merry-Mount lowered his weapon
and leaned coolly against the tree.
But look at the giant of Mishawum, Sir Christopher, he
resumed, with an arrow sticking in each leg! Tell me now,
looks he not like a feathered Mercury, with the talaria on his
heels  save that he is perhaps a trifle stout for sailing through
the air. Why he hath arrows enow in his legs to furnish Robin
Hood. Had he but a bow now, he were as well equipped an
archer as ever trod the merry green wood. And yet what
recks he of bows or arrows? `Non eget Mauris jaculis neque
arcu,' for hath he not possessed himself of pouch and matchlock
from yonder stiffening savage? But how camest thou to see in
one half second the whole state of the matter, and to drop
yonder unfortunate savage so promptly?
Experience, Master Morton, answered the knight,
experience
,
from earliest childhood to the present moment, has been
tutoring me. When danger threatens, never lay about you in
the dark. Trust me, a man with his eyes wide open is worth a
dozen heedless fellows who rush upon danger blindfold.
While these events had been taking place, or rather just before
the very opportune arrival of Morton and Gardiner, the valorous
butler, who had been severely bruised during the progress of the
affray, and was well nigh exhausted by his extraordinary efforts,
had been captured at last by the two remaining Indians of the
first party, who had attacked him, the one with his bow and
arrows, the other with a long hatchet-headed pole. They had
now bound him again, and had dragged him to the neighborhood
of the wigwam, where he now sat upon the ground very near the
Canary Bird, looking the image of dogged resolution.
Ah, look yonder, Sir Christopher, continued Morton, after
a little pause, during which the savages seemed to be still
deliberating
whether to attack or to hold a parley with the three
Englishmen. Ah, look yonder at my paragon of precentors,
my most bibulous of butlers, my most bandy-legged of
Bootefishes
,
taken he is, captured, in durance vile. There too lies the
luckless Canary Bird by his side, picked, trussed, and ready for
roasting; and yonder sneaks back Humphrey Rednape with the
pouch on his shoulders according to your command. This way,
Humphrey Rednape, or the red devils will add you to the brace
yonder. Sneak this way man, continued Morton, as Rednape,
who, as will be remembered, had fled early from the field of
battle, but who had in reality been the cause of the favorable
turn which things had taken, by the information which he had
conveyed to Morton and Gardiner, of whose whereabouts he
happened to be informed, now stole forward with a large pouch
of ammunition upon his shoulder, and a fire-arm in his hand.
These savages are peaceably disposed, said Gardiner,
suddenly. I have no doubt on the subject. Down with your
piece, you mistake me. No more killing. They have not the
least appetite for gunpowder remaining. 'T is much more to
my purpose to deal gently with them. They respect me and
fear me; 't is time that they should love me. Moreover, I
recognise
their chief  't is Sagamore John, as well disposed a fellow
as can be found in the bay. My life for it, he comes half way to
welcome me as soon as I am recognised.
With these words the knight, to Morton's profound
astonishment
,
left the cover of the tree with his matchlock carelessly
lying in the hollow of his arm, and coolly advanced to within
fifty yards of the second party of Indians, who had been
standing
huddled together in earnest conversation since the fall of
their first champion. Half a dozen bows were lifted in an
instant, half a dozen arrows were drawn to the head, while
Morton, transfixed with wonder, stood gazing at the
incomprehensible
fool-hardiness of the knight, when suddenly, at a word
of command, the weapons were all lowered, and the chief of the
party uttering a shrill cry of recognition, advanced forward to
meet the Englishman, proffering his hand, and making a hundred
gestures and unintelligible protestations of friendship.
The sagamore was a young man, tall and well limbed, like
most of their other warriors, and wore a variety of ingeniously
painted devices upon his arms and bust. A robe of magnificent
beaver skins hung from his shoulder, a girdle of wampum was
around his waist, and he held a tomahawk in his hand. Like
all the other savages who had appeared upon the scene, he was
equipped for peace, and had had no expectations that morning of
a conflict of any kind. He had a good-humored, horse face, with
an expression of considerable intelligence, and was evidently
regarded
by his companions with perfect respect. This was
Sagamore
John, a petty chieftain of a small body of natives who
inhabited the neighborhood of Mishawum, and who were all
subjects
to the more extensive sovereignty of the Squaw Sachem of
the Massachusetts.
Between this potentate and the knight, there had for a long
time existed relations of perfect friendship and mutual esteem.
During his residence in the Massachusetts, Sir Christopher had
ably employed the long period of apparent inactivity to which
the slow moving and somewhat recalcitrating operations of his
confederates in England had condemned him, in establishing
secret
but extensive relations of amity with the chiefs of all the
scattered tribes in the neighborhood of the territory, over which
he eventually contemplated establishing his own sovereignty.
His connections with them were widely ramified, and managed
with the adroitness which was his distinguishing characteristic.
The sagamore and Sir Christopher exchanged salutations.
In a few hurried expressions, which were inaudible to the other
parties, and by a careless gesture of the knight towards the
savage
who had fallen by his hand, it was evident that he had
explained his own part in the transaction. Desirous of
investigating
the original cause of the affray, he seemed willing to
prolong
his interview with the sagamore. All appearances of
hostility
having ceased on both sides, the other Indians retired by
themselves for the present to the vicinity of the wigwam, where
they resumed the interrupted preparations for their feast; while
Morton and Walford together proceeded to liberate the two
captives
Bootefish and Doryfall, and then withdrew to the vicinity
of the beach to hold deliberation.
Beshrew me, said the blacksmith to the knight, but you
seem marvellously to understand yourself with my friend the
sagamore yonder. A man of pith he is, and no skulker; and
by the beard of my father, I would not have valued your life at a
farthing when you marched out upon them just now. To be
sure, their arrows be mighty clumsy tools, continued the giant,
who had been amusing himself, since the cessation of hostilities,
with extracting the stone points of the darts, which, as we have
seen, had inflicted several annoying although trifling wounds
upon his person  to be sure, they be mighty clumsy tools,
unless
the game be cocksparrows; and look ye, I be something
bigger and tougher than a cocksparrow, he concluded,
contemptuously
tossing the weapons which had galled him upon the
ground.
Aye, said Morton, replying in the careless humor which
was habitual with him, to the observations of Walford, which
Gardiner, engaged in colloquy with the sachem, did not appear
to heed. Aye, master smith, thou seest that our worthy
friend Sir Christopher is even more closely allied to his highness
Sagamore John, even than thy gigantic self. The devil a bit
would yonder cocksparrow archers have dropped their weapons
at thy command, or even at mine, suzerain of Passanogessit,
though they know know me to be. See what it is to be born
with the jewel of command in your eye, as a beaver with a
priceless treasure in his tail. And truly this Sagamore John, as
VOL. I. 12
he delights to style himself  thanks to his highness, by the way,
for eschewing his savage name, which would crack our jaws
worse than his tomahawk or thy sledge-hammer, and into more
pieces than it hath syllables  truly John is a very agreeable
young man.
Aye, answered the smith, who had troubled himself but
little with savage pedigrees or politics, 't is as pretty a fellow in
a squabble as one would care to meet with of a summer's day.
A great chieftain he is, to be sure, and the Lord of all these
parts I believe  may they have never a worse one.
Poh, nonsense, thou most careless and uninstructed giant,
answered Morton, thy ignorance of the genealogy and political
history of the tribes among whom thou hast pitched thy tent,
is lamentable. Know, then, that yonder dignified red-skin,
with the wholesome name of John, is but a satrap, a prefect,
under the mighty personage who rules these savage realms.
Know that this whole country of the Massachusetts obeys the
sovereignty of an illustrious squaw. This squaw sachem is the
dowager of the lamented Nanepashemit, or the New Moon,
which New Moon being brought into unlucky conjunction with
certain Tarrantine tomahawks, was suddenly eclipsed somewhere
in the year of our Lord 1619. He left behind four lesser
satelites
,
three sons and a daughter  one of the sons, the respectable
young man now before us, whose pagan name, Wonohaquahan,
I will for once venture to pronounce, has command over some
twenty or thirty warriors, while his brothers possess a similar
authority
farther towards the east, but the dowager, the Saunks,
hath succeeded to the throne, and exercises despotic sway over
her sons and subjects.
Master smith, suddenly interrupted Gardiner, turning
from the sagamore, what began the riot this morning? That
is the matter to be looked to now.
Faith, Sir Christopher, the devil a bit can I instruct you on
the subject. Four drunken vagabonds of the pious crew,
harbored
by our friend Master Morton here, paid me a visit this
morning. I should have said three vagabonds, for yonder Robin
Bootefish hath this day borne himself so like a man of mettle, that
he shall be damned before he hears hard names again from
Thomas Walford; aye, or hard knocks either, said the smith,
extending his hand towards the doughty butler. That
individual
who by a kind of miracle had escaped unwounded, though
marvellously bruised, from his various adventures that morning,
and who had been refreshing himself during the interval afforded
by the historical disquisition of Morton, with a quiet nap in the
sun, had aroused himself at the voice of the blacksmith, and now
listened with gratification to this encomium upon his conduct.
Thanks to you, worthy Goodman Walford, said he with
stately but sincere cordiality, as he arose from his recumbent
position, and extended a hand to the blacksmith.
Thanks to you, master blacksmith, and truly I be well
pleased that the individual whom you chose to honor with the
name of lobster, and mayhap to handle somewhat more roughly
than was necessary, one fine morning, hath had opportunity to
show the stuff he be made of.
As the butler paused for breath, Gardiner, who had become
impatient at this effusion of sentiment on the part of the butler
and smith, now repeated his inquiry as to the cause of the
conflict.
If your worship, Master Morton, will allow, resumed the
butler, I can explain to Sir Christopher the whole of the
matter
in about six words.
Out with it, man, said Sir Christopher impatiently,
methinks
it needs no urging.
Well, then, know your worship, said the butler, that the
whole cause of this little riot with the red-breeches is all along
of Peter Cakebread. He be a mischievous, idle varlet, as your
honor knows, ready to get a friend into trouble, and willing to
let him get out of it for himself. Now you see, this Master
Cakebread, as we landed from our boats at Mishawum this
morning, chanced to find a canoe belonging to these very
red-breeches
snugly lying in the cove.
I knew there was knavery at the beginning, cried Morton.
There was a mighty bag of corn-meal in the boat,
continued
Bootefish, and your worship knows that the devil a pinch
of meal or flour has been at Merry-Mount these three months.
There were also several measures of dried beans besides. Now
what does my gentleman, Master Cakebread, but takes me this
very bag of meal and these very dry beans, and pops me them
into our boat, saying that we would have bread enow for
May-day
at Merry-Mount, or the devil was in it. I reproved him for
it, your honor, and called him a vile thief. This made him
laugh, hardened sinner that as he is, and without more ado, he
shoved the empty canoe out upon the water, as if it was not
enow to steal the contents thereof. As we were squabbling
among ourselves, the red-breeches, who had from the hill-top
discovered their canoe floating off into the bay, came down upon
us, shrieking like devils, before we had put off in our skiff. As
soon as they discovered Peter's knavery, you may be sure that
they screamed and yelled all the louder. Now what does my
little Canary Bird, when we found ourselves beset, but drop on
his face and pipe for mercy. As for Peter Cakebread, the cause
of all the mischief, why the devil even lent him his own wings,
to fly away withal, for how else he could make his escape as he
did, clean over the heads of us all, Christians and pagans,
friends and foes, is more than Robert Bootefish can tell you. In
the midst of our tussle upon the plain, up comes Goodman
Walford, and the rest is known to your worship.
The worthy butler concluded his harangue, which, without
more circumlocution than was to have been expected, had at
last instructed Morton and the knight as to the real cause of the
quarrel, by a beaming glance of affection directed towards the
smith.
And now, where is this skulking Cakebread? said the
knight, the culprit is known, and must be found and punished.
Master Morton, I shall insist upon an exemplary chastisement as
the only means of satisfying the savages' sense of justice.
Right as Rhadamanthus, answered Morton, but where
has the knave bestowed himself?
I have already told thee, Master Morton, interrupted the
smith, that the creature hath been seen by me in the midst of
the squabble. Flying in the air he was, like an imp of the old
one, for Satan protects his children. But if he be any where
outside the hottest cauldron in Beelzebub's kitchen, you'll find
him upon yonder oak. Take him an' ye will, but by the Lord, I
would not singe my fingers with his carcase to please the best
Christian in the bay.
While the smith was speaking, the knight had already
advanced
to the oak under which the blacksmith had received the
aerial communications from the offending Cakebread. The rest
of the party followed him, and soon became aware of the
presence
of the luckless culprit, who ensconced among the topmost
branches of the tree, sat grinning at them in defiance, and
obstinately
refusing to obey the knight's order to descend from his
pinnacle, from a very shrewd suspicion of the treatment he was
likely to meet with.
I knew we should find the culprit at last, exclaimed
Morton
.
Cakebread, Peter Cakebread, thy sins must be atoned
for, and that speedily. Of this thou mightest have been sure,
ere thou becamest a corn-stealer, for punishment, sooner or
later, surely overtaketh the guilty. What says my friend Flaccus
upon this point?
`Raro antecedentem scelestum
Deseruit pede Pna claudo.'
12*
Which for thy better apprehension is, `Punishment with her
club-foot, will yet overtake the nimblest and most thievish
baboon.' Have the kindness, then, to come down and be
whipped.`Valet ima summis mutare.' Leave thy infernal
mopping and mowing and descend.
Master Cakebread, however, seemed little inclined to obey the
behest of his liege lord and sovereign, and remained in his
elevated position, looking very malicious, very obstinate, and
very much frightened withal.
The knight became now very impatient, and shouted to him
in a voice whose peremptory tones seemed to produce an
instantaneous
effect upon the culprit.
I tell thee to descend from the tree, and that instantly, thou
misbegotten child of Satan; it were better for thee to obey my
commands without hesitation; for I swear to thee if thou
palterest
with me ten seconds longer, the tree shall be felled to the
ground, and thyself delivered over to the savages whom thou hast
plundered, to be dealt with according to their pleasure. Obey
me instantly and thou shalt be chastised, indeed, but thou shalt
be protected from the vengeance of the Indians.
This last threat, or rather the mixtures of threats and
promises
,
seemed to have its effect upon the culprit. He began
slowly to descend from the summit of the tree, and when he
had reached the lowermost branch of all, he sat himself quietly
down for a moment, at about ten feet elevation above their
heads, and seemed disposed to enter into a parley with the
imperious knight.
Worthy and most valiant Sir Christopher, he began in a
fawning and suppliant manner, thou knowest that bread is the
staff of life, and that
Now by St. John, cried the knight in a towering passion,
if thou darest to utter one single word of expostulation, or
delayest one single second longer thy descent to the ground, I
swear I will shoot thee as I would a fox, and give thy carcase to
the Indians in exchange for their poor devils who have been
knocked on the head in consequence of thy misdemeanor.
As he spoke, the knight lifted his matchlock to his shoulder,
and deliberately covered the body of the trembling culprit.
Cakebread knowing with whom he had to deal, and finding Sir
Christopher thus indisposed to trifle, made no more ado, but
turning a sumerset, which did honor to his early education, he
alighted upon his feet in the very midst of the group, wearing a
ludicrous expression of mingled fear, malice, and curiosity upon
his wizzened features.
The knight seized him by the throat in an instant, and then
making a sign to Rednape and Bootefish to approach, he handed
the culprit to them, with orders to bind him closely with a cord
which Rednape held in his hands.
The unfortunate Cakebread fell upon his knees, for he
believed
that the knight had determined to execute him at once
without judge or jury, by suspending him to the branch of the
tree which hung so conveniently a few feet above his head.
The frightened culprit fell upon his knees and roared for
mercy.
Have compassion upon me, thou most humane and puissant
knight, and thou, too, my honored lord and sovereign, most
worshipful Master Morton, he cried, with his teeth chattering
as he spoke; truly have I done nothing but abstract a little
superfluous provender from the savages. I did but forage upon
the enemy as a Christian warrior should. Bread is the staff of
life, and for the lack of it must we die, and yet be hanged for
procuring it?
Gag the cowardly driveller, said the knight impatiently to
Bootefish and Rednape; and know, thou unlucky and most
thievish imp, that there is no question of hanging. Chastised thou
shalt be; whipped, and that soundly, to appease the vengeance of
the Indians, and to furnish them an additional proof of the justice
that Englishmen know how to render, even when their own
countrymen must bear the pain and the shame. Master
Morton
,
have the kindness to summon the savages from yonder
wigwam.
Willingly, Sir Kit, answered Morton, but permit me
before I do so to make a suggestion,  Is it certain that it would
not be better to hand the culprit ?
Here the unfortunate Cakebread struggled violently to speak,
and to throw himself upon his knees, but the gag and cords
prevented, and Morton proceeded,
Would it not be better to hang the culprit, or at least a
culprit? If Cakebread be too valuable a subject for me to lose,
and I confess his many excellent social qualities have
endeared
him very much to the society of Merry-Mount, why I am
not sure that I could not find among the more aged and
weather-beaten
veterans of the crew, a worthy substitute for the gallows.
There is a fellow in my mind just now, a huge feeder, who
dwells at Merry-Mount, and hath done so for years, who is old,
blind, deaf, and altogether of no value to me or to any body;
what sayest thou, Sir Kit, suppose we discharge Master Cakebread
from custody and send forthwith for my venerable friend and
hang him vicariously to yonder branch, in presence of the
savages? My life for it, they will be most salutarily impressed
by so imposing a spectacle.
Tush, Morton, said Gardiner, who, although impatient at
this delay in executing his orders, treated the Sachem of
Merry-Mount
,
as he always did even in his most whimsical moments,
with considerable deference. Tush, Morton, thou triflest too
unseasonably; I have determined, that although this actual
offence be not very grave in amount, yet that this practice of
pilfering by white men upon Indians is likely to bring us into
contempt, and that it is necessary to make an example of this
fellow, who, as thou hast thyself informed me, has been guilty
of such tricks before. He must be chastised in presence of the
Indians, and that at once.
Cakebread, who, in spite of his cords, had contrived to execute
a hampered dance of rapture, and to emit certain smothered
and unnatural sounds indicative of his intense delight at
Morton's
proposition, and his unqualified approval of this project of
a vicarious punishment, now received a smart rap on the head
from Bootefish, to induce a more reverential demeanor, while Sir
Christopher continued,
If you will have the kindness to call yonder savages
together
,
and will simply appoint your servant Bootefish yonder to
the temporary office of executioner, I will, without farther delay,
see that a proper chastisement is meted out to this culprit, which
will be sufficient as an example, but which will hardly prevent
him from fulfilling his duties as principal buffoon, so long as he
can find greater fools than himself to laugh at his folly.
Robertus Bootefish! suddenly exclaimed Morton, upon
finding by the knight's determined manner, that the matter must
be forthwith settled,  Robertus Bootefish, thou art hereby
authorized by the command of thy suzerain, to take upon
thyself
,
in addition to thy other responsible offices of butler,
precentor
,
and head clerk, the dignity of carnifex maximus, which
is in the vernacular, head executioner, not only for the present
but for all future time, and thou art hereby instructed to hold
thyself in readiness to execute the penalty of the law according
to the behest of the illustrious knight, Sir Christopher Gardiner,
upon the body of the culprit, Petrus Panificium, or, in the
vulgar, Peter Cakebread, upon this very spot and at this very
moment of time. Dixi.
The worthy Bootefish, who had been well aware of the result
towards which all this parley was tending, and who was nothing
loth to inflict upon the sneaking comrade who had well nigh,
through his knavery, cost him his life, a proper chastisement,
which he regarded as rather due to his unmanly flight from the
battle-field than for the larceny, had already prepared a
formidable
whip, and now came forward with considerable alacrity in
obedience to the order of his august master.
The savages were immediately summoned, and squatted
themselves
gravely upon their hams, forming a circle around their
chief, who received from Morton and Gardiner a rapid and
succinct account of the matter from the beginning to the end,
and expressed himself thoroughly satisfied with the penalty
proposed
.
The luckless Cakebread was then unbound and led
forward by Rednape and the Canary Bird into the centre of the
circle, when he dropped upon his knees and with chattering
teeth and streaming eyes made a full confession of his guilt,
accompanied
by many whining appeals for mercy. He was,
however
,
promptly condemned to receive forty lashes immediately;
and although his fears had perhaps anticipated a far more fearful
penalty, he again attempted by a variety of hideous howls, to
obtain a mitigation of punishment. Finding all his efforts in
vain, after casting an imploring but ineffectual look at Morton,
he permitted himself to be seized by Rednape and Doryfall. As
soon, however, as they had taken him by the arms, he dropped
heavily upon the ground, affecting to have fallen into a swoon,
and lay motionless and apparently as senseless as a log. At a
look from Gardiner, Bootefish advanced to assist the others and
they then lifted him from the earth in their arms, where he lay
like a man, from whom all the bones had been suddenly
extracted
,
with his lithe and supple frame swaying and twisting in
every direction like a dead serpent. As they carried him past
Gardiner, however, he opened his eyes and directed one
demoniac
glance of mingled fear, rage and hatred, which was worthy
of the countenance of a fiend, and which might have inspired a
more susceptible mind than the knight's with a sensation of
terror. Sir Christopher, however, appeared not even to observe
the expression of the imp whose hatred he was at that moment
incurring, and who, contemptible as he seemed, possessed
venom and determination sufficient to inflict a signal vengeance
upon the author of his punishment, if the opportunity should
occur.
The abject creature was now tied by the neck and shoulders
to a young hickory, and the forty lashes were laid on with a
hearty good-will, and with solemn composure, by Bootefish.
The first stroke aroused the culprit from his affected torpor, and
elicited a howl which resounded among the wooded crags of the
surrounding wilderness. At the second he began to dance
about with extraordinary vivacity, and throughout the whole
chastisement he performed a series of wonderful gyrations about
the tree, accompanied with frantic but unsuccessful struggles to
escape from his bonds. When the last blow had been struck,
and the echo of the last howl had died away among the cliffs of
Mishawum, the savages, at Gardiner's request, were drawn up
in a double line, the cords which secured the culprit were
unbound
,
and he was ordered in conclusion to run the gauntlet
through them, and to receive a swinging thwack from every
one of them as he passed. As soon, however, as he was
liberated
,
he dropped again like a torpid snake upon the earth, and
appeared entirely inanimate from the effects of his punishment;
upon Gardner's stirring his prostrate carcase with his foot,
however
,
and threatening him with an additional allowance of stripes
upon the failure of instant obedience, he jumped upon his legs
and proceeded cautiously to the head of the line. Here, as he
was attempting to steal quietly by the first post of danger, he was
received by a hearty knock from the flat side of a hatchet; when,
suddenly recovering his powers, as if by enchantment, and
exerting the whole of his extraordinary muscular agility, he
bounded into the air, threw a somerset clean over the heads of
his enemies, and then fled swiftly across the plain. At the
command
of their chief, the savages desisted from the pursuit which
they had at once commenced; and all parties being thoroughly
satisfied with the penalty inflicted, and with the general result
of the morning's operations, they severally dispersed to their
respective destinations.
CHAPTER XII.
TWILIGHT MYSTERIES.
Late
in the afternoon of the same day, Esther Ludlow, who
was walking alone very near her own door, was surprised to see
the tall figure of Sir Christopher Gardiner crossing the glade
and approaching the house. The knight appeared no longer in
the gay attire which he had worn in the morning and throughout
the scenes in which we have found him engaged, but appeared
again in the sad-colored suit, and wearing the steeple-crowned
hat which marked the Puritan. His demeanor and bearing
were no less altered, and it would have been difficult for the
keenest observer to have discovered in the grave and measured
deportment, the meek and gentle voice, and the calm and
somewhat
melancholy countenance of the personage who was now
exchanging salutations with Esther Ludlow, any trace of the mnn
of action whom we left so lately upon the plain of Mishawum.
I have taken the liberty to intrude once more upon your
presence, said he, with a demure glance at Esther, which was
quickly withdrawn as her eyes met his own, because, since I
last parted from you I have received letters, which confirm the
tidings which you somewhat briefly imparted to me, the last
time we met. Believing that in all probability your own
dispatches
might not yet have been delivered, I have come to
proffer whatever information I may have obtained for your own
use.
I thank you for your courtesy, replied Esther coldly, for
she was not too well pleased with the knight's visit, and felt a
strange trouble, she knew not why, at his presence; I thank
VOL. I. 13
you respectfully, but the letters which have been delivered to my
brother and myself from our friends in England, have fully
instructed us as to the course of events in England, and as to
the particular details of the matters most interesting to the
dwellers in the wilderness.
Then I have only to express to you, replied the knight,
my sincere congratulations at the auspicious tidings. Before
another three months shall have elapsed, we may hope to see the
commencement of a religious settlement, the laying of the
corner-stone of a permanent asylum for the persecuted. I know
how much of pure and sublime happiness such an event must
excite in your breast. I sincerely trust that you will not be
offended that a lonely and unworthy wayfarer like myself,
ventures
to express to you his sympathy with a cause which he
knows to be nearest to your heart.
It lies doubtless very near to my heart, replied Esther,
who was somewhat softened to the stranger by his apparently
fervid interest in the cause to which she had devoted herself, but
whose mind, pre-occupied at that moment by deep and
melancholy
regrets at the recent demeanor of her absent lover, was
but little open to any strong impression from the language of the
man who was now addressing her. It lies doubtless very near
to my heart, and I am truly impatient that the expected ships
should arrive. Still my mind at times misgives me, whether
obstacles may not, after all, occur during these troublous times,
which may make their endeavors fruitless.
Not so, believe me, answered her companion, who, as will
be explained hereafter, had already made up his mind as to the
line of conduct he was to pursue for the present, having now
received the instructions which he had been so eagerly expecting
from his confederates in England. I have reason to believe
that the good work is likely to go on and prosper. Such is the
tenor of the advices which I have received from my own friends,
and such, doubtless, must be the hopes held forth in your
correspondence
.
I cannot tell, answered Esther, whose manner became
distant again, in spite of herself, as she found the knight
desirous
of protracting the interview without any apparent cause.
Our enemies in England are powerful and malignant, and I
fear they may send emissaries to the wilderness to impede our
cherished work.
But the friends of the colony at home are powerful and
influential, replied the knight, who was gazing with a look of
undisguised admiration at the fair face of his companion. He
checked himself suddenly, however, and remembering that
passionate
words and bold glances but ill comported with the stern
and grave character which he had assumed, he added in an altered
tone, Believe me when I assure you that you have but little to
fear from the machinations of the enemies whom you deem so
powerful. As to the emissaries to whom you allude, I doubt
very much their existence; certainly I have found but few
persons in whose sincere attachment to our great religious
enterprise, I could not confide as much as in my own.
And yet, said Esther, who was still more and more
desirous to terminate the interview with the mysterious
personage
,
who inspired her with an unaccountable feeling of distrust,
but unwilling to be absolutely discourteous to a man whom she
knew her brother regarded with respect,  I fear me that,
among the wild and lawless spirits who inhabit the south-western
coasts of Massachusetts, there be many who are both evil
wishers and evil doers. Strange tales reach our ears, of godless
and profane ribaldry in those regions, which would be in itself
sufficient to bring a curse and a desolation upon the land.
If you speak of the rioters and worthless revellers of
Passanogessit, answered Gardiner, you may dismiss any fears
as to evil influence from such a source; believe me, that crew of
outcasts is too contemptible and too insignificant in every
manner, to merit a thought. They will be swept away like the
foul and noisome mists of the morass yonder, before the clear
sunlight of religion which is so soon to rise upon this benighted
land. Let but your brave and energetic people arrive, and you
will see them shrink away like owls, and bats, and foul things,
which fear the light of day. Profane not, beautiful Esther
Ludlow, added the knight with another look of earnest and
irrepressible, but respectful admiration, profane not your
serene thoughts, by allowing them to wander to subjects so
infinitely below your own exalted sphere.
The passionate glances of the knight fell upon the beautiful
Puritan as harmlessly as tropical sunshine upon a marble statue.
With a cold and unembarrassed look, which almost disconcerted
him, she replied,
I am willing to receive your account of them, Sir Knight,
and to participate in the hopefulness with which you seem to
regard the undertaking of which we were speaking, but the air
is growing chill and the evening is approaching. I regret that
my brother's absence must make me appear uncourteous, in not
inviting you to partake of the humble hospitality of our roof,
and I must even crave your permission to retire.
Gardiner was not the man to be abashed by a repulse as
decided as this seemed to be, and he still lingered at the
door-step
,
ready and yet reluctant to take leave; thus detaining, for a
few moments, his companion, who was naturally unwilling to
withdraw into the house until he had departed.
It was a strange but not unaccountable attraction, which had
exerted so sudden an influence upon the knight's imagination.
It should, moreover, be never lost sight of, that although the
scenery of this tale is found in the stern deserts of New
England
,
yet that the actors were all Europeans, born and reared
among all the influences of an ancient civilization, and
subjected
to all the conflicting, turbulent and chequered sentiments,
motives, and passions, which beset human nature when
developed
under the exciting atmosphere of a high social culture.
Such almost wilful contrasts are not the least remarkable features
in the singular scene presented upon the opening pages of New
England's chronicle.
I purpose visiting our brethren at New Plymouth very
shortly, said he, as he found Esther determined to abridge their
interview, and I should be well pleased if in aught I could be
serviceable to you. I have tarried long enough among them, to
know that you have heaped upon your head the blessings of
those who were nigh to perish, and that your departure has been
bitterly lamented by the poorer of the brethren and their
families
in that sterile spot of earth. Is there naught in which I
can be useful to you?
I thank you for your courtesy, said Esther, advancing a
few steps towards him, for I do remember me, that there is a
family there which truly demands my care. A certain weaver
from Suffolkshire, who emigrated to these shores during the past
year, and who has been sojourning at New Plymouth, is, I
believe, still tarrying there. He is feeble in health, and not
overburdened with capacity for this wilderness work. Commend
me to him, and advise him, in my name, to tarry still a little
with the brethren of Plymouth. Delays still attend the
enterprise
of the settlement at Naumkeak. He must at this time be
suffering many pangs of poverty, and perhaps illness, for he has
a considerable family. Sir Knight, I shall even accept your
courteous offer, and entreat you to convey to this poor weaver,
whose name is Mellowes, a small token of my remembrance,
with an assurance of my continued interest in his welfare.
Esther went into the house for a moment, and presently
returned
.
There are a very few gold pieces in this purse, said
she, extending it to him, but they are all which are at present
13*
at my command, and more than sufficient to save my poor
friends from absolute starvation. If, however, want should
continue
to press upon them, they may be able to procure the
necessaries of life by means of this useless gaud, which I pray
you to convey to the Goodwife Mellowes, with the assurance
that the trifling gewgaw is not sent to be worn as a piece of
worldly apparel, but to be exchanged for the necessaries of life,
when they shall find themselves sorely beset.
As Esther spoke, she took from her neck a heavy gold chain
which she wore studiously concealed beneath the folds of her
folds of her garments, and delivered it to the knight.
And now Sir Knight, she concluded, once more imploring
your pardon for my withdrawal, I shall even bid you farewell.
She entered the humble cottage as she spoke, and closed the
door behind her. The knight stood stock still for a moment,
gazing enraptured at her retiring figure. He then advanced a
few steps across the glade, when he suddenly paused and leaned
musingly against the trunk of an oak which stood on the verge
of the forest. He lifted the chain to his lips, and kissed it
passionately
many times, and then fastened it round his neck. As
he did so, a smile of indefinite triumph shone for an instant
across his dark features.
The brown shadows of evening were fast descending upon
the landscape, and objects were already growing indistinct in
the twilight. The knight still leaned against the tree, lost in a
vague but delicious reverie. He believed himself alone in that
wilderness, but he was wrong. Within a few paces of him, but
concealed by the heavy branches of the very tree against which
he was leaning, stood the dusky figure of a man. He stood with
his eyes glaring fearfully upon the knight, his hand
clenching
a naked rapier, his breath suspended, and his features
and whole frame convulsed by fierce, but resolutely suppressed
emotion. The man who stood in ambush there was no savage,
although he was thirsting for the heart's blood of his enemy,
and was delaying with an almost voluptuous sensation of hatred,
the moment of gratification, which fate seemed at last to have
placed within his reach. That man was Henry Maudsley. He
had arrived at the spot a few moments before, with his heart
filled with regret and remorse for what had seemed to him in his
cooler moments, the unjust and unworthy suspicion which had
fastened so uncontrollably upon his soul at his last interview
with Esther.
After that last interview he had been hardly able to explain even
to himself the sudden and stormy passions which had overflowed
his heart like a torrent, when he first learned the existence of
what he believed to be an intimacy between the knight and his
beloved. From that moment a demon seemed to have assumed
dominion over him, and he had struggled in vain against the
fearful influence. He had, however, during the many solitary
hours of absence which had passed since he had left Esther so
deeply wounded as his unseemly outbreak of anger and jealousy,
found a little time to reflect upon his conduct and situation.
Although still unable to shake off the indistinct fears which
weighed like lead upon his spirit, he had, however, schooled
himself into believing that he was perhaps the victim of his own
imagination, and had so far prevailed over his hot temper and
his pride as to form the resolution to seek once more an
interview
with Esther. He would once more, he thought, appeal to
the old friendship between them; he would once more, but with
more eloquent appeals than the tame language with which, as it
now seemed to him, he had last urged his suit, again endeavor
to tear her from the desolation in which she had made her home,
would once more, and in bold and irresistible terms, warn her
of the dangerous character of the unworthy knight whom she
had admitted to her acquaintance. Should he find his first
suspicious
as baseless as he fondly prayed that they might prove,
he would upon his knees implore her forgiveness, that he should
have dared to profane the purity of her mind with the breath of
his suspicions. If, however, he should find that those boding
thoughts which still haunted him could not be dispelled by her
presence, he would at any rate bid her farewell in a spirit more
worthy both of her character and his own. Having once formed
this resolution, he had, with the headlong impatience of his
character
,
been unable to rest till he had fulfilled it. With a bosom
beating high with renewed hope, he had devoured the rugged
and difficult tract of wilderness which still separated him from
her, and had paused a moment within the edge of the thicket
which fringed the glade before her door, to collect his whirling
thoughts, and to calm his feverish brain.
At that very moment, as he thus paused, in full view of that
lowly door-step, but himself screened from sight by the
protecting
branches of the tree, he had been an involuntary witness to
the concluding moments of Esther's interview with the hated
and mysterious adventurer. He stood there transfixed, gazing
as mute and motionless upon the face of that fair Puritan, as if,
like the loveliness of the fabled Medusa, it possessed the power
to transform him to stone, while, as in that fearful fable, a
thousand serpents sprang from the life's blood which seemed
slowly dropping from his heart. He stood there, like one
enchanted
,
too distant to hear the low accents of Mabel, and with
his whole soul concentrated in his eyes He stood rooted to that
spot, and an earthquake would hardly have aroused him. He
heard not, spoke not, scarcely breathed, but he saw all that
passed. He saw Esther place the chain in Gardiner's hand; he
saw him kiss the sacred pledge of affection, accursed hypocrite
that he was, and then place it next his heart; he saw his smile of
gratitude; he saw Esther's lips breathing the gentle accents of
farewell; he saw the long, audacious glance, with which the
knight dwelt upon her retiring form; he saw his smile of triumph
as he advanced, in slow and repturous self communion as it
seemed, directly towards the tree which sheltered his own figure.
He saw all this, and stood motionless. He suppressed even his
breath as he saw his hated rival striding so closely to him. The
knight paused at last, and leaned against the tree. Maudsley
was so near that he might almost touch him; he saw the chain
glittering upon his breast, he could almost see the bright and
soaring thoughts, which he knew were swarming and singing
their triumphal music in his brain. They were alone together
in the wilderness, with only the stars to look down upon them,
and his hand clutched the hilt of his sword convulsively, as he
felt that if the hour of certainty and of despair had struck, that
the hour of vengeance, too, had sounded. He stood there
gazing upon the face of his successful rival, and resolved, as he
studied the lineaments of that dark and impassible physiognomy,
that he would calm himself before he addressed him, because he
knew the self-balanced character of his antagonist, and was
unwilling to confront the man who was always master of
himself
,
while his own reason was well nigh blinded by his passion.
He stood there striving in vain to compose himself, for a few
rapid moments, and remembering that the spot where they now
stood was too near the abode of Ludlow, and therefore unfitted
for the work which they were soon to have in hand, he
determined
to accost Sir Christopher tranquilly that they might
remove together to a more appropriate place. While Maudsley
was thus hesitating, the knight suddenly aroused himself from
his reverie, and, with rapid movements, strode away from the
tree in the direction of the coast. Maudsley, forgetting his
resolution of calmness, and furious lest his prey should escape
him, sprang madly forward, calling out to his enemy in a low,
husky tone, choked with emotion, which was inaudible to the
rapidly retreating and unconscious Gardiner. At the same
moment his arm was suddenly clutched from behind, and his
progress towards his antagonist impeded. Thus assaulted, he
turned upon his new enemy, raising his sword to cut down the
skulking savage, by whom he supposed himself attacked. What
was his surprise to see that his arm had been seized, and his
career arrested by the hand of a fair, slight youth, who held a
dagger indeed, but whose frame, though graceful, seemed so
powerless compared to his own, that he lowered his uplifted
sword, contenting himself with shaking off the arm which held
him, while he gazed with a sudden emotion of wonder into the
face of the youth.
Spare him, spare him, Harry Maudsley, said the young
stranger, in a voice which was wild emotion. Not to you,
not to you belongs the task  you shall not escape me, he
continued
,
clinging with all his strength to Maudsley, who strove in
vain to cast him off, as he found that the form of Gardiner had
already disappeared in the darkling forest. Enraged at this
singular and unaccountable interruption, maddened to see his
enemy thus eluding his grasp, and cursing the folly which had
restrained him from dashing to the earth the slender creature
who had thus stepped between him and his revenge, he once
more turned to him.
Now, by the God of Heaven, he cried, I know not what
prevents me, thou insolent stripling, from cleaving thee to the
earth. Whence come ye, in the name of the foul fiend, who, I
believe, hath sent you hither to balk me? whence come ye,
what are ye, and why have you dared thus to lay violent hands
upon me, and to interfere with my purposes? Speak, or even
this slender frame shall not .
Maudsley interrupted himself as he spoke, for his face was
now close to his companion's, and there was something fearful
in the expression of the stripling's beautiful but distorted
features
,
and in the wild light that gleamed from his eyes, with the
yellowish, unnatural glare of a savage creature of the forest.
Strike, if you will, said the youth, without the slightest
indication of fear, as he looked contemptuously upon the
threatening
blade of Maudsley  strike, if you will. My purpose
is at least answered. The knight is already far beyond your
reach. Strike, Harry Maudsley, think you I fear your anger.
Alas! this heart of mine hath been more deeply struck this
night than sword of yours could wound it. Strike, Harry
Maudsley. Think ye my life's blood will be a love potion for
ye to win back the heart of your fair and fickle Puritan?
Maudsley chafing at this allusion to the wound which was
festering in his bosom, and completely enraged that the
interruption
of the stranger had been, indeed, successful in compelling
him to defer his vengeance upon Gardiner, exclaimed in a voice
hoarse with passion
I hardly know why I pause, why I obey not your bold
defiance
,
save that I scorn to strike at aught so feeble. What art
thou, peevish boy, that thou hast dared thus to intercept my
purposes, and even to goad me beyond endurance, by thy sharp
and scornful language. But I cry your pardon, my gentle
youth. Doubtless, you too are a suitor to yon fair and fickle
Puritan, as you term her, and have learned by what you have
seen this evening, how well such suit is like to prosper. Is it
so? Tell me, and I will forgive thee for thy insolence.
The lad laughed a low, scornful laugh as he replied, looking
as he did so, with an indefinitely taunting expression, upon the
face of Maudsley. No, truly, Master Maudsley, you are
strangely deceived by your passion. Think you, then, that
yonder marble face and stony heart, to which you yourself bow
down in such hopeless adoration, have such an omnipotent
charm, that all who look upon her in this savage wilderness
must straightway kneel and worship? Oh, no, believe me, your
frigid Puritan hath no charms for me.
Insolent, presumptuous? interrupted Maudsley, who,
however
,
was so impressed with the extraordinary apparition of this
youth, whom he now looked upon for the first time, that he stood
still and listened to him, with a curiosity excited by his
mysterious
appearance and language, that not even the tumultuous
emotions that were raging in his bosom, could entirely
extinguish
.
Who the singular stranger was, how he seemed to be so
familiar with his name and person, how he was able thus to
probe the secrets of his heart, whence he derived his strange
power thus to taunt and dare him to his face, with such
impunity
,
were questions which he asked himself but could not
answer.
No, Master Maudsley, no, continued the stranger, neither
insolent nor presumptuous. My words are meant in kindness,
for God knows I would almost spare my deadliest enemy the
pang of jealousy.
The youth's features were livid with emotion, and his voice
grew hoarse and husky as he spoke, but he commanded himself
again, and continued in a more gay but bitter tone,
No, no, Harry Maudsley, your wondrous Puritan hath no
charms for me. I loathe the very name of Puritan, I hate their
rigid looks, frigid hearts, and insolent sanctity, and for yonder
daughter and fitting model of her whole dreary sect, I assure
you I do esteem her well assorted in this gloomy wilderness.
Believe me, I looked upon you but now with pity, when I
marked
the benumbing spell spread over you by yonder passionless
beauty.
Thou dost most grossly abuse, said Maudsley, the
privilege
of thy weakness. I would I knew if thou wert man or
child, angel or demon, that thou standest here calmly mocking
me, while I stand listening like a slave.
Be calm, Harry Maudsley, answered the mysterious youth,
while Maudsley, who really seemed in a manner fascinated, and
who, perhaps, as would not have seemed extraordinary in that
age of boundless superstition, believed himself in the presence of
something unearthly, stood obediently silent again.
Be calm, Harry Maudsley; I tell you I pitied you from my
heart, when I saw you thus spell-bound by your cold
enchantress
.
No, the woman I could worship should be one who
should make the blood whirl through the veins, not a statue
carved in ice, to freeze my heart and chill my senses.
Why then, asked Maudsley, why in the name of Heaven,
if you are not bound by some singular tie to the fate of yonder
maiden, or my own, why are you thus interested, why were you
thus impassioned, why did you arrest my arm, and frustrate
my intentions; in one word, whence and what are ye?
Faith, answered the lad, still in the same gentle but
taunting manner, I hardly know why I should answer your
catechism. My own information as to your name and purposes,
your past and your future career, are all sufficiently well known
to me, and yet have I not intruded upon the privacy of your
thoughts by one single question?
My future! my future! inexplicable and perplexing being!
exclaimed Maudsley, presumest thou then to read the dark,
unwritten page of coming events?
Truly, answered the stranger, it needeth no ghost from
the grave to foretell thy future. A less preternatural hand might
venture to lift the curtain, which hardly conceals the mad career
of such a reckless spirit as thou seemest.
Read it to me, if thou canst and darest, exclaimed
Maudsley
,
impatiently.
No, no, exclaimed his companion, I am no necromancer
nor mountebank. Least of all, to-night, shouldst thou listen to
thy doom. Suffice that if I read the stars aright, thy fortune is
still within thy command, thy destiny not so direful as thou
thinkest. Nay more, thou shalt have a pledge of this promise.
Mark me, ere three days are flown, shalt thou find around thy
neck, something which is very dear to thy heart.
VOL. I. 14
What mean you by this riddle? exclaimed Maudsley
and what know ye of
Ask me no farther, interrupted the youth, what I know,
I know. Suffice it you to know, that where you most love, I
most hate, where you most hate, I most madly love. Yet am I
not your enemy, nay more, I would be your friend, but that
friendship from me is a mockery and a curse.
Truly, I thank you for your good wishes, interrupted
Maudsley, but I could wish you to talk less in parables, which
convey but dim intelligence to my uninstructed ear. Know ye,
since ye forbid me to ask you further of yourself, and since you
disclaim all interest in, and all affection for the fair Puritan who
dwelleth yonder, know ye yon false-hearted knight, whom men
call Sir Christopher Gardiner?
Do I know the knight? almost shrieked the stranger, in a
shrill passionate tone. Do I know him? and the boy
laughed a hollow, mocking laugh, that almost chilled the
listener's
blood. Truly I know him well. And yet I pity him, I
pity thee, I pity yon fair, icy maiden, I pity each and all of ye
more, ten thousand times more, than I do myself. There might
be creatures who, if they looked in upon my heart even now,
might pity even while they shrank from me. No matter, we are
all the fools of our destiny, and the time shall come, perhaps,
when the strange and bewildering scroll shall be as plain to our
senses as if written in letters of light. I cry your pardon,
added the youth, suddenly checking himself, and speaking in an
altered and more moderate tone, I am much to blame, but
sometimes I fear my brain is turning. This wandering late of
nights may be hurtful. You ask me if I know one Sir
Christopher
Gardiner. I bade you to question me no further, yet you
shall be answered. Beware, Harry Maudsley. Look to your
beautiful Puritan. Though she be marble, she may be moved,
though she be ice, she may melt; and I tell you that, if there be
one silver cord of human tenderness within her heart, the hand
of the wily tempter hath already struck it, and awakened its
slumbering music.
The youth paused, and looked at Maudsley with an expression
of profound commiseration, as he saw how deep a wound he
was inflicting. He laid his hand once more upon his arm with
an almost caressing gentleness, as he said in a low and
melancholy
tone,
Alas! we are all consumed by selfishness. Believe me, I
spoke wildly and perhaps unwisely. Tell me, continued the
boy almost fondly, is yonder fair-faced Puritan so dear to your
heart then?
I know not from what source, answered Maudsley, that
you derive your mysterious power over my mind. Tell me,
I conjure you, why do I thus stand listening like a slave to your
wild and incoherent ravings?
You have not answered my question, continued the youth,
still in the same caressing tone. Tell me, is the maiden
so dear to you then?
She was.
And is she so no longer?
No.
Alas, Harry Maudsley, I know you better than you know
yourself. Yours is a nature where passion obeys not reason.
You love her still. Those icy chains are riveted upon your
heart. Look yonder at the cold, pale, virgin moon, said the
youth, as the crests of the shadowy forests became silvery in the
rising radiance. Serene and passionless she sails in yonder
calm and distant ether, and heeds not the tumultuous tides of
ocean, which follow her high command like spell-bound slaves.
Such is your fair and soulless mistress. I pity you, and ah!
how truly can I sympathize with you. Think you I know not
what brought you hither over the wintry sea? and think you I
do no honor to the thought? I too, I too, who have forsaken
home, and happiness, and God, only to wander in the wilderness
till my heart bleeds itself to death, I too can pity, sympathize
with, yea, render honor to the abject slave of love  wandering
in deserts, braving peril, sacrificing his all, and all for naught.
My sacrifices are over, boy, said Maudsley; I have torn
my heart out, but I can leave it in the desert. I know not your
sorrows, but I fain would know them. Let us return together
across the stormy deep. Neither to you nor to myself, I fear,
is the crown decreed after all our struggles. Will you go with
me?
The moon-light shone full upon the pale, beautiful face of the
youth. Maudsley saw that his eyes were full of tears.
No, Harry Maudsley, I go with none. I must do my work
alone. For me there is no returning, no reprieve. Your heart
is kind, and deserves a better fate than seemeth now in store
for it. Believe me, it shall go better with thee, and trust the
word of one who hath so long been out of fortunes favor, that
he hath ceased to hope for himself, that your star shall soon
emerge from the clouds. Farewell, Harry Maudsley, perhaps
we meet again.
The boy seized his hand, pressed it passionately to his
lips, and then suddenly disappeared. Maudsley called to him,
but in vain. He followed in the direction in which he had
vanished, but could find no trace of him. Obeying some
irresistible
impulse he dashed forward in pursuit. Plunging through
the difficult and briery thicket, now caught by mighty
grapevines
which twined like coiling serpents round his limbs, now
hurled to the ground by the grey, protecting branches of the
ancient trees, and now struggling through the dreary morass
which quaked and shifted beneath his feet, still on he sped,
through the silent night and the darkling forest. He reached
the shore, he looked forth upon the mighty waste of waters.
The moon hung in cloudless glory above the tossing waves, and
the long column of light lay upon the ocean's surface like a
prostrate pillar of silvery fire. But neither on shore or sea
could his eyes discern any trace of a living creature. He threw
himself on the sandy beach, and listened to the monotonous but
musical roar of the surf. His wild and whirling thoughts were
soothed for a season by the majestic influences of that sublime
solitude, and his boiling blood flowed more calmly.
14*
CHAPTER XIII.
THE MAY-DAY REVELS AT MERRY-MOUNT.
The
last day of April had arrived, and the eccentric sovereign
of Merry-Mount, who had promised to his subjects and himself
a celebration of the ensuing festival of May-day, according to
the good old custom of merry England, had completed his
preparations
.
Many of the guests had already assembled, for the
sports were to commence upon the eve, and to be continued
through the following day.
A rabble rout of vagabonds of all descriptions had assembled
at Merry-Mount. All his numerous subjects and retainers,
including
those of the reader's acquaintance who had already
recovered
from the damages sustained in the conflict at Mishawum,
were lounging about the pathways of the forest or amusing
themselves upon the open glade around the palace, with various
uproarious sports. Upon the summit of the bare and elevated
mound which rose on the seaward side of Morton's territory,
the sovereign himself was seated in company with Henry
Maudsley and the blacksmith, Thomas Walford.
I am truly beholden to you, my masters, said Morton,
that you have kindly consented to grace our poor revels. A
poor and meagre substitute, I fear me, for the ample and jovial
revelry of old England's merriest holiday, our entertainment may
prove; still good humor shall not be wanting, nor such good
cheer as the wilderness may afford.
I hope my worthy gossip, Robin Bootefish, hath quite
recovered
from his ugly knocks from yonder red-legged vermin, said
the blacksmith; truly was he pounded into a jelly, and I never
thought at one time to see him on his pegs again. A good
swashing fellow is Robin, and a hearty fellow at a hug with a
red-breech; I hope his soul and body hold together, Master
Morton.
Hold together! that do they indeed, answered Morton;
honest Robin's soul and body are as well coopered together
again as ever a one of his own ale-butts over which he presides
with so much dignity. Master Maudsley, you are looking but
so-so. I fear me from your cloudy countenance that you have
but small spirit for these follies.
In truth, Master Morton, answered Maudsley, who still
lingered from habit at the place where he had temporarily and
for his own purposes established himself, but to whom, as may be
easily supposed, the habits of the Merry-Mount crew were
distasteful
enough in his present state of mind; in truth, I fear I shall
be but a sorry guest at your festivities, and you must pardon me
for reminding you that, by our compact, I am to be but a
lookeron
,
and not an actor.
As you please, as you please, answered Morton, you shall
find that our majesty of Merry-Mount is less despotic than our
royal brother of England. Nobody shall dance or sing upon
compulsion in my dominions; but trust me, Master Maudsley,
you would do well, for your own sake, to take that gloomy mask
off your handsome face, and make a present of it to some
Plymouth
saint who may have cracked his lantern-jaws with too
much yawning and singing of hallelujahs. By the way, I regret
that our estimable, but rather serious friend, Sir Christopher,
hath positively refused us his presence. He is at present at New
Plymouth, I believe.
The gloom upon Maudsley's haggard features was certainly
not enlivened by the concluding allusion of Morton to the absent
knight, who had hitherto eluded his pursuit, and his voice
trembled
with suppressed emotion as he replied,
I have heard that the knight, with whom by the way my
acquaintance
is but limited, had made a pilgrimage to Plymouth.
I have some trifling matters of business to settle with him, and
trust ere long that he will return. I presume you know
something
of his movements, Master Morton.
Truly, but little can safely be predicted of Sir Christopher's
movements, was the reply, unless one could have the good
fortune to look at their very intricate springs, and those
unluckily
are locked up very closely in his own bosom. Still I shall
marvel much if he do not return to his customary haunt before
many days have passed.
It appears that your sports, said Maudsley, who was
desirous
of changing the subject of their conversation, are to
commence this afternoon. I suppose your May-pole, however,
will hardly be erected before morning, as that I think is the
usage, at any rate, in the part of England which I inhabit.
The May-games, answered Morton, who was full of quaint
information upon this, and upon all kindred subjects, were not
always confined to the first of May, nor concluded in one day.
They, are indeed, Master Maudsley, a relic of ancient custom
among the heathen, who religiously celebrated the four last days
of April and the first of May, as a festival in honor of the
goddess Flora, the gentle deity of flowers and fruit. The
ancients were a genial and an imaginative race. By the beard
of Jupiter Diespiter, I sometimes think there was some mistake
at my birth, and that I was intended to have flourished among
the pagans.
But I believe, said Maudsley, that an equal homage has
been always paid to the same divinity, although under a less
classical appellation, from the remotest times, both in England
and in other lands.
Unquestionably, said Morton, the custom hath been
time-honored
among Christians as well as pagans, and I swear that the
benighted heathens of this Ultima Thule shall also learn to
respect it. The peasantry of England and of other countries
hold that the observation of the ceremony is a good omen, and
will propitiate the warm favors of the Summer, and win the
golden treasures of Autumn.
In old times, said Maudsley, I think I have heard or
read that, as in antiquity, the revels of May were protracted
much beyond a single day in England.
Of a surety, replied Morton. In the reign of Henry VII,
the genial month was so overladen with its festivities, that May
perforce usurped the dominion of its sunny sister June. Those,
Master Maudsley, were the glorious days of graceful and manly
sport, and the returning smiles of spring were hailed and
courted amid the waving of pennoned lances, the career of
panoplied knights, the clangor of trumpets, the smiles of beauty.
Day after day on horseback, on foot, with spear and sword,
cross-bow and quarter-staff, would the gallant knights continue
their tournament, maintaining the charms and the supremacy of
their sovereign Lady May against all comers from far or near.
But the custom was of far more ancient observance, I
believe, said Maudsley, who was listlessly endeavoring to
distract his stormy thoughts, by affecting an interest in the
subject, which at that moment engrossed his companion's whole
attention.
More ancient! exclaimed Morton; marry, I would fain
know at what remote period there was an England without a
May-day. Not surely in the glorious days of King Arthur, when
the beauteous Queen Guenever, as soon as the genial month
appeared, would ride forth early in the morn, a Maying into the
woods and fields, attended by her knights of the round table, all
clad in green, all mounted on their mettled steeds, each bearing
a fair lady on his crupper, and each followed by his esquire and
yeoman. Alas, my masters, I do ill to dazzle ye by invoking
the stirring memories of brighter ages; but a wayfarer in the
wilderness, like myself, must even do his best with the materials
which he can find.
There is a meaning and a moral in all such ceremonies,
said Maudsley, although the sad-browed saints, whose fingers
itch to pluck all the gay plumage from life, can never see it.
Marry, replied Morton, and what a forlorn and shivering
chicken will poor humanity prove when they have pulled all the
painted feathers out of its tail. A fig for life when it hath lost
its illusion. The foul fiend fly away with the world, for me,
when it hath grown virtuous and sensible and regenerated. These
wiseacres, who would crop the world of its frivolities as closely
as they trim their own skulls, may have the whole of it to
themselves
and welcome, as soon as they have completed their work.
When life is drained of its liquor, they may live in the empty
butt as merrily as Diogenes in his tub, and no interference from
Thomas Morton. In the mean time, Master Maudsley, there
shall be mirth and dancing, good liquor and good
fellowship
.
But lo! our friend, the Cyclops of Mishawum, lieth
already
in the arms of Morpheus. I fear I have been tedious as
a Puritan. Moreover, the hours are advancing, let me first
awaken this slumbering giant, and then with your permission,
Master Maudsley, we will descend to the plain yonder.
The blacksmith was accordingly awakened from a refreshing
nap, which the didactic conversation of Morton had induced,
and the three accordingly descended from the mound.
It was already late in the afternoon. The weather was fine
and warm, the season was a forward one, so that there was a
prospect which might not have always proved the case, that the
necessary garlands and budding branches would be found for
the morrow's purposes, and upon the whole, the spring, in this
climate more than in any other, the most perverse, coquettish,
and fickle of seasons, seemed desirous of rewarding her ardent
and light-hearted adorer with her sunniest smiles. The open
glade around the palace was thronged with a strange and motley
assemblage. We have already observed, that besides the large
number of vagabonds of various descriptions who occupied the
log-houses which were clustered and formed a little village
around the palace of the suzerain, there had been a general
invitation given by Morton to all the scattered inhabitants of the
neighborhood to share his hospitality upon this occasion.
Moreover
,
a considerable number of Indians of both sexes, who had
long been upon terms of intimacy with the Merry-Mount crew,
and many of whom, in consideration of Morton's good humor
and good liquor, were willing to acknowledge him as their liege
lord, were mingled indiscriminately with groups of Englishmen,
as wild in conduct, if paler in countenance, than themselves.
Boisterous games, frantic peals of laughter, loud and incoherent
and often incomprehensible language, English chatter and
English
oaths intermixed with the guttural grunting of the Indians,
in short, a distracting variety of screams, shouts and yells awoke
the echoes of the hilly amphitheatre which encircled the scene.
Come, my merry men all, said Morton, as soon as he
arrived
among them, the sun is already near setting, 'tis time
we decided the contest between the forces of Winter and
Summer
;
for beshrew me, if we win not the victory, the May-pole may
stand another year in the forest among its brethren, with the
crows building their nests in its branches, instead of being borne
and erected in triumph upon the summit of Merry-Mount.
Please your worship, said Bootefish, who now came forward
with a very imposing and solemn air, the preparations for the
banquet of this evening are completed, the ducks are spitted, the
pigeons trussed, the lobsters disemboweled, the ale broached,
the spirits ready, and our spirits willing  I only wait your
worship's orders.
Spoken like a Spartan, most laconic of butlers, answered
Morton, and now do me the favor to draw off your party, or
rather order the two prefects to lead each his own to the summit
of the mount.
Bootefish, who was Morton's prime minister and grand
coadjutor
upon all great occasions, and who felt himself entirely in
his element when engaged in ceremonies of any sort, now seized
a brazen trumpet which hung at his waist, and blew a blast
which made the forest ring again. As he concluded his strain,
two grotesquely attired creatures were seen suddenly to issue
from different thickets of the neighboring wood, and advance
towards the company. The first seemed a cross between an
ourang outang and a bear, walking erect like the one and
covered
with a shaggy hide like the other. It was a tall, grim figure,
with the face of a man looking hideously forth from a tangled
thicket of beard which hung around his face and swept his
breast. His whole body as well as his arms, legs, hands and
feet were covered with black and rugged fur; a garland of
winter green was upon his head, and another encircled his waist.
This Orson held an oaken cudgel in his hand and advanced
boldly towards the assemblage, making a series of uncouth
gestures
.
This was the embodiment of Winter.
The other figure came dancing and skipping forward with the
airy movements of a Zephyr, although his merry features would
hardly have seemed sufficiently divine to captivate Aurora. A
garland of wind-flowers and violets adorned his brows, a robe of
green gossamer floated lightly from his shoulders, his legs and
feet were adorned with buskins and sandals, and he had wings
upon his heels. Thus attired, and presenting a happy
combination
of Ariel, Mercury, and Zephyr, this airy being, who was
the representative of Summer, the
prfectus cohortis stalis
,
according to the pedantic Morton's expression, skipped forward
with many fantastic contortions towards the assembled spectators.
The two suddenly met in the centre of the glade, and gazed at
each other with apparent astonishment and indignation.
Suddenly
,
Orson, with a howl of rage, lifted his mighty club,
Zephyr raised his light and flower-wreathed wand to defend
himself; but just as the blow was descending, skipped nimbly
back, while his ferocious antagonist, losing his balance by the
unresisted violence of his own attack, floundered clumsily upon
the ground. Zephyr now frisked briskly forward, and began to
dance upon his prostrate body, but Orson suddenly rousing
himself
with a roar, the aerial being tumbled in his turn, while
Orson again threatened to demolish him with his club. Summer
lay stark and stiff upon the ground awaiting the decisive stroke;
the blow descended, but ere it struck the victim, the prostrate
Zephyr suddenly darted into the air, thrusting out a long, red
tongue, and while his blundering foe was furiously beating the
ground, he sprang lightly upon his shoulders, and tied
himself
in a knot about his neck. Orson, thus incommoded, howled
hideously and capered round the field, striving in vain to free
himself. It was useless, the imp securely held his seat, grinning
like a mythological monkey. Suddenly, Orson collecting all his
energies, plunged wildly forward, directly towards a large tree
which stood near the centre of the glade, apparently determined
to dash out the brains, both of himself and his persecutor. As
he reached the tree, however, the Zephyr skipped nimbly from
his post, caught a projecting branch, and swung himself upon it.
The luckless Orson gained nothing by his stratagem, but a
useless
thump of his own hairy carcase against the tree, the force of
which brought him again upon the ground. Zephyr jumped again
from his perch, his eyes glittering with triumph; but ere he had
achieved the victory by standing again upon his prostrate body,
his enemy was up again, and again menacing him with his club.
The trumpet of Bootefish now suddenly blew a second blast,
and at the sound the two champions desisted from their combat,
and with threatening gestures separated from each other.
VOL. I. 15
The whole assemblage, who had been gazing with much glee
at the combat between the representatives of Summer and
Winter
,
seemed to regret that it had been decided neither way, but
while they were shouting for its renewal they were directed to
divide themselves into two parties. At the word of command,
and with the promptness of drilled soldiers, they obeyed the
orders, and divided themselves into two equal portions; over the
one of which Orson instantly assumed command, while the other
arrayed itself under the banners of Zephyr. The two parties,
marching in harmony with the trumpet of Bootefish, which all
the while was blowing martial sounds, now advanced towards
the mound, which they ascended at the opposite ends. Morton,
as umpire of the impending combat, had preceded them to the
summit, and had seated himself upon a rock, where, attended
by Walford and Maudsley, he presided in solemn state over the
scene.
The two parties, numbering some twenty-five upon a side,
stood in single file along the hill-top. Their leaders now
arranged
them across the breadth of the mound, so that only
about the half of each party stood upon the table-land, while the
other portions maintained a difficult footing upon the steep sides
of the cliff, by clinging to each other. Bootefish now blew
another blast from his trumpet, and then waving his hand for
silence, in a very impressive manner spoke as follows:
Oyez, Oyez, know ye, good people all assembled, that our
gracious sovereign lord, Thomas Morton, Prince of
Passanogessit
,
and suzerain of Merry-Mount, not being satisfied with
the combat betwixt the forces of the winter and spring, hath
been graciously pleased to ordain, that ye all, here and now
assembled, and equally and fairly matched, do each and all of
ye, here and now offer your own bodies upon the issue, and
by true and manful wager of battle, decide the question.
Then gravely bowing to his sovereign, the dignified Bootefish
blew another blast, and then added in a less pompous manner,
Now fall to work, ye devils ye, red, white, and grey,  pull
Dick, pull devil, hug heathen, hug Christian, and make the
matter short, or by the Lord, the brant geese will be burned to a
cinder.
The stately butler, who already began to be impatient, lest
the banquet, which had occupied so much of his attention
lately, should be spoiled by delay, now withdrew towards the
vicinity of his liege lord, and looked upon the contest with some
impatience.
The two leaders, Orson and Zephyr, now joined hands
together
upon the summit, with their followers dangling in a
chain, each clasping the waist of the one before him in the line.
Manfully and ferociously they tugged, each striving to pull their
antagonists over to their own side or to the ground. For a long
time they stood locked, motionless, and so evenly balanced, that
neither column wavered an inch, till at last Orson, with a howl,
which was responded to by the shrill whoop of half a score of
savages, hugged the grimacing Zephyr within his hairy arms,
and pulled the whole opposing column half a dozen feet towards
him by main strength. Zephyr, half suffocated in his embrace,
lay apparently powerless in his arms, and hardly made an effort
to resist the attack, but no sooner did he find himself partially
at liberty and on his feet again, than he dexterously turned a
somerset, still holding Orson by his shaggy fore-paws, and
twisting
his elastic legs tightly about the monster's throat, ordered
the nearest link in the living chain which hung behind himself,
to pull with might and main. He obeyed, while the strangling
Orson, helpless and powerless, was dragged forward like a bull
to the shambles, with his cohort struggling confusedly after him.
Suddenly there was a pause, the party who were so nearly
victorious
began to yield again. Zephyr still hung, but with
relaxed hold, upon Orson's neck, and the shaggy representative
of winter, breathing and gaining strength again, began to press
backwards, dragging his opponents after him with prodigious
vigor. Zephyr, still loosely clinging to his foe, allowed himself to
be dragged to the edge of the cliff, the opposite column
shouting
all the while their yells of triumph, when suddenly he
untwisted
his legs, threw a back somerset, wrenched himself free
from Orson's clutches as he did so, and then stood on his feet
at the head of his column, while his antagonist, who, with his
whole party, had been tugging with might and main to drag their
enemies to the brow of the precipice, now suddenly released
from the opposing pressure, toppled backwards upon his men,
who all fell one upon another, heels over head, down the steep
side of the mount, rolling helter-skelter on each other, till they
reached the marsh below, some of them even sousing
themselves
in the creek at the base of the hill, before the impetus
of their descent was exhausted.
The trumpet of Bootefish now blew another blast, and the
lord of Merry-Mount stepping forward, announced that the
combat was terminated in favor of the cohorts of Summer, and
that accordingly, upon the following morning, the Summer should
be brought home with appropriate ceremonies and symbols of
victory. He farther announced, that as the evening was
approaching
,
and the immediate business of the day terminated,
he invited the worshipful company to do him the honor of their
presence at the grand banquetting-hall of the palace.
The ceremonious Bootefish now again sounded his trumpet,
while the discomfited Orson, with his prostrate followers, arose
and struggled from the morass which had received them, shaking
the mud and water from their garments, and once more ascended
to the summit of the mount. Here, at the command of their
sovereign lord, both champions embraced each other in token of
amity, Orson hugging the breath out of Zephyr's body, and
Zephyr returning the compliment by again half strangling his
late antagonist with his supple legs.
The whole party now formed again with great decorum, and
heralded by the chief butler and master of ceremonies, who
waddled down the steep declivity as majestically as his short
legs would allow, they followed the Prince of Passanogessit and
his two companions, Maudsley and the blacksmith, towards the
palace. An abundant supply of good cheer and good liquor had
been provided, and the banquetting-room, which was capacious
enough to hold about one half the guests, was soon thronged,
while the remainder of the company, who could find no room,
were satisfied with bivouacking upon the outside, where they
were liberally supplied from the tables within the house.
Master Morton presided with solemn dignity, upon an elevated
dais or platform at one end of the rude hall, where Maudsley
also found a seat, and looked distractedly at the wild and
grotesque
scene which presented itself to his eyes. The shades of
evening had already settled upon the forest, but the rude hall
was as usual lighted by the broad glare of numerous pine
torches which threw a fitful light upon the strangely assorted
company, where the ruddy features, civilized attire, and
uproarious
mirth of the Saxon mingled wildly with the flashing eyes,
painted faces and rude but picturesque costume of the savage
children of the forest, who sat as motionless at the revel as if
sculptured in bronze.
The company upon the outside had lighted a fire, around
which they were clustered, while the food and liquor, laughter
and song went round, and before many hours had elapsed, they
were joined by the other party, who had found themselves
somewhat
cramped by the confined dimensions of the royal
banquetting
hall. Here the mirth and uproar were continued till late in
the night, or rather till early in the morning, although Morton,
who had ordered all matters with a foresight befitting so solemn
15*
an occasion, had taken care that but a limited quantity of liquor
should be served out at this introductory portion of the revels.
The sovereign of Merry-Mount, as soon as he thought that the
banquetting had gone far enough, had himself retreated within
his domicile to snatch a short repose. At about two o'clock in
the morning, he aroused himself, and proceeding with great
gravity into the midst of the assembled rioters who were still
congregated about the bonfire, he mounted upon the stump
of a large tree which had been felled, and addressed them as
follows:
My faithful lieges and dutiful subjects, we are of opinion
that this night's revel hath already been sufficiently protracted.
Therefore, be it known to ye, that it is our pleasure that ye do
now, one and all, and in such parties as your tastes may arrange,
go presently forth into yonder forest, there to collect the choicest
garlands, and to hew to the earth the mighty pine already
selected
for our May-pole, which now still standeth among its leafy
brethren. Ye will at sunrise bring home in triumph the
majestic
symbol of the returning spring, and with appropriate
ceremonies
erect it upon yonder mount, where it shall serve as a fair
sea-mark to guide all comers upon the morrow, who desire to
partake of the hospitality of our palace of Merry-Mount.
Furthermore be it known unto ye, that the May dew upon
the grass is a sovereign specific for restoring and renovating the
lustre of the human countenance. Ye will do well to bathe
your visages, something time-stained and haply flushed with
liquor as they may be, that beauty may be spread over them, as
behoveth the gallant followers and sworn lieges of our sovereign,
Lady May. Go forth, my lieges, and your sovereign shall, after
a little time, follow in your footsteps.
As the suzerain concluded his oration, which was received
with uproarous demonstrations of applause, the company, with
many a whoop and yell, divided themselves into different parties,
and plunged forth in various directions into the forest which
surrounded the palace. Morton withdrew again into his mansion,
while the blacksmith, who had no mind to sacrifice his sleep in
order to participate in these midnight ceremonies, and who cared
not to enhance the beauty of his swarthy visage by bathing it in
May dew, stretched himself at his vast length by the embers of
the fire, and was soon lost in oblivion. Maudsley, after
wandering
restlessly to and fro upon the borders of the forest, till he
was wearied with the conflict of his own distracting thoughts,
retired into his own log-hut, which stood in the neighborhood of
the palace.
CHAPTER XIV.
CONTINUATION OF THE MAY-DAY REVELS.
The
sun rose brightly from the sea upon May-day morning,
and Maudsley, who had found but slight and unsatisfactory
repose within his hut, stood upon the summit of the mount, and
refreshed his weary soul with a contemplation of the majestic
scenery around him. Although he was by nature of a wayward
and impetuous disposition, and although his prejudices, from the
earliest period of his life, had enlisted him strongly against the
gloomy and austere principles of Puritanism, he could not but
confess, as he looked upon that solemn and impressive
wilderness
scene, so full of fresh and uncontaminated beauty, that it
were indeed a prostitution of nature, if the virgin purity, the
cool and shady loveliness of this sylvan world were to be
profaned
forever by orgies such as he had already witnessed. He
could not but confess, and perhaps there was something within
his bosom responsive to the enthusiastic spirit of Esther Ludlow,
which suggested the thought, that it were a nobler destination for
this stern and unappropriated wilderness, to become a new realm
for earnest and self-sustained enthusiasts who had become weary
of the older world, than to fall under the base dominion of the
scum of Europe, conducted thither by leaders impelled by
purposes of self-aggrandizement, and seeking only to transplant
upon this wild territory the worn-out follies, the decrepid
purposes
,
the reeking crimes of civilization. He thought, as he
stood alone upon that cliff, of the contrast between the grovelling
pursuits and the ribald character of the men who dwelt around,
and the lofty if fanatical nature of those, concerning whose
welfare and success he could not, in spite of himself, but
participate
somewhat in the interest which was so enthusiastically
felt by Esther. He imagined that even he, too, felt that within
him which could abjure the world, where he had dwelt till he
had found or fancied himself weary of its follies, and he
abandoned
himself for a moment to a vague dream of what
happiness
there might be in this beautiful land, alone with one who
was dearer to him than the whole world beside, when suddenly
the dark shadow of the knight rose upon his fancy, and dispelled
in an instant the soothing vision. At a moment when he was
struggling to shake off the thoughts which were again thronging
to his brain, he was awakened at once to a vivid perception of
the world about him, by a variety of shrill and uproarious
sounds which issued from the forest. At first, so entirely had he
forgotten the mummery of the preceding evening, and the
promised
sports of the present day, he was at a loss to account for
the sounds, but as soon as he observed one or two of his late
companions emerging from the woods, he recollected that the
May morning had arrived, and he descended from the eminence
towards the open glade.
In a few moments the whole wild crew, who had passed the
night in the forest, had entered upon the open field, and after a
short pause formed a procession and moved slowly towards the
mount. They were bringing home the May-pole, which was a
vast pine nearly a hundred feet in length. The tree had been
stripped of its bark and branches, ornamented with garlands of
wintergreen and forest-tree blossoms, and placed upon rudely
constructed wheels. In place of oxen, some fifty savages were
yoked together, each wearing May garlands upon their swarthy
brows, and evidently taking a grave satisfaction in thus assisting
at a solemn ceremony, which Bootefish had assured them was an
initiatory step towards their conversion from paganism, and
which was sure to require copious besprinklings of the strong
water, which they worshipped as the white man's God.
Thus harnessed, the savages drew the mighty May-pole slowly
along, with the Lord of Merry-Mount seated upon it in solemn
state. The rest of the company thronged around him in his
triumphal progress, marching in unison to the braying of
trumpets
and the thump of drums, whose rude music sounded
strangely
among those ancient woods. After a time, and with great
efforts, the May-pole was at last brought to the top of the
Merry-Mount, where, after a pair of elk antlers had been
fastened to its top, and the red cross banner of England, with a
variety of other pennons, added to its other decorations, it was
triumphantly erected upon the summit. Many shouts of
congratulation
now rent the air, and then the company, a little
wearied with their exertions, threw themselves upon the ground
for a few moments' repose. Morton and several of his adherents
now withdrew for a time from the mount, leaving the company
under the charge of his lieutenant and grand master of the
ceremonies
;
who, after serving out to them what he considered a
sufficient quantity of liquor, soon after retired himself. A
grand arbor was now constructed of green branches upon the
hill, not far from the May-pole, and another of lesser dimensions
near it. A considerable time had thus been spent, and the sun was
already approaching the zenith, when suddenly the music again
was heard advancing from the neighborhood of the palace, and
presently a fantastically attired company were seen advancing
gravely toward the mount. The procession was led by the
sovereign
of Merry-Mount himself, who, as Lord of the May, was
attired according to immemorial custom in the green forest garb
of Robin Hood. He wore moreover upon his head a gilt and
glittering crown, and held a gilded staff in his hand, as symbols
of his supremacy. Hanging upon his arm, came a dark-eyed,
dusky daughter of the forest, who, for lack of a fairer
representative
,
was arrayed as Maid Marian, the May Lord's favorite dame.
She too, as Queen of the May, wore a gilded crown upon her
swarthy brows, with her glossy black tresses floating almost to
her feet, and was arrayed in gaily colored robes of purple and
crimson cloth. They were followed by Cakebread, who had
recovered
from the effects of the flagellation received at Mishawum,
and who now figured as court jester. The respectable buffoon
wore a fool's-cap and bells, a motley coat, with tight-fitting
Venetian
pantaloons, whereof one leg was of flame color and the
other of purple. He held a bauble or fool's baton in his hand,
and his dress was hung with little bells, which jingled merrily as
he danced along, occasionally refreshing himself and the
spectators
with one of his favorite somersets. Next came the grave
and dignified Bootefish as Friar Tuck, his short but portly
person
arrayed in a monkish robe bound about his ample waist with
a cord from which hung a rosary and cross, and his rubicund
physiognomy looking particularly effulgent, as it broke out like
the rising sun from the dark and cloud-like cowl which covered
his venerable head. Rednape followed as the lover of Maid
Marian, wearing a tawdry cap, ornamented with a wreath of
violets, fastened securely to the right side of his head, and a
sky-blue jacket; while his long legs were daintily incased in
scarlet breeches and hose, cross gartered, and with countless
ribbons and true lover's knots streaming from every portion of
his dress. Next came the Spanish gentleman and the Morisco,
personated by less distinguished members of the company, and
wearing immoderately loose breeches, curling shoes of a yard's
dimension, and enormous, empty sleeves hanging from their
gaily colored jerkins. The principal musical performer
followed
,
with a drum hanging from his neck, a tamborine in his
hand, and a lathe sword at his side. Next came a creature with
a wolf's head and a fox's tail, with half a dozen green and golden
snakes wreathed round his waist; after him, a kind of goblin
wearing the grim head and portentous teeth of a shark, with a
dragon's tail; then several palmers masqued and cloaked; then a
jack-in-the-green, or living pyramid of blossoming branches,
dancing grotesquely along to the wild music which accompanied
the procession. Last of all came the merry Bernaby Doryfall,
riding the hobby-horse, the animal's head and shoulders
artistically
contrived of pasteboard, while an ample housing, or rather
petticoat of parti-colored cloth, descended to the ground, and
effectually concealed the rider's legs. The amiable Centaur
wore a pumpkin helmet of formidable appearance, and flourished
a wooden dagger in his right hand, while with the other he reined
in his restive steed as he gaily pranced and capered about,
bringing up the rear of the pageant in a very effective style.
The procession ascended the mount in an orderly manner,
and arranged themselves about the May-pole, while the rest of
the revellers arose from their recumbent positions and stood,
awaiting the orders of their sovereign. That potentate now took
a roll of paper from his bosom, upon which he had inscribed a
short poem, setting forth, in very high flown and classical
doggerel
,
an allegorical description of the ceremony, combined with
many enigmatical allusions to the present and prospective
condition
of the nascent empire of the Massachusetts.
[5]
[5]
See Note V.
This, after he
had read it in a sonorous and impressive voice, he gravely
affixed to the May-pole, that it might serve for the edification of
his guests, whenever they felt inclined for literary relaxation.
Then, with an indescribable air of majesty, he again extended
his hand to the dusky Queen of the Revels, and conducted her
with stately step to the great arbor, where he seated her upon a
rustic throne. Then advancing once more in front of the
verdant
tent, he exclaimed,
With gilded staff and crossed scarf, the May Lord, here I stand.
Know ye, therefore, my faithful subjects, that your sports are
to be conducted in an orderly and reputable guise, so as in no
wise to cast discredit upon the court of your sovereign, or to
invoke a blush upon the tender cheek of our loving queen,
`Music, awake! ye lieges all advance,
And circling join in merry Morrice dance.'
Thus having spoken, the merry monarch seated himself at the
side of his queen, while the whole of the company, Christians
and heathens, friars and dragons, palmers, masquers and
mummers
all joined hand in hand, and danced madly about the
May-pole
.
Round and round they frisked, their brains, already heated
with draughts stronger than May-dew, whirling faster than their
heels, and their many voices, frantic with unbridled excitement,
ringing forth upon the solemn wilderness around them so wildly
and discordantly, that the very beasts which peopled the forests
might have shrunk to their caves in dismay. Round and round
they whirled, shouting, laughing, yelling; now some of them
rolling by dozens upon the earth, and dragged about by their
companions till they found their feet again; now the more
active of them leaping and curvetting over each other's heads,
or frisking about upon each other's shoulders, the riders
hallooing
in triumph and the victims staggering blindly about, but all
yelling and leaping as if the wild and stunning music which still
played more and more furiously had maddened their senses or
transformed them into goblins. Faster and faster flew their
heels, louder and louder sounded the diabolical strains of the
music, more fierce and frantic rose the piercing shouts; startling
the echoes of the stern and savage hills around them, which
seemed to reverberate an indignant response to their demoniacal
merriment.
Suddenly Cakebread, the jester, broke from the circle and
frisked forth into the centre of the group, shaking his bauble,
VOL. I. 16
and commanding silence. The whirling vortex paused for a
moment in its mad career, and the revellers, knowing scarcely if
they stood upon heads or heels, became stationary for a moment,
to listen to his communication.
Look ye, my masters, he cried, this is indeed the music
of the spheres, though something cracked and discordant it may
be, and this the circling of the starry hosts around the sun.
Beshrew me, though, but these whirls be faster than befitteth
some of the planets. As for me, I am a comet, bound to no
orbit, and dance but for my own pleasure. If ye will that I
execute a hornpipe, such as my virtuous dam, whom the Lord
assoilzie, was wont to delight the world withal, so  if not, may
the devil blow his trumpet, and set ye all whirling again  but
the comet shall break loose from your influences.
Peter, it should be observed, was fond of stating confidentially
to his friends that his parents had both been rope-dancers and
fire-eaters by profession, and that he had been brought up from
earliest childhood to their respectable calling. Furthermore, he
was apt to mention that his destiny in life had been perverted by
a pious and charitable schoolmaster, who had attempted to save
him, like a brand from the burning, and had instructed him in
Latin and the humanities, but had thrown him away again
afterwards. By this process he had acquired an enlightened
education, but had lost his ancestral calling, and had become
neither flesh nor fish, and only fitted for a buffoon. This may
serve to explain his vein of conversation, occasionally more
ambitious
than that of his confederates.
The company signified their approbation of his intentions,
and accordingly Peter Cakebread came forward, his eyes
glittering
with merriment, and executed his promised hornpipe with
wonderful zeal and agility, and in a manner to do credit to his
parentage and education. Never before, at least in that
wilderness
,
were seen such prodigious caperings, such impossible
pigeon wings, such a breathless profusion of miraculous
somersets
,
such a hopeless confusion and entanglement of head, heels,
arms, and legs, in one rapid and bewildering contortion.
Merrily
jingled the jester's bells upon foolscap, jerkin, and bauble,
as he span and gambolled about, and merrily did the company
applaud, as they gazed with open mouths and staring eyes upon
this exhibition of his dexterity, and swore that he must have
made a compact with the evil one, and exchanged his soul for a
skeleton of whalebone, so superhuman did his pranks appear.
In short, Peter Cakebread outdid himself, and seemed to have
combined and embodied within himself, at least for that
occasion
,
all the extraordinrry and necromantic qualities of his
departed and illustrious parents. As he finished his dance, by
standing stock-still upon the point of one toe, in the most
graceful
and preternatural manner, he was greeted with noisy plaudits,
in which the sovereign of the revels heartily joined, as he sat
there upon his rustic throne.
Excellent well, Master Cakebread, he cried; of a truth
thou hast surpassed thyself. A merrier buffoon, a nimbler
morrice-dancer
,
`choreis aptior et jocis,' it could hardly have been
my lot to meet with in this savage wilderness. Thy sovereign
drinks to thy health, and the gentle Marian likewise, he
concluded
,
after touching with his lips the tankard presented
officiously
by Bootefish, and then extending it to the dusky sharer
of his throne, who, nothing loth, did due honor to the toast, or at
least to the tankard, which she seemed better to understand.
After Cakebread had finished his dance, and had meekly and
modestly returned thanks for the applause so generously
bestowed
upon his exertions, the master of ceremonies came
forward
with an important air, and conferred gravely with his
sovereign.
Thou art right, worthy Robin, answered that potentate,
upon
receiving this communication; truly the chariot of Phbus
is already wheeling from its zenith, and the day will yet prove
too short for our sports if we use not better diligence. Let the
pyramid of tankards and trinkets be erected, that the rosy
milk-maids
,
according to immemorial custom, may dance for their
simple prizes about it.
Bootefish accordingly beckoned two or three of the revellers
to his assistance, while the rest remained recumbent upon the
grass, pledging each other in the fiery liquor, and laughing
uproariously at the jibes of Cakebread, who, stimulated by the
applause which he had received, and the copious draughts which
he had imbibed, exerted his utmost powers worthily to discharge
the high functions of court jester, which had been conferred
upon him by his sovereign.
Presently Bootefish and his assistants had erected upon the
mount, about half way between the May-pole and Robin Hood's
arbor, a tall pyramid of tankards, pewter plates, and flagons,
which were to be used at the ensuing banquet, and garnished
it with ribbons, small looking-glasses, strings of gaudy beads,
gaily-colored strips of cloth, and a profusion of such cheap and
trifling finery, as was most pleasing to savage eyes. He then
apprized the lord of the revels that the pyramid was ready.
Be it it known to ye, my lieges, said Morton, rising to
address his subjects, that the milk-maid's dance is one of the
most ancient and time-honored customs of the May-day, and
that no festivity in honor of our sovereign lady could be
esteemed
complete, where this most graceful and becoming
ceremony
was wanting. Rings, chains, gooches, ribbons, and such
simple bravery, are the appropriate rewards for the gentle
contenders
.
It were a burning shame, if this custom, thus honored
throughout the Christian land of our birth, should be omitted in
this our first festivity in this benighted wilderness. The dance
of the rosy milk-maids, pleasing and pretty as it is, can in no
wise be dispensed with. Rosy milk-maids, come forth!
At this concluding exclamation of Morton, his faithful master
of the ceremonies gravely led forth a band of savage maidens,
who had easily been prevailed upon, by promises of liberal
reward
,
and for the sake of the glittering gewgaws which were
conspicuously displayed upon the pyramid, to agree to take
share in the pageant.
The rosy milk-maids, accordingly, as the Lord of
Merry-mount
facetiously designated these dusky daughters of the forest,
came forward, hand in hand. Though differing widely from
the buxom lasses of England, their prototypes upon this
occasion
,
yet there was something far from disagreeable in these
lithe and graceful creatures, with their bright, savage eyes,
supple
limbs, and elastic movements. They joined hand in hand,
and executed gracefully one of their own wild dances, ever and
anon, accompanying their airy bounds with sudden, shrill, but
not unmusical snatches of rude vocal music. Their
countrymen
,
mingled with their paler-faced confederates, looked on
with dignified composure, occasionally applauding their vigorous
whirls with a deep grunt of approval. When the dance was
finished, they stood stock-still, and received at the hands of the
master of ceremonies, the prizes which were suspended from
the pyramid, with a composure and dignity which might have
befitted princesses. There was no struggling, no snatching, no
exultation of manner, but they quietly adorned their swarthy,
but exquisitely moulded persons, with the various petty
decorations
which they received, and then gracefully and silently
withdrew
towards the principal group of revellers.
The company were now refreshed with a slight repast of dried
venison and bear's meat, of which they partook as they reclined
together upon the grass, and when the meal was concluded the
sports were resumed. There were now many games of skill and
strength exhibited. A mark was set up at the extremity of the
mound and the savages and Christians contested with each
16*
other with the bow and arrow, in which, as was observed with
considerable satisfaction by the sovereign, the palm of superiority
was by no means always to be awarded to the Indians, but was
fully as often due to his more immediate subjects, who manfully
contended for victory with their swarthy allies. The savage
was foiled at his own weapons. Perhaps it was the fire-water
which dimmed his eye and rendered his nerves unsteady, while
it left comparatively unaffected the more practised organizations
of the English. Games of wrestling, Indian hug and trip and
twitch succeeded, in which the savages, with their slippery skins,
almost naked persons, and pliable limbs, were almost constantly
victorious. Then there were merry bouts with the quarter
staff, in which the hardy Saxon regained his lost supremacy,
while many a broken head and bloody coxcomb dealt liberally
among the heathen champions, attested the prowess of the
English
at their own national game. Late and long were the games
protracted, and long and loud continued the uproar and the
merriment
.
The sun was now fast approaching the horizon, and
the hardy frames both of pagan and Christian would have been
well nigh exhausted, but for the liberal circulation of the butler's
flagon, which still flew gaily around, wherever a feeling of
lassitude
seemed creeping over the revellers. As the subtle influence
mounted to their brains, again their spirits kindled, again their
frames became instinct with renovated vigor, as if the wand of
an enchanter had been waved above their heads.
To the games of wrestling and quarter staff, which had been
conducted with orderly precision, now succeeded a general
pell-mell
,
in which all parties, old and young, male and female,
Saxon and savage, mingled in desperate and bewildering
confusion
,
hugging, tumbling, knocking, thumping, tripping,
twitching
,
pulling, leaping, dancing, singing, whooping and hallooing,
as if they had all gone mad.
At last the Lord of Merry-Mount extended his hand to his
savage
queen, and led her forth with majestic grace towards the
May-pole
.
Both, wearing their golden crowns upon their heads and
decked in royal robes, now danced a slow and stately measure,
and then, with agreeable condescension, joining hand in hand
with the whole group of revellers, they commenced once more
the merry Morrice dance, the sovereign accompanying his steps
by singing in a clear, melodious voice the initiatory verses of the
song to which he had alluded. The whole assembly pealed out
the chorus, making a din loud enough as they did so, to shame
the howling of the forest wolves. When the song was
concluded
,
the monarch and his queen slipped out from the throng,
while the rest continued leaping and frisking about the
May-pole
,
in a rapidly revolving circle, which increased every instant
in its dizzy speed, till one after another, overpowered by his
exertions
,
was sucked into the merry whirlpool and sank overcome
upon the ground. The revellers, thus fairly danced off their
legs, remained reposing upon the sward for a few minutes, till
the master of ceremonies again sounded his trumpet, when all,
suddenly inspired with renewed vigor, sprang to their feet again,
and marshaled by the indefatigable Bootefish, formed again into
solemn procession and marched down the mount towards the
palace.
CHAPTER XV.
MORE MYSTERY.
The
sun had sunk behind the forest-crowned hills. The
golden and violet hues which fringed the robe of the departing
day, were already mingling with the dusky purple of the
twilight
.
The last lingering glow upon the summits of the pines
had faded. The revellers had left the scene, whose shady
loveliness
their gambols had profaned. Maudsley alone remained
upon the hill, feeling a sensation of relief, that his ear was for
the moment no longer vexed with the howlings, nor his eye
offended by the grimaces of the crew who had been keeping
their long holiday upon the now silent mount.
And did the gentle and sylvan sports of merry England,
said he, musingly to himself, indeed resemble this grotesque
buffoonery, I could even find it in my heart to sympathize with
the Puritans' hatred of all holidays and pastimes. Did the
graceful and poetical festivities, by which the genial summer, in
olden times and lands, was ushered to her throne, bear affinity
to the frantic orgies which have this day been enacted, I could
honor the stern enthusiasts, who would trample upon such
mummeries
.
Methinks I feel my brow burning with confusion at
having looked so long and so listlessly upon fantastic pranks,
fouler even than the bacchanalian rites of ancient fable, and
which might have shamed a crew of leaping satyrs.
As Maudsley thus moralized, he was startled by hearing a
sound of altercation in the valley below him. He turned his
eyes in the direction whence the sounds proceeded, and saw
several figures, evidently belonging to the company, who had
recently entered the palace, and who seemed, so far as he could
discern in the gathering twilight, to be collected in a group
about a person wrapped in a mantle, who appeared desirous of
disengaging himself from the rest.
He descended noiselessly from the hill, and advanced
unperceived
towards the disputants.
Stole away, stole away, cried a mocking voice, which
Maudsley recognised as that of Cakebread; no, no, my pretty
master, 'tis not for thee to treat with such disdain the hospitality
of the puissant Lord of Merry-Mount. I tell thee I am sent to
bid thee return to the banquet. I am ordered to conduct thee
thither, by our sovereign potentate himself.
And tell thy sovereign potentate, said a voice, in whose
irritated, but musical tones Maudsley recognised something
familiar, that enforced hospitality is an insult which I will not
brook. I am master of my own movements, and look ye, I
purpose to go forth from Merry-Mount upon the instant. So
commend me to your sovereign, as you style him, and tell him
as much in answer to his message.
But I tell thee, Master Malapert, answered Cakebread, who
still acted as spokesman of the detaining party, that I have
special orders from the sovereign to bring thee back, and at
once. So obey the monarch's behest, and that cheerfully and
instantaneously, or else I shall arrest thee by virtue of this rod
of office, and thus saying, the jester shook his bauble till the
bells rang again in the face of him who seemed thus determined
to withdraw.
And I tell thee, Master Mountebank, that I give thee special
orders to leave me, and that instantaneously, answered the
stranger, in a still more angry tone; go back to thy master, and
bid him choose, in future, a less insolent buffoon to bear his
messages.
And how if the buffoon, answered the other in the same
mocking tones, decline to profane the ear of majesty with
insults
,
such as his mind is unlikely to digest?
Then keep them for thyself, was the reply; I trow thy
mind can digest them as easily as thy back can brook the
lash.
The jester, somewhat stung by this allusion, was about
making a still more irritating reply, when the long and ungainly
figure of Rednape thrust itself between the disputants.
Truly, said he, I am inclined to look at the face of this
high flying youngster, which he has kept covered all day so
daintily. Who knows, Master Cakebread, but this be some
villainous spy, sent among us by the saints. Come, come, my
young master, off with your hood and mantle, honesty should
never be ashamed to show its face in any company.
At this remark, the youth only pulled the hood of his cloak
more closely about his features, and Maudsley, who had now
cautiously advanced still nearer, saw that he was one of those,
who, masked and disguised as palmers, had been present during
the day's festivities, but who, as he had accidentally remarked,
had kept as far as possible aloof from the crowd of revellers.
Rednape, somewhat puzzled by the determined resistance of
the youth, stood for a moment awkward and irresolute, and
apparently unwilling to proceed to extremities, when Cakebread,
who seemed to have reasons of his own for detaining the
departing
guest, whispered something in his comrade's ear.
Sayest thou so? sayest thou so? said the ungainly
vagabond
,
apparently astonished at the information which he had
received, then, mayhap, it were safer not to meddle with him,
for if ever man had the devil for his most particular and
confidential
.
Nonsense, man, I tell thee it will be worth a handful of
golden angels to thee; still an' thou lackest courage; why I shall
even take the liberty myself to unmask this pretty gentleman.
And thus saying, Cakebread, relying upon the support of his
confederate, Rednape, ventured to pluck the slight and
seemingly
friendless stranger by the cloak. I bid thee once more
come along with me into the presence, he cried, and that,
too, wearing thine own natural features. What, man, the
masking
and mumming be all over, and .
The stripling, enraged at this assault upon his person, started
suddenly back from the jester's clutches, and throwing back the
short mantle from his right shoulder, suddenly brandished a
dagger in his assailant's face.
Now, by heaven, my patience is exhausted indeed, he cried
in a voice of passion; lay your ruffianly fingers upon me again,
interpose yourself an instant longer to my departure, and I
will stab you to the heart.
The cowardly Cakebread, appalled at this intrepid demeanor
of the stranger, shrunk hastily behind the awkward form of
Rednape
,
crying out as he did so,
To him, Humphrey, to him! Down with the murderous,
blood-thirsty ruffian, down with the sanguinary spy, down with
the disguised assassin, down with him, Humphrey.
Thus appealed to by his confederate, and obeying the brutal
instincts of his nature, Rednape plucked his sword from its
sheath, and rushed desperately upon the stranger, who, at the
moment when he saw himself temporarily disengaged from his
first tormentor, had suddenly attempted to save himself from the
unequal contest by flight. The two other vagabonds, however,
who had, apparently from curiosity, followed Cakebread and his
companion from the palace, now interposed themselves to his
retreat, and the unfortunate but courageous youth was obliged to
turn and defend himself against his enemy. Ill enough it
doubtless
would have fared with the victim of this cowardly attack,
whose slight and tender frame was but poorly fitted to an
encounter
with the big and bony miscreant who now attacked him,
had not Maudsley, bursting at last from his concealment, sprung
with a bound a towards the ferocious Rednape.
Stop, thou cowardly thief, cried he indignantly; unhand
that slender boy, and face a man, if thou hast courage enow for
aught but robbing hen-roosts. Turn here, or by heaven, I will
clip thy other ear for thee upon the spot, and cheat the pillory of
its due.
Rednape, thus purposely taunted by Maudsley, who wished to
divert his rage from the stranger to himself, turned suddenly
from the pursuit of the weaker enemy, and rushed ferociously at
his new assailant. Maudsley received his onset with composure,
parried successfully a desperate blow aimed at his head, and
dealt him in return a crushing stroke with his sword which
nearly severed the ruffian's right arm from his shoulder, and sent
him bleeding and howling back to his companions. Cakebread
and the two others, who had been but just enabled through the
deepening twilight to witness the sudden arrival of this new
protector
of the stranger, and the result of his conflict with their
champion, desired to see no more of a controversy whose aspect
was thus decidedly changed, but, without more ado, took to
their heels, and ran with headlong haste to the palace, not even
waiting to see whether their wounded confederate, who had
sunk exhausted and groaning upon the field, were alive or dead.
The field being thus cleared of the ruffians, the stranger, who
had stood stock-still upon the arrival of Maudsley's unexpected
assistance until the issue of the contest, now advanced towards
his deliverer.
We meet again, Harry Maudsley, said he, with the silvery
accents in which Maudsley instantly recognised the voice of
his mysterious companion at Naumkeak. We meet again,
Harry Maudsley, and truly I may thank your most opportune
assistance, that we do meet once more in this weary world.
Truly I do thank you, and from my heart, for your bravery,
although
,
alas, you would wonder that I should thank you for so
worthless a boon as life, could you read my heart this night.
I supposed, indeed, replied Maudsley, that it was my
enigmatical
and most shadowy friend, whom I had the pleasure of
assisting. You may spare your encomiums upon my bravery,
for it needed none to whip away a pair of cowardly curs, like
those who presumed to meddle with you. But what do you here
amid this wild and worthless crew, and what means the cowardly
attack which was even now made upon you?
Why I am here, replied the other, I could hardly myself
explain, saving that I am but an instrument in the hands of
others, or rather, perhaps, because I yield without hesitation to
a destiny which hurries me hither and thither, like a withered
leaf before the whirlwind. You would with difficulty
understand
my purposes, even if I should endeavor to explain them.
As to the obstacles which yonder ruffians interposed to my
departure
,
it is no mystery to me, although no doubt to you it is
somewhat inexplicable, and for the present at least must so
remain.
You still speak in parables, answered Maudsley. We
meet, in gathering twilight, in lonely forests, drawn together by
some irresistible influence, as if our fates were bound together
by an invisible chain. And yet I have hardly gazed upon your
face, except through dim shadows; you appear to me, and you
vanish, like some spiritual inhabitant haunting these solitudes.
Distress yourself no longer, Master Maudsley, interrupted
his companion. I am, I do assure you, no unearthly sprite,
but healthy flesh and blood. I am now about to bid you
farewell
,
with one word of consolation. I swear to you, then, that
what you most dread shall never happen, that what you have
almost ceased to hope, shall yet occur. Believe me or not, but
when to-morrow's sun shall first shine upon you, you shall
acknowledge
my power, for you shall already behold its influence.
VOL. I. 17
You shall feel still more sensibly that we are indeed bound
together by a chain, and you may, perhaps, remembering the
fidelity with which I have hitherto observed my promises, be the
more disposed to trust me for the future. And now farewell,
Harry Maudsley, and if you value the continuance of our
friendship
,
follow me not.
The stranger extended both arms through the gathering gloom
towards Maudsley, as if he would have embraced him.
Maudsley
advanced more closely, and it seemed as if his companion's
arms for an instant touched his neck. In another moment he
had vanished into the depths of the forest.
'Tis strange, muttered Maudsley, after his strange
companion
had left him. So gentle and so frail a form, and yet so
imperious an air, so bold a heart, so wayward a mood, so mystic
a fancy.
He turned away, but suddenly as he advanced, his ear was
struck by a deep groan, as of one in pain.
Hey-day, who speaks? cried Maudsley, suddenly startled
from his reverie, and immediately afterwards recollecting more
distinctly what had happened so short a time before. By
heavens, if that be really the voice of Humphrey Rednape,
perhaps
I may have some ocular proof that the whole scene hath
not been a creation of my imagination.
Groping his way towards the spot whence the groans
proceeded
,
he soon became aware of the presence of the
unfortunate
Rednape. Finding that his wound, although attended
with a very profuse loss of blood, did not seem to be so
dangerous
as he had at first supposed, he left him lying upon the
ground, while he coolly paused for a moment at the door of the
palace upon his way to his own hut, and recommended the
condition
of the suffering ruffian to the particular regards of several
of his fraternity. Rejecting very peremptorily all entreaties
upon the part of the sovereign, to enter the palace and partake
of the concluding festivities, and with eye, ear, and brain
wearied
with the fantastic scenes of which he had been all day long
an unwilling witness, he sought relief and repose in the humble
solitude of his own dwelling.
Long and loud was the merriment within the palace. Fierce
and furious was the revelry, whose discordant din vexed hour
after hour the solemn ear of night. But we willingly drop the
curtain over the concluding scenes of the Merry-Mount holiday.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE MINOTAUR.
Upon
the afternoon of a glowing and sultry day, the solitary
of Shawmut was sauntering beneath the ample shade of the oaks
and chestnuts which decorated his natural park.
A few weeks had passed since the events recorded in the last
chapter, and the fervid summer had already succeeded to the
coy and reluctant spring. It was early June, but, as is not
uncommon in a climate which loves the intense so much as ours,
the heat was already that of mid-summer.
The verdure of the forest as well as of the open glades was of
that tender and peculiarly vivid green, which marks the
summer's
infancy; and the many flowering trees and shrubs which,
for a few brief weeks, decorate themselves at this genial season
with their brilliant garlands, seemed to have changed the stern
wilderness scene where the exile dwelt to a gay and painted
garden. The red rose and the wild eglantine festooned
themselves
about the sterile cliffs; innumerable dogwood trees,
scattered
profusely through the woods, displayed their large, white,
magnificent flowers; the laurel upon the hill-sides blushed with
its rose-colored chalices; the dainty privet, which loves the
abode of man, hung over the rude palisades and tortuous fences
its clustering and snowy panicles; the gaudy iris and the purple
flower de luce made the fountain's edge, the brook-side, and the
damp meadows gay; while from the stern and hideous morass,
which bounded one side of the park, was diffused the delicious
odor of the azalea, that obscure and hidden shrub which makes
an atmosphere of fragrance about the foul and repulsive swamps
where it abides, like a sweet and virtuous soul sanctifying, by its
own perfume and beauty, the most squalid and cheerless haunts
of humanity. The woods, the hills, the plains were vocal with
the melody of a thousand birds, rejoicing in the return of
summer's
genial warmth. The swift and busy swallow darted to
and fro about the roof of the cottage; the clear, cheerful note
of the quail, calling and responding to his mate, sounded
incessantly
from the edge of the wood; the plaintive and monotonous
melody of the thrush resounded throughout the innermost depths
of the forest; while in the open glades, swinging and balancing
himself upon the most slender twigs, the merry bobolink
executed
in masterly style his brilliant bravuras, and impromptu
variations.
The golden summer day had been spent by the gentle exile
in protracted wanderings through the forests which girded his
lonely home. As the sun was sinking behind the hills, he
emerged from the shadow of the trees where he had so long been
lingering, and, staff in hand, began to ascend the crag which
rose immediately above his dwelling. When he had reached
the summit, he seated himself upon his favorite spot, and looked
out upon the summer sunset. The day had been one of fierce
and unmitigated heat, but towards evening the white and
cumulous
clouds had rolled up, pile upon pile, before the gentle
breath of the south-west wind, and now, broken into wild and
fantastic masses, and colored by the departing sun-shine with
purple, gold, emerald, violet, and every other radiant hue, they
stretched in a flood of glory along the western horizon, now
building
themselves up like the walls and battlements of towered and
aerial cities, now changing to a shadowy but innumerable army,
crowding cohort after cohort, with glittering spear and shield and
crimson banner, around the descending chariot of the god of day.
Quivering gently above the sunset's glow, just where the clear
blue of the upper sky was mingling with the emerald green
17*
nearer the horizon, appeared the young moon's silver bow. Far
along the northern edge of the horizon played the lambent
summer's
lightning, incessant, gentle, innocent as an infant's smile.
Throughout the massive foliage of the scattered trees, which
reared themselves along the precipitous sides of the hill, sighed
the cool breath of the evening wind. Soothed by the gentle
influences of the scene, and refreshed by the grateful breeze, the
solitary sat gazing long and musingly upon the wilderness scene,
which had already grown dear to his heart.
The purple hues of evening were already settling upon the
landscape, when the hermit heard a footstep ascending the
narrow pathway, and looking downwards, he saw presently the
tall form of Sir Christopher Gardiner advancing towards him.
He felt a slight sensation of impatience at this interruption to
his solitude. The knight and himself were connected by a
slight and single thread. Blaxton claimed to hold the peninsula
of Shawmut by eminent domain, acknowledging for himself,
as he said, no suzerain but the Lord of Hosts. He had,
however
,
so far recognised the rights of Sir Ferdinando Gorges in
Massachusetts as to allow his own name to be inserted in John
Oldham's lease from the Gorges family, as one who would induct
the lessee into the property on the opposite promontory. He
troubled himself, however, but little with such matters, and
laughed at the notion of sovereignty in the wilderness.
Good even, most contemplative hermit of the desert.
said the knight, as he reached the summit, truly the path to
this eyrie of yours is something of the steepest. You should
have the wings as well as the gentleness of the dove, to inhabit
this mountain top.
Good even to you, Sir Knight, answered Blaxton, I am,
as you say, but as a partridge hunted in the mountains, but I
care not. I have escaped the snare of the spoiler, and I love to
ascend to these contemplative heights, and look down upon
the world below me.
Aye, Master Hermit; but methinks thou shouldst have
the wings of eagles, as I but now remarked. My frame is
somewhat
of the hardiest, and my lungs of the soundest, but truly
this precipice is something of
I carry the patriarch's ladder with me always, interrupted
Blaxton, and climb from earth to heaven as I list.
Truly a convenient piece of furniture, answered the
knight, humoring the humorist, and one that would be
invaluable
in more professions than one. By St. John, half a dozen
such scaling ladders in a siege, would make short work of the
strongest citadel built by mortal hands. I find you as discursive
and contemplative as ever. I guessed, when I tracked you to
this aerial summit, that I should find you still farther removed in
spirit from the dull earth which we have the misfortune to
inhabit. Know you, perchance, to pass to other and more
trivial matters, that the saints of Plymouth are mightily enraged
at the mad pranks lately enacted in the bay by my merry gossip,
Thomas Morton, and that there be serious intentions of
forthwith
ejecting him from his present abode by force of arms?
Truly, answered the solitary, whose hermit life had so
much increased his natural absence of mind that he rarely
heard more of any companion's observations than sufficed to
direct his musings a little from their previous track, without
by any means bringing him into perfect communication with the
other's mind. Truly I have but little sympathy with your
saints, whether of New Plymouth or of other regions. It
seemeth strange to me that a brotherhood of martyrs, who have
fled to the wilderness for conscience sake, should so clumsily
have left their consciences behind them, that the apostles of
liberty in things spiritual, should have been so careful to bring
with them from the land of slavery, the old bolts and shackles
which have so long been festering upon their own limbs. A martyr
it seemeth is but a bigot after all, and our fugitive martyrs have
been somewhat too careful to bring a brand from the funeral
pyres of their murdered brethren at home, to light new faggots
for their own victims in this barren wilderness. If poor
humanity
be so helpless and crippled, what matter whether it hobble
to heaven on crutches supplied to its infirmity by an anointed
prelate or a self-elected saint? Is it not strange, Sir Knight,
that none of your learned and your bold reformers have possessed
wit enough to solve the mighty riddle of their age? Verily, it
seemeth to me, that this eternal warfare of religion, which hath
so long brooded with its gloomy wings over the whole of
Christendom
,
that this fierce and oppressive sphinx, which hath so
long appalled the souls of men with its fearful presence, doth
but propound a riddle, by whose solution it would be
annihilated
.
And have you discovered, replied the knight, in the
course of your lonely contemplation, the mystery of the
sphinx?
I have read the riddle, answered the solitary, and the
answer is Toleration. This mighty reformation, of which we
hear so much in many lands, and which hath hitherto proved in
England but a mockery, is naught, so long as one fetter remains
upon liberty of conscience. What matter that the scarlet mantle
of Babylon should be rent into tatters to show the corruption
which those gorgeous robes conceal? What matter that priests
should be proved to be mumming mountebanks and mercenary
quacks, so long as still some other fantastic delusion is to
succeed
,
so long as the whole contest is but a petty struggle between
rival impostors? 'Tis by pondering on matters such as these,
that I have a little estranged myself from my kind, perhaps, for
I feel something within my bosom which rebels at tyranny in
whatever form it may disguise itself. I have built my solitary
altar here upon this fair mountain-top, where I can commune,
eye to eye, with the Creator of the universe. Truly he reveals
himself to me, not through the awful thunderings amid which
he appeared to the fierce prophet upon Sinai's mount, but
rather seemeth he to speak to my heart with the gentle
whispering
of a loving father. Sometimes it seemeth to me here, in this
fresh and unpolluted solitude, as if the vanished days of the old
and sinless world, when the Lord walked in the garden with the
patriarchs, might be renewed, and that his loving counsels might
be intelligible to every human ear.
As the solitary paused, Sir Christopher, who, as may easily be
imagined, had taken but small interest in the discursive and
moralizing soliloquy of the hermit, but who knew by experience
of how little advantage it was to attempt to arrest the course of
his vagaries, replied:
Most virtuous hermit, your words are indeed the words of
wisdom, and I have a profound satisfaction in finding how much
we sympathize in our views of human nature. But unhappily,
O most contemplative of mortals, I have not been endowed
with that generalizing and philosophical spirit, which enables
you to draw such sublime results from your meditations. This
poor machine of mine, look you, hath been constructed for
action, and I feel it already corroding in its present quiet.
Furthermore
,
if, as you say, the human race be so fond of
persecution
and tyranny, why what proves it more than that they were
born to be persecuted and tyrannized, and that the only method
to save them from each other is to govern them altogether? If
men love ceremonies, pageants, and formulas so dearly, what
proves it after all, but that man is not a metaphysical abstraction,
but an unlucky biped, who reasons only through his senses, and
who must be governed through his senses. And now, taking
leave of metaphysics, I would either bid you farewell upon your
mountain-top, or accompany your footsteps to the vale beneath.
Blaxton, as may be supposed, had hardly profited much by
the disquisition which the knight had given him in exchange for
his own, but, observing by his guest's motions, that he was about
descending the hill, he mechanically arose from his seat, and
accompanied him along the south-western declivity, towards the
western cove.
The door of my poor hermitage is ever open, said the
solitary, as they reached the vicinity of his abode, and I
could be well pleased, Sir Knight, to offer you its poor
hospitality
.
I am bounden to you, Master Hermit, answered Sir
Christopher
,
but I must even make the most of the gentle breeze
which I see yonder is just curling the surface of the water. I
have a considerable voyage before me to night, and I sought you
upon my way, trusting to communicate to you one or two
important
matters. I pray you to honor me with your attention a
few brief moments.
Willingly, willingly, answered the hermit, who had not
heard a word of his companion's remarks, and I am truly
pleased to find you as prone as myself to philosophical
speculation
.
A petty world, Sir Christopher, a petty world and a
petty people. A stale cheese at best, be its maggots ever so
busy. The night is like enchantment, the wilderness under this
young summer moon shines like a silver garden. I must saddle
the archbishop, by your leave, and even take a canter.
With this the whimsical hermit very gravely walked off
towards his homestead, leaving the knight standing near the
beach, quite alone and very much disconcerted.
Was ever such a brain-sick, moping, moon-struck owl!
said Gardiner to himself. The creature has even flown away
from me, after all, in the very breath with which he assured me
of his undivided attention. However, the evening is yet
young, I will at least await for a little while his
re-appearance
.
So saying, Sir Christopher threw himself upon the turf under
a spreading tree, and solaced himself for a few moments by
contemplating with extreme attention the play of the gentle
moonlight upon the waters. As the knight, however, was not
blessed with the habit of imperturbable and reposing
rumination
which marked the character of his late companion, and
as he had not sought the promontory of Shawmut that night to
gaze at the moon, he naturally, after a little time, became very
impatient again.
Just, however, as he was upon the point of taking his
departure
,
he heard a hurried trampling upon the north-western
extremity of the beach. He turned and saw the hermit,
mounted upon a very handsome mouse-colored bull, which he
had brought with him from England, and tamed for his own
riding,
[6]
[6]
Historical fact.
careering in a rapid gallop, along the sandy margin of
the cove. His loose robes and long grey hair were streaming
wildly in the summer wind, and as he flitted through the
moonlit
scene, he looked more like a fantastic creature of the
imagination
than an actual inhabitant of earth.
Gardiner had seen many things and many people in his day.
He had, moreover, become very familiar with the eccentric
and flightly character of the recluse; but he fairly rubbed his
eyes, as this wild creature flitted rapidly to and fro upon the
yellow sands, passing and repassing before his eyes with
extraordinary
velocity, the bull lashing his sides with his tail, and
evidently enjoying the sport as much as his master, to whose
every impulse he seemed astonishingly obedient. It really
seemed to the knight that he must either be the victim of some
optical delusion, or that the singular metamorphosis of the
gentle
,
dreaming hermit, into this mad Minotaur, rushing up and
down the beach in the moonlight, argued the possession of some
preternatural power on the part of his companion. He looked
calmly on, however, and awaited with patience the termination
of the hermit's gallop, as he had one or two matters which he
wished to confide to him, before he took his departure. After
rider and animal seemed temporarily exhausted by their race,
they suddenly halted, close to the knight, who still lay stretched
beneath a tree which grew very near the beach.
We were talking of the Reformation, said the recluse,
speaking in the same calm and gentle voice which was habitual
with him; but I need not remind you that we have ever been
in England even far behind the Continent of Europe. The
Reformation, the world over, has been unsuccessful, because,
when men are once up to the knees in blood, their virtue is apt
to be soaked out of them; but after all, something was
accomplished
something more was attempted. Indeed, Luther and
Calvin were two trumpets, whose peals even now recho to the
world's end,  two rams'-horns, whose spirit-stirring blasts were
potent enow to batter down the outworks of the popish
Jericho
;
but they are cracked and broken now, and fit only for
children's playthings. I tell you it now needs an archangel's
trump not to awaken men from their lethargy, for they are awake,
but to startle them from their wilful and hopeless madness.
For my own part, said Gardiner in reply, without
manifesting
any astonishment at the hermit's proceedings, I care not
whether the pontifex maximus be Pope Harry, who burns a
schoolmaster for beating him in an argument about
transubstantiation
,
and gives a convent's revenue to a woman who makes a
pudding to please him  Pope Elizabeth, the holy virgin, who,
unlike her father, does not marry, and therefore rarely murders
her paramours  Pope Jamie, who finds it so much pleasanter to
be pope than ruling presbyter, or Pope Charlie, who will not be
comfortable, till he has unpoped himself and feels upon his neck
again the foot of his real and Roman holiness. I care not one
jot indeed, whether I have Harry or Charlie, Julius or Gregory,
Tudors, Stewarts, or Borgias, to direct my worship, and to
smooth my path to heaven. I have other
Excuse me, Sir Knight, interrupted the hermit, but I
even paused to give a little breathing time to Bishop Laud, here,
continued he, patting the neck of the animal which he bestrode,
and to whom he had given the name of the arch-enemy of the
Puritans. Poor fellow, he puffs enow to shame his godfather.
There is a prelate, Sir Christopher, will mount the devil's
back and ride him off his legs. Satan himself will be spavined
before his career is over. Then go thy ways, bishop, he
concluded
,
suddenly dismounting, and suffering the animal to
wander
and graze at will through the park; I will have more
mercy upon thee than thou wouldst have upon the Puritans, or
the devil himself. And now, Sir Knight, I think you had
somewhat
to impart to me.
Simply this, said Gardiner, whose accurate perception
always
informed him exactly when a word or two would reach his
companion's mind, and who never showed, by his manner, that
he found any deviation from the strictest common-place in the
hermit's erratic demeanor  simply this, and I crave your
pardon
for not having communicated the matter before. Thomas
Morton hath incurred the enmity of the Plymouth brethren by
many mad pranks by him committed, more especially by an
uproarious
frolic for eight and forty hours' long at May-tide. Thomas
Morton will be attacked by an army of saints. He will be
expelled from his residence, and sent prisoner to England. All
this will happen within thirty days, and yet the reckless rioter
will not believe it. These papers, however, which I have
withdrawn
from his keeping, I wish to intrust to your hands.
With this the knight took a sealed packet from his bosom
and placed it in the hands of the hermit, who was listening
with attention. Mixed with them are several important papers
VOL. I. 18
of my own, which I do not consider so safe in my own
temporary
domicile as they will be with you, the more so, as this
untoward
event which is so soon to take place, hath induced me to
make some alteration in my plans, and will, perhaps, cause my
absence from these places for a season. The papers relate,
mostly
,
to the affairs of Sir Ferdinando. You will, however, perceive
that the departure of Morton, which I foresee and have
accordingly
provided against, although he is resolute in his own
disbelief
thereof, may be yet turned to good. I do not regret the
opportunity of being able to communicate through a trusty
ambassador, with Sir Ferdinando, except of the necessary
procrastination
which it it causes.
Sir Knight, answered the hermit, I take these papers,
which you no doubt think of extreme importance, and which to
me seem as valuable as the last year's leaves. I shall keep them
carefully, and in the same receptacle you wot of. I know
nothing, or but little, of Sir Ferdinando, I know nothing of your
purposes nor projects. I care as little for your schemes as for
the schemes of the saints. I have consented, when almost the
only dweller in the Massachusetts, to be appointed by the knight
to put John Oldham into the possession of his lease; but truly
if he has no reliance on any stronger arm than mine, he is
likely to remain out of possession for many a long year. Truly
there is a certain hard-handed Indian fighter at the opposite
promontory, who I think would be more serviceable to Master
Oldham than myself. However, the knight is doubtless the best
judge of his own matters, and therefore even let my name stand.
Have you other commands for me?
Thanks, gentle Master Blaxton, answered the knight,
but I have deposited my papers with you, to do which was the
principal purport of my visit. I warn you, however, that you
will probably ere long receive a summons to join in the pious
crusade against the anti-Christ of Merry-Mount. You will be
called to trail a pike in the holy warfare, or your purse will bleed
for it.
With this the knight courteously bade the hermit farewell,
and, stepping briskly towards the beach, was soon lost from
view; while Blaxton, hardly heeding his departure, remained,
contemplatively gazing on the sylvan scene before him, now softly
lighted by the young summer's moon.
It will be perceived how very little sympathy, either of opinion
or character, existed between the knight and the hermit, and
how slight and accidental was the band which united them.
Blaxton's mind was so honestly and unaffectedly removed above,
or at least without, the ordinary sphere of human cares and
wishes, and his character, like his life, had through long
seclusion
and a systematic indulgence of its eccentric humors, become
so lonely, that he regarded with comparative indifference the
various indications of the projected colonization of the New
England wilderness. The high priest of nature, seated in
simple but sublime loneliness by the side of his forest fountain,
passing his gently monotonous days in exalted communion with
his Creator, was likely to look forward rather with a sensation of
impatience than of gratification, to the arrival of men who,
however
earnest and enthusiastic, belonged, as the reader may have
already gathered from his conversation, to a sect with whom he
felt little sympathy. He, however, felt that in the boundless
wilderness
there was room enough for nations, and he therefore
could not conceive that a few scattered pioneers could in any
way incommode each other. For himself, he did not dream that
there was a possibility of his own solitude being disturbed, but
believed that his rights of property in a wilderness spot which
possessed no value but that which was derived from his hands,
would undoubtedly be held sacred.
As for Sir Christopher Gardiner, his position was growing
intolerably
irksome. After having been kept in the dark for a
long time as to the state of the projects and counter-projects for
colonizing New England, he had at length, as we have seen,
obtained
information from his coadjutors at home. The
information
had, however, proved in the highest degree unsatisfactory.
The dilatoriness and lukewarmness of his friends was becoming
intolerable. The fiery man of action saw himself condemned to
another and a protracted season of languor and inactivity.
Instead
of his recruits in men, money and munitions, and an
approval of his purpose to seize upon and occupy at once all the
prominent posts in the country, he received counsels of caution,
procrastination, dissimulation. He more than suspected that
this growing timidity and hesitation at home was indicative of
an inclination to abandon altogether an enterprise which
perhaps
was beginning to lose its charms. Still, however, with the
tenacity of purpose which belonged to his constitution, he kept
fast hold upon his own projects, determined not to abandon them
so long as one powerful confederate remained to him, and as
long as a solitary hope remained of a successful issue.
He was now certain that Sir Ferdinando's project was for the
present foiled, or at least postponed. He had received direct
information that a company of Puritans had received a grant of
land from the company in England, a part of it including a
portion
of the very territory once conveyed to the Gorges family,
and that a body of emigrants, under highly respectable and
influential
leaders, were immediately to set sail for New England.
He was, however, assured that the effort to obtain the grant of a
charter from the crown to this company, without which the
enterprise must necessarily fail, would be unsuccessful. The
attention of government was directed to the seditious, democratic
and dangerous character of the sect who were thus, as was
insinuated
,
contemplating the establishment of an independent
republic
upon these distant territories; and strong opposition was
made, both directly and indirectly, by powerful persons, to
prevent
the accomplishment of their designs. Sir Christopher was
particularly enjoined to observe accurately and unceasingly the
conduct, conversation and character of the new comers and to
keep his associates in England constantly and minutely informed
as to all their proceedings, with a view to sustain the charges of
their opponents, that the new settlers were not only schismatics
but rebels, and that they were thoroughly and bitterly hostile, as
well to the monarch's authority in the nation, as to his
supremacy
in the church. Had there not been some peculiar and
private objects to be attained in the wilderness, and had there
not been at the moment some peculiarly cogent objections to his
visiting England, it is highly probable that the knight would
have abandoned the country upon the instant, with a view of
expostulating emphatically and personally with his hesitating
confederates
,
and of infusing something of his own vigor and audacity
into their minds. As it was, he saw himself condemned to play
the spy for a still longer period. Dissimulation and intrigue
were not distasteful to him; on the contrary, they formed the
very sphere in which his peculiar genius most delighted to
exercise
itself; but intrigue in the forests, dissimulation in a desert,
had but little charms for so accomplished a schemer. He had,
however, under the circumstances, nothing for it but to bide his
time, and though he chafed at the inactivity which was imposed
upon him, he submitted for the present with as good a grace
as could have been expected.
The vagaries of Thomas Morton, morever, had given him a
good deal of uneasiness. He had constantly warned him how
inexpedient it was to excite the jealousy of the other religious
settlers, already established in New England, and how necessary
it was to the final success of their schemes that the character of
himself and his associates should, for the present at least, appear
to be discreet and orderly. But reasoning was apt to be thrown
away upon the reckless potentate of Merry-Mount, and Gardiner
18*
already began to fear whether he was not likely to derive more
injury than benefit from his alliance. Still as the good-humored
roysterer possessed many qualities that were highly valuable to
him, and as he had been privy, in a considerable measure, to his
various schemes, it was the knight's desire to manage him and
preserve his alliance. Unfortunately the late May-day festivities
at Merry-Mount had excited the wrath and indignation of the
Puritans
of New Plymouth, among whom Gardiner had carefully
established
himself during the whole period of Morton's riot. This
he had done, both to enable the settlers to contrast the solemnity
of his own character with the licentiousness of the master of
misrule
,
and to enable him to observe at once the effects produced
upon their minds by the whole proceedings.
For a moment we return to the solitary of Shawmut. The
day had been one of fierce and unclouded sunshine, the evening
had been cool and serene, but the night which was now
approaching
seemed to be of another character. The moon had sunk
in the west, overwhelmed at her departure by the hosts of dark
and shadowy clouds, which seemed to have gathered from every
quarter to hurl her from her throne. The north wind blew its
trumpet-blast through the shivering woods. The scud flew
thick and fast across the upper sky. There was a wild
hurtling
and trampling in the air, as if from a conflict of invisible
and aerial hosts. Suddenly a flaming meteor, larger and more
lustrous than a planet, shot completely across the sky, springing
up from the north, culminating almost to the zenith, and
disappearing
in the sea with a crash like thunder. Then the thickly
congregated mass of clouds suddenly rolled away, like a scroll
that shrivels in the flame, and the hermit saw in the western sky,
hanging just above the horizon, the gigantic image of a flaming
sword. As he was gazing with a sensation of awe at this
strange phenomenon, which displayed itself just after his eyes had
been dazzled and his ears stunned by the sudden appearance and
violent explosion of the meteor, it vanished, while a little above
the quarter where it had disappeared he distinctly saw the images
of four ships, slowly ploughing their way across the blue and
unclouded
expanse of ether, with snowy sail and flying pennon,
each, after a few moments, successively disappearing in a
mysterious
and ghost-like manner, below the western horizon. The
solitary stood gazing at this strange succession of weird and
unwonted
appearances with a singular trouble in his mind. He stood
watching long after the last aerial ship had sunk below the
horizon
,
anxiously awaiting the appearance of some new and still
more bewildering phenomenon.
No farther sign appeared however. The clouds gathered again
over the face of heaven, the night grew gloomy and starless,
the wind, now veering towards the east and freshening to a gale,
spread its wings, damp and heavy with ocean mist, across the
murky landscape. The hermit, who felt chilled and depressed
by the sudden atmospheric change, as well as perplexed by the
wild and boding appearances which he had witnessed in the sky,
looked fearfully around, lest perhaps the former preternatural but
beautiful face, which had not long before appeared to him, might
even now be gazing through the dense foliage of the oak tree
near which he was standing. He almost dreaded, as he cast his
glances slowly around him, to find those dark and mournful eyes
looking upon him with the same warning and prophetic expression
which they lately wore. But the strange apparition did not
return
to him that night, although his imagination, strongly
excited
by the unusual phenomena of nature which had just displayed
themselves to him, might easily, it would seem, have bodied forth,
out of the melancholy and dreamy fancies which were thronging
about his mind, some visible shape of mystery and terror, such as
had once before perplexed and haunted him.
With slow and thoughtful step he paced along the verge of
the cove, and then entered his lowly cottage.
CHAPTER XVII.
THE CAPTURE.
A few
days after the revels of Merry-Mount had been
concluded
,
the sovereign of that territory was left in almost solitary
state in his palace. He had depatched the greater number of
his retainers to the inland portion of the country, this being the
season when it was usual with them to meet the Indians, make
their purchases of beaver, and arrange their future contracts;
and there were none left within the precincts of the Mount, save
the head butler and the Canary Bird.
Leaving those two worthies in charge of the palace, Master
Morton, one fine summer's morning, passed over the river and
took his way towards the plantation of Wessaguscus, or rather to
what remained of that unsuccessful establishment at that place.
A few straggling settlers still lingered in the vicinity, living,
however, in the most miserable condition, some of them being
actually servants to the Indians, and performing menial offices
for a livelihood, although by far the greater portion had made their
escape from the unpromising colony; some to Plymouth, some
to Merry-Mount, and some, who could command sufficient
means, to England.
The fate of the plantation at Wessaguscus, (the earliest
settlement
in Massachusetts Bay,) was a striking counterpart to that
of New Plymouth, and in fact the history of every settlement
that was made in the territory of the Massachusetts, by any class
of adventurers, except those with whom religion was the ruling
motive, shows that some higher and stronger principle of action
than the love of gain, was necessary to maintain a colony in so
wild and dreary a solitude.
The vernal period of Massachusetts history bears some
resemblance
to the spring-time of her climate. If we regard the
successive efflorescence of civilization along the edge of the
bay, the pale and feeble buds reluctantly expanding their petals
one by one, amid a stormy and cheerless atmosphere, many of
them frozen and destroyed before unfolding, and the healthiest
but faintly quivering upon the black and leafless bough, we shall
find that there seems but one single source of vitality, capable of
protecting and supporting their faint and slow development.
In warmer climes, under more genial influences, and inspired
by golden dreams of terrestrial wealth and glory, there have
been colonies whose beginnings were more brilliant, picturesque,
and captivating to the imagination, but they have not unfolded
to empires. The broad-leaved tree of the tropics derives its
rank luxuriance as much from the stimulating and poisonous
influence which it imbibes from the atmosphere, as from the
fertility of the soil in which it stands. Magnificent are its
foliage, its flowers, its towering shaft, its umbrageous top, but a
blast of the hurricane lays it low. The stalwart oak, whose
roots descend through beds of sterile gravel and through-clefts
of frost-riven granite, derives its nourishment from the pure and
unsunned veins of living water, and from a thousand subtle and
invisible treasures of nature's inmost bosom. The tempests of a
thousand years sweep over it in vain.
Morton had passed a portion of the summer's day loitering
about the neighborhood, hoping to fall in with certain petty
chieftains, of the neighboring tribes, with whom he was in
constant
habits of intercourse, and with whom he had some
particular
arrangements to conclude. He had been disappointed,
however, and was upon the point of returning to his own
domains, as it was already late in the afternoon, when he
suddenly
heard himself called by name. Turning in some surprise
at the sound, he saw emerging from a kind of cavern, partly
natural and partly artificial, which opened upon the side of a
sloping crag, a strange and almost preternatural figure. The
creature seemed covered with hair from head to foot, but how
much of his hirsute covering was the natural growth of his own
hide, and how much had been borrowed from other animals,
could not, in the general squalor and filth which covered the
whole, be accurately discovered. His head was covered with
matted iron-grey elf locks, which circled and twisted in every
direction, like a nest of rattlesnakes; the nails of his hands and
feet were long and crooked, like vulture's talons; he had a
basket on his arm, and held a long pole in his right hand. The
expression of his features, as far as could be discerned through
the mass of hair and filth with which they were obscured, was
something less human than that of an intelligent ourang-outang.
Master Morton, Master Morton, screeched this creature,
suddenly darting out of its cave, and leaping towards the Lord of
Merry-Mount.
How now, thou filthy Caliban  art thou not starved nor
scalped yet? answered Morton, who seemed to have seen the
creature before  What wouldst thou with me, most venerable
carrion? Propound, explain, but prithee stand upon the other
side of me, for the wind, look ye, sits upon this quarter, and
there be certain damp and earthy exhalations, contracted
doubtless
by thy subterranean mode of life  pauca verba, pauca
verba,  thou understandest me, I perceive.
Master Morton, Master Morton, thou diddest me a kindness
once, said this human woodchuck.
Did I so, indeed? answered the other; then prithee, do
me another in return.
Truly I will, your worship. What shall I do to serve you?
Shall I dig you a basket of clams? Stay but here, your worship,
and I will be back before you can whistle for me. And with
this the creature planted his pole in the earth and began leaping
down the side of the hill.
Stop, stop, cried Morton, I have no occasion for clams
at this present juncture, and truly the favor I meant to ask of
you, was simply that thou shouldst frothwith return again into
the womb of thy mother earth. Burrow back again, thou most
venerable mole, for truly thou makest the daylight hideous.
Come back with the owls and the bats, and the toads, and the
other noisome things which love the twilight  but the sunlight,
believe me, was never made for thee. But stay, I did but jest,
added Morton, as the creature, hanging its head and weeping
bitterly, began slowly to retreat towards his cave  stay here,
then, and air the inmost chambers of thy mind, by opening them
to the breeze and sunlight of improving society. After all, 't is
not good to be so solitary. Take thy clam basket and follow
me. Thou shalt go with me to Merry-Mount, and shalt dwell in
my tent, poor miserable devil that thou art. Come along, I
say.
I say, Master Morton, thou diddest me a kindness once,
said the Caliban, turning again towards his companion, and
squatting down at the door of his cave.
So thou diddest me the honor to observe before, answered
Morton, and truly I do even propose to do thee another. I
tell thee to follow me to my palace, and forsake thy heathenish
haunt and grovelling habits. `Come live with me, and be my
love,' as the worthy Kit Marlowe expresses himself to a more
fascinating object, let me hope than thou art
I cannot away to Merry-Mount, answered the other. I
would go willingly, but I cannot away.
And why can you not, most hirsute of human creatures?
answered Morton. Come with me, I say, and that at once, for
by the Lord it is growing dark and mirky, and the air looks full
of smothered thunder.
Yes, yes, Master Morton, thunder enough, lightning enough,
answered the monster; I have not lived under ground so
long for nothing. I can smell the brimstone when it is
boiling
.
There is thunder brewing up yonder, and plenty of it,
and the wind will blow a little perhaps to-night; any body knows
that.
By Jupiter, said Morton, here is a subterranean
philosopher
!
But what hath all this to do with my invitation to thee.
I did bid thee to our palace at Merry-Mount, thunder or no
thunder.
I told thee I could not away, answered the other.
And why not, pretty one, replied Morton.
Truly, because I have sold myself to the great god
Abamoko
,
and he hath ordered me to stay here to serve his red
children. If I should go away from my cave, who would find
ground-nuts for the sachems, who would dig clams for them,
who find quails' eggs for the squaws? Sometimes I feel as if I
should like to go away. The cave is very cold in winter, and
the snow hides the ground-nuts. But the red creatures are very
kind. They give me my cap full of parched corn every week
when I work for them. I thank thee kindly, Master Morton,
but I cannot away to Merry-Mount. I have sold myself to the
great god Abamoko.
Now here is an ingenious fellow, said Morton to himself,
who found that the poor crack-brained man of the woods was
out of the reach of his arguments. Now here is a profound
philosopher, who has gone farther than ever Christian went
before
,
for he has even turned his back upon our old and
respectable
Sathanas, and sold himself, soul and body, to an Indian's
devil  and a devilish hard bargain he has made of it too. A
cap full of parched corn hebdomadally!
proh pudor!
is that
the rate paid for humanity by this pitiful devil? Commend me
to honest Mephistopheles after all, and the devil take such
sneaking
skin-flints as the god Abamoko. But I say, thou
subterranean
philosopher, what favor did I ever do thee, for which
thou expressest so much gratitude, albeit somewhat uncouthly?
Thou didst once rescue me, answered the Caliban, when
three red-skins would have destroyed and scalped me. I had
pilfered but I was starving. Thou didst save my life, and
moreover thou didst give me, besides, a horn of rosa solis.
I do remember me, exclaimed Morton, and by Jupiter
Diespiter, here is gratitude enow to redeem a city. Here is a
poor outcast, burrowing in the ground and feeding on pignuts,
who remembereth with gratitude one single horn of liquor, for
as to the preservation of thy life, seeing what use thou makest
thereof, that can hardly be reckoned a kindness. By heavens,
such virtue shall be rewarded. Look upon this, sylvan
monster
!
And with this Morton held up a hunting flask, of
ample dimension, which he carried suspended at his side.
An unearthly grin spread itself over the physiognomy of the
wild man of the woods, as he leaped nimbly forward, and eagerly
clutched the treasure which was offered to him.
Aha! said he, as he greedily applied it to his lips, aha?
this is a greater spirit than Abamoko. I wish I served your
spirit, Master Morton, but Abamoko is powerful, and his red
children are very kind. Alas, I cannot go with thee to
Merry-Mount
!
Stay where thou art then, in God's name, replied the other,
since thy thraldom is so irresistible; and now farewell, for
truly I like not over-well the threatening aspect of yonder
clouds, and I have a trifling march before me.
Alas, alas, thou art going indeed, said the wild man, and
truly I fear much lest mischance should befall thee. I have
smelt the thunder all day long as I lay in my cave, and I saw
fearful sights in the air last night. But 'tis not the worst, 'tis
not the worst! There is a more fearful mischance threatening
VOL. I. 19
thee, Master Morton, alas, alas! to thee who have been so good
to me. And here the creature began to weep bitterly.
Why, thinkest thou I am afraid of the thunder and rain,
most delicate of wood spirits? said Morton, laughing.
Alas, alas! blubbered the other, 't is not the rain, nor
the wind, nor the thunder, though they will all be fearful. 'T is
the dreadful Captain Standish, the mighty man of Plymouth,
that I
Captain Standish! exclaimed Morton, what of the heroic
shrimp, what of the most puissant pigmy? speak.
Alas, alas, replied the other, I pray thee jest not at that
mighty man of wrath.
Diddest thou never hear, continued he, in a low and
mysterious tone, diddest thou never hear of the fearful plague
which swept through this wilderness, now many years ago, I
know not how many, neither was I here then. Alas, alas! I was
then in my own happy home, and had not sold myself to the
terrible Abamoko, continued the creature, with the tears
running afresh along his grimy cheeks.
Did I never hear of it, cried Morton, why thou most
uninstructed pagan, did I not see it? Was not I, Thomas
Morton, Prince of Passanogessit, travelling through these rugged
wildernesses at the very time when that same distemper ceased?
Did I not, who knew that the Indians were ceremonious and
careful in the offering of burial rites to their dead, did not I,
when wandering through the places where they had dwelt, and
whence they had all vanished, see them all lying in heaps like
autumn leaves, old and young, sachems, warriors, squaws, and
papooses, all rotting together unburied in the wilderness, with
the wolves, and the kites, and the carrion crows feasting upon
their carcases? Did I not believe that I had got to Golgotha
instead of to the Massachusetts, and what then wilt thou tell me
of this plague, and what the plague hath this plague to do with
Captain Shrimp?
Knowest thou not then, Master, that the plague still exists?
continued the other in the same hoarse and boding tone.
Quite the contrary, my rustic friend, answered Morton,
I know that it hath surceased well nigh these ten years.
The plague exists, Master, said the other, still in the same
hoarse and earnest accents. It hath gone to sleep, but it
exists still, it hath foded its wings, but it is alive, and it will
soon fly over the land again; so beware of the mighty man of
Plymouth, Master!
It hath gone to sleep, hath it? answered Morton.
Aye, truly, Master, the great God Abamoko himself hath
told me so, often and often, as he visited me by night in my
cave.
So the God Abamoko visits thee nocturnally, answered
Morton. Excuse me, but his highness seemeth somewhat
addicted to low company.
Alas, alas! answered the monster, he comes by night,
and fastens the fetters upon my legs; they are red-hot iron,
and they burn me to the bone; he screws them tight, and my
flesh smokes, and my blood boils, and my brains fry.
What detestable and unfeeling cookery, answered Morton;
now may Satan himself consume such a boiling, frying,
scorching devil as Abamoko. Why in the name of Beelzebub
don't you fly away in the day-time?
Because he makes me swear every night to serve him and
his red children faithfully. Because he hath burned and branded
me for his own; because the fetters are always there in the
day-time
,
although invisible and looser than in the darkness.
And where in the foul fiend's name broodeth this plague
that terrifies you thus? replied Morton. Where doth it roost?
Mayhap it were as well to find its nest at once, and crack all its
eggs before it hath time to hatch them.
Ah, continued the outcast, in the same solemn tone, jest
not, I pray thee, with such fearful matters. Knowest thou not
then in very truth, that the hero of Plymouth keepeth the plague
in a barrel, safely stowed in the cellarage of his own house,
and that if he list, he can let it loose to fly over the whole
country?
Whew! exclaimed Morton, so the murder is out. So
Captain Shrimp is the devil's head butler, is he, and hath the
care of his choicest casks? And how, I pray thee, hast thou
made this notable discovery of the treasures of the Plymouth
cellar?
I tell thee, Master, continued the other, that the red
children of Abamoko all know whence came the fearful
pestilence
many years ago, and they know 'tis the Englishman's
devil and the scourge of red men. Abamoko himself hath told
them where it is confined, and who keepeth the keys of its
prison. This is why they all fear the Englishmen so much, and
the hero of Plymouth most of all.
Truly a most admirable device, answered Morton. Ah,
valiant Miles, ah, truculent Shrimp, thou hast, indeed, a trick
or two worth knowing. Bless thy witty brains, I could almost
worship thee. And thou wert in London but lately, and in the
very midst of the plague, too, and escapedst unharmed. 'Twas
the very vintage season for thee, no doubt, and there didst thou
fill thy hogshead for wilderness consumption. The pestilence
in a puncheon, forsooth! No wonder these deluded savages fear
thee as the roaring lion!
Hush, hush, exclaimed his companion, who seemed quite
shocked at the irreverent manner in which his astounding piece
of intelligence was received; hush, hush, hearest thou not
yonder distant thunder? I tell thee it is ill jesting upon these
awful matters. Ah!  what a peal was that! Abamoko is full
of wrath; and with these words the lunatic coiled himself into
a heap upon the ground, moaning dismally, while his teeth
chattered with fear.
In effect, the weather had began to assume a somewhat
threatening
aspect. The day, which had been one of intense heat,
was already drawing to its close, but there was no freshness, no
evening coolness in the atmosphere. The sun had sunk beneath
a long, dense mass of leaden clouds which lay motionless along
the horizon, but the whole upper surface of the heavens still
glowed like burnished brass. Not the faintest breath of wind
was perceptible, and the gigantic oaks and chestnuts, which
grew around the spot, stood with their massive foliage darkly
painted upon the brazen sky, the outline of almost every leaf so
sharply defined, and every branch so fixed and motionless, that
the very forest seemed enchanted. The silence was oppressive,
not a twig rustled, not a bird sent forth a solitary note, not an
insect murmured. Nature seemed so spell-bound and breathless,
that it was a relief to Morton's ear, when the distant and
muttered
thunder, which was hardly audible, and which, however,
seemed so sensibly to affect his companion, at last interrupted
the boding silence.
There were certainly some symptoms of an approaching
storm, although it seemed probable that it would be long before
it broke forth. Although it was past sunset, and although the
western edge of the horizon was dark and gloomy, yet there
seemed a singular and inexplicable radiance in the sky. Long
bars of brilliant light seemed to be projected upwards from some
source far away from the quarter where the sun had sunk; and
as evening advanced, instead of the shadowy and refreshing
twilight, the brightness of the sky seemed with every instant to
increase. While the portion of the west, which would naturally
have been tinged with the last glowing colors of the departed
day, retained the same dull and sombre hue, there was spread
over the rest of the sky a thin rack of flame-colored vapor,
which seemed to radiate an intense degree of heat and light.
Wild and ragged clouds of a dull green hue, were driving with
fearful velocity across this blazing surface, indicating that while
the deceitful and brooding calm still lingered below, there was
already a fierce commotion in the upper atmosphere.
Morton stood looking at these various and portentous
appearances
,
with the eye of a man whom long experience in the
wilderness had taught to read the book of nature with great
accuracy.
There is no mistaking such ugly signs as these, said he,
rather to himself than to his companion. It needs no
misbegotten
gnome, coming from the bowels of the earth, to tell me
that there will be a devilish pother of the elements before I can
get back to Merry-Mount. Now, although the weather be June,
and the distance home but ten miles, yet I would rather empty a
tankard in the poorest hedge ale-house between London and
Staines, than run all night through these slippery thickets, with
nothing to light me on my path but the lightning, which is a
mighty zig-zag and uncomfortable kind of link bearer.
I tell thee, Master, croaked out the lunatic, as he lay
coiled and shuddering in a heap, profane not thus the name of
the mighty and fearful hero of Plymouth. Deride not, neither,
the terrible Abamoko. He rushes even now over our heads,
astride the thunder.
Faith, then, answered Morton, I wish he would even
take me up on his pillion behind him. As for the heroic Captain
Standish, whose name, it seems, is not to be profaned, I beg thee,
in case that he, as well as Abamoko, should pay a visit to thine
humble abode, to present to him my warmest congratulations
and regards. Tell Captain Standish, moreover, that should
his leisure allow, it would gratify me deeply to receive him
at my poor palace at Merry-Mount, the rather that I have
heard some casual intimations of an intended visit on his part,
and
Your presence here will save Captain Standish that trouble,
suddenly exclaimed a stern voice at his side. Morton turned
hastily round, and to his infinite amazement, beheld Miles
Standish
,
standing close to him with his drawn sword in his hand.
At the same instant he felt himself suddenly seized from behind
by several powerful arms, and before he had time for a single
struggle, he beheld himself a prisoner. At that very moment
there was a louder and more prolonged peal of thunder, at
which the lunatic uttering a sudden and sharp cry of horror,
started to his feet, looked fearfully round, and then vanished
into the bowels of the earth.
END OF VOLUME I.VOL. II. 1
CHAPTER I.
THE FAREWELL.
When
Henry Maudsley arose from a brief and feverish
slumber
,
upon the morning following the May-day revels, he was for
some time at a loss to determine whether the strange events of the
preceding evening had not all been a delusion and a dream.
The wild accents of the mysterious youth who had been his
companion
during the concluding hours of the day were still haunting
his imagination, but who the stranger was, whence he derived
such singular knowledge of his own history and most secret
thoughts, and for what reason he had conceived so lively an
interest
in his welfare, it was beyond his power to imagine.
She shall yet be thine, Harry Maudsley, the promise
uttered
by that melodious voice still rang in his ear. As he repeated
the words mechanically to himself, lifting his hands as he did so
towards his head, he suddenly felt something unusual about his
throat. What was his surprise, as he sprang forward to the
light, to find suspended from his neck the very golden chain
which he had seen Esther present to Gardiner at the conclusion
of that fatal interview which had so lately destroyed his dearest
hopes!
He gazed at the glittering relic, emblem of the perfidy of one
for whom he could have found it in his heart to forfeit both earth
and heaven, in speechless bewilderment. He clasped it to
his heart for one moment, at the next he tore it from his neck
and dashed it to the ground with the fury of a madman.
Suddenly
he recollected more of the mysterious words of his late
companion. He remembered the bold prophecies with which
the stranger had flattered his heart; he remembered the promise
that a proof of his power should be displayed to him upon the
dawn of this very morning, and behold already the glittering
pledge was there. The mystery now was more perplexing than
ever. It was almost impossible for him to resist the conviction
that he was the victim of some magic spell. Witchcraft could
alone account for the mysteries which were spread over him like
a net. And to what end had these subtle sorceries been woven?
What was to be the issue of the strange and twilight
companionship
which had suddenly sprang up between himself, and, as it
seemed to him, this shadowy wanderer from some unknown
world? Were his purposes good or evil? Was he abusing the
mystic power which he possessed over his mind, to lead him to
destruction, or was he a beneficent genius, suddenly appearing
to him as he stood upon a fearful precipice, to warm him of his
danger, and to lead him back into the paths of happiness whence
he had wandered so far? Was Esther likewise subject to the
influence of this mocking spirit? 'Twas mystery all. Again
he lifted the chain from the ground, and gazed long and anxiously
upon it, as if he would examine every slender link till he learned
wherein lay concealed the heart of its mystery. But the chain
revealed not the secrets of the magician, although it indeed
seemed endowed with a magic of its own.
For an instant, as he dwelt upon the pure image of Esther, he
felt that he could have prostrated himself before her as at the
feet of an enshrined saint, and have expiated his unworthy and
degrading thoughts with repentant tears. Had he worshipped
her so long as if she really dwelt in a purer sphere than his own
stormy world, and was he now to disown all the past? Was not
this an invention of the great tempter? Was it not all devised
as a fiery ordeal to test the truth of his devotion? 'T was
impossible
that there could be one spark of sympathy between two
such characters as those of Esther and Sir Christopher Gardiner.
More delicate and sensitive than the Venetian goblet, the crystal
purity of her character would instinctively reject the subtle poison
of that artful mind. He would seek her presence once more; once
more he would pour out his heart to her, and, what his pride had
hitherto forbidden, he would lay his destiny in her hands and
swear that his future life should be guided by her own wishes.
Thus struggling against his convictions, hoping against his hopes,
the heart of Maudsley was tossed to and fro upon a stormy
sea of passion and of doubt. Then his eyes again fell upon
the fatal chain. The snake-like smile of Gardiner, as he stood
in the twilight of that eventful evening, again flashed upon his
memory. Again the words of the mysterious unknown
recurred
to him, and he did indeed acknowledge that both their
destinies seemed bound together by a chain. 'T was strange
indeed, he thought, as he gazed upon that fragile plaything,
that the fate of so many beings should be entangled in those
slight and golden meshes.
It so happened that the earnest enthusiasm of Esther's
character
had just began to awaken a corresponding emotion in his
own breast, even at the moment when all his hopes had been
dashed to the earth. He had made his way originally to New
England with but one object. He was determined, if
possible
,
to tear Esther from the life of gloomy solitude to which she
had so fanatically devoted herself. He had been baffled. His
stormy nature vainly dashed itself against the placid but
unyielding
enthusiasm of her character, as the wild surge dissolves in
foam against the marble cliff.
The estrangement which had resulted from the ill success of
his violent entreaties and reproaches, would have proved but
temporary. The love inspired by such a woman could not be
uprooted like a worthless weed. On the contrary, the natural
and necessary effect was to increase Maudsley's passion a
thousand
fold, for enthusiasm is apt to inspire respect, even where
it fails to elicit sympathy. The wild scenes into which he had
plunged, to bury, if possible, the recollection of his love  the
profligate and fantastic creatures who had surrounded him like
a horde of unholy spirits, had produced a strange and sudden
effect upon his mind. His nature, although not fickle, was
impressionable
.
All that surrounded him in the wilderness was
odious, and his heart panted after the serene image of Esther
with a renewed and redoubled devotion, as if her presence
alone could give light to this dreary and desolate land  could
exorcise the evil demons who seemed ravening for him as their
prey. His mind was indeed beginning to awaken to a deeper
appreciation of her lofty character. The contrast between the
purity of her life and the unhallowed ribaldry in the midst of
which he had lately dwelt, had spoken to him in trumpet tones.
His heart was softened, his pride humbled, his resolution
weakened
.
His whole nature was ready to receive a durable
impression
,
perhaps at their very next interview. Deep was
already calling unto deep, and from the profoundest recesses of
his heart, there had arisen at last an answering murmur to her
own.
It was at this very point that the great misfortune befell him.
A few hours before his presence at the fatal interview between
Gardiner and Esther, and he knew not what sacrifices he was
not prepared to make. He was ready to lay himself at her feet,
to implore her guidance along his benighted path. And now he
would indeed see her once more. He was impelled towards her
irresistibly; but alas! who should say in what such an interview
might result?
1*
Upon the afternoon of the same day he found himself at the
residence of the Ludlows. Walter was seated under a tree in the
neighborhood of the house, lost, apparently, in one of those
pensive
reveries which were habitual with him. Maudsley looked
anxiously around for Esther, but she did not at that moment
appear to be in her brother's company, and he was not unwilling
to gain a little time to collect his scattered thoughts.
The heats of summer are already upon us, said he,
accosting
Ludlow.
Aye, said Ludlow, acknowledging Maudsley's salutation,
the climate of New England is more intense and more exciting
than that of our own land. It is, however, to be considered
fortunate
that the approaching colony will not arrive like the early
Plymouth settlers in the very midst of a rigorous winter, but that
some few months will be afforded them to make preparations for
withstanding the winter's siege. But I cry you pardon,
Master
Maudsley, I believe you feel but little sympathy with the
matter to which I allude.
Not perhaps so lively a sympathy, answered Maudsley,
as that which is felt by one who is near and dear to you. It
might have been  but no, the time is past, the feeling dead.
I have sought you, Master Ludlow, to inquire if I may, in any
thing, be serviceable to you in England, concluded he abruptly.
And do you purpose returning thither? answered Ludlow.
Such is my intention; replied Maudsley.
I regret, continued Ludlow, that no spark of sympathy
hath been awakened in your bosom for the sacred cause. There
was a time when I had hoped, that in the pure and fervent
sentiment
which seemed to bind you to the destinies of one very
dear to me, there might be found an element of a still more
elevated emotion. I grieve to think that this should be all past,
Master Maudsley; but I have no disposition and no right to
read your heart.
The heart of man is inscribed with strange hieroglyphics,
answered Maudsley, and happy is he who possesses the key to
read the mysteries of his own. For myself, I hardly hazard a
conjecture at what may be passing within the souls of those
around me, when I find it so difficult to understand my own.
Life is a masquerade, and a dull one, Master Ludlow, yet wo
to him who would tear the grinning masks from the features
of his companions.
You are almost oracular this evening, answered Ludlow,
somewhat perplexed by the singular humor in which his
companion
seemed to be indulging; but to recur to what I before
observed, I regret extremely to find that no change hath come
over your soul, for sooth to say, I had fondly anticipated some
such event. 'Tis a disappointment to me, Henry Maudsley, for I
felt a warm confidence that the bright morning of religious
relevation was really about to dawn upon you. Nay, after the
extraordinary conversion of the proud and ambitious knight,
it seemed not fantastic to hope for a similar change in so muclr
younger and fresher a soul.
To whom do you allude? cried Maudsley, with a sudden
start.
To one whom men call Sir Christopher Gardiner, was the
reply.
And is he, indeed, one of those whose heart hath been
suddenly
changed? said Maudsley, governing his emotion by a
violent effort, and speaking with perfect calmness.
Aye, he is, indeed, a striking and living testimonial of
grace, answered Ludlow. I have had long and intimate
interviews with him. Without revealing to me the details of his
past life, he hath confessed to me that he hath been but little
better than one of the wicked. But the Lord hath revealed
himself to him suddenly, and at the dead of night. The very
hour and moment of his new birth he has been able to fix with
singular precision. I have a firm conviction that this erring
man hath made already a comfortable progress in grace, nor do
I entertain any doubt of his final justification.
Indeed, said Maudsley, with an imperceptible sneer, and
still speaking with forced composure, indeed it rejoiceth my
heart exceedingly to hear such comforting assurances of one, of
whom I had scarcely expected such tidings. If Sir Christopher
Gardiner, then, be truly one of the elect, and if his residence in
the wilderness is likely to be a protracted one, I may surely
congratulate you upon such a valuable acquisition as his habitual
companionship must be.
Aye, answered Ludlow, dropping his voice, and speaking
in a confidential tone, and I have even hopes that the intimacy
between us may be hallowed and cemented by a still closer
bond of union. You have known me well enough, Master
Maudsley, to be certain that it was for a long time the dearest
wish of my heart, that the union, which at one time seemed a
most likely event, between my sister and yourself, might sooner
or later be arranged. Without having been entirely in your
confidence, I have, however, at last arrived at the knowledge that
Providence, from the first, hath not ordained such a
consummation
.
I am, however, very conscious of the defects of my own
character. I can at times look clearly upon the position of
Esther and myself; but perhaps I weary you, Master Maudsley.
Proceed, Walter Ludlow, answered Maudsley, waving his
hand impatiently.
It is then desirable, as you will easily admit, continued the
other, that Esther should have a protector and a companion.
How long I may remain a sojourner in this weary world, I know
not, but I am at best but a wayfarer and a pilgrim, and it is not
right nor fitting that she should thus devote her existence to one
whose path is every through the valley of dark shadows. I
repeat it, Esther needs a protector and companion, and such I
believe I have at last found for her. You see, I speak with
perfect
frankness, Master Maudsley.
I am honored by your confidence, replied Maudsley,
speaking
calmly, but in tones so hoarse and unnatural, that almost
any one but Ludlow must have been struck by them, and I am
to understand then that the protector and companion so desired
for Esther Ludlow, hath at last been found in the person of Sir
Christopher Gardiner.
Even so, answered Ludlow quietly. To me, the
adventures
of his past life, whatever they may have been, are as
nothing, for I feel an earnest conviction that he is a regenerate
man, within whom the Lord hath vouchsafed to renew a right
spirit. I believe you have but a slender acquaintance with the
worthy knight, Maudsley?
Death and furies, muttered Maudsley, who still stood there
with wonderful composure, while the blind and dreaming dotard
was searing his nerves as with red-hot irons, am I to endure
these tortures forever; pray Heaven he may not urge me to use
my influence with Esther in favor of her new suitor and
protector
!
Aye, continued he aloud, in reply to Ludlow's question,
my acquaintance with the worthy knight is but slender, but I
trust that an opportunity will soon be afforded me to improve it.
He is not at present sojourning in the immediate neighborhood,
I believe.
No, answered Ludlow, he is at present tarrying, for certain
private reasons, at New Plymouth. But he is expected to return
to his old residence before many days. I am glad to find you
disposed to improve your friendship with him.
Trust me, answered Maudsley, grinding his teeth and
speaking in almost sepulchral tones, I am only too anxious for
an opportunity. May death alone separate us afterwards!
Ludlow elevated his eyebrows slightly, as he listened to what
he considered the somewhat exaggerated expressions of Maudsley,
but he was very far from suspecting what was really passing in
his heart. He was indeed one of those who are incapable of
reading the most common events which pass around them, to
whom the souls of their immediate companions are as sealed
volumes, and who are therefore thoroughly incapable of
sympathizing
with or of benefitting those who are nearest and
dearest to them, even with the warmest and purest intentions.
If Maudsley had remembered the character of his companion, if
he had reflected upon the profound ignorance in which he
usually
dwelt, as to the feelings of those around him, he would
perhaps have appreciated more justly the value of the singular
communications which had just been made to him. But he was
at the moment the slave of passion, and the whispers of reason
were powerless. His soul, upon reaching the residence of
Esther, had been filled with the most conflicting emotions. The
slow, hesitating communication of Ludlow was the match to the
mine. He had, however, governed himself, and the
simple-minded
Ludlow possessed not the smallest knowledge of the
tempest which was raging in his companion's bosom.
You will find Esther in her garden, I believe, said Ludlow,
with sudden abruptness, and it is fitting that you should confer
with her before your departure, which it grieveth me to hear you
announce as so imminent. A few letters, however, I may
possibly
desire to intrust you with. For the present, I crave your
pardon for retiring ere the daylight be spent, for I have left a
task unfinished. Farewell, for the present; I shall find you at
our humble evening meal.
With this Walter Ludlow suddenly entered the house, leaving
Maudsley almost overwhelmed.
The evening was dreamy and delicious. Even at that early
period of the summer, a few fireflies were already flitting over
the moist fields, looking like disembodied spirits, as they fitfully
shone, disappeared, and again twinkled into existence, hovering
gently and noiselessly over the damp earth. The shades of
evening were gathering, as Maudsley, advancing a few steps
from the spot where Ludlow had left him, suddenly saw Esther
approaching from the garden. In spite of all his resolution, and
notwithstanding the time that had been afforded him for
collecting
his thoughts, his heart, which had been beating violently,
seemed to stand stock-still. His coward blood seemed to retreat
upon its citadel, and his whole frame shivered. It was passing
strange. But a moment before, and he had felt as if he could
have bidden her farewell without the quivering of a nerve. He
gazed upon her entranced. For a delicious moment he shut his
eyes wilfully to the precipice upon which he was standing, and
forgot his stormy past, his dreary future, reckless of all except
his idolatrous and irrepressible love. The lava torrent which
had overwhelmed his existence had spared one single flower, and
with the calm avarice of despair, he slowly plucked it as it grew
there upon the edge of desolation. He stood still, and gazed
upon Esther, who was not yet aware of his presence, as if in
this, his last interview, he would crowd into one brief moment
the rapture and the agony of years. Never had she seemed
more beautiful. As she stood there, surrounded by the dark
and solemn scenery of the forest, where the murmuring pine
and the time-hallowed oak mingled their shadows in the
advancing
twilight, she seemed like some fabled forest spirit, some
fountain-haunting Egeria, some rapt and mysterious priestess,
suddenly arisen in the silent wilderness to embody the softest
dreams of poetry.
Esther started, as, upon drawing nearer, she perceived
Maudsley
standing motionless in her presence. She was pained at the
thoughts of this approaching interview. Although it was
impossible
for her to forget the past, and although she felt that the
feelings which had, as it were, grown with her growth, could
never be eradicated from her bosom, yet she had taken her
resolution
.
She had long felt convinced that it was an unfortunate
destiny which had thus entangled, as it were, rather than united,
the existences of two persons whom Heaven had created so
unlike
in character and opinion. The bright hopes which she had
conceived for the future, in the midst of her joy at the sudden
appearance of her lover in the wilderness  the conviction which
had been forced upon her, of the earnestness and depth of that
passion, which had impelled him to pursue her thus across the
world  had all been destroyed and buried in the disappointment
which she felt as she discovered that he still remained
unchanged
.
She greeted him coldly, but without embarrassment.
We meet again, Esther Ludlow, said he in a hoarse tone,
and with forced composure; we meet once more, and for the
last time.
The last time! answered Esther, with a trembling voice.
Aye, answered Maudsley, gloomily. What hath such an
one as I to do in this wilderness. The prize for which I fondly
strove has been snatched from my eager grasp. Surely none
knoweth better than Esther Ludlow that this desert is no place
for me.
'Tis true, she answered, mistaking his meaning, and
speaking
with greater firmness. This gloomy desert is no place for
one so light-hearted and so impetuous as yourself. Truly, I
marvelled much when you appeared so suddenly in this distant
world. I marvel less that you have so soon grown weary of
it.
You know too well, resumed Maudsley, why I am in this
wilderness, but you know not how utterly and absolutely I was
ready to lay myself at your feet. When I remonstrated with
your determination; when I so violently urged the abandonment
of your most cherished projects; even then I felt the influence of
what seemed your sublime enthusiasm stealing over my heart.
Is this indeed true, Henry Maudsley? interrupted Esther,
with a rapturous expression of countenance.
Even then, continued Maudsley, in the same gloomy tone,
without noticing the interruption, even then I felt a strange
influence subduing my nature. How it was I knew not, and
cared not, but it seemed to me that an exalting ecstasy had
suddenly
mingled with and hallowed my earthly passion, when in one
fatal moment the spell was rudely broken.
You speak indeed in parables, interrupted Esther, once
more gazing upon him with an expression of wonder.
And yet I am no prophet nor soothsayer, answered her
lover, but a weak, deluded, erring fool. Whence, and of what
nature, was the sublime vision which seemed at one moment to
have swept over my senses? Was it a subtle poison distilled
within the depths of a treacherous heart, and infused into my
very being by the dark magic of a woman's eyes? And was this,
only this to be the result of my enraptured trances, which I
mistook for the presence of the divine spirit?
Henry Maudsley, said Esther with calmness, so far as I
can discover the meaning of your mysterious language, you have
dared to couple the term of treachery with my name.
Aye, answered Maudsley, still speaking like a man in a
dream, aye, 't was indeed a rude awakening, but better thus
than that the dark poison should have quite overpowered my
senses; and yet, who would dare even to believe his senses?
who would not rather brand them as liars and slanderers, than
reject the record which an angel's pencil hath written.
Henry Maudsley! cried Esther, in an accent of despair,
for it suddenly flashed upon her, as she listened to this utterly
incomprehensible language, that her lover's reason was unsettled.
Henry Maudsley, for the love of God look not thus wildly
upon me. Look me in the face, if you have ever loved me, and
tell me in plain language what is this dreadful mystery which
seems to cast a shadow over your mind?
VOL. II. 2
My suspicions may be baseless, he continued, pray God
they prove so! for your welfare even now is dearer to me than
my heart's blood. Remember this, however, else one day the
reflection may flash upon you, like lightning from the dark
clouds, which seem gathering over both your life and mine.
Remember this, continued he, looking fixedly upon her,
that with all his faults and follies, Henry Maudsley was no
hypocrite. May God protect you from the inextricable snares
of hypocrisy!
Hypocrisy, Master Maudsley! exclaimed Esther, with
flashing eyes, do you dare to charge me with hypocrisy?
God forbid, Madam! was the reply. I know your
spirit to be pure and noble. I bade you beware of hypocrisy,
but I meant not that the hypocrisy was in your own heart. Less
than I have said, I could not say; more, I have neither claim nor
wish to say. Farewell, Esther Ludlow, farewell forever. 'T is
a word which I came hither to speak, and now 't is spoken.
But one word more, and my task is accomplished. Whatever
betide us both, now that we are forever separated, believe me
that I have forgiven you. Believing this, you may yet trust to
the sincerity of a heart which has been wholly yours. Should
that dark day come, as sooner or later my soul prophecies it
must, when Esther Ludlow shall require a friend in her utmost
need, remember that there is one, if he still exists upon the
earth, will cross sea and land, and encounter every danger to
avert evil from her head.
'T is time that this strange and inexplicable scene should
cease, answered Esther, who felt deeply wounded, as well
as entirely overwhelmed with wonder at what seemed to
her the insulting and outrageous demeanor of her companion.
To what hypocritical snares you allude in such a mysterious
manner, I know as little as I do the nameless crimes for
which you forgive me with such strange magnanimity. I thank
you truly for the confidence which you still place in my
character
,
although I think it would be more kindly exhibited if you
would deal more frankly with me. Your riddles are all beyond
my intelligence, and seem to me unworthy of yourself. For
your generous offer of assistance in the time of trouble, I thank
you, but I trust never to be so utterly forlorn, as to require the
protection of one who hath been so unjust and so insulting.
With these words, which she uttered with great dignity of
manner, although her eyes were blinded with tears, Esther was
turning from the spot, when Maudsley hastily detained her.
But one moment, Esther. I answer not one word to your
reproaches, and God shall judge between us two. We stand
here in the midst of a wild and mysterious world, whose
superstitions
we know not, the spiritual tenants of whose forests
we know not. That there are spirits, whether of good or evil,
who haunt these solemn and sequestered scenes, I know, for I
have myself communed with such. But this is from my
purpose
.
I designed to leave with you a pledge of my promise.
Despise that promise, if you will  the day may come when you
may lack a true and loyal friend. Should that day arrive, look
on this chain, and remember Harry Maudsley. And now,
farewell
,
farewell, Esther Ludlow.
As he uttered these concluding words, he suddenly flung the
mysterious chain around Esther's neck, and, with a hasty stride,
disappeared into the twilight shadows of the forest.
CHAPTER II.
THE ESCAPE.
The
expectations of Sir Christopher Gardiner had indeed
been proved to be well founded. The lord of Merry-Mount had
at last rendered himself so obnoxious to the Puritans of New
Plymouth, and the last uproarious proceedings during the
May-day
festival had been deemed so outrageous, that at last they
had determined to eject him from the colony.
Their aversion to him was no doubt mainly founded upon his
hostility to their religious tenets, and upon his rantipole mode of
life, which was necessarily shocking to their rigid manners.
Besides this, he was supposed to be engaged in certain
mysterious
plots, contrary to the interest and comfort of the Puritanic
settlers. He was, moreover, openly accused of dangerous
dealings
with the Indians, and in particular of supplying them with
fire-arms, and teaching them the use thereof, which, according
to a proclamation of King James, was an offence against the
laws of England.
As for the merry potentate himself, he stoutly maintained that
the only crime of which he was guilty was that of being more
skilful and successful than they in his trading with the savages,
particularly in the beaver trade, which superiority he himself
attributed to his better knowledge of the Indian language and
character, and to the greater influence which he had been able
to exert over their minds. According to himself, he was ever
upon the most friendly and harmonious terms with his dusky
neighbors, and he repeatedly asserted that he had received
infinitely
more kindness and hospitality from the heathen than he ever
did from the Christian inhabitants of New England. Envy of
his own success was in his opinion the main cause of the grudge
which the Plymouth people bore him, and the main reason why
they had at last determined upon open hostilities against him.
Although he had, as we have seen, been repeatedly warned of
his danger, yet the reckless buoyancy of his character had led
him to place but little faith in the evils which impended over
him, so that he had in the very time of danger conducted
himself
like a most unskilful general, and a most impolitic monarch.
His forces, which should have been concentrated at his own
capital, to protect him against the threatened invasion, were
unhappily engaged in distant forays far away in the interior,
and the sovereign of Merry-Mount himself now found himself
alone, and at a distance from his palace, suddenly confronted
and made a prisoner by his most redoubtable enemy.
The apparition of Captain Standish had been so sudden and
so unexpected, and the capture of Morton so instantaneous, that
it seemed almost as if the Plymouth hero had really been
possessed
of some of the marvellous attributes ascribed to him by
the lunatic, who had just disappeared into his cave. There was
something too, in the savage scene around  in the wild and
fitful appearance of the threatening sky, in the distant
mutterings
of the thunder, the stifling atmosphere, and the unnatural
light which was streaming from the sky long after the shadows
of evening should have covered the earth, which might have
inspired a lively or a timorous imagination with a sensation of
awe.
There stood the famous captain, armed to the teeth, with
uplifted sword and threatening eye, motionless as a statue; and
there stood the luckless Morton, with his arms securely
pinioned
,
and surrounded by half a dozen stout fellows, suddenly
and completely in the power of the foe whom his lips had just
been scoffing.
2*
Morton stood stock-still, looking at the calm and immovable
image before him, and for a moment could not but believe
himself
the victim of a horrid night-mare. 'T was impossible that it
could be real. He had heard no footsteps, seen no movement
in the thickets, not a leaf had rustled. These six armed men,
with that dreaded commander at their head, had risen out of the
earth to daunt him. 'T was an invention of the evil one. He
had the night before seen the portentous vision of the flaming
sword in heaven. It had not moved his soul  why should this
terrestrial vision appal him?
Aroint thee, Sathanas! said he at last, striving as it were
to arouse himself from a dream. Aroint thee, evil one, and
keep thy bugbears to frighten madmen and children withal. I
fear them not, they move me not. `Justum et tenacem
proposi'
By the Lord, 't is no fever dream after all, or if it be, 't is a
damned obstinate and chronic one of its kind, added he upon
finding, after struggling and shaking himself very vigorously, that
the armed phantoms did not fade away, and that he was still
retained
in durance by his captors.
Thy struggles are useless, thou foolish mischief-maker,
said Standish, speaking at last, although still remaining in the
same motionless attitude. Thou art my prisoner, and if thou
inclinest to retain that giddy head upon thy shoulders, I would
earnestly recommend submission.
So, the ghost hath a tongue as well as a sword, hath he?
said Morton to himself, in a low, bewildered tone. And yet,
truly, I heard his voice before, but 't was then a fancy of my
brain, I thought. By Jupiter, Son of Saturn, here is a pretty
predicament for a sachem and a sovereign; and with this, he
relapsed again into meditation, still gazing with a rueful and
puzzled expression upon his adversary.
Miles Standish, who thus confronted the Lord of Merry-Mount,
was as small of stature as he was heroic in spirit. Scarcely
elevated above the dimensions of a dwarf, he yet possessed so
well knit and muscular a frame, that no man who looked upon
him, much less one who had seen or felt the vigor of his arm,
but would have almost preferred an encounter with a giant than
a contest with this small but intrepid hero. His countenance
was bronzed with exposure, his features were bold and martial,
and his eye was full of fire. Although he was not much past
middle age, his temples were bare and his beard grizzled. He
was at this moment arrayed in the military costume of the period,
and wore a round iron morion, with a narrow rim, upon his
head; a cuirass and back-plece of steel, a doublet and hose of
tawny leather, and held a long double-edged sword in his hand.
His six followers, who were picked men from the Plymouth
colony
,
were likewise clad in the same defensive armor. They were
morever armed with long, heavy snaphances, or matchlocks, held
long forked staffs, which were called rests, in their left hands,
while from their left shoulders and across their chests were
suspended
broad bandileers, holding a string of charges for their
muskets, contained in small tin cylinders. It was very evident
that they were out upon an expedition which was considered
serious
and important.
As for Captain Standish, enough was known by Morton of his
character and history, to give him ample assurance that he was
not a personage to be trifled with. Although the master of
Merry-Mount
was very prone, when at his own palace and among his
own adherents, to indulge in various witticisms at the expense of
the pigmy of Plymouth, yet in his heart he well knew that he
was a most intrepid champion and a most dangerous adversary.
Miles Standish was indeed one of the most striking and
picturesque
characters which appear upon the first and most heroic
page of New England's annals. Descended from a younger
branch of an ancient and honorable house in England, and the
legal heir to the family estates, which had at last devolved upon
him as the head of the family, but which were surreptitiously
and unjustly detained from him, he had become wearied of
prosecuting
his claims amid the thousand obstacles interposed by
unjust
power and the law's chicanety. He had sought and acquired
honorable distinction in the pursuit of arms. He had served
with distinction in the Low Countries, in the army which
Elizabeth
had sent to assist the struggling Hollanders, and after the
truce he had served with honor upon other battle-fields. He
had made the acquaintance of the pilgrims of Robinson's
company
,
while sojourning at Leyden, and when the emigration to
America was resolved upon, he had either volunteered or
received
an invitation to associate himself with them. Although no
rigid Puritan himself, and not a member of their church, his
sympathies had been entirely enlisted in their cause, and he had
sailed with them in the Mayflower. From the first moment
when these poor but heroic outcasts set foot upon the rock of
Plymouth, the intrepid Standish had proved a most invaluable
assistant to them. His bravery, military experience, iron
pertinacity
of purpose, insensibility to fatigue and privation of every
kind, were qualities which constituted him a most admirable
champion and military leader for this small and feeble colony in
their dangerous enterprise. Always foremost in every expedition,
whether to explore the country, to treat with the savages, or to
give them battle when they were disposed to hostility, he was
equally serviceable at home in laying out their town,
constructing
their fortifications, and training and disciplining the colonists
in the use of arms.
Considering himself the military servant of the company, he
had accepted, without hesitation, the expedition which had been
determined upon against the troublesome master of misrule, as the
Puritans designated the Lord of Merry-Mount, and had taken with
him six trained and trusty fellows, in whose conduct and valor he
most confided. Although it was supposed that Morton had a very
considerable body of adherents domesticated near him, yet the
number of men composing the expedition was considered quite
enough to take possession of his strong hold and to secure his
person. With about the same number, Standish had crushed
the great Indian conspiracy, and quelled forever the spirit and
the hostility of the Massachusetts savages.
It was by pure accident that Standish, upon his way by sea to
Merry-Mount had paused at Wessaguscus, and by a still more
singular accident that he had chanced then and there to find all
alone and unprotected the object of his search. Proceeding
towards his pinnace, from which the party had disembarked
during a calm, Standish, who was in advance of his followers,
had heard voices through the thicket along which he was
passing
.
With his usual caution and readiness, he had enjoined
silence and secrecy upon his companions, and had crept,
unperceived
by the unsuspecting Morton, close to the spot from
whence the voices issued. There, to his no small astonishment
and gratification, he had suddenly beheld the well-known form
of the sovereign of Merry-Mount, quietly conversing with the
miserable, crack-brained outcast, the last remnant of Weston's
ill-starred colony, upon trifling and indifferent matters. At a
nod of their commander, his followers had noiselessly
surrounded
and captured their prize, as we have already seen, at the
very moment when a jesting and contemptuous allusion to
Captain
Standish was falling from his lips.
Morton had stood gazing for a few moments in utter
bewilderment
at this sudden and unexpected apparition, but was
slowly obliged to acknowledge that it was, indeed, no vision of
his imagination.
By Jupiter Diespiter, muttered he to himself, this is the
valorous Shrimp in
propria person
, and with a lobster's shell on
his back, armed in proof, and making night hideous. I think
't is no vision after all. Most valiant gentleman, continued he
suddenly aloud, and addressing himself to his enemy, would
it be presumptuous to inquire whether you are in reality the
illustrious Captain Miles Standish, (it did not seem at that
moment natural to call him Captain Shrimp,) or merely some
fantastic apparition?
That my name is Standish, answered the person addressed,
is probably as well known to thyself as to me. That I am
here in substantial flesh and blood, hath been sufficiently made
known to thee already. Furthermore, I would request thee to
spare me thy stale witticisms. We of Plymouth have but small
relish for the buffoonery which is so rampant at Merry-Mount.
And I would, moreover, advise thee to collect what reason thou
mayest possess in that crazy brain of thine, that thou mayest be
better prepared than at present thou seemest, to answer the
interrogatories
of the grave fathers of Plymouth.
Truly, most valiant captain, answered the crest-fallen
Morton, I have not, at this present time and tide, the smallest
intention to seek the society of those grave and respectable
personages. Therefore, it would hardly seem necessary in me
to prepare answers to any catechism with which it might be
their desire to indulge me.
But I tell thee, answered Standish, that thou art to appear
before them before the year is many days older, whether it be
thy intention or inclination to visit them or no, for it is most
assuredly my intention to escort thee thither, with as brief a
delay as may be.
This, then, is what I should term enforced hospitality,
answered the other, for which I shall be likely to render but
little gratitude. You have basely and surreptitiously obtained
command of my person, contrary to the laws of the English
realm, under whose protection I presume that I dwell,
even in this Ultima Thule, or, for thy better apprehension,
in this remote wilderness. The majesty of the law is not to be
trifled with, Master Standish, and evil consequences may alight
on the heads of those who dare to be guilty of so grave an
offence. I warn thee to detain me at thy own peril.
I am no pettifogger, Master Morton, answered Standish,
and I have neither ability nor inclination to argue legal points
with thee. I am a soldier, and have quite skill enough to read
and to understand my orders. Those orders are to assure myself
of thy person at all hazards, and to bring thee presently to the
plantation of New Plymouth, and those orders, look you, I
purpose
to execute.
And by what authority, may it please your most arbitrary
captainship, answered Morton, do you dare thus to lay
violent
hands upon an unoffending subject of his Majesty, King
Charles?
Truly, as I neither consider myself the prisoner in this
instance, answered Standish, whose quick temper was already
ruffled by the cool, complacent, and somewhat ironical demeanor
of his captive, nor thyself as the judge appointed to try the
cause between us, I shall no longer brook thy insolence, and I
counsel thee to imitate my discretion in this particular, and
forthwith to hold thy peace.
This little chimney is soon fired, quoth Morton to himself,
a taller one might quietly consume within itself these little
sparks; but your little heroes are ever puffing and smoking. I
pray the, good Master Standish, continued he aloud in a more
courteous and good-humored tone, be not so easily inflamed
by the natural resentment of a free denizen of the wilderness as
well as a loyal subject of his Majesty, at losing his natural
birthright
of freedom, and, as he humbly conceives, without due cause.
I did but purpose to try conclusions with thee upon this matter;
surely it would be no extraordinary stretch of condescension
upon thy part, to inform me a little touching the crimes with
which I stand charged, and the authority by which I am
arrested
.
The squall will soon be upon us, said Standish, abruptly,
to his followers, without heeding the last observation of his
prisoner. We shall hardly expedite our journey by taking to
the pinnace to-night. Moreover, as the object of our expedition
is already accomplished, and our journey considerably abridged
by this fortunate encounter with the merry gentleman, whom we
have come so far to seek, I propose to take up our quarters for
the night at the ruined fort, whence, with the earliest dawn we
will set sail for Plymouth.
The night had, in truth, advanced, as they stood parleying
with the prisoner. The atmosphere, however, still retained its
lurid glare and its suffocating stillness. The tempest, which was
brooding in the distance, still delayed its coming.
The place where Morton had been captured, was in an open
hollow, surrounded by wooded hills of moderate elevation, and
not far from the mouth of the river which gave its name to the
abandoned plantation. A difficult pathway, overgrown with
brushwood, wound through the ravine, and led to an ancient
clearing upon a more elevated plain, where a few scattered and
dilapidated huts still stood, the last remnants of the
unsuccessful
settlement. Thither it was the intention of Captain
Standish to conduct his prisoner, because, as he had already
informed his companions, the threatening aspect of the weather
rendered it advisable to postpone the voyage to the morrow.
Morton was accordingly accommodated with a rope, securely
fastened about his loins, and placed in the immediate custody of
two sturdy and grim-faced Puritans, who were expressly ordered to
shoot him down, if he offered to make his escape. In this
ignominious
condition, the Lord of Merry-Mount was obliged to follow
close upon the heels of the small hero whom he had so often
derided
,
and who now led the way through the bushes, and along the
almost impenetrable pathway, with a firm and rapid step.
Morton
,
whose confidence in himself had not deserted him, and who
still nourished hopes of escape from the awkward dilemma in
which he found himself, affected the most perfect submission,
and followed patiently after his leader, slily testing the strength
of the knot, however, as he advanced, and eagerly watching an
opportunity to slip out of his noose, and to roll down the side of
the hill, when he trusted easily to elude pursuit under cover of
the almost impervious thickets. His hunting-knife, which was
the only weapon he had with him, had unfortunately been taken
from him at the moment of his capture, and he found the knot
so securely tied, and the cord so obstinately tough, that all his
efforts to loosen or break it proved fruitless. As they were
passing
,
however, through a very deep shade, and along the edge of
a somewhat precipitous ledge of granite, he suddenly gave the
rope a furious jerk, and threw himself bodily over the sloping
precipice. His manuvre was only partially successful; his
two sturdy guardians, who had wound the cord securely about
their wrists, retained their hold upon him, although they were
unable to maintain their balance, upon this sudden and
unexpected
strain. All three rolled headlong down the precipice,
which might have been some twenty or thirty feet in descent,
and plunged with a crashing noise into the thick underwood
at the base of the rock. One of the matchlocks was harmlessly
discharged in the catastrophe, and the three lay for a moment
struggling together in the darkness and confusion. Standish,
who was a few paces in advance, comprehended in an instant
what had probably occurred, and sprang like a tiger down the
cliff, in the direction whence came the confused noise of the
struggle.
There was light enough remaining, to enable him to observe
that the prisoner's attempt had been unsuccessful, and all the
party being already upon their legs again, having sustained no
VOL. II. 3
farther damage than a few scratches and bruises in their descent,
he ordered them forthwith to make the prisoner's bonds still
more secure, and then to follow round the base of the ledge, till
they could ascend again to the narrow pathway which they had
lost.
So thou wouldst bid us farewell so soon, said he, in an
angry tone, to his captive. Trust me, thou knowest little with
whom thou hast to deal, or thou wouldst desist from such trifling.
I advise thee to follow at my heels quietly for the remainder of
thy journey, or I shall send thee on a longer journey at a
moment's warning, and one for which thou art even less
prepared
than for the present one. Be wiser, then, scapegoat; a
further attempt will be fatal to thee.
Scapegoat in thy teeth, muttered Morton, considerably
vexed, and somewhat battered, by the unsuccessful result of his
attempt  scapegoat in thy teeth, thou peppery, waspish,
unmannerly
drummer's boy! A plague upon it, continued he,
in a louder tone, 't is bad enough to be bruised in body, by an
accidental plunge from yonder precipice, and truly there needs
no browbeating in addition. I tell thee I was cast down from
the rock against my will, even like the Tarpeian virgin of
ancient
story, and by the Lord, was I well nigh suffocated by the
martial ornaments that were showered down along with me.
Escape! and why, truly, should I care to escape? What crimes
am I charged withal? `
Integer vit, scelerisque purus
,' et
cetera, et cetera.
Muttering and discoursing in this fragmentary and voluble
manner, Morton followed again his captors through the bushes,
but finding his eloquence lost upon Standish, he soon relapsed
into solemn silence.
No further opportunity for escape presenting itself during the
remainder of their brief and rapid tramp through the woods, he
soon found himself emerging with his companions into the open
plain which was to be the termination of their journey.
Though the night was already somewhat advanced, it was not
so dark but that Morton could easily note the appearance and
bearing of the different objects about him, with which he had
long been familiar. There were at that moment, so far as he
knew, no tenants in the dismantled and decayed huts which were
here and there scattered along the clearing, but within the centre
of the plain he knew that there was a larger tenement, which had
been kept from time to time in tolerable repair, for the use of
the trading and fishing parties who occasionally resorted thither.
This was the building which had been designated by Standish
as the ruined fort, because it had in truth served as a
blockhouse
or citadel in the early days of the settlement, although
there was now only enough left of it to serve as a tolerable
protection
against the weather, and although it was never occupied,
except temporarily and at distant intervals.
Hither, accordingly, the party bent their way, and soon
entered
the dilapidated tenement. It was a dismal looking edifice
enough, although, for a summer's night, its dismantled and
uncomfortable
condition was hardly of consequence. The party
would naturally have preferred bivouacking in the open air, as
was their usual custom upon such expeditions, but as the night
threatened to be stormy, and as they had a prisoner to guard, it
was thought more advisable to take possession of this building.
The house consisted of two rooms, the larger opening directly
from the door-way, and the second, which was smaller,
communicating
only with the first. There was an old oaken bedstead
in the inner room, which had accidentally escaped destruction,
and was the only piece of furniture in the whole mansion.
There was a single narrow and unglazed window placed very
near the ceiling of the larger room, and nearly the whole of the
opposite side was occupied with an immense fire-place, which at
that season of the year was not likely to be used. It would have
hardly dispensed much comfort, had the weather been colder,
as the chimney itself had toppled down at some previous period,
making a chasm in the roof, and leaving a large heap of bricks
and rubbish scattered over the earthern floor. In this cheerful
abode, the whole party were now assembled, and a light being
soon struck, and two or three pine torches lighted, Morton was,
much to his satisfaction, relieved of his bonds, and allowed to
seat himself upon the ground along with the others. None of
the party having taken any refreshment since the morning, and
their appetites having been sharpened by their rugged march,
they now produced their stores of dried bears' meat of which
they invited Morton to partake. He, however, thought proper
to decline their proffered hospitality, knowing that fasting would
keep him watchful, and sat rather at a distance, amusing
himself
with observing at his leisure the appearance of his new
companions
.
The rude apartment, with its walls and roof formed of naked
and smoke-stained rafters, the damp and earthy odor from the
clayey floor, and the wild glare of the yellow torchlight,
harmonized
well with the grim figures who occupied that lonely
dwelling. They had disencumbered themselves of their
defensive
armor, and were all seated in their buff jerkins upon the
ground, seeming, with their closely shorn heads, stern features,
grizzled beards, and rigid demeanor, about as formidable
guardians
and uncongenial companions to the merry Lord of
Merry-Mount
as he could possibly have desired. Their iron
head-pieces
,
corslets and matchlocks were piled together in the centre
of the apartment; the outer door was barred, and one of the
soldiers
sat with his back planted against it, while the others sat
together in a circle. The one who seemed to be the oldest of
the party now pronounced a long, enthusiastic prayer, in which
a blessing was asked upon the food of which they were about to
partake; thanks were rendered for the signal success which had
crowned their expedition, and fervent ejaculations of horror were
added at the graceless condition of the profane sinner, whose
misdeeds had at last provoked chastisement from the fleshly arm
of authority. This preliminary concluded, the party proceeded
to devour their food in solemn silence, and for many minutes no
sound, save the steady crunching of their iron jaws, disturbed
the quiet of the scene.
The lively spirit of Morton began to grow impatient at the
imperturbable repose which pervaded the assembly. He had
determined to fast that he might be more watchful, for he was
resolved
to make his escape during the night, if the slightest chance
for doing so should offer itself. Being, however, of a sociable
disposition, not being a whit abashed nor provoked by the very
pointed allusions to his own unregenerated condition, contained
in the somewhat lengthy exhortation of which he had been an
auditor; feeling, moreover, his spirits recovering their buoyancy
as he revolved in his mind a variety of projects for escape, and
being, moreover, desirous to place himself upon better terms
with his captors, that he might, if possible, disarm their vigilance
and thus procure a greater chance of success for his efforts, he
was sorry to observe the absolute and rigid silence maintained by
the whole party.
Truly a loquacious and cheerful company, muttered he
impatiently
to himself. Madwags, all! Now, by Jupiter, I could
even find it in my heart to request yon granite-faced fellow,
who hath been prophesying so much to my discredit, to strike
up the hundredth psalm, by way of enlivening the repast.
Shade of Heliogabalus! is it not appalling to witness the steady
grinding of provender between those ponderous jaws of theirs.
Thank Heaven, they have some signs of grace, still, and I have
still hopes of them. He who will moisten his clay a little, however
hard baked and rigid it hath become, is not to be despaired of.
3*
This last muttered ejaculation was elicited by observing that
as the meal drew near its close, several of the party produced
from their pouches certain round flasks, of comfortable
dimensions
,
which they passed about among each other, occasionally
diluting their potations with draughts of water, with which one
of the iron head-pieces had been filled from a spring near the
house. Morton was briefly invited to partake of this
refreshment
,
and not to appear singular, and to avoid exciting suspicion,
he complied, although he prudently refrained from doing more
than moisten his lips. Pipes and tobacco were now produced,
and upon the whole the party began to assume, in the eyes of
Morton, a more favorable aspect. The silence was at last broken
by the elderly person who had held forth before supper, and
who, after Standish, seemed the most considerable person of the
party.
What thinkest thou, brother Standish, of the result of Isaac
Allerton's recent voyage to England? said he. I have had
small opportunity to confer with him since his late return, but
methinks two hundred pounds at thirty per cent. is no such
mighty negotiation.
Truly I am, as thou well knowest, answered Standish,
somewhat testily,  for he had, himself, not many years before,
been sent upon a financial mission to England, the result of
which, as the honest soldier was but little skilled in money
matters
,
was the procurement of one hundred and fifty pounds, for the
use of the colonies, at the moderate interest of fifty per cent.
truly I am, as hath been sufficiently proven, but a child in
mercantile
matters, nor, if the truth were known, do I care to
increase
my skill, seeing that my profession and natural temper do
but slightly fit me for such pursuits. I was born and bred a
soldier, Master Neegoose, and am perhaps better fitted to deal
with a bear or a Pokanoket savage than a money-changer, whom
I take to be a more dangerous animal than either. As for Isaac
Allerton, truly I believe that what man could accomplish, he hath
done. Thou well knowest, that early after our arrival at New
Plymouth he accompanied me, alone, and of his own free will,
to the abode of Massassoit, and I will say that it required no small
amount of bravery on the part of one like Master Allerton, not
bred to arms, thus voluntarily to venture, as it were, into the
lion's mouth, for nothing was known, at that moment, of the
temper and disposition of the red-skins.
Most true, brother Standish, answered Neegoose, I
entertain
no doubt of Master Isaac's courage, but even as thou hast
thyself but just observed, other qualifications may be
necessary
to bring about a negotiation of lucre to a hopeful
termination
Well, well, Master Neegoose, interrupted Standish, who
was not much more of a logician than a financier, and who had
no inclination to pursue the topic  the negotiations of Master
Allerton have doubtless been as successful as my own, and I
have small cause to cavil at his proceedings. As for me, so far
as concerneth my own agency in England, the colony would
have suffered but little loss, had the Turkish corsair, which ran
away with the ship which accompanied my own, even taken
possession of my unworthy person also, or had the plague, which
devoured forty thousand wretches in London during the year of
my visit, even swallowed me likewise. So I say again, far be it
from me to censure too severely the course of Isaac Allerton.
Ah, brother Standish, answered Master Neegoose, we
well know the dangers both of flood and field, which threatened
thee during thy voyage, and at London. Well do I remember
the lamentations which were loud upon our tongues, when we
heard of the fearful pestilence walking by noon-day, to which
thy valuable life was exposed. Truly, most thankful were we to
the Lord at thy escape, and most devoutly did we sing praises
to the God of Jacob that he did deliver our blessed
turtle-dove
from the multitude of dangers which compassed him
around.
The small but truculent Miles Standish certainly bore little
resemblance to a turtle-dove, but this happening to be the
only scriptural quotation which the worthy Neegoose had on
hand at the moment, he was obliged to content himself
therewith
.
Having found, moreover, that his worthy captain was
not particularly inclined to discuss and criticise the result of
Master Allerton's embassy, which was at the moment the latest
topic of interest at New Plymouth, he proceeded to discourse
somewhat at length upon the probability of the same gentleman's
being able to procure a patent from the company in England,
for the territory which the colony then occupied without
permission
of the owners.
I am no lawyer, answered Standish, after listening to a
long and somewhat confused harangue upon this topic, from
the worthy, but somewhat prosy Abraham Neegoose, but I
will venture to pronounce this opinion, that neither Master
Allerton, nor any other agent of the colony, is likely to find a
patent for our territory, unless he carry a golden key with him,
to unlock the cabinet where they keep such matters in England.
Small difficulty hath been found by Sir Henry Rosewell, Sir
Richard Saltonstall, and other wealthy and influential knights
and gentlemen of the Massachusetts colony, in procuring their
patent, and the first ships are even now upon the way. But
we of New Plymouth are weak and poor, and must even bide
patiently for a season.
Aye, answered Master Neegoose, we are as yet but a
handful of corn in the earth upon the top of a mountain, but the
fruit thereof shall shake Lebanon. Still it may be that we shall
be overshadowed by the new colonists who are speeding hither.
'T is a pleasant country the Massachusetts, and I could wish
we had ourselves been seated there.
The comforting fluid had during this conversation been
circulating
decorously, but freely, and Morton, observing that the
rigidity of the company had somewhat thawed, drew nearer, and
appeared attentive to the conversation, by which he was
apparently
much edified. Thankfully accepting the flask which was
again handed to him by one of the company, he raised it to his
lips, and bowing politely to brother Neegoose, he remarked,
Hunc scyphum tibi propino
, which in the vernacular,
added he, upon observing the grim stare with which that
respectable
individual received this outlandish address, is, I
drink to your very good health, worthy Master Neegoose, and a
pleasant ending to an acquaintance so auspiciously begun.
Firstly, answered the worthy corporal Neegoose, for such
was his rank in the little army of Plymouth, firstly, I do hold
the drinking of healths to be a profane and unnecessary
invocation
;
secondly, I entertain doubts whether it be lawful for an
unregenerate man even to pray in company with the elect, and
I feel a conviction that it is unlawful for him to drink in their
company; thirdly, thy whole character and proceedings are
distasteful
to me, and that thou mayest be sure I have small cause
to affect thy society, know that the worthy and pious Faint-not
Mellows, whom upon a recent occasion thou diddest so sorely
maltreat, is brother unto my wife, and this being the case, thou
mayest suppose that I, even I, am somewhat inclined to resent
his wrongs.
Whew   whistled Morton to himself, at this
agreeable
piece of information, I have indeed treed the wrong
bear, and had I possessed the smallest suspicion of thy
distinguished
matrimonial relationship, I would have seen thee
damned ere I meddled with thy most grisly saintship. Master
Neegoose, continued he aloud, touching the third head of
thy discourse, and waiving the two preceding as likely to lead
us into longer argument than may be desirable at this time and
tide, I would even beg leave to inform thee that the worthy and
pious Faint-not Mellowes, as you very properly term him, hath
received no injury at hands of mine. True he was somewhat
disconcerted at the rude gambols of certain waggish retainers of
mine, but they meant no mischief, and I have checked and
corrected them therefor, and they repent. This leads me once
more respectfully to inquire, continued he, turning abruptly to
Captain Standish, who, without paying much heed to the
conversation
between the prisoner and the corporal, was solacing
himself with a quiet pipe of tobacco in a corner of the room,
why I have been tied thus by the loins like a monkey, and
forcibly haled hither like a colt to a fair, in manner and form
altogether derogatory to my dignity, and prejudicial to my
comfort
?
In short, of what crime, or misdemeanor, am I accused,
and by what authority am I thus deprived of my liberty?
By the authority of the Governor and Company of New
Plymouth
,
answered Standish, drily, without taking his pipe from
his mouth.
I know no such governor nor any such company, returned
the prisoner.
Thou art likely soon to become better acquainted with
them, answered the captain, as I purpose to present thee to
them within four and twenty hours.
Aye, persisted Morton, but the Governor and Company
of New Plymouth have neither patent for the land which they
themselves wrongfully occupy, nor royal charter for exercising
jurisdiction in any part of New England, or any other portion
of the universe. How dare they then intermeddle with a
peaceful settler, far removed from their plantation, and forcibly
deprive him of his liberty?
I am no pettifogger, answered Standish, and meddle not
with matters not pertaining to my profession. If thou art
inclined to argument, my life for it, thou shalt hear reasoning
enow from the worthy magistrates themselves, therefore I
counsel thee not to waste thy wisdom and thy wit upon me,
but to reserve them till they be wanted.
And I counsel thee, continued Morton, somewhat nettled
at the cool and contemptuous manner of his captor, and I
counsel thee to think twice ere thou carriest out, to its
consummation
,
the foul conspiracy in which thou art engaged.
And I tell thee, Master Mischief-maker, answered Standish,
that I have seized thy body, because to that effect were the
company's orders. If they had ordered me to bring thy head
simply, I should have brought thy head, by which proceeding I
should have been spared much trouble, besides the necessity of
listening to thy tedious and irrelevant discourse.
Here's an arbitrary giant, muttered Morton to himself,
here's a most hot-headed and hyperbolical Hop-of-my-thumb.
A man's argument against his own kidnapping is tedious and
irrelevant forsooth, and I suppose if the tiny little devil had his
knife at my weasand, it would be an impertinent pleonasm upon
my part to strike it away.
Master Standish, continued he aloud, in a very lofty and
dignified tone, it is by no means my intention to quarrel
personally with you. I do not purpose to undervalue your
strength, your valor, nor even your geometrical height. I am
aware that the renowned Wittewamutt, who derided the
smallness
of your stature, was himself made a head shorter for his
insolence. I am aware that you brought home the savage
chieftain's head in your breeches pocket, as a keepsake for
those gentle employers of yours at New Plymouth. I am,
however
,
well aware also of the motives of this violent assault upon
my personal liberty.
Then why, in the name of Satan, answered the doughty
little hero testily, dashing his pipe upon the earth as he spoke,
then why, in the name of the foul fiend, hast thou asked me
so many questions about it? Being so wise thyself, methinks
thou mightest have spared me the din of thy discourse. How
much longer, I pray thee, will that damnable tongue of thine be
wagging?
Corporal Neegoose, and the rest of the company looked
some-somewhat
shocked at the irreverent expressions used by Miles
Standish in the first ebullition of his wrath. Being, however,
not altogether unused to such demonstrations upon the part of
their commander, who was not famous either for moderation of
temper, or for puritanic daintiness of language, they looked
composedly on, as the choleric soldier strode up and down the
small apartment, with his long sword clanking after him at every
step, and vented his indignation in a few abrupt sentences.
How long am I to be pestered with thy insolence? said he.
Is it not enough that I must be troubled with thy entertainment
and transportation to Plymouth, but thou must weary mine ears
also with thy endless prating? How long, I demand again, wilt
thou continue to wag that accursed tongue of thine?
In sooth, answered the imperturbable Morton, who rather
enjoyed the ill humor of his antagonist,  in sooth if I wag
my tongue, Master Standish, 'tis because I have nothing else
to wag. Stood we foot to foott together upon the outside of
this dungeon where thou now holdest me cribbed and pent, and
were I equipped with a blade as trusty as thine own,
perhaps
thou mightest find me apt to wag other weapons than my
tongue.
At this magnificent effusion of heroism on the part of Morton
who would, perhaps, have been somewhat disconcerted at being
taken at his word, the wrath of the hot-tempered Standish
became quite incontrollable.
By heaven! he shouted, as he turned upon his prisoner, like
a tiger, by heaven! I can hold no longer. This insolence
shall be forthwith dealt with. Though the servant of the pious
and peaceable pilgrims, I am, perhaps, more of a soldier than a
saint, and since thou demandest it, insolent braggart, thou shalt
be indeed put to the proof.
As he uttered these words in a voice of thunder, still raging
up and down the little room, he made a sudden dart at the pile
of arms upon the centre of the floor, apparently with the
intention
of ferreting out a sword for the express behoof of the Lord
of Merry-Mount.
That worthy looked a little uncomfortable, as he saw the
effect produced by his last sarcasm, but was soon relieved from
what might have proved an embarrassing position, by the worthy
Neegoose, who now thought it necessary to interfere, to prevent
this singular scene from being continued any farther.
What ails thee? valiant brother Standish, said he
advancing
with great solemnity of voice and manner, and endeavoring
to calm the impetuosity of Standish, who was pacing about with
great vehemence  `What ails ye, ye mountains, that ye skip
like rams, and ye little hills, like lambs?' Why art thou so
sorely vexed at the idle and vain buffoonery of him who is little
better than as one of the wicked. Bethink thee of thy own
position, of thine own character, and the dignity of the grave
and reverend magistrates. Forego thy rash intention, and let
not the child of Belial gain advantage over us. I pray thee
conduct thyself rather like a calm and skilful commander than
as a hot-brained man of wrath.
Truly, Master Neegoose, I believe thou art right, answered
Standish, whose wrath was beginning to cool again, almost as
suddenly as it had waxed hot, as he reflected upon the absurdity
of his proceeding, and upon the advantage which he should give
his prisoner, by thus yielding to the dictates of his angry temper.
Truly, thou art right, and I am an ass, a peppery,
uncomfortable
blockhead, thus to be flouted of my humor by the taunts
of a worthless vagabond. Thus rebuking himself as testily as
VOL. II. 4
he had but just now abused his prisoner, the worthy champion
of Plymouth seated himself, by a violent effort, plump upon the
floor again, and lighting a fresh pipe, began to puff so furiously,
that his head was soon enveloped in smoke, and the tempest of
his wrath seemed for a time obscured and overcome by the
clouds compelled from his pipe.
Well, well, said Morton, taking up the thread of his
discourse
,
when he saw that this sudden storm had subsided, and
that the only danger at present to be apprehended from indulging
his license of speech, was merely that the dialogue would prove
a soliloquy  well, as I before had the honor to observe, I
know well the motives of this assault upon me. The plantation
of Merry-Mount is a trifle too flourishing; the beaver trade is a
trifle too successful. Ye of New Plymouth were but bears' whelps
once, and I feared ye not; but ye have grown to be bears
now, (and very gruff and uncomfortable bears ye are too,) and
would eat up all the cakes and honey-combs to be found in
Canaan. I know the cause of your high-handed proceedings,
and I promise ye the star-chamber shall hear of it before I have
done with ye .
Cease, vain man, from thy idle and frivolous discourse,
said Corporal Neegoose, who, observing that the commander of
the party only silently puffed at his pipe with redoubled fury
during the continuance of Morton's disjointed abjuration,
thought it necessary to interpose to check the current of the
prisoner's invective. Let me assure thee, once for all, that
thy conspiracies are all discovered, and it shall go hard but that
the dissolute nest, which thou with vain-glorious folly dost
denominate
thy palace at Merry-Mount, shall be soon levelled to
the ground. Crushed shall it be, even like a nest of hornets,
and its idle and licentious brood of tenants scattered to the
angry winds of heaven. `Moab is my washpot, over Edom will
I cast out my shoe, saith the Lord.' I tell thee, Merry-Mount,
which should be rather termed Mount Dagon, shall be
destroyed
,
it and all that therein dwells. Aye, thou Master of
Misrule, even so hath it been ordained.
You have spoken, Corporal Neegoose, answered Morton,
but whether wisely or not, let the night-owl, whom I hear
screeching just now, decide. As I find, however, that my
conversation
is so little relished, I will even address myself to sleep,
and have accordingly the honor to wish rosy dreams and
peaceful
slumbers to ye all.
No one seemed inclined to oppose this resolution on the part
of the prisoner, which, as the night was already well advanced,
seemed on the contrary a very reasonable one. It was arranged
by the commander that Morton should be placed for greater
security in the inner room, and that Corporal Neegoose should
occupy a part of the old bedstead with him, provided the
prisoner
should choose to avail himself of that luxurious piece of
furniture.
The Lord of Merry-Mount accordingly took up his quarters in
the interior apartment accompanied by the worthy corporal. The
others, including the valiant captain, disposed themselves
according
to their pleasure upon the floor of the outer room, one
of the party stretching himself for additional security across the
outer door.
It was not long before a general concert of discordant and
inharmonious sounds announced that the whole party were fast
asleep, all save the prisoner, who, in his own language,
describing
the occurrence afterwards, was as wakeful as the geese
of the capitol. He had, upon first lying down, affected great
drowsiness, and had taken pains to fall very soundly asleep, in
appearance, before the senses of the corporal were steeped in
forgetfulness; so that the simple-minded functionary, who was
especially charged with the safe-keeping of the prisoner, was
completely disarmed of all suspicion, and resigned himself
tranquilly
to his slumbers almost as soon in reality as Morton had
done in appearance.
Morton lay very quietly for nearly an hour. The night was
already far advanced, and as the days were at the longest, it was
not safe to delay his attempt at escape too long. Much to his
surprise, the weather, so far as he could judge from the faint
glimmering at the window in the other room, seemed tolerably
clear. What had become of the storm which had worn so
threatening an aspect in the afternoon, and which had been so
alarming to the nerves of the subterranean philosopher of
Wessaguscus, did not distinctly appear. Morton had lain there,
reflecting upon a thousand different topics, listening to the
discordant
variety of nasal melody which proceeded from the outer
room, and endeavoring to detect the particular organ of the
heroic Standish amid the general concert, till it seemed to him
that he had been lying there since the creation, or at least since
the discovery of America, and he became at last so nervous and
impatient that he felt the moment was come when he must
absolutely
arise and make the experiment, or else remain there the
whole night through.
A peal of distant thunder now suddenly broke through the
external silence and confirmed him in his intention. The storm
was, after all, coming on, and a sharp squall, with thunder and
lightning, would be sure to make such a pother about the crazy
tenement that the party would be awakened and kept watchful
for the remainder of the night. He determined to arise, but
there were two difficulties which presented themselves at the
outset. In the first place, the dreaming corporal, in the
unconscious
expansiveness of sleep, had wound his arms around
Morton's
neck, and it would be difficult to loosen his hold without
awaking him. In the second place, if he was even fortunate
enough to extricate himself successfully from this iron embrace,
he had to make his way in the dark across the floor of the outer
room, which was, to a certain extent, paved with the upturned
faces of his captors. Of course he dared not strike a light, and
to make his way to the door, which, moreover, he knew to be
barricaded with the body of one of the party, without awakening
any one, seemed a very difficult task.
Truly, muttered he to himself, Master Corporal
Neegoose
,
I could find it in my heart to dispense with these
clinging arms of thine, which, however endearing they may
be to the worthy good wife Neegoose, if such an enviable
female exists, are, just now, most particularly in the way
of your humble servant. By thy leave, then, most evangelical
of corporals, continued he in an inaudible monotone, as
he daintily and dexterously untwisted the hard knot in which
the corporal had tied his bony arms about his neck, without
awakening him, by thy permission, I will even leave thee
to thy chaste and solitary slumbers. Muttering thus, he
groped his way stealthily from the bed as far as the entrance to
the other room, when he paused for a moment upon the
threshold
,
deliberating how he should proceed. It was so dark that
he could only guide himself by the ear, and he was particularly
anxious not to plant his foot upon the face of the sleeping
Standish
,
feeling well assured that if that fiery hero should be
awakened
,
he would, if necessary, stop his further progress with a brace
of bullets, without the smallest hesitation. While he was thus
taking counsel with himself, and wondering how he should be
able to make his way to the outer door without having a more
definite notion of the condition of the floor than he at that
moment
possessed, the scene was suddenly illuminated by a flash of
lightning.
Morton readily took advantage of the circumstance and
rapidly
examined the appearance of the apartment. The single
glance was almost sufficient to dash his hopes to the earth. The
ground was covered with the prostrate forms of his captors, all of
4*
them, however, wrapped in deep slumber, while the redoubtable
leader of the expedition had established himself in a sitting
posture
against the door, flanked upon either side by a grim and
substantial man-at-arms. As for the solitary window, it was so
very small, besides being at such a distance from the ground,
that there was not the slightest possibility of retreat in that
direction.
By Jupiter, these be stubborn impediments, muttered the
Lord of Merry-Mount, to himself, as he stood in a contemplative
and somewhat discomfited mood upon the threshold of the outer
apartment. Though this crazy old shell of a fort be not so
strong as London Tower, yet it will do, after all, to hold in
durance vile even as eminent a state criminal as the Prince of
Passanogessit. Truly do I seem like a very reckless old rat who
has allowed himself to be caught in a mouldy trap, but one
which will hold him tightly in spite of his grimaces. I could
take it as a particular and personal favor, now, if the earth
would but open and swallow me up at once.
There appearing to be no immediate signs of any such
catastrophe
,
Morton was obliged to bethink himself of some other
means of relief. As the storm was evidently coming on apace,
and as it was likely that the sleepers would soon be startled by
the crash of the elements, he thought he might as well relinquish
his efforts at escape, for the present at least, and he accordingly
was about returning to the embraces of Corporal Neegoose, when
another and still more vivid flash of lightning afforded him
another opportunity of examining the scene of action. At the
instant when the room was thus illuminated, his eyes happened
to be turned towards the ceiling, in which, as will be
remembered
,
a considerable rent had been made by the falling of the
chimney. He had already rejected the idea of escape through
that aperture, which, although it was larger than the window,
and in fact of sufficient dimensions to admit of the passage of
his body with some little compression, was at so hopeless a
height from the floor, as to be altogether out of his reach. At
the moment when the lightning illuminated the gloom around
him, his eyes were accidentally fixed upon the ceiling. Was he
deceived by a too sanguine imagination, or did he really at that
instant behold a means of unexpected and easy escape? Either
a phantom of his brain was deluding his senses, or else he had
seen a rope dangling from the roof, and reaching nearly to the
floor. The flash was past, however, in the same instant, and all
was darkness again.
Fair and softly, said he to himself, as he stood pondering
for a moment in the same position which he had retained since
he left his couch, fair and softly; yonder slender and waving
line, which the lightning hath revealed to me, looked very like a
good honest hempen rope, but it may after all be but the
counterfeit
presentiment, the phantasma of a rope. If it should prove
but an airy picture, a fanciful figment of my heated brai, why
truly I fear 't will be of foul augury. A rope, the ghost of a
rope, faugh, this savors too strongly of a certain leafless tree
which bears human fruit. Why, precisely at this moment,
should the fantastic vision of a rope's end present itself? They
lie in their throats, these slanderous Puritans, who seek again to
crush me to the earth with their accusation of foul crimes in
England, of which they know me innocent. They would send
me home, would they, again to be badgered and worried by a
pack of yelling curs? I know the mouths of the blood-thirsty
hell-hounds are slavering at the thought that they are sending
me home to a gibbet. But they lie in their throats, and .
As Morton muttered these exclamations with more earnestness
and passion than was usual with him, there came another flash
of lightning, which again revealed to him the appearance of the
mysterious rope. Moving almost as quickly as the flash, and
dexterously avoiding, as he dashed forward, the upturned faces
and prostrate forms of his captors, his hand had already securely
clutched the rope before the darkness had again enveloped him.
Giving it a desperate pull with all his might, to ascertain whether
it was a real, substantial cord, capable of sustaining his weight
and assisting him in his escape, or only a spiritual noose to
entangle
him in some new and indefinite embarrassment, he soon
decided that it was indeed as honest and material a rope's end
as was ever twisted. Without more ado, and waiting for no
more illumination of any kind, he climbed rapidly and with
uncommon
agility to the roof, coiled himself through the narrow
aperture like a serpent, and then crouched for a moment till
another flash should show him the proper means of descending,
without breaking limbs or neck. While he was thus hesitating,
he heard a low, hoarse voice directly below him.
Hist, hist, Master Morton, said the voice, knowest
thou me not?
Faith, answered Morton, he must have good eyes that
knoweth his oldest friend in such a pitchy atmosphere as this.
Still, if I mistake not, thou shouldst be my subterranean
philosopher
of Wessaguscus, he who smelleth the thunder when it is
brewing, even in the bowels of the earth.
Thou diddest me a kindness once, said the voice.
Exactly so, answered Morton. I could have sworn it
was thou. By Jupiter Diespiter, thou hast requited it a
thousand-fold
,
and if I reward not thy grateful heart, if fortune do but
extricate me from my present dilemma, I wish I might be choked
in the very rope which thy disinterested benevolence hath
furnished
me with. Verily, I have not found such gratitude, no,
not in Israel. But, how shall I get down to thee, my fine
fellow
?
Feel for the hickory bough, Master Morton, it will bear thy
weight.
So instructed, Morton groped cautiously about, moving very
gingerly along the crazy roof of the edifice, which, having
been originally constructed for a fort, was unfortunately of a
much greater elevation than most of the rude dwellings of that
day. Feeling that a broken leg or a dislocated ankle would
hardly expedite him in his nocturnal march, Morton conducted
himself so warily, that it was long before he found, at the
extremity
of the building, a long hickory branch, extending almost
to the roof-tree. Grasping it, as soon as it was found, and
trusting implicitly to the counsels of his enigmatical friend,
he swung himself boldly out into the darkness. The branch
yielded gently with his weight, and he felt himself descending
till he knew he must be very near the ground. When the branch
would bend no more, he relinquished his hold, and dropped
easily upon the ground.
As soon as he found himself fairly out of his prison, he cast a
rapid and anxious glance around him. The darkness was not
so intense as it had first appeared, or else there was something
of the extraordinary and preternatural light returning, which
had so strongly arrested his attention upon the previous
evening
.
At any rate, the outlines of the landscape, the dusky
figure of the dismantled fort, the dim and portentous forms of
the gigantic trees, were visible, and he even fancied that he saw
the faint and shadowy appearance of his mysterious friend
creeping stealthily out from beneath the shadow of the hickory.
Hillo, hillo, sweet philosopher, said he in a shrill whisper,
is that thine own worthy self, which I behold stealing from the
bushes?
I am glad you have escaped from the mighty man of wrath,
said the other, creeping close up to him; pray Heaven, the
plague be not let loose for this.
Poh, poh, a fico for the plague, answered Morton, gaily;
and now listen to me, my good fellow. If I do not warmly
urge thee to accompany me this night to our poor palace of
Merry-Mount, 't is because I am somewhat out of suits with
fortune, myself, just now, and because my patronage would be
like to prove but a small blessing, seeing that although I have,
by thy most opportune assistance, eluded the grasp of my
pursuers this night, I may yet momentarily expect that the
attack will be renewed upon me, even in my stronghold. Thou
wilt return to thy subterranean receptacle, that is to say, thou
wilt burrow in thy hole again this night, I suppose.
I shall go back to my den, answered the other, shuddering,
but alas! Abamoko is fearful, my flesh will be torn with
red-hot
pincers. Did not I tell you that I smelt the thunder
coming?
Well, no matter about Abamoko and his pincers just now,
replied Morton; I must be off, and that speedily, but before I go,
let me say thus much. These matters will blow over ere long,
at least I hope so, and then, if thou wilt but accept my offer, I
promise thee a place of honor and profit at Merry-Mount, to be
followed up by still more substantial favor, when certain projects,
which the wise ones wot of, shall have ripened into fulfilment.
In the mean time, and as an earnest of my good intentions, take
this, my fine fellow. We have not yet discovered a gold mine at
Passanogessit, nor hast thou, with all thy thunder-smelling
propensities
,
discovered the philosopher's stone, or I am mistaken.
Therefore, take these few poor pieces, and come to me when the
storm is over. Good-night my good fellow, I have a longer
tramp before me than thou hast, and the nights be short.
So saying, Morton slipped a few pieces of money, the only
ones which he had with him, into his companion's hand. The
philosopher received them mechanically, and stood stock-still
for an instant. Suddenly, as he jingled the pieces, a thought
seemed to electrify him. He uttered a shrill laugh, jumped
high into the air, and clapped his hands in a paroxysm of
delight, quite extraordinary and wholly unwarranted by the
circumstances
.
Ho, ho, ho, he cried; ho, ho, ho, solid silver! crosses of
solid silver. No more digging, no more pinching, no more hot
irons. Ho, ho, ho! a fig for Abamoko!
With this highly intelligible ebullition of triumph and
gratitude
,
which was certainly not justified by the magnitude of the
present which he received, the wild man again sprang high in
the air, and then dashed off at full speed into the darkness.
The shrill wizard laugh was wafted fitfully back from the gloom
which had suddenly, as it were, ingulphed him, and was caught
up by the echoing hills and reverberated through the mirky and
savage silence, till it seemed to Morton as if a thousand
invisible
demons of the wilderness were mocking him in the darkness.
Suddenly there was a stir in the fort. Morton, who had only
advanced a few rods in the opposite direction from that in which
his mysterious friend had disappeared, crouched under a tree,
and strained his eyes anxiously through the darkness. There
was a confused and noisy trampling in the house. Suddenly a
light was struck. At the same instant, a gun was discharged at
a little distance from the house, then another, and another.
Then through the light, which streamed from the solitary
window, Morton could distinctly perceive the forms of his late
captors issuing from the house, and rushing madly with many
confused and angry cries, in the direction of the fugitive. He
had evidently been heard and seen in his moment of triumph,
and had as plainly been mistaken for Morton himself. Shot
after shot was fired, but without success, for, after the last
discharge had died upon his ear, he still heard, above all other
sounds, the ringing, wizard laugh, sounding more and more
faintly in the distance, and repeated by the echoes in still more
ghostlike and fantastic tones  Ho, ho, ho!
CHAPTER III.
THE HURRICANE.
This
accidental diversion in Morton's favor was fortunate.
The pursuers, having started off in the darkness upon a wrong
scent, would hardly discover their mistake in time to molest him
during the next few hours. He accordingly hoped to gain
sufficient
time to enable him to reach Merry-Mount and fortify
himself
there, before the enemy should besiege his stronghold. He
was at that moment some eight or ten miles distant from his
home, because it was necessary for him to go considerably about,
to cross the head of the Monatoquit River, which separated the
plantation of Wessaguscus from that of Passanogessit. He stood
upon the edge of the plain, and was just starting upon his tramp
through the forest, when his attention was arrested by the
extraordinary
appearance of the atmosphere.
We have already noticed the singular illumination of the
heavens a little after sunset. This remarkable brilliancy had
now returned at the dead of night, and a large portion of the
upper sky was covered with yellowish vapor, which emitted a
wild and sickly glare, contrasting strangely with the pitchy
darkness which had for the last hour or two enveloped the
scene. The thunder still rolled, and the lightning flashed at
intervals, but not a drop of rain fell from the clouds, and it
seemed as if the parched and arid earth had absorbed so much
of the fierce sunshine which had prevailed for many days, that it
repelled and dissipated the gathering moisture in the clouds.
Whether the storm had spent its fury in other directions, or
whether it was still brooding and impending in the distance,
seemed doubtful; but there was something in the calm and lurid
atmosphere, something nameless and indefinable, which inspired
sensations of awe. It was so death-like a calm, that not a single
leaf quivered upon the poplars. The crackling of a dried twig,
under Morton's foot, sounded like the report of a fire-arm. He
still stood upon the plain which we have described, upon which
grew here and there several gigantic oaks and chestnuts, and
had advanced nearly to the edge of the forest which surrounded
the clearing. He had paused, bewildered by the extraordinary
light which had so suddenly returned. He was at first inclined
to believe that the woods had taken fire, but there was neither
smoke nor any other indication of such an event. Moreover, the
total disappearance of the phenomenon for some hours, with its
sudden and startling recurrence, both forbade the idea of a
conflagration
.
Suddenly the breathless silence was broken by a
distant, rushing sound, as if the air were swept by myriads of
invisible wings. The volume of sound increased fearfully every
second, and now the forest roared as if the ocean had burst its
bounds, and were sweeping over the land. The unnatural light
glared still more fitfully upon the scene, and as the hardy
Morton
looked with terrified eyes around, he saw the mighty wood
fluttering, writhing and tossing its myriad arms madly for a
moment. In that single moment, ten thousand trees were
whirled from their roots, and dashed to the earth, before his eyes.
There was a short, wild crash, as these forest giants, which had
braved the storms of centuries, fell before the furious blast, and
at the next instant, the whole forest bent flat to the earth, like a
field of waving grass, as the hurricane careered over it in its
majesty. The thunder-cloud, which had so long delayed its
coming, now sailed up from its resting-place with fearful velocity,
obscuring with its black wings the preternatural glare, and then
VOL. II. 5
descended with sudden swoop upon the earth. The rain fell in
floods, the inky blackness of the air was pierced incessantly by
the arrowy lightning. The thunder crashed above and around in
one unbroken roar. No breathless interval between the flash and
the bolt, whispered of any slight removal of the dreadful artillery
of heaven. The rattling thunder rode upon the lightning's
wings. Peal followed flash, and flash succeeded peal, in
ceaseless
and fearful succession.
At the instant of the hurricane, Morton had thrown himself
flat upon the earth. As he prostrated himself, he saw a solitary
and gigantic chestnut tree, which stood near him upon the plain,
flying through the air like a feather, its ponderous trunk snapped
like a last year's reed. The next instant a thunderbolt shivered
a mighty oak which stood by itself within ten yards of him, and
during the breathless moments which succeeded, as he lay with
his face upon the ground, the rain pouring like a cataract, it
seemed as if the earth must be powerless to absorb the
thunder-bolts
,
which fell incessantly around him.
How long he lay in this condition, he knew not. The
moments
seemed ages, in that fearful convulsion of the elements;
but the summer tempest was soon over. The hurricane was brief
as it had been terrific, and it was soon extinguished, as it were,
by the floods of rain, which were still falling.
In half an hour, the violence of the storm had abated. The
lightning still glared, and the thunder rolled in the distance,
but the clouds were broken, and a star or two glimmered faintly
through the rifts of the tempest. Morton aroused himself at last
from his recumbent position, and looked ruefully around. The
storm had subsided, but the night was dark, and his journey was
likely to be obstructed by the multitudes of fallen trees.
Well, well, said he to himself, the elemental pother is
over, and, as far as I can judge, am I neither blown into the sea,
nor blasted by lightning, nor ignobly drowned in a puddle, which
seemed latterly most like to be my fate.
`Jupiter Diespiter!
Igni corusco nubila dividens!'
Ah Flaccus, Flaccus! what boots it that I strive to soothe my
ear with the limpid gurgling of thy verse, when the howling
hurricane and the wrathful Shrimp, both raging through the
gloomy forests, have filled my soul with discord? Farewell,
Flaccus
,
for the present, and farewell, ye bowers of Wessaguscus!
With this the undaunted Morton set forth resolutely upon his
journey. The atmosphere grew lighter as he advanced, and
revealed to him the ravages of the tempest. Vast trunks of
prostrate
trees, upturned roots, and ponderous, broken, interwoven
branches, obstructed his passage at every step. Still on he toiled
manfully and patiently. In an hour and a half he had emerged
from the forest, and found himself engaged in passing a vast and
gloomy swamp. The earth quaked beneath his feet as he
struggled
on, springing from one tufted hammock to another, and in
danger every moment of being swallowed up in the black,
yielding
ooze, whose treacherous nature had been aggravated by the
deluge of rain which had been falling. Still, with the
adroitness
and knowledge of woodcraft which he possessed, he was
enabled to escape from this, as well as from the other dangers
which beset his course. He reached the sources of the
Monatoquit
.
As he had anticipated, the slender stream was swollen
into a torrent, but he found, to his gratification, that a large tree
had been torn up by its roots in the whirlwind, and thrown
directly across the boiling flood. Across this natural bridge he
nimbly made his way, and again dashed into the forest. On he
sped, the distant lightning ever and anon flashing across and
illuminating his path, and assisting him in threading his difficult
passage through the tangled and tempest-riven woods. Day was
already faintly glimmering in the east, as the exhausted Morton
at last reached the outer barricade of Merry-Mount. The gate
was heavily and carefully barred; but the faithful Bootefish,
attentive to his master's signal, although, of course, as drunk as
usual, hastened to admit him. Morton ordered him to make all
secure against an impending attack, and to awaken him in two
hours. He then plunged into the palace, threw himself, all
smoking and reeking as he was, upon a bear-skin, and fell
instantly
into a profound slumber.
CHAPTER IV.
THE SIEGE OF MERRY-MOUNT.
The
only inhabitants of Merry-Mount, at that moment, were
Bootefish and the Canary Bird. The other retainers and
vagabonds
,
who composed its ordinary population, had gone up into
the interior of the country, to trade with the Indians, and to
supply themselves with beaver. As for Henry Maudsley, he had
some time before become disgusted with the ribaldry which
prevailed
at the palace, and had abandoned entirely the temporary
residence which he had established there. Although, as we
shall have soon occasion to narrate, he still lingered in New
England; there had been for some time very little sympathy
or communication between him and the Lord of Merry-Mount.
Bootefish bustled about, during the brief slumber of his chief,
with a good deal of importance and alacrity, making prompt and
efficient provision for the approaching siege. There was a
goodly store of matchlocks, and plenty of ammunition in the
palace, which he now was busily employed in arranging, feebly
assisted by the Canary Bird, who seemed that morning to have
grown considerably more yellow of hue, at the same time that
he had lost a good deal of the blithe and chirping vivacity which
usually distinguished him.
There were three small apertures in the outward palisade,
which inclosed the buildings at Merry-Mount, which had been
intended for three murtherers or small cannon, which had never
been mounted, but which Bootefish knew to be lying somewhere
about the precincts. After considerable delay, he at last
was fortunate enough to find them, and, with great exertion,
5*
succeeded, with the aid of Doryfall, in placing them in their
destined position.
The responsibility, which had been cast upon him, had for
the moment dissipated the drunkenness of the heroic chief
butler
,
and, as is usual with all truly great men, his genius seemed
to rise in proportion to the emergencies of his situation. He
never seemed more calm and self-collected than in this hour, so
big with the destinies of Merry-Mount.
Here be twelve good snaphances, Master Canary Bird, said
he, complacently, addressing his lieutenant, and not observing
the very rueful expression of the little man's face, twelve
snaphances
,
three murtherers, and one hundred pounds of good dry
powder, besides a goodly heap of bullets of all sizes. By the
beard of my father, methinks 't is enough to blow these bloody
Puritans sky high; confusion upon the damnable croppies,
Bernaby
!
Here, pledge me the same.
Confusion to the croppies, gasped Bernaby, after
swallowing
eagerly a mighty draught of the potent liquid offered to him,
with the desperate intention of inflaming his courage, which was
growing rapidly torpid  confusion to the croppies, Robin
Bootefish! Marry and amen.
Right, Bernaby!  but I wish thou wouldst get a little
color in those parchment cheeks of thine. Look at me, man!
Seest thou aught of the lily in my countenance? cried the
worthy butler, turning full upon his companion a face like the
rising sun of midsummer.
Truly, no, good Robin, and I could wish there were twenty
like thee at Merry-Mount. Alas! we be, after all, but three.
An' we had swashing Numps Rednape now, or Dick Shorthose,
or even Peter Cakebread, with his damnably ugly face, methinks
't would be more comforting. Besides, 't is a pity that we two
should gain all the glory of a triumph over Captain Standish. Is
it not so, Master Butler?
Fire and fagots, no! roared Bootefish, we two, led on
by the worthy Lord of Merry-Mount, are enough to toss an army
of psalm-singers into the sea. Humphrey Rednape be damned,
for a brawling, blustering bully; as for Peter Cakebread, I had
rather than forty shillings that he were here, that thine own
cowardice might be fairly scared out of thee, as thou witnessed
the scurvy shifts which the old baboon would be put to, to
escape the dangers which might beset him. But by the Lord!
while I am talking thus the moments are passing. 'T is time
to call the master.
Quite time, I should say, worthy Robin, said the gay voice
of Morton, who suddenly joined them, looking as fresh and jovial
as ever, having found time, since arousing himself from his
brief slumber to exchange his soiled and way-worn habiliments,
and to array himself, as he said, in becoming costume to greet
the distinguished visitor whom he was expecting  Quite time,
I assure thee, Robin, but, luckily, I do not depend upon the
larum of thy tongue, to tell me when to rise when danger is
nigh. I see thou hast completed thy preparations, for I have
already been the rounds, and I commend thee therefor. I do
not so highly commend thy present employment. 'T is not now
the `
tempus dapibus
.' The sun is half an hour high, and thou
must even defer the rest of thy potations, till we meet when all
is over to pour out our libations upon the altar of victory. For
the present, sobriety and decorum are most befitting.
And prithee, your worship, how knowest thou of the
approach
of Captain Standish? How knowest thou whether he be
not even now at New Plymouth? asked the butler.
From the very best authority, worthy Master Robin,
answered
Morton, I feel quite sure that Captain Miles Standish
hath already left New Plymouth, and is even now upon his way
to invade Thomas Morton of Merry-Mount.
And prithee, if I might ask, for there have been many idle
rumors floating about this expedition of late  prithee, who hath
told thee this?
No less a person, honest Robin, than the aforesaid Captain
Miles Standish himself, answered Morton.
Captain Miles Standish! echoed the honest butler, perfectly
astounded at this piece of intelligence, which his sovereign so
flippantly conveyed to him  Captain Miles Standish!  and
how, I pray thee, good Master, in the name of Satan, hast thou
happened in his company, and how
And how in the name of Beelzebub have I happened out
of his company when once in it? thou wouldst say, interrupted
Morton. 'T is a long story, and must be reserved in all
its details to some more quiet opportunity. Suffice for the
moment that the heroic Shrimp circumvented me by stratagem
at Wessaguscus.
And how, I prithee, didst thou so wittily circumvent
him?
cried Bootefish.
I tell thee thou shalt know all in good time, Robin,
answered
Morton; but let it suffice thee now, that I have reached
my palace in safety. But in faith, thou shouldst have seen them
butting their heads against each other in the dark, like drunken
rams, and outbellowing the thunder in their rage, when they
found their prisoner gone. As for the heroic Shrimp, trust me,
he tore his leather jerkin for spite, and Corporal Neegoose, even
the venerable Abraham, in whose bosom I had slept, would have
torn the very hair from his head for vexation, had it not been
too short to lay hold of.
[1]
[1]
See Note VI.
But no more of this. To the look-out,
Bernaby, and tell me what thou seest.
At this moment there was a loud knocking at the outer gate.
Bootefish, at a nod from his master, advanced to the palisades,
and reconnoitred the supposed enemy through a narrow lookout.
'T is a red-skin, said Bootefish, returning-to his master.
A red-skin! then by my life 't is no enemy, I'll be sworn,
exclaimed Morton. To him again, Robin, and learn his
errand.
Bootefish again advanced to the palisade, held a short parley
with the savage, which was inaudible to the others, and then,
after the lapse of a few minutes, returned to his sovereign.
'T is a red-skin from Wessaguscus, said he, and one
who wishes well to the Master of Merry-Mount. He hath been
informed by a white man, who sojourneth in that neighborhood,
that Captain Miles Standish is even now upon his way to
Merry-Mount
,
having set sail with his followers in his pinnace after the
tempest of last night had abated. Fortunately, the wind hath
been wondrous light, or the mighty man would have been here
before the friendly scout.
Admit the scout, Robin, he will be one more man-at-arms
for our feeble garrison, said Morton.
Truly your worship, answered Bootefish, he utterly
declined
all invitation to that effect, although it was warmly
extended to him by your unworthy precentor. He had promised
to deliver the message sent by the white man of Wessaguscus,
and having accomplished his errand, he hath vanished into the
bushes.
My life for it, this is another friendly office on the part of
my subterranean philosopher. But thou knowest not my gem of
sages, said Morton, the solitary subterranean of Wessaguscus,
who
Sail, ho! cried the Canary Bird from his perch.
The devil! ejaculated Morton, suddenly interrupting
himself
and mounting with wonderful rapidity to the lookout, in
order to survey the scene for himself.
After straining his eyes for a few seconds into the clear blue
distance, he became convinced that the white sail which was
first visible upon the edge of the horizon could be nothing else
than the pinnace of Standish.
Truly, the Philistines be upon us, cried he to Bootefish,
and the tug of war approacheth. Look again to the barricades
and see that the murtherers are in fit condition to do their duty.
We shall have warmer work than hath been often seen at
Merry-Mount
.
'T is all in readiness, your worship, hiccupped the butler,
whom matutinal potations, added to the excitement of his
preparations
,
had now rendered magnificently drunk. All is
in readiness to receive the damnable brawlers of New Plymouth.
Down with the profane despisers of our holy liturgy! Down
with the bloody separatists! All is ready for them, your honor.
All right, Robin, said the sovereign, descending from his
watch-tower and setting himself busily to work to examine the
arms and ammunition of the little fortress; all very right, but
I wish thou wert not always so cursedly drunk when thy sobriety
would be worth its weight in gold to thy master. What a
piece of ill luck it is, too, that my garrison should be so feeble
just at this moment
We are enough, your worship, roared Bootefish; enough
and more than enough to swallow every one of the rascals. I
pledge myself, I, Robin Bootefish, precentor and clerk of
Merry-Mount
,
pledge myself to chop them all into mince-meat, and
stuff sausages with them for your worship's breakfast.
Confusion
to the drunken Puritans, your honor, and
Tush, Robin, interrupted Morton. I like thy spirit, but
I cannot commend this braggadocio of thine. And, by the way,
what hath become of your other man-at-arms, the stalwart Canary
Bird? Go seek him out, Robin, for 't is time to muster our
garrison
.
Certainly, certainly, hiccupped the butler. 'T is proper
that the garrison should be mustered. But your worship should
know that this Canary Bird is a drunken knave, and what is
more, a scurvy coward. I will look for him, your worship, but
I pledge myself that I shall find him creeping into a rat-hole, or
the bung of an empty ale-butt, to escape the
So saying, the valiant butler staggered off, and after an
absence of a few minutes, returned, leading along, by the ear,
the recreant Doryfall, who, as he had rightly conjectured, had
been found stowed away in the cellar among the empty casks.
Here be the Canary Bird, your worship, cried Bootefish,
marvellously ill of the pip I assure ye, and ready to moult all
his feathers, white as well as yellow. Here, my good fellow,
he continued, extending his flask to the trembling Canary Bird,
take another drop. Why, thou lily-livered, ague-shaking
mountebank, what ails thee, then, that thou swallowest not thy
liquor?
'T is nothing, murmured the unlucky Canary Bird, in a
feeble voice, and utterly unable to swallow the proffered libation.
I have a slight touch of the lockjaw. My aunt was a martyr
to it.
Your worship sees, said Bootefish, turning away from the
cowardly Canary Bird with an expression of profound disgust
upon his countenance, your worship sees that there is no
dependence
to be placed upon this creature. Put not your trust
in Canary Birds, saith the wise man. No matter, your worship,
we two are enough to carbanado all the Puritans of Plymouth.
I pledge myself, your worship
Enough of thy pledges, honest Robin, interrupted
Morton
,
and do me the kindness to ascend once more to the
lookout
,
for I believe that our unfortunate friend here might as well
return to the cellarage; he is not even fit to serve as a warder.
Go to the lookout, and that instantly. Death and damnation!
he continued, as the drunken butler, after pompously staggering
towards the ladder which led to the lookout, fairly rolled over
upon the ground, as he attempted to ascend. By Jupiter
Diespiter! here is my garrison reduced to myself. Why,
Bootefish, thou drunken lobster, art thou really deserting me in
my utmost need? Why, thou miserable, pot valiant, human
hogshead, thou
Fair and softly, fair and softly, hiccupped the butler, as he
slowly assumed a sitting posture at the foot of the ladder. Fair
and softly, your worship. Good words are due to the future
bishop of Massachusetts. Ceremony is a proper thing, even
from a sovereign to his subjects. I was born to be an usher, a
genteel usher. Your worship shall see the genteel ceremony
with which I will receive the bloody-minded Puritans. Down
with the accursed Brownists! Cherish piety  piety and
ceremony
.
A curse upon all Canary Birds, and a fig for Miles
Standish. With these disjointed ejaculations, the heroic
Bootefish
fell into a profound lethargy.
Morton, stepping lighly over his prostrate carcase, now hastily
ascended his watch-tower. As he reached the summit, he saw
that the pinnace of Miles Standish had already cast anchor
under the cliff, and that the party who had captured him the
night before were disembarking upon the beach.
By the Lord, cried he to Doryfall, who still stood the
image of mute dismay near the base of the tower  by the
Lord, the invincible armada hath arrived at last. By Jupiter, the
odds are something heavy, nine to one as I count them, for of my
garrison of two, one is drunk with fear and the other with liquor.
O, thou heroic and most truculent of Puritan captains, am I to
fall into thy hands after all? O, Miles, Miles! thou lengthy
brevity, thou gigantic pigmy, thou confounder of dimensions!
O, thou, who art Miles in name, leagues in valor, and but a few
paltry inches in stature, why the plague could not the plague
have swallowed thee in England, when thou didst so manfully
brave its fury, and why, O why did it spare thee to plague me
here with thy fury, in New England?
As Morton thus soliloquized, the invading party had all
disembarked
upon the beach, where they remained stationary, and
seemed to be listening to the orders of their commander.
There they are, every one of them. I can see them all
the captain, the centurion, the corporal, Standish, Abraham
Neegoose, and all the rest of them. `
Antimachumque,
Helimumque
,
Securiferumque, Pyracmon
.' O, Miles! why could not
the ferocious Pecksuot have sent an arrow through thy jerkin?
So should I have been saved the trouble, and the whole of New
England the expense, of this tremendous invasion.
Morton's soliloquy was now cut short. The party upon the
beach began to move, and the sovereign of Merry-Mount hastily
descended from his elevated position, to prepare for their
reception
.
He was now, unfortunately, in solitary grandeur, for the
Canary Bird had taken advantage of his master's temporary
abstraction to again effect his escape into some unknown
hiding-place
,
and the butler being in a hopelessly lethargic condition,
there was none left but himself to defend his castle.
Morton now took one more hasty survey of his artillery and
ammunition, and then arming himself with a snaphance, he
stationed himself at one of the little apertures which had been
left in the palisade, and reconnoitred the enemy as they
advanced.
In a few minutes, the whole party, with their commander at
their head, had arrived within fifty yards of the palisade.
Morton now hesitated as to the course which he was to
pursue. If he had not been entirely alone, if only two or three
faithful followers had been at his side, it would have been
perfectly easy for him to have defended his castle against the
present invasion. It was now, however, evident that the
palisade was to be attacked upon two or three points at once,
for he already observed that three of the party were detailed in
an opposite direction. It would have been easy for him, as he
VOL. II. 6
stood there at the embrasure, to have taken deliberate aim at
Standish, and have picked him off at the head of his company.
It would have been easy for him to have fired one raking shot
with the murtherer, which would have inflicted serious damage,
although the nature of the ground, and the clumsiness of his
field-pieces, rendered the result of such a cannonade very
doubtful. At all events, it was not likely that he could destroy
the whole of his assailants with his single arm, nor defend his
place against a desperate attack for any considerable length of
time. Had the Canary Bird but been a little less
chicken-hearted
,
or the butler a little more abstemious, it would have
been possible for him, perhaps, to have beaten off his assailants,
but alone as he was, the attempt seemed almost hopeless. His
palisades were weak and easily broken through, and it was
entirely out of his power to defend them at more than one point
at a time. Moreover, if his adversaries should become inflamed
by obstinate resistance upon his part, the terms of his final
surrender,  and to that under the circumstances he felt that he
must come at last,  would be more disadvantageous, particularly
if any of them should suffer loss of life or limb in the attack,
than perhaps might now be secured by diplomacy.
While Morton was thus holding council with himself, the
valiant Standish had advanced still nearer to the palisade. At
that moment the life of the Plymouth hero hung by a hair.
Morton covered him deliberately with his piece, the barrel of
which he thrust through the embrasure, and for an instant's
space, he was inclined to yield to the promptings of the busy
devil within him. After all, it would have been but an
act of self-defence. The invaders of his domicile were
attacking
him without the slightest shadow of legitimate authority
derived from any source under heavens. The principles of
natural law, all authorized him to defend himself and his castle
by every means in his power. At the same time there was
something in the manly bearing of Standish, that forcibly
appealed to the generous part of Morton's nature. Small was
the love which the Lord of Merry-Mount bore to the champion
of the Puritans, and still his soul revolted at the thought of
slaying the gallant soldier like a dog in a ditch. And yet he
had himself, within the last fifteen hours, suffered insult,
reproach, ignominy, at that gallant soldier's hands. He had
been treated like a base cur, bound, handcuffed, outraged,
degraded, and all this he felt without cause, and without right,
except the right of brutal violence. The man who had most
vilified, persecuted, and insulted him, by whom he had been
entrapped in the forest, caged, tormented, and, after his escape,
hunted down to his lair as if he had been a wolf, that man stood
now within a few yards of the muzzle of his gun. A motion of
his finger, and the vanquisher of Wittewamutt, the heroic
champion of the Puritans, the terror of all the savage tenants of
New England, was sent to his long account.
All these conflicting thoughts rushed rapidly through Morton's
brain. Generosity united with prudence finally triumphed over
the desire of vengeance. His character was more politic than
desperate; and as he reflected how infinitely complicated and
disastrous would be his relations with the settlers, should his
hands be stained with the blood of Standish, even if, as was
most unlikely, his grim companions in arms should leave his
death unrevenged a single hour, he relinquished his first and
deadly purpose.
During the infinitely small fragment of time, during which
his life had been thus rapidly but minutely weighed in the
balance of Morton's mind, Miles Standish had advanced very
near to the palisade, closely followed by Corporal Neegoose and
four of the men-at-arms.
Thomas Morton, he cried at last, by authority of powers
committed to me by all the planters of New England combined,
I summon thee presently to surrender thyself, without further
delay, into my hands.
Faith, answered Morton from the embrasure, the
courtesy
I have so recently experienced at thy hands, when my evil
genius led me unwittingly into thy clutches, hath inspired me
with small relish for a further continuance of thy acquaintance.
Retire, Captain Standish, or I shall most assuredly do thee to
death where thou standest. `
Verbum sapienti
'  thou knowest
the proverb. Retire, or I will knock thee down like a moose.
Fire, if thou darest, replied Standish, without blenching,
although the muzzle of Morton's matchlock still pointed full at
his breast; fire, if thou darest, my death will avail thee nothing.
If thou wouldst have another murder upon thy guilty hands, do
as thou threatenest.
'T is a calumnious lie, shouted Morton, stung by this
insult
into renewed passion. I marvel much, that a gentleman
and soldier, like thyself, Captain Standish, can stoop so low as
not only to wear the livery and obey the commands, but even to
repeat the falsehoods of these base-born curs. But I will not be
fretted out of my reason, and moreover
Master Morton, interrupted Standish, in a peremptory
tone, this parley hath lasted till I am weary. In one word,
wilt thou surrender at discretion, or shall I use violence?
Choose, and that instantly, for I swear to thee by the God of
Jacob, that my orders shall be executed without a moment's
further delay.
Morton was a prudent and politic man. During the interval
which had elapsed since the first arrival of the pinnace, sufficient
opportunity had been afforded him for reflection upon his
position
.
Even when giving way to an explosion of passion, his
reason was by no means clouded, but he had the wit to preserve
a method, even in his rage. He had been, throughout the whole
interview with Standish, collected, if not cool. He had
reflected
upon all the probable consequences of his action, even
while his matchlock pointed at the heart of Standish; he had
reflected, during the brief parley, upon his future prospects, even
while apparently yielding to a tempest of passion, and he had at
last arrived at the conclusion, that all the golden visions which
had solaced his exile, and to convert which into reality had been
the cherished object of years, must inevitably be dispelled, did
he not extricate himself skilfully from the dilemma in which he
found himself. He was sure, at all events, to fall into the hands
of his enemies, for to resist single-handed the present invasion,
was but fool-hardy. It was only the part of a desperate man to
sell his life dearly, and to defend himself to the last. His
situation
was not yet desperate, but with the blood of Standish, or
that of any of his followers, upon his hands, it would be utterly
hopeless. On the other hand, if he surrendered himself into the
hands of Standish, the worst result which he anticipated was a
voyage to England. Under the present complication of
circumstances
,
he felt that more was to be gained than lost by such an
event. There was much in the recent history of his affairs that
might be handled by him with advantage, to circumvent the
projects of the new planters of New England. An immediate
interview with Sir Ferdinando Gorges would be of service at
the present juncture, in forwarding the enterprise of Sir
Christopher
Gardiner, upon the success of which depended the
fulfilment
of his own schemes.
Revolving these matters rapidly in his mind, and giving one
despairing glance at the motionless carcase of the chief butler,
he at last resolved to surrender. Within less than one minute
after Standish had uttered his last peremptory demand, Morton
called to him, through the embrasure, in a voice which had
resumed all its native gaiety,
As the result of the present parley, the garrison of this
fortress is disposed to capitulate. The general of the besieging
forces will please to propose his terms.
6*
Master Morton, replied Captain Standish, I have neither
time nor taste for buffoonery. Thou wilt forthwith unbar thy
gate, or I shall give my signal at once for an attack.
The garrison, continued Morton, with much magnificence
of manner, the garrison, to save the effusion of blood, and to
preserve many valuable lives, doth consent to capitulate; but it
demands to go forth with all the honors of war.
With the honors of a halter, roared the choleric Standish,
nettled by Morton's effrontery. Unbar the gates instantly, or
I swear to thee by
Swear not at all, most waspish of warriors, interrupted
Morton, for lo, am I not already obeying the behests of the cruel
conqueror? Surely, it is legitimate for the commander of the
garrison, in the present state of the siege, to whisper a word or
two touching the terms of his surrender. I require, therefore, a
pledge from the besieging general, that no violence shall be
offered to me, or to any of my garrison; and that, furthermore,
my flag shall be saluted by my garrison, after it is struck. Do
you assent to these conditions?
Corporal Neegoose, shouted Standish, in a tempest of rage,
I delay no longer. At the word of command, the corporal
and the men-at-arms rushed after their commander, in a furious
assault upon the gate; while, at the same instant, at a concerted
signal, the party upon the opposite side were already about to
attempt a breach in the palisade with their partisans. At the
instant of the attack, Morton quietly and slowly unbarred the
portal, saying, as he did so,
Fairly and softly, my masters, fairly and softly. Silence
giveth consent, saith the proverb, and thus do I understand my
terms to be allowed. Be not over hasty, most valiant
general
,
nor thou, most evangelical of corporals; but enter calmly,
and take possession of this virgin fortress.
The gate swung open as he concluded, and displayed Morton,
standing quite alone at the entrance to his domain, with his
matchlock in his hand. The party, headed by Standish, rushed
furiously into the inclosure, and, suspecting some ambush, as
they found Morton, whom they supposed surrounded by twenty
followers, in such perfect solitude, Corporal Neegoose and two
others made a sudden onset upon him, threw him to the ground,
disarmed and bound him, and were upon the point of
hand-cuffing
and gagging him, when Standish interposed, and ordered
them to desist.
Master Morton, said he, you are my prisoner; but from
your recent behavior, I am inclined to believe you satisfied that
it is useless to resist. I am, therefore, disposed to liberate you
from actual bondage, assuring you, however, that any attempt at
rescue, on the part of your followers, will be punished by
instant
death.
Captain Standish, replied Morton, after he had shaken
himself free, 't would have been perchance more becoming to
have treated me less like a felon, and more like a gentleman,
after I had thus surrendered at discretion. Yet I do hereby
volunteer my parole, assuring thee that it is neither my
intention
nor inclination to attempt my escape. I shall follow thee
to Plymouth as patiently as the wild ass's colt followeth its dam.
Touching the matter of a rescue upon the part of my followers,
thou wilt believe that to be most unlikely, seeing that with the
exception of one chicken-hearted monkey, whom thou wilt find,
either dead or alive in some cranny in the cellarage, yonder
motionless lump of humanity constituteth my whole garrison.
As he concluded, Morton pointed to the prostrate Bootefish,
whom several of the followers of Standish had just discovered,
tranquilly enjoying his slumbers at the foot of the lookout, and
whom they now were dragging forward for the inspection of
their commander.
As he listened to the last observation of Morton, and
contemplated
the lethargic form of Bootefish, Standish looked at his
corporal with a somewhat disconcerted expression of
countenance
.
To the hero of New Plymouth, his present
achievement
seemed not likely to bring fresh laurels. Giving one
contemptuous glance at the butler, the testy Standish turned his
back upon Morton, and striding towards the farther extremity
of the inclosure, seated himself upon a log, struck a light, and
began to solace himself with a pipe of tobacco. In the
meantime
,
Morton, throwing himself into a gracefully recumbent
attitude upon the turf, and looking benignantly around upon his
captors, observed,
Make yourselves perfectly at home at this poor palace of
ours, my masters. All is yours, I fear me, by the rights of war.
I cannot flatter ye that ye have broken down my spirit yet,
although ye have conquered my territory,
`Et cuncta terrarum subacta
Prter atrocem animum Catonis.'
Hast ever solaced thyself, Master Neegoose, with the crystal
numbers of the Venusian bard?
CHAPTER V.
THE DOUBLE LABYRINTH.
Several
weeks had elapsed since the matters just related,
when one afternoon Esther Ludlow was wandering in the
neighborhood
of her residence. Summer had long been scorching
the wilderness. After a day of breathless heat and cloudless
sunshine, she had come forth from her humble cottage as the
afternoon was closing, to watch for the coming of the evening
wind. But the leaves stirred not yet, but hung shrivelled and
motionless in the brazen sky. The oppressiveness of the
atmosphere
was so excessive, that even the sounds of nature seemed
languid and feeble. The melancholy cat-bird in the deepest
thicket scarce could utter his musical complaint; the squirrel sat
motionless upon his tree; the snake lay basking upon the rock.
All was silent, save the ceaseless hum of the locusts, whose
shrill and all-pervading monotone, struck upon the ear like
the audible voice of heat. The great heart of nature seemed
to beat feebly in her bosom. Esther lingered in the cloistered
depths of the forest, now gliding with the noiseless movements
of a nun, through the long, green naves, now gazing upwards
at the vast and solemn arches; now losing herself among the
clustering and interlacing ranks of gigantic and aspiring shafts,
or watching, as she sat upon some prostrate column, the play
of the chequered sunbeams, as they streamed in a horizontal
flood through the branched and foliaged tracery of the grove.
Long and deeply she mused. At times she doubted whether,
in her conduct during the last few months, she might not have
committed some irretrievable error, but no tongue had whispered
Maudsley's name, since the memorable interview in which he
had bidden her farewell forever; and whether he still lingered
in New England, or whether he had already departed to more
genial scenes, she could not tell. At times, something
whispered
in her heart, that her bearing towards him had been too
harsh, and that she had not dwelt kindly enough upon the
constancy
of his love. But she reflected that constancy and devotion
could not atone for suspicion and insult. She became every day
strengthened in the sad conviction, that fate had allowed two
hearts for a brief period, and almost in their own despite, to
cleave and grow to each other, only to be rudely and forever
torn asunder, and to shed their life-blood in the separation. She
felt convinced that there was an utter want of sympathy between
their natures, and that a reconciliation was hopeless. What the
mystery of the chain betokened she could not imagine; the idea
of Sir Christopher Gardiner as a lover had never presented itself
to her mind. She had not the slightest idea in what way
Maudsley had possessed himself of the chain, and an indefinable
feeling had restrained her, at the only interview which had since
taken place between herself and the knight, and which had
passed in the presence of her brother, from alluding to the
circumstance
.
Maudsley's language had been so incoherent and
incomprehensible, that at times she feared that his brain had
been unsettled, at others she was almost ready to believe in the
reality of the preternatural influence to which he had alluded in
such a passionate manner, and to imagine that it was even
extending itself over her own fate. She struggled long and
deeply with these emotions, as she wandered in the silent forest.
At times she doubted whether the sacrifice which she had made
to her brother, a sacrifice of a whole life, was indeed a just and
worthy one. Even if it were right to consecrate her own
existence
to his, was it just to trifle with the welfare of another? and
if, without any thought but Maudsley's happiness, and laying
aside all useless, although womanly reserve, she had approached
her lover boldly, determined to pluck out the heart of the whole
mystery which enveloped them, would it not have been better
for all?
Exhausted and harassed by her unprofitable musings, she
violently aroused herself with the intention of returning to her
home. To her surprise, she found, after making one or two
turns, and becoming at each turn more bewildered, that she had
unconsciously wandered farther than she intended; and that she
had, for the first time for many months, entirely lost her way.
As the day was drawing to a close, she became, in her anxiety
to hurry to the right track again, still more and more
embarrassed
.
It had been an unusual thing for her to venture
unattended
to any considerable distance in the wilderness; but the
day had been so sultry, the freshness of the forest so inviting,
and her reverie so deep, that she had unconsciously wandered
too far. It was now in vain for her to attempt to recognise any
familiar feature in the landscape. Although there was still a
sufficiency of daylight left, as the summer's sun had but just
descended, yet it would have required a more practised eye than
hers to have read the language of that sylvan scene. To one
educated as she had been in the quiet, cultivated gardens of
England, the maze of the forest was an inscrutable mystery. It
was no longer possible for her to select any single and
well-remembered
landmark. Still her self-possession was not easily
disturbed, and after wandering for a few minutes longer, she
arrived at a small natural opening, where she felt certain that
she had never found herself before. A high ledge of granite
rose from the edge of this valley, swelling upwards through
the forest in a westerly direction. Esther began to ascend this
cliff to obtain, if possible, a distant view which might enable her
to form some conjecture as to the path which she was to follow.
With much effort she arrived upon the broad flat summit of the
granite mass, where she sank for a moment exhausted. As
she lay there upon that isolated promontory, she seemed like a
shipwrecked victim cast upon some rocky and desolate isle.
From east to west, from north to south, the unfathomable forest
flowed round her, like a sea. The myriad leaves, already
agitated
by the evening wind which had so long delayed its coming,
now murmured like the awakening surge.
Recovering from her exhaustion, she arose and looked
anxiously around. Alas! she could not discover the slightest
indication of any thing familiar to guide her footsteps. In
whatever direction she strained her eyes, still rose and rolled
before her sight that green and boundless ocean.
She took a silver whistle which hung at her waist, and which
she had been accustomed to use as a signal to her brother and
his servants, and blew a shrill blast upon it, without the slightest
expectation that its tremulous and slender note could penetrate
to her own abode. The faint vibration soon died upon the air,
but just awakening a slight and feeble echo which floated back
to her ear like the voice of some gentle wood-spirit. Again and
again she mechanically sounded the slender notes, and felt a
vague terror stealing over her as she listened to the gentle but
unearthly tones, by which it seemed to be mocked and
mimicked
in the distance. Suddenly, as she blew her final and
despairing blast, and was about descending from her elevated
position, her ear was startled by another and most mysterious
sound. Just as the delicate echo which had responded to her
own last signal, had melted into air, the tone seemed suddenly
caught up and repeated; gently at first, and then more loudly,
till she was surprised to hear, as it were, an answering signal to
her own. A hope sprang up in her bosom as she listened to
this distant note, and yet she was still more perplexed and
bewildered
,
because it was not the signal that had been concerted
between her brother and the other inmates of her household
with herself. Again she awoke the silence with her instrument;
and now as the last echoes subsided, the clear tones of a distant
lute rose upon the air, in a strain of exquisite melody. Esther
listened with a vague sensation of awe. It seemed as if some
enchantment were spread over the forest. The instrument was
struck by the hand of a master. The music, although plaintive
and touching, was highly intricate and artificial in its character,
and Esther's bewilderment, as she listened to this spirit-like
melody, was complete.
The strain was finished, and silence again brooded over the
scene. Who the invisible artist was, and what his purpose
might be, she could not guess. Was this vast wilderness peopled
by aerial spirits, of which the old world's grey mythology had not
dreamed? Were these viewless wanderers of the wood
beneficent
or malignant in their nature? Had this mystic strain
sounded upon her ear only to perplex her still farther, and lead
her on into still deeper and more hidden intricacies of the
forest?
She stood in that lonely spot, pondering upon the strange
circumstances which surrounded her, and irresolute what course
to pursue. Suddenly, as she looked towards the wood, which
inclosed on all sides the rock where she was standing, she
thought she saw the motions of a living creature amid the
branches of a tree. A feeling of terror came over her, and she
remained with her eyes fixed upon the spot. She was not
mistaken
.
It was not the evening wind which stirred the foliage.
Presently a slender branch was moved cautiously aside, and
Esther heard a low, whispering sound. Her blood began to
freeze, the tongue clove to the roof of her mouth, and she
remained motionless as a statue, awaiting, in silent horror, the
danger which was to befall her. As she gazed upon the spot
where she had perceived the motion of the foliage, with senses
sharpened by apprehension, she now distinctly saw two bright,
VOL. II. 7
savage eyes glaring directly upon her face. What wild denizen
of the forest it was, whether savage beast or still more savage
man, she knew not. Her suspense was but short, for presently
a shrill whoop struck her ear, and at the next moment a painted
Indian, with bow and tomahawk, sprang through the thicket,
and stood close to her upon the rocky platform. Esther uttered
not a sound, but dropped upon her knees raising her clasped
hands in mute supplication. For a brief space the Indian stood
stock-still, gazing at her in grim admiration.
'Twas a strange, but fearful sight, could one have looked
upon those two breathing statues, placed upon that rocky
pedestal
upon the bronze, impassible savage, upon the
motionless
marble of Esther's kneeling figure. How long they
remained
in this strange position, she could not tell, for into
each of those moments was crowded an age of agony; but it
had at last its termination. The savage moved towards her,
as she still remained there upon her knees, and with a
succession
of rapid gestures intimated that she must follow him.
Finding her still immovable, he made use of one or two
distorted
English phrases, which produced as little effect.
Becoming
impatient at last, he strode forward, seized her by the
hair of her head, and attempted to tear her away. At that
instant
her agony burst forth in one wild shriek. The savage,
unheeding her screams and struggles, and still bent upon his
purposes, seized her in his powerful arms, lifted her from the
ground, and was bearing her away, when suddenly another yell
rose upon the air, and caused her foe to pause for a moment
where he stood. In the next instant two other Indians, armed
to the teeth, sprang nimbly upon the ledge, and confronted the
captor and his victim. Finding himself thus beset, the foe of
Esther placed her gently upon the ground, and stood for a
moment
at bay. It was but an instant, for he was soon desperately
beset by the two new-comers. His resistance was but
momentary
,
for finding himself so much overmatched, the wary savage,
dexterously avoiding a blow which was near cleaving his skull,
suddenly threw himself bodily over the high and precipitous
rock, caught at a projecting branch of a stunted oak which
grew half way down, and swinging himself nimbly from one
point to another, soon disappeared in the thicket. Esther
remained
,
more dead than alive, upon the very spot in which her
enemy had left her, hardly able to lift her eyes towards her new
captors, and venturing scarcely to doubt that she had but
escaped one danger to fall into another to the full as formidable.
There was a brief pause of a few moments, during which she
remained mute and motionless, but not insensible, when at last
the silence was broken by a shrill and peculiar cry, uttered by
one of the savages. After a brief delay, the cry seemed to be
answered at a slight distance, by a clear, exquisite melody,
played by the same instrument which had excited her wonder
but a short time before. Esther knew not why, but her heart,
which was almost dead within her, began to beat with a vague
and trembling hope, as that delicate strain fell upon her ear.
Earthly or aerial, the invisible musician seemed to be in league
with her present captors, and it seemed impossible that such gentle
sounds should breathe of danger and of blood. It was strange,
but at that moment it seemed as if her curiosity was even
stronger than her fears. She started to her feet, looked for the
first time at her new companions, and was more pleased than
astonished to find that the expression of their painted faces was
not ferocious, and that their gestures seemed respectful. She
stood anxiously awaiting the termination of the adventure with
more of hope than terror. Presently a light step was heard in
the thicket at the base of the ledge. She turned in the
direction
of the sound, and saw a slight but active figure ascending
the cliff.
The new comer was no savage. Esther saw it at a glance.
There was still ample light to read his countenance, and she felt
a sensation of relief as she looked upon the stranger, who was
advancing
softly towards her. His countenance was smooth and very
fair; the features were those of a delicate and beautiful youth.
He was dressed in a somewhat fantastic but European garb;
wore pistols in the girdle which bound his slender waist, and
held a kind of partisan or spear-headed staff in his hand. A
small musical instrument, of peculiar structure, which hung
carelessly
upon his shoulder, left no doubt that the invisible musician,
whose strains had so excited her wonder, stood in reality before
her.
If her fancy had been bewildered before, when she had but
heard those singular melodies and knew not whether they
proceeded
from earth or air, she was not much less perplexed, now that
she gazed upon the singular being who had thus presented
himself
before her.
In the mean time the youth had approached, and stood gazing
upon her face with eyes which spoke strange language. The
expression of his countenance was earnest, at times tender, but
changeable, and it ever and anon became wild and almost fierce.
After gazing upon her for a few moments, he addressed a
hurried observation, in an unknown tongue, to his two
attendants
,
who, in obedience to what seemed a command, suddenly
descended to the bottom of the cliff, where they placed
themselves
in a recumbent attitude upon the ground, awaiting the
orders of him who seemed their superior. Esther and the youth
were left alone upon the cliff.
Observing that her new companion, whether friend or foe,
remained silent and serious, gazing upon her countenance as if
he would have read her soul, she felt a strange trouble.
Determined
,
if possible, to put an end to this suspense, she collected
her thoughts and addressed him, in low but firm accents.
I know not who or whence you may be, she said, but your
looks are gentle, and your countenance shows you to be of
English
,
or at least, of European lineage.
You are right, lady; answered the stranger, in a low,
musical
tone. My lineage is English, my birth-place England,
although much of my life hath been passed in other climes.
Then I cannot doubt, returned Esther, with more
confidence
,
that I am in the company of a friend. It is, doubtless,
by your agency that I have been saved from a fate of unknown
horror. And, continued she, with a shudder convulsing her
frame, if I lack words to express my gratitude, you cannot
doubt how sincerely it is felt. You know not who I am, but you
see before you an English woman, not long a dweller in this
wilderness, who hath unluckily lost her way in the forest. If
you could guide me to the residence of Walter Ludlow, you
would increase my debt to you a thousand-fold. Are you
perchance
acquainted with the spot where Walter Ludlow dwells?
I am, indeed, said the stranger, with a wild and almost
savage expression passing like a cloud across his beautiful
countenance
.
I know the residence of Walter Ludlow well.
Then I am sure, cried Esther, that I shall not urge you
in vain to conduct me thither.
I shall do so, Esther Ludlow, answered the stranger
doubt it not. Although you have wandered far enough to
perplex
yourself, yet is the way homeward neither long nor difficult.
I pledge myself to conduct you thither.
Thanks, a thousand thanks! answered Esther. I knew
that your purposes could hardly prove unfriendly. But it seems
that my name is known to you.
Aye, lady, answered the other, your name and person are
both well known to me.
'T is strange! cried Esther, for surely never have my
eyes looked upon you before. Is it, indeed, continued she,
7*
musingly to herself, is it indeed a gentle spirit of these ancient
woods, sent hither to relieve me in my hour of peril? As
Esther gazed upon the stranger, his very beautiful countenance,
the gentleness and elegance of his person, so strangely
contrasting
with the savage scenery around them, and the romantic
character of his whole appearance, almost authorized the belief
that he was rather one of those aerial beings who play i' the
plighted clouds, than a mortal denizen of the wilderness.
And know you my brother, Walter Ludlow? said she aloud.
I have never looked upon his face, was the reply.
Why, this is stranger still, thought Esther. And are you
a permanent sojourner in the wilderness?
Nay; with me nothing is permanent, replied the stranger.
Change, continued he, is the element in which I have my
being. Ask of yonder purple cloud, said he, pointing upwards,
which even now floats by the rising moon, and for an instant
is steeped in its silver radiance, ask if its glory be permanent.
Ask how soon it will be mingling its being in the tempest's rack,
and sweeping round the world, destroying and destroyed? No,
lady, change is my element; alas, in all regards save one, save
one!
The enigmatical language of the stranger seemed to confirm
Esther's suspicions. Still there was something earnest and even
tender in his looks and language, something gentle in his
melancholy
,
that touched her heart and forced her to reject the
fanciful
supposition.
'T is strange, said she, that my own person should be
familiar to you, and that of Walter Ludlow unknown
Is Walter Ludlow the only dweller in the wilderness in
whom you feel an interest? asked the stranger, abruptly.
Nay, answer Esther, there be many of the scattered
settlers
in this neighborhood who have my warmest sympathy.
And yet, continued the other, there is one who hath
sojourned here many months, whom one cause alone brought
hither. 'T is strange, continued he, abstractedly, that there
should be such power in a woman's face, to lead across wintry
seas, and to chain in howling deserts, one whose heart was
careless
,
whose existence was bright. Let me look once more upon
that face.
As he spoke, the youth advanced close to Esther, laid his
hand gently upon her shoulder, and gazed long and intently
upon her, as if he would have read her soul. Esther started
back and colored slightly, at this familiarity. A vague fear stole
over her mind, but at the moment she seemed so entirely in the
stranger's power, that she was unwilling unnecessarily to excite
his anger. Moreover, there was so much gentleness and delicacy
in all his movements, that she felt, in spite of the loneliness of
her situation and the mysterious character of her companion, a
sensation of confidence, for which she could hardly account.
Fear nothing, lady, said the stranger, in gentle tones;
fear not that I should gaze too long or too fondly upon your
face. Fate having thus accidentally placed me by the side of a
sorceress, whose power I have dreaded, I did but desire to study
the character of her enchantment. Fear not that I, too, shall
feel the spell. Nay, believe me, how much injury soever we
may mutually and unwittingly inflict upon each other, when I
swear to you at this moment that I wish you well, and that
my intentions toward you are fair and friendly. One single
question more, and I will lead you to the dwelling of Walter
Ludlow.
Speak on, replied Esther, utterly perplexed by her
companion's
language.
Do you love Harry Maudsley? asked the youth, with
startling abruptness.
Esther recoiled a step from her companion, as he thus
addressed
to her this extraordinary question, and hesitated a
moment ere she replied.
I know not who or whence you are, she said at last, nor
your motives, in thus taking advantage of my lonely situation to
insult one who hath never injured you. It is base, it is
unmanly
,
it is unworthy of an Englishman, of whatsoever creed or
party he may be.
Nay, lady, answered the other calmly, I meant not thus
to move your indignation. But I
will
take advantage of our
present situation, not to inflict injuries or insults, but to render
you a service. I implore you to answer my question. Believe
the word of one who wishes well to both of ye, when he swears
that he hath no evil motive in asking a question, rude, perhaps,
and sudden, but as honest as it is plain. Tell me, do you love
Henry Maudsley?
Esther felt extreme wonder that the extraordinary familiarity
of the stranger did not, for some unaccountable reason, excite
the indignation in her bosom, which she felt should have been
aroused. The voice and manner of her companion seemed to
divest his language of much of its intrinsic boldness.
Something
,
too, of the indefinite impression that her companion
possessed
some weird influence over her destiny, and that his
purposes were kindly, though mysterious, still lingered in her
fancy, and was not without its effects.
I wish well to Henry Maudsley, she replied, wondering, as
she did so, at her docility.
Do you love Henry Maudsley? replied her companion,
with even more excitement of manner. I implore you for the
last time, nay, I command you, to answer that question. Your
own fate, his own, and that of others whom you dream not of,
may be at this moment trembling upon your answer. An
answer I will have, ere either of us leaves this labyrinth. Fate
hath conducted me hither to read a riddle, and I swear to you
that the riddle shall now be solved.
Is this threatening language worthy of you? said Esther.
Is this an English gentleman's courtesy to an unprotected
woman?
Pardon me, lady, but I could set my life upon this cast.
Whether I use threats, promises, or prayers, my object is the
same, your welfare and my own. The moments are rapidly
passing; you know not how much of weal or woe your answer
may effect. Answer me, I do not say truly, for truth alone
could speak from those pure lips, but answer me at once. Do
you love Henry Maudsley?
I do, murmured Esther, in a soft, broken voice, overcome
at last by the stranger's passionate demeanor and her own vague
fears.
Thank God for that answer, cried the youth, with strange
exultation.
There was a pause of a few moments, during which Esther
strove in vain to collect herself. The silence was broken by the
stranger, who addressed her again in an earnest but a calmer
tone.
Listen to me once more, said he, I give you a warning,
which should have some value in your mind. Sport not with the
happiness of two hearts which have grown together. Pervert
not the destiny of Maudsley, nor your own. Maudsley loves you
more than life. His fate is in your hands.
Esther, confounded, at times almost indignant at the language
of her companion, uttered not a reply. There was another
pause. After the expiration of a few moments, the youth
suddenly
moved towards Esther.
The night is advancing. Shall I not conduct you to your
brother's residence? said he.
Ah, let me entreat you to hasten thither, replied Esther,
and spare me, I beseech you, for the remainder of our
companionship
,
language like the mysterious words which you have
lately spoken. Indeed, they trouble and perplex my soul.
Fear nothing, Esther Ludlow, replied the youth; and
now let me conduct you from this lonely spot.
As he spoke, he gently assisted her along the uncertain
footing
of the rock. When they had at last reached the bottom of
the ledge the stranger whistled thrice. Forthwith two dusky
figures sprang from the thicket as noiselessly as phantoms, and
without uttering a word glided slowly before them through the
thicket. The stranger seemed to be as familiar with every step
of those bosky bourns as if he had been indeed a spirit haunting
their sylvan solitude. A tortuous deer-path, winding through
the tangled woods, seemed the thread which was to lead them
from their leafy labyrinth. To Esther the path would have been
almost invisible by daylight, but at night it seemed as if magic
alone could enable their shadowy guides to pass thus rapidly
before them through the thicket, and her slender and youthful
companion to follow their track so carelessly and yet so
accurately
.
After a rapid and silent march of some half hour's duration,
they emerged into a broad, open glade, which was familiar to
her eyes. Through the majestic trees at the farther extremity,
the level line of light streamed from the windows of her own
cottage. Having reached this spot, the youth paused and once
more addressed her:
We part at this moment; whether we meet again I know
not; but remember my words of warning, and remember that I
wish you well. There is one other warning which I meant to
give you, and the hour has come.
Speak, said Esther, wondering what new mystery was
impending, but feeling relieved of much of her anxiety, now that
her companion had in reality brought her in safety to her own
dwelling-place.
The stranger advanced closely to her, and once more laid his
hand upon her shoulder. Danger and distress threaten you,
he whispered hoarsely in her ear, in the person of a certain
mysterious knight. I tell you to beware of him. Shun him as
you would shrink from a subtle and poisonous serpent. Distrust
every word, every motion, every look. Farewell, Esther
Ludlow
,
and may God preserve you from every danger.
There was a pause. Esther trembled, she knew not why, at
the warning language of her companion. She collected herself,
however, by a determined effort, and turned to thank the
stranger for his safe guidance through the forest, but he was
gone. She called in a loud whisper, there was no answer; she
advanced a few steps towards the forest from whence they had
emerged, but the youth, with his shadowy attendants, had
suddenly
disappeared.
Wearied and harassed by the fatiguing adventures of the
evening, she moved with a desponding step towards the cottage.
As she approached her home, a tall, dark figure, bearing a
lighted torch, suddenly crossed the glade, and strode rapidly
towards her.
We have been searching for you far and near, said a deep,
earnest voice; thank God, you are found again.
Esther shuddered, for she recognised the voice of Sir
Christopher
Gardiner.
CHAPTER VI.
DISSIMULATION.
A few
moments later, and Esther sat within her own cottage
walls. Every living creature had deserted it, for Walter Ludlow
with his servants, alarmed at the protracted absence of Esther,
were anxiously wandering through the forest in search of her.
Esther was left alone with the knight, who, having found
himself
accidentally at nightfall in the neighborhood, had learned
the alarming tidings of Esther's absence from her brother, and
had volunteered to assist them in the search. He was just
returning
from an unsuccessful expedition in a different direction
from that taken by the others, when he suddenly encountered
her a few moments after the stranger had left her.
Esther felt a sensation of despair as she found herself thus
suddenly in the presence of one who had always excited a vague
and unaccountable fear in her bosom, and against whom she
had been at that moment so mysteriously warned. Overpowered
by fatigue, and by the keen emotions which, for the last hour,
had been agitating her, she sank almost fainting upon a seat.
The knight gazed with a long, bold, impassioned glance at
that form of majestic beauty, thus reclining before him, so
helpless
and so lonely. A wild fire danced in his eye. A cloud of
stormy passion seemed sweeping across his brow. His features
quivered, his frame shook with emotion. Suddenly he aroused
himself, and with a strong effort seemed to control the
struggling
devil in his soul.
Fool, fool, he muttered, wouldst thou dash into
fragments
thus the work of years? Has time brought no coolness
to thy blood?
Checking himself thus, he busily, but respectfully, employed
himself in assisting Esther. He bathed her face with water; he
chafed her hands; he employed all fitting expedients with the
quiet but active tenderness of a woman. When she was partially
recovered from her prostration, he administered to her a few
drops of a potent restorative from a flask which he bore about
him.
After the expiration of a few minutes, she was herself again.
She looked around in bewilderment, and started visibly, as she
became aware of the presence of Gardiner, who, seated
respectfully
at a distance, was gazing intently upon her face.
Be not alarmed, Esther Ludlow, said he gently, although
your brother is absent, he cannot fail to return very soon. In
the mean time, be assured that you are in the company of an
earnest and sincere friend.
Where is my brother? said Esther, faintly.
Alarmed at your disappearance, he is searching the forest,
attended by his servants. It was my fortunate lot to find you, as
I was returning alone from an unsuccessful search.
Would that Walter were here, exclaimed Esther.
He cannot tarry long, answered Sir Christopher; but if
it be your pleasure, I will go forth and seek him. I may thus
convey to him a little earlier the news of your fortunate
appearance
.
Ah, do so, do so, said Esther, with a shuddering,
imploring
accent, as if she were striving to exorcise a fiend from her
presence.
I go, said Gardiner, although it grieves me to leave you
thus unprotected; it grieves me more, he added with a sigh,
that my presence seemeth so odious in your eyes.
Nay, nay, said Esther, alarmed, lest her manner should
have betrayed too much aversion, but surely it is fitting that
the anxiety of Walter Ludlow should be shortened as much as
lieth in our power.
VOL. II. 8
Enough, Esther, said Gardiner, in the same melancholy
and respectful tone, you shall be obeyed. Think not, however,
that I should have been so base as to have taken advantage
of this unguarded moment to urge a hopeless suit. You
know, he continued, seeming fiercely to control a rising feeling,
that these lips have never dared to speak of emotions which
are older, deeper, fiercer, than dwell in many bosoms. Is it not
strange that such a one as I have been, should be a changeling
now? Is it not strange that a wonderful and holy vision should
have risen upon and illuminated my soul in this wilderness?
Aye, I have heard a voice crying out to me from the very depths
of the desert. I looked, and behold, it was to me as if the gates
of Paradise were opening upon mine eyes, as if I saw the
celestial
battlements thronged with the cherubim and seraphim, and
heard the immortal strains of harp and sackbut, even from
before the footstool of God! I bowed to the dust, as the
celestial vision swept over me.
And why speakest thou to me of these things, interrupted
Esther, and least of all, at this place and season?
Because the floodgates of my heart have been for once
broken open, and the long-imprisoned feelings rush forth beyond
control, answered Gardiner, with rising impetuosity. I tell
you, Esther Ludlow, that it is to thee, and to thee alone, that I
owe this glorious vision. I care not what may be the issue of
my mortal passion, nor to how hopeless a life of agony your fiat
may condemn my heart. I shall always bless thee upon my
knees, that thou, under God, art the cause of the new life that
has been infused into my being. If, as I humbly dare to hope,
the Holy Ghost hath descended like a dove upon the raging
waters of my sinful heart, and at last found a resting-place there,
thou, only thou, art the cause. Is this not reason enough that I
should devote a life to your service, if so poor a boon could in
aught advantage you? I speak not of earthly hope, but surely,
surely thou wilt not reject the devotion of a heart which owes
its salvation to your blessed example.
Too much of this, too much of this, cried Esther, rising
from her seat, with a troubled and almost irritated demeanor, let
me implore you to delay no longer in seeking out my brother.
This language, be it sincere or otherwise, sounds harshly in my
ears, neither is this a fitting time nor place for such a theme.
Without uttering a word, and with eyes bent modestly and
meekly upon the ground, the knight glided towards the door.
He had scarcely opened it, when there was a noise without, the
trampling of many feet, the blazing of many torches, and then
Walter Ludlow, informed of Esther's safety by a glance of Sir
Christopher, rushed into the room, and folded his sister to his
heart.
Great was the joy among the inmates of Ludlow's household,
and fervent the thanks offered by them to Gardiner, who was
supposed to have been a second time her deliverer from death.
After a short time passed by the brother and sister in
congratulations
,
Esther narrated her adventure briefly and succinctly.
She dwelt as lightly as possible upon the singular and mysterious
personage to whom her deliverance was owing; but she was
startled, as she alluded to the youth, to observe the dark
and extraordinary expression of Sir Christopher's face. He
uttered not a syllable, but his dark eye seemed to plunge like a
poniard into her heart. The expression, although fierce, was
momentary. It had passed away sooner than the wonder which
it excited in Esther's bosom. Still, she felt an instinctive
reluctance
at dwelling upon the details of her adventure in Gardiner's
presence, and she accordingly related scarcely a syllable of the
extraordinary conversation which had passed between her and
the unknown.
As the evening wore away, the conversation had rolled upon
other matters. Sir Christopher, who was to be the guest of
Walter Ludlow that night, made some inquiries touching the
expedition of Endicott, who was to have set sail many weeks
before, and was hourly expected in New England.
I can conceive, said he, no nobler lot than his. To
found an empire upon a great idea, to plant a seed silently in the
soil of this wilderness, certain that, under the shade which will
spring from that slender cause, whole nations will repose, is not
an obscure, although it may be a painful and a self-denying lot.
Only a petty soul, replied Esther, who was pleased in spite
of herself, at hearing language from Gardiner's lips with which
she could feel an honest sympathy, only a petty soul would
deem that destiny obscure by which a few humble individuals
are singled out to lay the corner-stone of an empire such as the
world hath not yet seen. None but petty souls would count the
privations, the labors, or the tears, in the midst of which so high
a destiny is accomplished.
Aye, said Gardiner, to be not the Cadmus, nor the
Romulus, nor the pirate chieftain, planting wild dynasties with
the bloody hand, but rather the prophet and the lawgiver of an
infant state  to be the Moses, the Joshua, of brave enthusiasts,
who have turned their backs on home and happiness, only that
their faces may still be turned toward God; this is ambition
worthy of a lofty soul!
Aye, said Esther, so seemeth it to me. England groans
under the worst of tyrannies, the dreary tyranny of the mitre.
Less dreary, less dead than such a land, is this howling
wilderness
.
Whether such is to be forever the condition of our
country
,
or whether at some distant day the star of hope is to arise,
who shall be bold enough to prophesy? For myself, I regret
not my lot.
Nor I, said Gardiner, enthusiastically, for if a happier
day is ever to dawn in England, it must be, methinks, after long
and fearful convulsions. The promised land of religious
freedom
may be reached at last, but a red sea of human blood rolls
between our suffering people and that distant shore. Better, far
better, the air of the wilderness, better the wild altars, crowned
with the virgin flowers of a purer world.
The hours rolled on. Esther was struck with the coincidence
of sentiment and opinion between herself and Gardiner, and
pleased, not only with the ready response which his eye and
tongue seemed to render to her own language, but with the
sympathetic anticipation by which he gave exact and eloquent
utterance to her own thoughts even as she formed them. She
seemed to lose something of her abhorrence of his person and
character.
If Maudsley had but thought and spoken like this stranger,
thought she to herself, after the party had separated for the
night, and she was alone with her own thoughtshad Henry
Maudsley thus comprehended the depth of my nature, and thus
sympathized with rather than scoffed at the aspirings of my
soul. Alas! he knows not how the heart which he hath
outraged
,
might perhaps, with the blessing of God, have led his
own to better and holier purposes. Alas! Heaven smiles not
upon us now!
8*
CHAPTER VII.
AN ACCOUNT SETTLED.
A few
days after these events, Sir Christopher Gardiner was
walking alone upon the beach of the western cove at Shawmut.
He had come thither for the purpose of conferring with the
eccentric hermit of the peninsula; but had found him absent.
Being anxious for an interview with him, he still loitered in the
neighborhood of his cottage, hoping that ere long he would
return.
The knight was pondering deeply upon his position in New
England, which was harassing and irritating enough, although
he had already taken his resolution. As it will be soon more
particularly related, the long expected colony of Puritans,
under the guidance of Captain John Endicott, had at length
arrived at Naumkeak. They were provided with a large grant
of land from the New England Council, and although, as yet,
the grant was not fortified by a confirmatory charter from the
crown, they expected that an ample one, in spite of all
opposition
and intrigue, would shortly be obtained.
Thomas Morton, Gardiner's chief confidant, ally, and
instrument
,
had, as the knight used so frequently to prophesy, at last
irritated the more orderly inhabitants of New England beyond
endurance. The expedition against him, we have seen, had
been successful. The Plymouth captain had at last, without
the effusion of blood, secured the person of the Merry-Mount
rioter, and had carried him off a prisoner to Plymouth. Here
the defeated and deposed potentate had been summoned before
the magistrates and elders of the colony, but had refused in a
lofty manner to acknowledge their jurisdiction. After being
detained several weeks a prisoner, he had been finally
disspatched
to England in a vessel sailing from the Isle of Shoals.
He was placed under the charge of John Oldham, the man who
claimed the territory at Mishawum under the Gorges grant, and
who, several years before, had received such ignominious
treatment
from the Plymouth settlers. He had lately, however, for
purposes of his own, become reconciled, in appearance at least,
to those colonists, and it was a striking proof of their confidence
in his character as well as his friendship, that the man whom
they had, upon a former occasion, so bitterly wronged, should
have been selected by them for so responsible a trust. John
Oldham, in short, who had been buffeted, thumped, and literally
kicked out of Plymouth in 1625, was now charged with the
guardianship of Thomas Morton. The lord of Merry-Mount
was sent to England to answer to certain charges preferred
against him here, the principal of which were, his dealings with
the Indians, particularly his supplying them with gunpowder
and fire-arms, and the riotous demeanor of himself and his
companions
at Merry-Mount.
Gardiner had conceived a strong hope that the issue of the
campaign against Merry-Mount, would, after all, tend to the
furtherance of his own designs. In the first place, although his
connection with Morton still remained a secret throughout New
England, he feared it might be difficult to conceal their
acquaintance
much longer. The character of Morton was so
reckless and boisterous, that it well nigh neutralized the
advantage
which might have been derived from his knowledge of the
country, and his various accomplishments. If he could have
held his tongue, he would have been an excellent conspirator.
His brawling propensities made him mischievous.
As for the knight himself, such was his natural genius for
intrigue, and so highly had that faculty been cultivated during
his adventurous life, that he really possessed at that moment
only a dim and enigmatical existence in the wilderness. So
mysteriously did he glide to and fro, now pausing a moment in
the rude cabin of some hardy settler; now roving over moor and
mountain with the dusky children of the soil; now mingling with
the stern and melancholy Puritans in their severe and primitive
worship, himself more stern and more melancholy than them all;
seen occasionally of all, but mixing with none; the place of his
residence and the time of his arrival in the country alike
unknown
;
he seemed but an unreal shadow, a phantom, appearing,
vanishing, and re-appearing at different places and seasons,
without a definite purpose, and almost without a real existence.
So far, his mask had been securely worn, and the Plymouth
people had no suspicion of his real character.
This state of things could not, however, be expected to last
indefinitely, and the knight, unfortunately, was obliged to
consider
his projects as postponed for a considerable time. It was
therefore rather a relief to him than otherwise, when his anxiety
as to Morton was terminated by the capture and deportation of
that eccentric personage. In the next place, Gardiner conceived
strong hopes from the fortuitous conjunction of Oldham and
Morton. Here was a man expressly charged with the
safe-keeping
of his old ally, who had not only been deeply wronged by
the Plymouth Puritans, but who had a powerful claim to a
considerable
part of the territory now granted to the newly-arrived
Massachusetts Puritans. Morton, who was a lawyer by
profession
,
and possessed of no contemptible sagacity in the science,
could not fail, in the course of a long voyage to England, to
strengthen Oldham's opinions as to the legality of his territorial
claim. He was, moreover, almost certain, by his eloquent and
sarcastic invectives, to arouse Oldham's dormant indignation
against the whole religious party in New England, to inflame his
ancient prejudices, and to secure his valuable assistance upon
their arrival in England. Much might be made before the New
England Council, and more before the Lords Commissioners of
the Oldham case. As for the charges against Morton, and the
punishment likely to be measured out to him, Gardiner gave
himself not a moment's uneasiness. Letters which the knight,
by the same ship which conveyed the prisoner to England, sent
to powerful persons there, made it certain in his own mind, that
the Lord of Merry-Mount would escape unscathed, and would
be allowed to return to the new world whenever it suited his
convenience.
These considerations served to keep hope still burning in
Gardiner's
mind. Still he felt that his very soul was corroding in the
wilderness, and he would have, perhaps, abandoned his
enterprise
altogether, dissatisfied as he justly was at the supineness of
his English confederates, but for the sudden and extraordinary
passion which had taken possession of his soul. Indeed, it is
impossible to say how much influence the beauty and the
imposing
character of Esther Ludlow had exerted upon the destiny of
this singular adventurer. In other scenes, and under other
circumstances, a passion might not have mounted to such a
sudden
height, in a heart which had been swept by so many and
such fierce emotions; but he was idle, he was in the wilderness,
and his jaded soul had just been sated with a passion which had
burnt itself to ashes. At that very moment he had been aroused
from the torpor which seemed to be creeping slowly over his
existence, by the sudden emotions excited by the beautiful vision
which broke forth upon him in the wilderness.
The purity of Esther's character excited, rather than repelled,
the depraved imagination of Gardiner. She seemed to him a
priestess, a prophetess, a vestal; and there was so much of the
Clodius and the Catiline in his temperament, that the very
sacredness of character which would have served as her
protecting
shield against many men, was in his eyes but as an enticing
veil, enwrapping and enhancing her loveliness. And yet, when he
found himself in her presence, he felt at times an unaccountable
restraint. Like water dashed from the swan's silvery but
impenetrable
armor, his impetuous thoughts seemed to recoil
harmlessly
from the innocence of her soul. It had been easy for
him to ingratiate himself with the feeble and dreamy Walter
Ludlow, but he felt that he had not yet obtained even the most
precarious foothold in the mind of his lofty sister. It was this
which impelled him forward, for to such absolute indifference he
had not been accustomed during his wild career. Never had
he found himself so absorbed by a sentiment, whose indulgence
he had been accustomed to look upon as a pastime. It was
strange, but it seemed that, at last, his hour of infatuated
passion had arrived. It was as if the hard remnant of his inmost
nature, which, like the diamond, seemed the final essence of a
thousand fires, had at last melted before Esther's crystal purity,
as the impenetrable gem dissolves in the burning-glass. Still
at that moment, as he stood alone in the summer sunshine, his
aspiring thoughts flew upward like eagles. To win so bright a
prize was enough to repay his long and languid exile in the
desert, even should his other lofty visions fade forever. But
they should not fade. Though they seemed to roll themselves
away into the azure distance, they were still gilded by the sun,
and brightly in that imaginary splendor gleamed the gorgeous
towers of his golden dreams. With his imagination bubbling
like a witch's cauldron, he paced to and fro upon that lonely
beach, chasing the airy shapes which coursed one after another
in long procession through his brain.
Thus absorbed, and soothed as he loitered in that solitude
by the rippling waves, he was suddenly aroused from his reverie
by the appearance of something white upon the water. It was
a sail at the distance of about half a mile, advancing from the
northward, and evidently making its way to the peninsula of
Shawmut.
Gardiner watched its motions, supposing that it was
probably
the solitary inhabitant of the promontory returning to his
domain. As the boat neared him, however, his keen eye at once
recognised the boat and its occupant, and a dark and singular
expression shot across his features. He stood motionless,
looking
towards the little skiff, as it slowly drifted before the faint
summer breeze. In a few moments the keel grated upon the
pebbly beach within a few yards of the spot where he stood,
and a man sprang hastily out, paused an instant to moor his
boat, and then strode directly towards him. The new comer
was Henry Maudsley.
Good morrow, Master Maudsley, said the knight, with
unperturbed visage; if you are bent upon a visit to the hermit
of Shawmut this afternoon, I fear, like myself, you are come but
upon a fool's errand.
I thank you, Sir Christopher, for your information, which is
doubly agreeable to me, answered Maudsley, whose voice was
low and husky. I did indeed purpose a visit to Master
Blaxton
to-day, but I am fortunate, both in finding him absent, and
in finding yourself as his substitute.
Indeed, said Gardiner, calmly, and in what manner can
I serve you, Master Maudsley? In what way can I act as the
representative of the holy clerk of Shawmut?
My affair, answered Mandsley, with rising passion, my
affair with Master Blaxton can be deferred; that with Sir
Christopher Gardiner brooks no delay.
Indeed, said Gardiner, with a sneering affectation of
curiosity
,
have we such pressing business to settle? Pray, let me
remain no longer ignorant of such weighty matters. Let us
proceed to business at once.
With all my heart, said Maudsley, unsheathing his sword
with a sudden movement.
Hey-day, hey-day, Master Maudsley! said the knight, in
an accent of astonishment, unbaring his own rapier, however,
with lightning-like rapidity; was your voyage to Shawmut this
morning made for the special purpose of my assassination? If
it be not presumptuous, I would fain ask your cause of quarrel.
I have no inclination to waste these precious moments in
idle brawling, answered Maudsley. Your own hypocritical
heart will tell you in clearer tones than mine, our cause of
quarrel. You have escaped me once, through, I could almost
believe, supernatural agency. Should I fail a second time to
chastise your villany, the fault would be mine.
These be bold and bitter words, returned Gardiner, who
seemed for some mysterious reason to be singularly averse to an
encounter with Maudsley. But stay, the days are long at this
particular season, and I am a searcher after truth. Enlighten
me, for by St. John, you shall take nothing by your braggadocio
humor, and shall lose nothing by a more perspicuous course of
conduct.
Maudsley stared at the knight in profound astonishment.
He was utterly at a loss to understand what possible motives
could restrain him from accepting a combat thus fiercely urged
upon him. Of his courage and skill at every weapon he
entertained
no doubt, and his imperturbable coolness at this particular
juncture, proved that he was acting deliberately. Maudsley, as
we know, before the particular cause for his hatred had occurred,
had already conceived a peculiar and unaccountable detestation
of Gardiner, which the knight had upon all occasions appeared
very cordially to reciprocate. There had always seemed
something
more than caprice in Maudsley's aversion, and Gardiner's
conduct had always been apparently dictated by some secret, but
decided motive. In short, it seemd that Maudsley was governed
either by interest, or presentiment, or by both, while Gardiner's
hatred was the result of actual, although concealed, knowledge.
As for Sir Christopher, he seemed to have an especial motive
for self-control, and he stood in a careless attitude of defence,
like a reposing gladiator, calmly, but fixedly, regarding his
antagonist in the eye, and silently awaiting his response.
I came nor here to play the fool, said Maudsley at last,
nor to answer to any catechism. Neither am I disposed to
enter upon a detail of grievances of which you are as well
instructed as myself. If you must have reasons, let this suffice,
and, as he spoke, the impetuous youth endeavored to strike his
antagonist with the flat of his sword.
Fairly and softly, answered the knight, coolly, but adroitly,
recoiling a few paces to avoid the proffered insult. If there
be really so many and such weighty reasons already existing,
why invent fictitious and imaginary ones? Tell me frankly and
nobly, as befits the dignity of this imposing solitude, tell me
plainly your wrongs, and if there be no redress, I swear to you,
you shall have vengeance.
Maudsley was more and more irritated, and yet more and
more perplexed. An impetuous, passionate man, particularly if
he be very young, is very apt to be worsted in an altercation
with a cool, adroit man of maturer years, and he is the more
likely to be worsted if he happens to be entirely in the right.
Feeling sure to be baffled in argument, because he felt himself
too angry to utter an intelligible syllable, he took refuge for
the moment in silence.
Then you persist in denying me your catalogue of
grievances
,
continued Gardiner, after a pause. 'T is strange, but
one would have even expected eloquence from your lips upon
such a subject. Since, however, you will not speak, and since
I have no more desire than yourself for prolonging this
interview
,
I shall myself state your cause of quarrel. It lies in an
almond shell, good Master Maudsley, even in the soft eyes of a
certain Puritan maiden
Maudsley started, and made a fierce, quick, gesture of assent.
VOL. II. 9
Jealousy is a common passion, continued Gardiner, a
common cause of quarrel. I will not say that in some respects
there may not be foundation for your jealousy. But, good
Master Maudsley, where many strive but one can be chosen.
In one word, cried Maudsley, boiling over with his
hitherto painfully repressed wrath, I pronounce you a
hypocrite
and a villain. Whence and wherefore sprang the hatred
which I have borne you since your dark shadow first fell across
my path, I ask not. There may be hatred at first sight, it seems,
as ardent as first love. That you are a hypocrite, I know.
Your object is the perdition of one who, in her saintly purity, is
as far above your sphere as heaven from hell. I know that your
designs are all artful and base, and that your whole existence in
this wilderness, of which you prate so loftily, is one long lie.
And think you, answered Sir Christopher, still preserving
the same careless attitude, in spite of Maudsley's violent
language, and think you to arrogate to yourself a monopoly of
jealousy? Think you that the dark passion finds its only home
in your bosom? Think you that I, even I, continued he, with
an ominous expression upon his dark brow, and with a voice of
rising passion, am a stranger to your sweet and stolen
interviews
with a certain gentle, blue-eyed, mysterious youth?
Think you that I am your laughing-stock and your dupe?
Hath your effrontery grown to such a height that you defy me
to the teeth, with your saintly heroics touching the fair Puritan?
Shame on you, shame, Master Maudsley!
A sudden light broke upon Maudsley's mind as the knight
gave utterance to these taunts. He stood for an instant
bewildered
,
and hardly knowing what to reply, or whither this strange
interview was tending. He was far from suspecting the real
cause of Gardiner's singular forbearance even now, although so
suddenly enlightened as to a part of the mysteries which had
enveloped him. He replied not immediately, but stood leaning
upon his sword, and reflecting for an instant upon his course.
Fool, fool, muttered the knight to himself  Are my
projects, after all, to be foiled by the rash temper of this
hot-headed
boy? I thought him already in my power. Hath the
charm failed? By heavens! it shall be decided, and at once.
Hark you, my gentle master, I have a word for your most secret
ear, said he aloud.
And fear you, said Maudsley, that yonder crows will
prate of your secret, that it must be whispered in the silent
wilderness?
Nay, nay, my quick-tempered friend, replied the knight,
but there be many words and many matters which sound more
becomingly in a whisper, even though there be no lurking ear
in the whole universe, save those for whom they are meant.
Hark you, I say !
With this, the knight strode hastily forward to Maudsley, and
whispered in his ear for half a minute.
Maudsley started, as if a serpent had stung him.
Liar and villain! he cried, almost beside himself with
fury.  It needed but this to set my soul on fire. Defend
yourself
;
for nothing human shall restrain me longer.
With this Maudsley threw himself madly upon Sir
Christopher
,
who now entirely upon his guard, received his onset with
perfect calmness and precision. Maudsley, by profession a
soldier, was daring and skilful with his weapon, but he was
inflamed by passion. Gardiner was a consummate swordsman,
and besides, was wary and collected. Finding that his project
of making Maudsley useful to him had failed, the knight was
now desirous of being relieved of the embarassment caused by
his presence in New England. The combat proved desperate
but brief. Maudsley, after a few fierce passes, which were
skilfully
parried by Sir Christopher, at last by a lucky feint, pushed
within his adversary's guard. His rapier's point was upon the
knight's breast, and it seemed that his last and desperate thrust
must necessarily, at that instant, terminate the adventurer's
career, when, to his astonishment and rage, the treacherous
blade, encountering some hidden obstacle, shivered at the hilt.
At the same moment as he stood disconcerted and defenceless,
the knight sprang nimbly forward and passed his rapier through
his body. Maudsley glared at his foe with a last look of defiance,
and fell to the earth without uttering a sound.
Sir Christopher stood stock-still for a few moments, gazing
upon his prostrate adversary, while a thousand dark emotions
chased each other across his brow.
'T was thy destiny, he hoarsely muttered, thy destiny and
mine. I swear, I sought to spare thee, but thou shouldest not
have crossed my path. Have I not avoided thee as my evil
genius? My God! exclaimed the knight in a still more husky
tone, as he bent over the fallen Maudsley, what a terrible
resemblance, closer and more fearful even than in life! The
same haughty features, the same chestnut locks. My God! that
icy look, that ghastly resemblance will haunt me to my
grave!
Muttering thus incoherently, Gardiner stood musing in that
terrible companionship, till the cloudless midsummer's sun was
nearly set. His level beams poured full across the glassy cove,
and rained a flood of light upon the spot where Maudsley lay.
It was a fearful contrast,  that virgin wilderness, that golden
summer sunset, and that scene of blood. Sir Christopher
Gardiner
had been familiar with scenes of violence even from his
boyhood, but there was something appalling to him in the
solitude
which had been just profaned by the desperate affray. It
seemed to his heated imagination, as he gazed around him, as
if the world had suddenly renewed its infancy, and that the
first murder had at that instant been enacted. His brother's
blood seemed to cry to him from the ground. He sprang to his
feet, as if he felt the hot brand searing his forehead, and fled
from the spot like the guilty and conscience-stricken Cain.
9*
CHAPTER VIII.
THE SECOND APPARITION.
The
hermit of Shawmut had devoted a long summer's day to
a solitary excursion in the wilderness. He felt no fear in
rambling
to and fro, either upon his bull, upon his feet, or in his
boat, for he was regarded with considerable reverence by the
natives, with whom he occasionally came in contact, and to whom
his skill in pharmacy had often rendered essential service. He
was indeed, as was natural, looked up to by those scattered and
benighted creatures, as a being not belonging to earth, and
possessed
of superior attributes to mortals. His striking, and almost
ethereal appearance, his solitary habits, and his abstracted and
dreamy manner, contributed not a little to encourage this belief.
That morning, he had been tempted by a summer's breeze to
put forth in his little skiff, which experience had taught him to
manage with great adroitness. He had, after tossing about for
an idle hour or two upon the billows of the cove, amused
himself
by entering the mouth of the river which discharges itself
into the bay nearly opposite his abode.
The slow and tortuous Quinobequin, as the River Charles was
then more properly called, which, as Captain John Smith had
already informed the world, doth pierce many days' journey
into the entrails of that country, was a river whose calm, deep,
almost stagnant, and at the same time highly erratic character,
was singularly in harmony with that of the profound, wandering,
gentle, unimpassioned hermit, who, first of civilized beings, then
dwelt upon its banks. A brawling, shallow, headlong stream,
now whirling through gravelly ravines, now dashing down
precipices
of granite, would have been no fitting companion for the
exile. Blaxton thought, as he idly floated up the long reaches, or
rowed himself against the lazy current, in the short, sudden coils,
by which the river incessantly seemed doubling in its languid
course, that the stream was a fit emblem of himself. Winding
noiselessly and obscurely to and fro among the woods and
meadows, the river flowed calmly along, with scarce an eddy
upon its glassy surface, silent, but deep, hesitating, meandering,
and yet, after leagues of its serpentine motion, accomplishing so
little, that a child in a few bounds might measure the whole
length of its actual progress towards its goal.
Still, within its unruffled depths were ever mirrored Nature's
freshest charms. The forest-crowned hills came from afar to
bathe themselves in its tranquil flood, the serene heaven, with its
floating clouds, the silver majesty of the moon, the countless
troops of stars, and even the effulgence of the day-god himself,
were daily and nightly reflected in its placid bosom. And was
not this a compensation for the absence of that restless energy
which would have hurried it faster to the eternal sea, but would
have shivered its transparent surface into a thousand fragments,
and rendered its nature tumultuous and troubled?
Thus mused the contemplative solitary, as hour after hour he
loitered in his bark along that solitary stream. Although gentle
and quiet, there was still variety in his inland voyage. Here,
the river coiled itself, like a silver snake, through a wide
expanse
of meadow, where, if he stepped ashore, the rank grass,
unconscious of the scythe, grew higher than his breast. Anon,
he floated into a more secluded reach, where the stream dilated
for a moment to a mimic bay, where his oar would disturb a fleet
of anchored wood-ducks. Again, as the river narrowed itself
within its banks, a grey and decaying trunk of some fallen tree
would almost obstruct his passage, from which the basking
turtle would drop hastily and heavily into the stream, or the
headlong frogs dash themselves off in nimble and grotesque
alarm. At times, his course lay through broad and level
meadows
,
where grew only the ringletted and drooping elms, the
most graceful, the most feminine, and the most fragile of trees;
and which, sometimes like verdant fountains, sometimes like
foliage-wreathed urns, sometimes like bending, graceful,
suddenly
metamorphosed nymphs, with their green tresses sweeping
the ground, stood, singly or in detached and picturesque groups,
along the moist and open meads. Again, the river would lose
itself beneath shadowy and deeply wooded banks, where the
tangled forest grew close to the water's edge, where the various
melody of summer birds was never silent, where the whir of the
strong-winged partridge would fall suddenly upon the ear, where
the slender deer would steal timidly forth to slake its thirst at
the river's brink, or the grim figure of the brown, indolent bear
would appear for an instant through the thick curtain of the
midsummer foliage. There, the maple, the birch, the alder,
and the oak, were all matted together, in intricate luxuriance,
and the hermit would often pause to contemplate some
Laocoon-like
group of mighty trees, entangled, interlaced and suffocated
in the vast coils of some serpent-like grape-vine. A thousand
flowers of brilliant hues, decorated his lonely progress. Immense
fields of the strong and tangled pickerel-weed, with its broad
lotus-like leaves and flaunting flowers, now clogged his pathway;
and now, a multitude of white and fragrant water-lilies
thronging
around his bark, like troops of amorous, odor-breathing
water-nymphs, seemed to woo him to repose. The delicate
arrow-head, with its spikes of pale and tender blossoms, the
intensely brilliant cardinal flower, which looked as if it should
be transplanted to some ancient cathedral window-pane, where
placed upon the bosom of some gorgeous saint, its vivid crimson
should reflect the sunlight for ages; the stately eupatorium, the
fragrant azalea, the gaudy sunflower, and a host of other
nameless
weeds, grew in rank and tangled confusion along the oozy
bank.
The hermit moved slowly along his watery path, solacing
himself
with the accurate observation of nature, which was the
business of his life, ever and anon pausing to cull his simples,
to collect his herbs and flowers, with which his little canoe was
already amply freighted; now losing himself in the vague
reveries
,
which he so dearly loved, and now pausing under the
shadow of some spreading tree, to take from his scrip and hastily
to consume his slender repast.
Thus, upon noiseless wings, flew the golden hours of that
summer's day. Towards nightfall, the solitary had returned
from his excursion, and anchored his bark close to his cottage.
Entering his humble dwelling-place, he busied himself a long
time in assorting the additions which he had that day made to
his collections of natural history. When he was at last wearied
of his task, he knelt down and offered up a prayer of gratitude
of Him who thus sustained his faltering steps in that remote
solitude. He then turned over the leaves of his Bible,
pondering
as he read. The hours stole on, the slow-moving finger
of his clock already pointed to midnight, his eyelids were
already heavy with sleep, when the vast silence around him was
suddenly broken by a fearful shriek. The hermit started to his
feet, the scream seemed to pierce his heart. He burried to the
window and looked out upon the night. All was quiet, serene
and starry. The scream was not repeated, and for an instant
the solitary again strove to persuade himself that he had been
deluded by his imagination. Sleep, however, had been scared
for a season from his eyelids, and he sat listening to the loud
beating of his own heart, and in anxious expectation of a
repetition
of the vision which had once before so much agitated
him.
He was not mistaken. Within a very few minutes, which,
however, had appeared to be ages, there was a noise without as
of a stealthy step. Blaxton sprang to the window again, and, as
he did so, actually confronted the same mournful face, which
had once before visited him at the dead of night. Exactly, as
upon the previous occasion, the vision was of one very dear to
him, who had been long laid in the grave. The beautiful face,
with its deep prophetic eyes, was in startling proximity to his
own, and looked in upon his midnight solitude with an
expression
of terror and of warning. He staggered backwards a few
paces, overcome by the suddenness of the apparition. He
recovered himself, however, very soon, by a powerful effort, but
the face had already vanished from the window. He rushed
from the house into the midnight air, and as he did so, he
distinctly saw a figure gliding among the trees across his lawn.
It seemed to bend its course towards the water's edge, and to
pause when very near the beach. As it paused, Blaxton thought
he heard a repetition of the scream which had at first alarmed
him, but it was so much fainter as to be almost inaudible.
Impelled by an irresistible impulse, he followed unhesitatingly
in the pathway of the mysterious figure, as it rapidly glided
before him. After a moment's pause, however, at a particular
spot upon the beach, the vision seemed suddenly to fade away.
Whether it was a figure of flesh and blood, which had evaded
his pursuit by a sudden retreat through the briery swamp, which
bounded his domain upon the south-west, the hermit could not
tell. In an instant, he had reached the spot where it had
disappeared
,
but he could discover, however eagerly he strained his
eyes in every direction, no further traces of its presence.
While he stood agitated, and pondering upon the meaning of
this second mysterious visitation, he suddenly heard a faint
groan. It seemed to proceed from the ground, and almost from
beneath his feet. He stooped to search in the dim starlight,
and amid the rank grass, for the cause of this singular sound,
when to his astonishment and horror he became aware of the
presence of a corpse lying seemingly stark and stiff almost at
his feet.
There seemed now to be some cause for the various mysteries
which had lately so perplexed him. Why he had been thus
visited, and what was to be the result of these apparitions, he
knew not, but he felt a vague terror taking possession of him,
as he stood there in that midnight solitude, with that ghastly
companion.
The phenomena of the heavens which had exerted so keen
an influence upon his imagination, a short time before, he had
in a measure interpreted. The vision of the aerial ships he had
explained by the arrival of the Naumkeak colony soon
afterwards
;
and now it seemed to him that the phantom sword had
portended the scene of violence and bloodshed, which appeared
so recently to have been enacted near his own threshold. His
thoughts, which were wandering into infinite space, were,
however
,
suddenly recalled to earth again, by a repetition of the
groan. His sympathies were at once aroused, and bending over
the prostrate form of Maudsley, he discovered, by the faint
beating of his heart, that life was not wholly extinct. Without
hesitating any longer, and exerting all his strength, he lifted
the body from the ground, and bore it with difficulty to his
cottage.
CHAPTER IX.
ENDICOTT AT NAUMKEAK.
Many
weeks had passed away. It was now early in
November
,
and the hundred emigrants who, two months before had
arrived with Governor Endicott in the good ship Abigail, were
now established at Naumkeak. That narrow tongue of land,
covered with thick forests up to that epoch, and tenanted only
by the two or three scattered families, of whom these pages have
already spoken, had already undergone a considerable change.
Walter Ludlow's solitary residence was now upon the skirts
of a little village. It was, to be sure, a village of but a dozen
thatched and mud-walled hovels, and had been constructed with
great rapidity during the autumn, that the emigrants might
have some refuge against the rigors of their first Massachusetts
winter.
Although the coming winter had allowed, as yet, but few
prognostics of its severity to be felt, although the climate still
seemed tolerably mild, yet the sufferings of the settlers had already
begun. The scurvy raged among them like a pestilence, fevers
and inflammatory disorders, induced by low diet and exposure
to a new and treacherous climate, had already assaulted almost
every family, and in the immediate future the icy spectre of the
approaching winter, the gaunt image of impending famine, rose
before them, not like threatening phantoms, but as terrible
realities.
In the centre of the little extemporaneous village, stood a
mansion
of much more considerable dimensions than the huts which
surrounded it. A two-storied house, consisting of a skeleton of
timber-work, filled in with bricks, and having a projecting roof,
which was covered with red tiles, was the most prominent object
upon the clearing. The materials out of which this edifice had
been constructed had been brought from Cape Ann.
Within the lower apartment of that dwelling were assembled
several persons of grave and earnest appearance. A frugal
midday
meal had just been partaken of by the company, who were
of both sexes, and a conversation upon serious and important
matters had succeeded to the repast. At the upper end of the
board sat a person of striking appearance; and yet he was
neither handsome in countenance nor commanding in figure.
The man was a little under middle age and a little above middle
stature. He wore a Geneva skull-cap, a doublet of dark-colored
serge, with a broad linen collar falling over it, and other
habiliments
of so grave a character, that he might have been easily taken
for a clergyman, had it not been observed that his hand rested
habitually and rather caressingly upon the iron handle of his long
rapier, and had not the bold expression of his features and the
restless glancing of his eye, forbidden the supposition. The
lines of his face were stern and energetic, but somewhat harsh
and heavy. The short grizzly locks, the heavy moustache
and chin-beard of iron grey, the decided brow, the inflexible
mouth, were all expressive of command. It was the
physiognomy
rather of a man of action, than of a profound thinker,
and yet there was much in its character which was deliberate,
earnest and imposing. Altogether, the whole appearance of
the personage who sat at the head of that humble board, gave
assurance of a man.
This was Captain John Endicott, the man who had been
intrusted
by the newly organized Massachusetts company with the
command of the first emigration, and who had thus far wisely
and resolutely conducted their affairs.
You understand me then, thoroughly, Master Conant, said
VOL. II. 10
he, addressing a grave and hardy looking personage who sat near
him, who was the most prominent of the few brave and
persevering
settlers who had preceded Endicott's arrival at Naumkeak.
You understand my views, and that of the company whom I
represent, entirely?
Truly, Master Endicott, I think we have at last arrived
at a settlement of all disputes, replied Conant, and I rejoice
that all our differences are fairly healed.
The company, which has been organized for a great and
sacred purpose, is determined to send hither none but pious,
orderly
and energetic men, continued Endicott; and to send no
idle drones, neither to permit any such to remain within the
limits of their patent.
I believe you have effectually destroyed one nest of hornets,
answered Conant, by your late expedition across the bay.
Aye, there needed but little deliberation to crush such a
swarm of caterpillars, answered Endicott, and I am truly
beholden
to our neighbors of Plymouth, and to their trusty captain,
Master Standish, for his well executed capture of the master
mischief-maker of that ungodly crew. How called you him,
Master Conant?
Thomas Morton, sometime a pettifogger of Furnival's Inn,
replied Conant, and lately principal Master of Misrule at the
place he has profanely denominated Merry-Mount.
And which is henceforth to be denominated Mount Dagon,
answered Endicott. The vile reveller is disposed of, and the
places that knew him shall know him no more. I have dispersed
his infamous crew, and have cut down the idolatrous May-pole,
with which he dared to profane this pure and sacred wilderness.
Aye, said Conant, it was almost your first deed in New
England, and a worthy commencement of your career. The
place was a den of infamy, and a rallying point for loose
vagabonds
and peace-breakers, for hundreds of miles around.
I had a deeper motive even than the promotion of peace and
order, by my immediate invasion of Mount Dagon, said
Endicott
.
I am now awaiting instructions from the company,
touching
many matters. I am, however, already enjoined to assume
immediate possession of all the important points, particularly the
maritime points, within the patent, and to expel, at once, all
persons
who are not instantaneously obedient to my authority.
These orders I intend to execute, and promptly too, he
concluded
,
slightly pounding the floor with his sword as he spoke.
The expedition of the three Spragues is, I believe, already
successful, said Conant.
It is so, said Endicott. It was all-important to occupy the
peninsula of Mishawum, both from its natural advantages, and
because it is the key to the whole portion of the territory claimed
by a busy faction in England, which is adverse to the company.
The three brothers have acted promptly. They found a solitary
tenant upon the peninsula, a loose, depraved fellow, they tell me,
Walford by name, and a blacksmith by trade. Do you chance
to know him, Master Conant?
I know but little concerning him, was the reply; a
bold fellow enough, and a hardy pioneer, but restless, I
believe
,
and uncomfortable, and more than all, a boon
companion
of Master Morton. What said he to the Spragues?
He said nothing to the Spragues, answered Endicott,
saving that the peninsula of Mishawum belonged to him, both
by right of occupation, and by grant from the lawful
possessors
of the soil. He refused to acknowledge the authority of
the Massachusetts Company, or to have any dealings whatever
with us.
He claims the peninsula of Mishawum under lease from one
Oldham, said Walter Ludlow, who was present at the meeting,
but who had not yet spoken.
Oldham, Walford, Morton, and howsoever else they may
be called, answered Endicott, are all but creatures of the
Gorges family. 'T is a proud and powerful race, and their chief,
or rather the most energetic among them, is Sir Ferdinando
Gorges. He is known to have many agents scattered about in
the wilderness, under assumed names, and please God, I intend
to scatter them all to the four winds. For what said Moab unto
the elders of Midian: `This company shall lick up all that are
round about us, as the ox licketh up the grass of the field.'
There may yet be trouble from the efforts of John Oldham,
who hath so lately gone for England, resumed Roger Conant.
Never fear, Master Conant, answered the governor, the
charter is as good as passed; but there is one measure now in
contemplation, which is likely to assure the prosperity of the
colony beyond all peradventure, and to place it entirely above
all the efforts of its enemies.
And what may that be? asked several of the company in
a breath.
It is yet a profound secret in England, answered Endicott,
but I see no reason why it should be not confided to our discreet
and trustworthy associates here. Know, then, that it is
contemplated
by many of the most eminent and most wealthy members
of the Massachusetts Company in England, not only to embark
a portion of their worldly goods in this adventure, but to do a
far greater thing.
And that is to visit the country in person, perhaps? said
Conant.
Aye, to visit the country, answered Endicott, and to
leave their own forever. If the effort to obtain the charter be
successful, of which I entertain not a doubt, the next move will
be to obtain, either silently or explicitly, the royal permission to
transplant that very charter to the wilderness. In case the right
is obtained, a large number stand engaged to transplant
themselves
hither. The worthy Winthrop, of Suffolk, hath
resolved
,
in this event, to convert his manor of Groton into
money, and to embark with all his family and all his worldly
goods for America. Many of the Lincolnshire folk have taken
the same resolution.
These be good tidings indeed, said Conant and others,
and I rejoice as unfeignedly as even you could do. Truly,
when I first heard of the formation of the new company, my mind
did much misgive me, whether we old planters might not be
likely to suffer some injustice at their hands. Thanks to your
upright and Christian conduct, however, Master Endicott, we
have exchanged the spirits of heaviness for the garments of joy.
The conversation now turned on many local topics. The
arrangements to be made by the company touching land
allotments
,
ministers' support, and the beaver monopoly were
discussed
,
upon all which points Endicott made satisfactory
statements
to the old planters.
And pray, Master Governor, said a withered little old man,
who sat near Roger Conant, doth the company reserve to
itself likewise a monopoly of tobacco?
No, Goodman Musselthwaite, answered Endicott,
although
the company disapprove of the planting; firstly, because
they do account it a pernicious weed, and secondly, because the
profits upon it are likely to be but small; yet they are disposed to
be indulgent in this respect to the old settlers, if tobacco
planting
be by them considered necessary to their proper sustenance
and comfort.
Aha! this is, indeed, generous and equitable, said
Goodman
Musselthwaite, whipping out a tobacco pipe as he spoke,
which he proceeded very deliberately to light. Tobacco,
worthy Master Governor, is meat, drink, and feather-beds to us
rusty old pioneers of the wilderness. Without tobacco, look ye,
it is hard to be fat and comfortable, with one's head upon the
same pillow with a wild cat's.
10*
Or with tobacco either, returned Endicott, looking gravely
at the parched and shrivelled physiognomy of the old planter;
howbeit, the company hath determined to forbid the cultivation
of the weed to all, save only the old planters. They are to be
permitted to raise the vegetable for their own consumption and
for exportation, but it is upon no account to be sold within the
limits of the patent, being considered by the government of the
company as contrary to good health and good morals.
Truly, you surprise me, worthy Master Governor,
ejaculated
Goodman Musselthwaite, with a whiff of astonishment and
tobacco smoke  I regret to learn at this time and season, that
my health and morals are in so perilous a condition, for I could
find it easier in my heart to forswear board and lodging than my
tobacco-pipe.
Forgive me, Goodman Musselthwaite, returned Endicott,
I am enjoined to forbid the use of the weed to the new comers
only, saving and excepting ancient men, and such others as may
through illness occasionally require it.
I hold that the company is wise in these regulations, replied
Roger Conant, and I am well pleased that you have been
enjoined to have regard to the private morals and manners of
the colonists, the rather that such things have necessarily been
much neglected in this wilderness.
Ye can assist me in many respects therein, answered
Endicott
.
Observe well the morals of those in your immediate
neighborhood. See that no loose habits be tolerated for an
instant. Govern all the sinfully inclined with a rod of iron.
Smite them hip and thigh. Above all, tolerate no new-fangled
heresies in religious matters. We have sought the wilderness
to build up altars upon the true and only model. Demolish all
other altars, should any such be raised.
The company, then, said Walter Ludlow, are not
inclined
,
I perceive, to a toleration of the various forms of the
Christian religion.
May God, in his infinite mercy, forbid, thundered Endicott,
indignant at the very idea of toleration. I tell ye all that there
is but one road to heaven, but ten thousand ones to hell. All
they who live under my authority, please God, shall travel the
right path. We have not undertaken this great business that
we might erect a general haberdashery shop, where every
canting
coxcomb or fribbling madam might purchase a new
fashioned
religion every day to suit their sickly fancy. No, Master
Ludlow; keep a strict watch upon the restive imaginations and
frothy consciences of the novelty seekers. Cooper them up,
and that roundly and soundly, my worthy friends, with the
strong hoops of comfortable coercion. Otherwise, these
effervescent
and yeasty consciences will explode every day, to the
manifest detriment of our infant commonwealth.
And so I understand, said Ludlow, that you hold by the
Geneva creed, and that you are not inclined to recognise
fellowship
any longer with the Church of England.
Most truly, replied Endicott, with continued sternness of
manner, and of all matters which do most move my spleen,
Master Ludlow, the chief is that mischievous vice which men
call toleration. No, no, my good friend, tolerate me no
toleration
.
Put the noses of all recusants to the grindstone, and
sharpen them, if you can, till they have a keener scent for the
road which leadeth to heaven. If that will not serve their turn,
why, even grind them off as soon as may be.
A general approval of these sentiments, so dogmatically laid
down by the doughty governor, was manifested by a grave
shaking of heads and wagging of beards, by his sad garmented,
earnest looking companions.
CHAPTER X.
THE PESTILENCE.
There
was a slight pause in the conversation, during which
a person entered the room, and whispered to Endicott, and then
to Esther Ludlow, who had been sitting all this time, listening in
attentive silence to what was going forward. As soon as the
person had communicated his message, she arose from her seat,
and quietly left the room.
A shade passed over the stern brow of the governor, and his
iron features seemed to be moved by a momentary convulsion.
The emotion, however, whatever it was, seemed to be instantly
suppressed, and he shortly afterwards resumed his conversation
with his companions.
Look ye, Master Conant, and you, Master Ludlow, said he,
these be blank register books, which, at the company's request,
I propose shall be kept in every family of the colony. I
purpose
to appoint an overseer to each family, whose duty it shall
be to keep an authentic history of each day's business.
Idleness
is the mother of mischief, Master Ludlow, and I mean that
every hour of every day shall be chronicled, with the
employment
and the amount of work of each member of each family,
from the father down to the youngest child. I purpose that
every child born in the colony shall be brought up to some
useful
occupation, whereby he will be more likely to obey his
spiritual
instructors, and to walk in the way of the Lord. I intend,
by means of these registers, that the governor and the council
shall at any moment be able to read the lives and the characters
of every man, woman or child, who live under their authority.
Thus shall the patriarchal days of the old world be restored, and
sin, thus busily watched for, shall be scared out of our infant
community.
So saying, the governor gravely distributed to Conant,
Ludlow
and to others, whom he had appointed overseers, the
registers
,
in which the history of the little colony was thus minutely
and daily to be recorded.
I believe, continued he, that the objects of our present
meeting, which were duly to discuss all matters which might
create difference between the old planters and the new, have at
last been satisfactorily adjusted.
Even so, answered Conant, the company hath been wise
and fortunate, both in their prudent resolutions, and in their
selection of so discreet and upright an agent as Master
Endicott
.
I furthermore propose, said the governor, in view of this
peaceful settlement of all difficulties, of this happy termination
of all heart-burnings between the new comers and their
predecessors
,
to baptize this spot of the wilderness by a new name.
Nahumkeak is its present denomination, in the barbarous
language
of a barbarous people.
So is it called, replied Walter Ludlow, but I am inclined
to believe that the term, even like these wandering tribes
themselves
,
is of Hebrew origin. I am not altogether unskilled in
that tongue, in which the blessed Scriptures were first
promulgated
,
and I find there an apt and happy derivation for the word
by which this wilderness spot hath hitherto been known.
And what may that be, Master Ludlow? asked the
Governor.
Nahumkeak, continued Ludlow, deriveth plainly from
two Hebrew words, which, being interpreted, signify the haven
or the bosom of consolation, and a pleasanter or more
prophetic
designation than this, I could not desire for our new
settlement.
And so think I, said Roger Conant, and I confess a
desire to retain the term endeared to us by a long period of
suffering.
Nevertheless, I propose to change it, returned Endicott, in
a somewhat peremptory and arbitrary manner, and henceforth
I propose that it shall be called the City of Salem, in memory
of the covenant of peace, this day concluded between the new
comers and the ancient planters. `In Salem is my tabernacle,
and in Zion is my dwelling-place, saith the Lord.'
Be it as you will, said Ludlow, although I should be
even as well contented to know my old resting-place by its old
name.
I could be as well content likewise, said Conant, and do
desire to have no hand in changing its appellation.
Nevertheless
,
I say with Master Ludlow, be it as you will. Peace is, at
least, happily established among us.
And therefore shall it be commemorated by this new and
sacred name, said the governor, and so no more of these
matters.
Verily, said the withered little man, who had been puffing
his pipe in solemn silence, during this long session, and whose
voice now sounded like the boding raven's, verily, I marvel
that ye should discuss the prospects of this little colony so
closely. The pestilence walketh among us by noon-day, and
assuredly the ill-starred colony must perish speedily.
I tell thee, man, that this colony shall never perish!
thundered Endicott, striking the ground fiercely with his sword,
as he spoke. No, although, as in Egypt of old, there be not
a house where there is not one dead. No, let the pestilence
stride among us, let the grave yawn and swallow us. Still shall
this goodly work go on, for the finger of the Lord is in it. I
fear not the savage, nor the winter, nor the pestilence, and
under God, I have sworn to fulfil the sacred trust reposed in
me. I, even I, with the blessed Redeemer's help, will sustain
this tottering load, and may this right arm be withered, bone,
marrow, and muscle, if it doth not cheerily bear up the load
imposed upon it, so long as this heart of mine beateth within
my bosom.
The stern and choleric Puritan strode forth into the middle of
the apartment, as he spoke, and looked around him with flashing
eyes. His rude but impressive figure seemed to dilate into
colossal proportions, as he stood in the centre of that earnest
group, looking and speaking almost like an inspired prophet.
Stern, sudden, choleric, but earnest, undaunted, untiring, he
seemed more like Joshua, the son of Nun, rebuking his faltering
followers, and invigorating them with his own overflowing
inspiration
,
than like a mortal of earth's mould.
What tell you me of famine, of pestilence, of danger? he
continued. I tell you, man, that my people shrink not, for
the Lord sustaineth them, and the road to heaven is no nearer
from their fathers' graves, than from these frozen deserts. But
should their hearts faint by the wayside, should they cry to
me, even as the children of Israel cried unto Moses, saying,
because there were no graves in Egypt hast thou taken us away to
die in this wilderness; even then do I feel that within me, which
could lift them up from the sloughs of despair, and sustain their
footsteps even till they reached the firm ground.
The withered little old planter, somewhat abashed by this
burst of fierce enthusiasm, which his observation about the
pestilence had elicited, seemed desirous of withdrawing himself
from observation beneath the smoke-cloulds which he furiously
emitted from his pipe. In the mean time Conant, looking
respectfully towards the governor, observed,
Since the subject hath been mentioned, let me express my
deep regret, that the worthy Dame Endicott should be, even
now, dangerously ill with the fever, which hath made such havoc
in the colony.
Aye, replied Endicott, calmly, the wife of my youth is
stricken, I fear me she is sick even unto death, but God in
his mercy may yet withdraw this cup of bitterness. Her
sufferings
are, at this moment, but light, and an angel from heaven,
even now, is ministering at her bedside.
What mean you, Master Endicott? asked Conant, in some
surprise, and as if he believed the governor's mind bewildered
by the stern suppression of his natural emotion.
I mean, said Endicott, speaking with some difficulty, for
his voice seemed choked at times, in spite of his sternness,
I mean that her sufferings seem at the moment light, and that
all which could be done by the gentle hand of woman, to
alleviate
pain, is rendered to her hourly by one who seemeth to me to
walk among us more like an angel than a woman. I need
scarcely add, Master Ludlow, that I speak of your sister.
The brother was already gone, but Brackenbury spoke,
You may well say, Master Endicott, that she seemeth more
like an angel than a woman, for it hath, truly, often seemed to
me, that she must possess powers greater than human, to sustain
herself amid the trials and the dangers to which she hourly
exposes her life. Since this fearful pestilence first began to
rage among us, she hath been untiring. Not a cold hearth but
hath been warmed, not a starving family but hath been fed from
her bounty, not a bedside at which she hath not ministered.
Providence hath been more bountiful in worldly goods to Master
Ludlow and his kindred, than to most of the indwellers of the
wilderness, but Esther Ludlow holdeth her substance as a
sacred trust from the Almighty, and dispenseth it accordingly.
And may the blessings of those who were nigh to perish,
descend upon her head! said Endicott. Who dares murmur,
when this fair and feeble creature alone seemeth endowed with
strength enough to sustain, upon her own shoulders, so heavy a
burthen of suffering and sorrow? Were I to be struck down in
the midst of my followers, she alone, would be more than
sufficient
to uphold and to comfort the people, and with her own
weak hand, directed by the Lord, to establish them beyond all
peradventure in this goodly land.
The company now began to separate, each gravely saluting
the governor as he departed. Endicott followed the last guest
to the door of his dwelling-place, and walked forward a few
steps upon the clearing. As he stood, musing and solitary, at a
short distance from his door-step, a young man, who was one of
the recently arrived colonists, saluted him.
A shrewder atmosphere this, than the air of England, most
worshipful governor, said he, with a certain flippancy of
manner
which jarred upon the ear of the stern Joshua of New
England; and a marvellously sickly climate I fear me. Marry,
if this pestilence continue longer, I shall even leave the dead to
bury their dead, and take shipping for England.
The governor suddenly turned upon his complaining follower,
and his eye flashed with indignation as he spoke.
Peace, Master Crowther, he cried, imperiously; such
peevish repinings vex me to the soul. I had hoped that the
grain had been well winnowed and sifted before we took this
goodly work in hand; but I find, to my sorrow, that there are
still some grains of worthless chaff left in the bushel.
If your worship meaneth to reproach me as being the chaff
in the bushel, replied the young man, with increased pertness
of demeanor, I could be well contented to be cast unto the
wind, so that it might blow me over the seas to merry England
again. Marry, chaff or wheat, I have at least been well ground
between the upper and nether millstones of famine and
pestilence
,
like the rest of your misguided followers.
Peace, babbler, I say! thundered the governor, deeply
incensed, both at the pusillanimity of his follower, of which he
had been for some time aware, and of his disrespectful bearing.
VOL. II. 11
Think not that ye shall find let or hindrance from me. I will
myself provide shipping for all the chicken-livered dullards
whose cowardly stomachs yearn already for the fleshpots of
Egypt.
Beshrew me, most worshipful governor, said Crowther,
but it seemeth to me, that one who is so unlucky as to find
himself, against his will, in the midst of tribulation and scurvy,
might be at least spared such scurvy language. Why, pray
thee, am I to be so sternly rebuked?
For three different reasons, young man, replied the sturdy
governor, each of which is enow to prevent all friendly
converse
between us two at this moment. First, because thy
cowardly desertion of a good cause, into which thou rather
forcedst thyself than wert chosen, hath moved my indignation.
Secondly, because thy insolence, in the presence of thy
magistrate
,
deserveth chastisement. Thirdly, because the very hair
of thy head witnesseth against thee, and with its preposterous
and womanish length, arouses my anger. Did not the holy
apostles, long ago, forbid such sinful bedecking of the head?
Know ye not that the longest hair hides ever the emptiest
brain?
Marry, good Master Governor, said Crowther, somewhat
provoked in his turn, at the rebuke thus roundly administered to
him; I am yet to learn that the Lord hath especially
commissioned
thee to superinted the decking of our outward man, or
that any such authority hath been granted by the company. I
understand thoroughly, however; thy aversion to long hair.
Men say thou wert educated as a surgeon, a barber-surgeon, and
doubtless thy fingers and scissors itch for the handling of our
hair.
For the cropping of thy ears, insolent whelp! muttered
Endicott, repressing by a strong effort his indignation at the
increasing insolence of his companion.
We have all our aversions, good Master Endicott,
continued
Crowther, with arms akimbo. You cannot abide a head of
flowing locks. For me, a grizzled moustachio is a nuisance, I
cannot away with .
More had the flippant Crowther, perhaps, spoken in this vein,
had not the choleric governor, inflamed beyond all bearing by
this last sally, suddenly dealt him a swinging box on the ear.
The young man; stunned as well as surprised by this unexpected
buffet, which the governor did not vouchsafe to accompany with
a single word of explanation, measured his length upon the
grass. Upon recovering his consciousness and perpendicular
position, he ventured to suggest, but in a marvellously
discomfited
and crest-fallen tone, that this was a kind of treatment to
which he was unaccustomed, and which he considered
thoroughly
unbecoming upon the part of the chief magistrate of the
colony.
Get home, Master Malapert, thundered the governor in
reply, cutting short all further remonstrances, get home upon
the instant, or I promise thee that within fifteen minutes shall a
pair of stocks be constructed, and that thou shalt have the honor
of sitting in them for the first time, and every day hereafter,
until thou learnest a proper respect for thy superiors. Haddest
thou tarried at Jericho till thine own beard was grown, thou
wouldest have had less occasion to insult the grey hairs of thy
elders, and the colony would have been well rid of a drone.
The governor concluded with a peremptory gesture, at which
the discomfited Crowther sneaked away without any further
observations. Endicott remained standing upon the spot for a
few minutes, and began to rebuke himself severely. He was a
man of quick temper, accustomed to military command,
requiring
implicit obedience, bigoted in his religious opinions, but
of indomitable courage and great sagacity. Such a man of
iron, rigid, unyielding, incisive character was, perhaps, the true
and only instrument by which the first foundations of the Puritan
commonwealth could have been hewn out in that stern and
rocky wilderness.
After rebuking himself, more perhaps than he deserved, for
the excess into which his warm temper had carried him, his
mind reverted to his wife, who had followed his fortunes with
the unshrinking fortitude which distinguished so many Puritan
matrons of that day, but whose tender frame was evidently
sinking under her situation. He had watched by her couch
with a tenderness such as could hardly have been looked for
beneath that rigid exterior; and his labors had been alleviated,
as we have seen, by the assiduity of Esther Ludlow. He
returned
pensively towards his home, and, with a slow step, ascended
to the chamber where the sufferer lay.
It was a low, mean room, with one small window. The floor
as well as the walls were of rough planks, and the scanty
furniture
,
as well as the equipments of the humble couch where the
dying woman reposed, were of the humblest description. The
private apartment of that Puritan governor was not luxurious.
It was almost squalid, although in the best and fairest house of
the village, and looked more like the den of a starving pauper
than the chamber of a magistrate. Some large logs were
smouldering
upon the hearth, which, as the only window was
darkened
by a cloak which had been pinned against it, diffused a
dim and solemn light throughout the room.
Upon a rude block of wood, close by the pillow of the sufferer,
sat Esther Ludlow, her eyes overflowing with silent tears. There
sat that fair Puritan, over whose head there almost seemed a halo,
a visible emblem consecrating the presence where all that is most
gentle and heroic in woman, seemed embodied. Endicott entered
the apartment noiselessly, and paused for an instant upon the
threshold. A tear trickled down his iron cheek as he looked
towards the rude pallet, where she, who had forsaken all to follow
him into that desert, now lay struggling with death. The mortal
reward which she had reaped for her devotion, was a few months
of sorrow, and a death in the wilderness. But to the exalted
enthusiasm of Endicott, as confident in the shadowy compact
which he had long since made with the ruling power of the
universe
,
as in his agreements with his terrestial employers, a
crown of glory seemed already descending upon her head.
Esther put her finger softly upon her lips, as soon as she was
aware of his entrance, to indicate that the weary sufferer was
asleep. He fell upon his knees in silent, fervent prayer. Life
was still fluttering about the feeble heart of the victim.
Motionless
,
upon outspread wings, the death-angel seemed to hover
above her head, lingering, reluctant, as if his purpose had been
changed by the mutely-appealing, protective form of Esther.
11*
CHAPTER XI.
THE WARNING.
Late
in that November afternoon, Esther Ludlow walked
from the governor's house towards her own home. Dame
Endicott
still lingered, but in a hopeless and insensible state, and
Esther, whose rude but commodious dwelling-place had for some
weeks been converted into a hospital for the many exiles, whom
the pestilence and famine had stricken, now bent her steps
homewards
to fulfil her duties there.
She had, herself, recently dispatched a messenger to
Plymouth
,
who bore a letter from Endicott to Governor Bradford,
praying that the services of the worthy and eminent Doctor
Fuller
,
who had already rendered signal services, during similar
afflictions in the older colony, might be extended to the suffering
colonists of Naumkeak. In the mean time the whole
superintendence
of this hospital devolved upon her brother and herself.
The enthusiasm of Esther sustained her in these dark hours.
She flitted among the suffering people like an angel of mercy,
shedding blessings from her wings. She had at last found her
sphere. The vision which had been displayed before her exalted
imagination so long, seemed at last to change to reality. The
foundation of that great religious asylum beyond the sea, seemed,
al last, securely laid. Not appalled by the gloom which hung
over the birth-day of the colony, not daunted by the dangers
which rose like spectres along its course, she felt her heart beat
high within her as she contemplated the sublime motives, the
unwavering courage, of the leaders of the undertaking. She
rejoiced that Providence had at last revealed to her a mode in
which she might prove, otherwise than in idle rhapsodies, her
deep devotion to the cause which had led her and her brother
into the wilderness. She rejoiced that her comparatively wealthy
condition, and her habituation to the climate, enabled her to
render essential services to those starving, perishing martyrs.
Charity, in marble or on canvass, is an attractive, adorable
image, but the exercise of the virtue in reality, and in detail, is
far less picturesque. Esther was true to her mission, which she
felt had been intrusted to her by the hand of the Lord. She
never faltered, she never repined, not a cloud obscured the
brightness of her face, which diffused a radiance around the
gloomy hovels where she was a daily visitant, and where to many
a weary soul she seemed like one clad in the shining garments
of a better world.
Yet she had sorrows of her own, and her heart was sad
when she thought of Henry Maudsley. To her it seemed that
they were hopelessly separated. She had not seen him, she had
heard no tidings of him since that inexplicable interview in
which he had heaped so many wild and incoherent reproaches
upon her, and in which he had thrown around her neck the
chain, of which he had possessed himself in so mysterious a
manner. She supposed that he had already crossed the ocean,
never to look upon her face again, and that he believed her
fickle, deceitful, capricious. As she thought of this, as she
thought how incapable he had proved himself of reading her
soul, as she remembered the stinging words, more poisonous
than adders', with which he had tortured her when last they met,
her proud soul mounted, indignant and resentful, to a height
from which she looked down with pity upon one so perverse and
so misguided. And yet she could not but acknowledge, in her
heart of hearts, that life had forever lost its brightness, and that
a portion of her soul was withering never to blossom again.
Brooding over these melancholy thoughts, Esther strayed
pensively homewards. The twilight was gathering, and she had
already left the last hovel behind her, which intervened between
the little village and her own abode, when as she passed
beneath the branches of the vast pine trees which skirted her
own domain, she felt a sudden, but gentle touch upon the
shoulder. She turned quickly around, feeling but slight alarm,
for she supposed herself probably accosted by one of the
settlers
,
when to her surprise she beheld a person whom she had
certainly never seen before, and who, at least by that dim and
uncertain light, seemed hardly human. A withered, leathern,
apish, malicious face, lighted by two sparkling, toad-like eyes,
a supple, lithe, baboon-like figure, whose restless and erratic
movements seemed altogether involuntary, were the
characteristics
of the personage who now presented himself to her
astonished eyes. As soon as this extraordinary creature found
that he had attracted her attention, he suddenly threw a
somerset
high in the air, and alighting upon one leg, he thrust
forth a carefully sealed packet in his brown and shriveled
paw. As Esther, manifesting considerable repugnance and
alarm, seemed reluctant to take the letter, and anxious to make
her escape, the creature suddenly gibbered out, in a shrill voice,
the name of Henry Maudsley. As the loved name struck her
ear, Esther instinctively reached forth her hand and snatched
the packet, whereupon the singular creature uttered a chuckling
laugh, threw another somerset, and disappeared in the thicket.
As soon as her strange companion, who was no other than Peter
Cakebread, had taken his departure in this whimsical manner,
Esther hastened to her own cottage, tore the seals from the
mysterious packet, and read, by the light of a pine torch, the
following lines:
A fearful danger is impending over thee, Esther. Thine
own hand only can avert the blow. One who hath no further
claim upon thy heart, hath yet sworn to devote his life, if
necessary
,
to solve the mystery which envelopes at this moment thine
own destiny and his. But all efforts will be fruitless, if these
words do not alarm thee. I know, I deplore the infatuation
which hath involved thy fate with the fortunes of a nameless
adventurer. I bid thee most solemnly now, in this my
farewell
missive, to beware of him, Shun him as thou wouldest
perdition. Power or right to say more at this present, I have
not. Within a few days, I purpose to take shipping for
England
,
with but one purpose in view, to enable myself to solve
my own doubts, and to arm myself with authority to tear off the
garments which disguise a hypocrite, a villain, and a malefactor.
Think not that wounded pride or petty jealousy dictate my
course. No, Esther, thou wilt not judge me thus harshly.
Were I doomed to perish at this hour, still, with my latest
breath would I implore thee to break forever from the meshes
which surround thee, before thy destruction be accomplished.
One word more, and I have finished. To thy loyalty I trust
that this communication may be buried in oblivion, and that no
living being hear from thy lips of my existence, either in this
wilderness or in the world.
Henry Maudsley
.
CHAPTER XII.
THE PLOTS OF CAKEBREAD.
The
solitude of Shawmut had not yet been invaded by any
detachment from Endicott's colony. Although the brothers
Sprague had already established themselves in the neighboring
promontory of Mishawum, where, until their arrival, the burly
blacksmith had dwelt in undisturbed repose, yet the hermit
Blaxton still maintained himself upon his beautiful peninsula.
He had, however, for many weeks past had a companion.
We have seen at what a critical moment he had found Henry
Maudsley. The hermit's skill in pharmacy, aided by the
vigorous
constitution of the wounded youth, had at last frustrated the
malice of Sir-Christopher Gardiner. The knight, never
doubting
of his death, had been withheld by a feeling not natural to
him, but which, for particular considerations, was an
overpowering
one in this case, from putting foot upon the peninsula. The
corpse of his victim, lying unburied upon that solitary beach,
was a sight from which he shrank. Although, at times, he felt
disposed to summon up his old energy, and to laugh down his
compunctious visitings, yet he was after all forced to submit to
what seemed a decree of destiny. However much he essayed
to conquer his repugnance, however important it had been at
times for him to visit Blaxton, still would the spectre of the
murdered Maudsley rise up before him, and scare him from his
purpose. The reasons, which so excited his imagination, will
be more fully developed hereafter.
Maudsley still lived, however, and after many struggling
weeks, during which his life had been trembling daily and
hourly in the balance, he had at last recovered.
It was a singular dispensation which had placed him in
Blaxton's
hands. Had this opportune succor been extended to him
by any other person, the whole wilderness of New England
would have rung with the strange adventure. As it was, no
living soul but himself knew all the circumstances of the case.
His antagonist believed him dead. The Ludlows believed him
in England. Blaxton knew not, for he never inquired in what
manner he had received so desperate a wound. This
indifference
in any other person would have been impossible, in the
hermit it was perfectly natural. His extreme abstraction from
all worldly interests, as well as a singular delicacy which
instinctively
forbade him from intruding upon Maudsley's
confidence
,
had kept him not only silent, but perfectly incurious.
During his patient's convalescence, he had peremptorily refused
to listen to a disclosure, which he saw was offered with a secret
unwillingness, and induced by a feeling of gratitude. The two
companions were thus at once put at their ease, and the cause
of Maudsley's involuntary intrusion upon the hermit's solitude,
was never again alluded to during its continuance. Their
discourse
,
when they did converse, was wholly upon other matters.
The solitary's thoughts, as we know, were discursive, and seldom
closely related to surrounding circumstances, so that during the
protracted period of the wounded man's convalescence, they had
ample opportunity to put many a girdle about the universe, but
were never once in danger of descending to details which might
perhaps have embarrassed Maudsley.
It was one of those exquisite but melancholy mornings which
are sparingly sprinkled through the earlier half of a Massachusetts
November. There was a thin, golden haze in the sky which the
faint breathing of the south-west was not sufficiently powerful
to lift, the water of the western cove sparkled like silver, and
the gently diversified amphitheatre of hills which surrounded it,
was softened by that purple, cloud-like tinge which is so
characteristic
of Italian landscape, and which occasionally usurps the
place of the vitreous and dazzling clearness which more
peculiarly
belongs to American scenery. The woods, with the
exception
of the oaks, where the shrivelled foliage still tenaciously
clung, were leafless and desolate. Gaudy October, with her
robes of a thousand dyes, had vanished, her glittering diadem
lay crushed upon the ground, while sad November, like a grey,
discrowned queen, with pensive brow and mourning weeds and
melancholy pace, followed in the jocund footsteps of her departed
sister.
The dark pines still lifted on high their fadeless plumes, but
throughout the rest of the forest, no living leaf decorated the
bare and skeleton tracery, save the yellow, starry blossoms of
the witch-hazel, that mysterious plant which adorns its leafless
sprays with golden flowers, just at the approach of winter, as if
it loved to decorate the pale and lifeless corpse of nature.
Blaxton held a flowering twig of this weird and singular shrub
in his hand, as he strolled that morning by his forest fountain,
indulging in an erratic conversation with Henry Maudsley.
Inspired
by such an accidental circumstance as this, he could
wander off into illimitable space, torturing the subject of his
observation into a thousand similes.
Observe these golden stars, said he to his companion, who
looked abstractedly at the branch, but whose thoughts were far
away, are they not aptly clustered upon this wizard plant?
'T is fitting that the tree, whose every twig is a divining rod,
able to guide the skilful seeker to mines of unsunned gold,
should wear such golden stars. It wears them in winter, too,
for are not the flowers which blossom in the mine, fadeless?
Do they not smile at winter's impotent cold?
They are indeed pretty flowers, answered Maudsley,
carelessly
,
for his thoughts were upon other matters; I remember
that you informed me of their importance in pharmacy; of their
singular healing properties.
And yet, continued the hermit, who had informed him of
no such thing, but who, as usual, did not hear a syllable that
was addressed to him, and yet is there not a prophetic
warning in this late blossoming? The divining tree puts forth
its flowers when all the gladness of the green earth hath passed
away,  even so do the golden flowers of wealth too often delay
their unfolding till the hair of the seeker is grey, and his blood
cold, and his heart as withered and leafless as this shivering
forest which surrounds us now.
As he spoke, he broke off all the little twigs from the branch
which he held, leaving only a bare and forked stick, the proper
form of the divining rod. Then he began musingly to walk to
and fro about the open glade near the fountain, holding the rod
between the thumbs and fore-fingers of both hands, in an
elevated
position.
The rod, as thou knowest, young stranger, continued the
solitary, who had never yet inquired Maudsley's name and
history
,
about which he was profoundly indifferent, the rod serves
as well to indicate the crystal veins of living water, which fill,
like innocent milk, the maternal bosom of nature, as to direct
the thirsty gold seeker in his feverish pursuit.
The hermit continued gravely pacing to and fro along the
withered turf, holding his divining rod lightly in his hands,
while Maudsley, lost in thought, scarcely attended to what was
passing. At last, the rod which had obstinately maintained its
elevated position, began slowly to turn in his fingers, and after a
little while pointed directly down upon the earth beneath him.
Were I a gold seeker now, said he, standing perfectly still,
and looking contemptuously down upon the spot, to which the
VOL. II. 12
divining rod pointed, I should feel sure that this indication
could not mislead. Thank God, however, I am not a money
digger. In all the vagaries of my useless life, I never sought for
gold. How melancholy, my friend, seems to a contemplative
recluse, the pursuit of wealth. Unhappy the wretch who,
holding
ever a divining rod in his weary hands, pores still with bent
shoulders and aching eyes upon the dark recesses where nature
hides her gold, and never sees the blue sky above him, nor the
bright sunshine, nor the gay flowers which blossom for rich and
poor.
'T is strange, continued he half unconsciously, after a pause,
but the rod hath pointed almost exactly to the little cellarage
where I have buried my iron box of papers. Perhaps Sir
Christopher's
documents which lie with them may be as golden as his
visions. As the solitary thus soliloquized, he tossed away the
twig. Maudsley had not heard his last remark, but finding his
companion silent, was about speaking upon another subject,
when the whimsical figure of Peter Cakebread suddenly
presented
itself.
That respectable and practical individual had evidently heard
the hermit's concluding observations, and very gravely, secretly,
and accurately, took note of the spot, which Blaxton had thus
carelessly indicated. As soon as he had done so, he made a
triumphant leap into the air, and stood for a moment upon his
head, by way of announcing his arrival to Maudsley.
As soon as the hermit became aware of the presence of
this personage, he turned upon his heel, sauntered away in
search of his bull, and was a few minutes afterwards seen
sweeping
through the park at a headlong pace. Maudsley, in the
meantime, eagerly accosted Cakebread, from whom he received
not only an account of the safe delivery of his missive to Esther
Ludlow but also a small parcel of papers, which the messenger
took with a mysterious air from his bosom. A singular expression
passed over Maudsley's countenance as his eye fell upon these
documents, and after a moment's apparent hesitation and
reluctance
he began eagerly to devour their contents.
The respectable Peter Cakebread, as we have omitted to
inform
the reader, had gone into the service of Sir Christopher
Gardiner, after the lamentable overthrow and departure of his
former master, the Lord of Merry-Mount. It will be, however,
remembered, that he had received a certain memorable
flagellation
at the hands of the knight, which a person of his particular
temperament was not likely to forget or forgive. He had,
however
,
entirely dissembled his hatred, in order more fully to gratify
it in the sequel, and he was accordingly very glad, upon the
general
breaking up of the establishment at Merry-Mount, to accept
Sir Christopher's offer of employment.
It is unnecessary to state the details of the manner in which
he was first presented to Maudsley's notice at Shawmut. Suffice
that he had been bound to secrecy by the most cogent of
arguments
,
and that the existence of Maudsley was still quite
unknown
,
as well to Sir Christopher as to every other dweller in
the wilderness.
Peter Cakebread, with the tendency to investigation which
marked his character, had omitted no opportunity, at odd
moments
,
thoroughly to search the house of Gardiner, and in so
doing had discovered many papers which threw some light upon
the private history of the man who had excited his curiosity as
well as his deadly hatred. Although Gardiner had deposited
with Blaxton, some months before this epoch, a large portion of
his important papers and correspondence, yet there were enough
remaining, which related more to his own personal matters, to
excite
if not to gratify the malicious curiosity of Cakebread. It may
be judged with what satisfaction he had heard Blaxton's accidental
remark, although he carefully avoided mentioning the matter at
that moment to Maudsley. Now it chanced that the papers
already found seemed to bear some relation to the Maudsley
family. Having been sent upon an errand to Blaxton, in
consequence of the knight's repugnance to visit Shawmut, he
had been accidentally brought into contact with Henry
Maudsley
,
and had communicated to him a part of the information he
had acquired.
Maudsley would naturally have shrunk with horror from a
surreptitious
examination of papers obtained thus by stealth, even
from one who was his deadly foe. The name of Edith Maudsley
upon one of the documents, however, happened to strike his eye at
the first glance which he threw upon them. Thereafter, and for
very sufficient reasons, he felt no restraint, but without the
slightest
compunction, was ready to plunge, by any means, into the
very heart of the mystery. Still, however, he was doomed to be
baffled, for the information which he gained was but fragmentary
and unsatisfactory. He acquired a clue which led him to some
distance and awakened some deep and decided suspicions, but
still the affair remained perplexed, and the proof incomplete. It
was necessary for him to visit England, immediately and secretly,
to probe the matter to the bottom, and he waited his restoration
to tolerable health and strength with great impatience.
He had, in the solitary perverseness of a jealous and wounded
spirit, thoroughly wrought himself up to a belief in Esther's
infatuation
for the adventurous knight. He felt that she was lost to him,
but his generous nature recoiled from the thought of permitting
her to lose herself forever. But there were other and still more
powerful cords which bound him and the knight in one destiny.
At least his suspicions, founded upon something much stronger
than surmise, were now added to the inexplicable sensations
which the first sight of Sir Christopher had excited in his mind.
As far as he knew, he had never met him in any other part of
the world, and yet there was a mysterious feeling excited by his
presence  a feeling like a dim reminiscence of a previous
existtence
,
for which he could not account, and which, he could not,
by any effort, wholly banish from his imagination. Had he been
acquainted with the connection of the knight with the Gorges
family, he would probably have made much more rapid strides
towards an elucidation of the mysteries, but it so happened
that the documents, heretofore submitted to him, contained
no mention of Sir Ferdinando, and related mostly to a period of
time long past away. Later papers, which very probably might
be in existence, had not yet been found by the diligent
Cakebread
.
Under a full view of the circumstances, therefore, Maudsley
could do no more than write the enigmatical letter to Esther,
previous to his departure to England. To him, henceforth,
Esther was as nothing, but his own honor demanded a thorough
investigation of the character of the person at whose hands, as he
now believed, he had suffered more than one outrage, and whom,
he hoped ere long, to punish as a felon, not as a rival.
Cakebread had informed him of the safe delivery of his
mission
to Esther, and there was now nothing more to detain him
in New England. A small vessel was to depart the next day
from Naumkeak, with a cargo of furs to the company in
England
,
and in that vessel he had determined secretly to embark.
12*
CHAPTER XIII.
THE GRAVE-DIGGER.
All
that day there had been a long, low, purple bank of clouds
brooding along the south-western quarter of the horizon. In
spite of the genial temperature of the atmosphere, and indeed in
consequence of it, Maudsley, who had lived long enough in the
climate to understand its character, knew that a storm, and
probably a heavy snow-storm, was impending.
He had, however, taken leave of his hospitable and eccentric
entertainer soon after the interview with Cakebread, which took
place early in the forenoon, and, assisted by a favoring breeze,
he had made a rapid passage to Naumkeak in Blaxton's little
skiff, which Cakebread was to restore, upon the succeeding day,
to its owner.
It was not his purpose to make his presence known, either to
the Ludlows or to any other of the colonists, and he had already
placed his effects on board the vessel which was to sail for
England
early the following day.
Late in the afternoon he wandered about the woods in the
neighborhood of the little settlement, carefully avoiding the
vicinity of the Ludlows' residence, and concealing himself from
the observation of any casual wayfarer from the village.
The scene was bare and desolate. The short-lived glory of
an Indian summer's morning had long since given place to the
chill, leaden atmosphere of a winter's afternoon. The rising
north-easterly wind sighed mournfully through the leafless forest.
The withered leaves, eddying and whirling with every sudden
gust, swept around him with a ghost-like sound. The dried
branches crackled beneath his foot. The waving branches of
the pine trees sent forth a dirge-like sound, in which he seemed
to hear the requiem of all his earthly hopes. The boding cry of
a sable company of ravens, which were winging their way across
the tree-tops, jarred upon his ear like a funereal wail. A few
flakes of snow were already flitting through the gloomy
atmosphere
,
which was pregnant with the coming tempest. All around
him looked barren, desolate, and in gloomy unison with his own
broken existence and withered hopes.
As if in mockery, it seemed that the example and the
enthusiasm
of Esther had begun to work their natural effect upon his
impressionable temperament, just at the very moment when she
seemed lost to him forever. Bitterly did he reproach himself
now, for the wanton reproaches which he had so profusely
dealt upon her faith, or, as he had then termed it, her
fanaticism
.
Every idle word which he had uttered in his
scornful moods, recurred to his fancy now with vivid
distinctness
.
Each word seemed a scorpion whip, and memory an
avenging fury; and yet it was all too late. Whence, he
thought, except from some juggling fiend, could come these
holy promptings, at a moment when every thing swam around
him, and when his faith in every thing pure and holy was
destroyed by the discovery of Esther's feebleness and falsehood.
It was all a mockery. He beat down the rising feelings of
religious faith, as he would have trampled upon a tempting
demon.
Thoughts like these were whirling through his brain, as he
moved now slowly, now rapidly, through the melancholy woods.
At last, as he approached the verge of the irregular clearing, at
the extremity of which the infant village was situated, he heard
a dull sound, as of an iron instrument striking the frozen turf.
He stepped forward in the direction whence the sound
proceeded
,
and found a solitary individual digging a rude grave.
He gazed upon the scene with a gloomy kind of satisfaction.
The snow was already falling thick and fast, the shades of
evening were prematurely approaching, all nature seemed
arrayed in gloom.
The grave-digger was a thin, feeble figure, and as he ever
and anon laid aside his rusty pickaxe, and struck his arms
to and fro across his breast, to arouse the warmth in his
shivering frame, he looked almost like a shadowy creation of
the fancy. As he resumed his labor again, there seemed
something in his countenance familiar to Maudsley, who
presently
recollected the features of Faint-not Mellowes, the
Suffolkshire
weaver and pilgrim from New Plymouth, whom, as
has appeared in the earlier pages of this history, he had once
rescued from the ruffianly hands of the Merry-Mount crew.
His gloomy task required no little labor, for his arms were
weak and the earth was rigidly frost-bound. It seemed that the
inhospitable wilderness, which had greeted those early pilgrims
with so cold a welcome, and inflicted upon them so many
fearful sufferings, would almost deny to their dead a
resting-place
in its bosom. It was a melancholy scene, in which, at
that moment, Maudsley and the grave-digger were the only
actors. They stood at the edge of a clearing of some twenty
acres, at the opposite extremity of which were huddled together
the few miserable mud-walled and coarsely thatched hovels,
which, with the fair house of the governor, constituted the
village of Naumkeak. A thin wreath of smoke rose above the
forest a little beyond the farthest house, indicating to Maudsley
the hidden residence of her who was all the world to him, and
who yet was lost to him forever.
The ground immediately around him was rough and broken.
Vast, blackened stumps, looking like the tomb-stones of the
forest patriarchs, who had flourished there for centuries,
encumbered
the soil, and among them were thickly strewn the
many recent and rudely finished graves, where the stricken
settlers, day after day, ever since their arrival in that desert,
had come to deposit their dead.
There, in their wild resting-places, hastily and scantily
hidden from the prowling wolf, slept those early victims, those
obscure but unforgotten martyrs. The soil of the wilderness
was already hallowed ground, and if England contained the
ashes of their forefathers, New England already held the green
graves of those who had been nearer and dearer to them.
Maudsley looked on for a few moments in silence, and then
stepping forward, he gently saluted the grave-digger,
'T is sorry weather, Goodman Mellowes, for so melancholy
a task as that which occupies you, said he, and your strength
seems hardly sufficient to accomplish it.
Mellowes desisted from his labor, and stared, with marks of
great surprise, at the individual who thus suddenly addressed
him.
Verily, verily, said he at last, thou hast caused me to
drink of the wine of astonishment. Lo! is it not Master
Maudsley
who saluteth me?
Most truly, answered Maudsley, but in what respect is
my appearance so astounding?
Verily, I did opine that you had long since returned to the
flesh-pots of Egypt, answered Faint-not  and yet do you
now present yourself to me thus suddenly in fleshly garb, but
pale and haggard, and rather resembling a visitant from the land
of spirits than the stalwart youth whom I do remember some
months ago.
I have been indisposed of late to be sure, answered
Maudsley
,
but I hardly thought that I wore such a death's head upon
my shoulders, that even the Naumkeak grave-digger would
shrink from my society. But be of good heart, my worthy
friend, I am neither ghost nor goblin, and furthermore, rest
assured that you at least shall not have the task, which seems no
trifling one, of digging a grave for me in this wilderness,
inasmuch
as I purpose to effect my retreat before that last friendly
office shall be necessary.
Alas! worthy master, replied the weaver, I regret that thy
heart hath not been regenerated, that thou mightest know how
sweet is the indwelling of the Holy Ghost in a justified person.
But while I am prating thus, my work languisheth; lo, Iam
forgetful
.
So saying, the grave digger again applied himself to his
task.
My friend, said Maudsley, after looking compassionately
at the feeble Faint-not's painful efforts, let me prove to you
that my frame is not so exhausted as you think. Give me your
instrument, and with your permission, I will even assist you in
hollowing out this trench. A grave in this wilderness will be a
quiet resting-place enow, even if an unregenerate hand hath
helped to dig it.
Notwithstanding the remonstrances of Goodman Mellowes, who
was, however, nearly fatigued and not unwilling to be relieved
of a portion of his labor, Maudsley took the spade and pick-axe,
and steadily set himself to his voluntary task. There was a
nameless instinct which impelled him to the work, besides a
simple and good natured desire to lighten the load of the weary
Mellowes.
I regret, worthy master, said the weaver, continuing his
conversation, as he stood upon the outside of the grave and
occasionally
directed the labor of his companion  I regret, in very
sooth, that thy heart is, as thou callest it, still unregenerate. I
do remember me full well, how, and where, and at what very
moment, the Lord was graciously pleased to reveal himself to
me. It was of an October evening, five years now past and
gone, that, at three quarters past nine of the clock, during a
smart shower of rain, even as I was taking a pipe of tobacco in
the kitchen of my cottage in Great Brixsted, in Suffolk, my
wife and children being then all soundly asleep, the Holy Ghost
was suddenly pleased to descend upon me, whereupon I
I pray thee, Goodman Mellowes, said Maudsley, purposely
cutting short the worthy but somewhat prosy weaver's history of
his religious experience, to which, at that particular moment, he
felt no inclination to listen,I pray thee, hast thou really
abandoned
Plymouth and established thyself permanently at
Naumkeak
?
Truly, I have, was the reply, although many months ago,
I did, as thou knowest, purpose to bring my children and wife
even back to New Plymouth.
I recollect, replied Maudsley, still busily pursuing his task,
but why did you change your mind?
Owing, as I would humbly and with reverence believe,
answered Faint-not, to a special interposition of Providence,
who deigned, in my poor behalf, to visit me corporeally, wearing
the form of a mortal female, but who seemeth rather to my
apprehension
,
as one wearing the garments of light.
Indeed! said Maudsley abstractedly, and paying but little
attention to the enigmatical observation of his companion.
Aye, continued the other, although Mistress Esther
Ludlow
was habited in fleshly garments
Maudsley started as the name struck his ear, and he was
upon the point of springing from the grave. He checked
himself
,
however, by a sudden impulse, and before his emotion was
observed by his companion, who gravely continued,
Although she was habited in the garments of earth, yet did
never a tabernacle of flesh contain a more precious jewel. She
hath been, as one might say, the guardian angel, under
Providence
,
of this little settlement.
And you say, continued Maudsley in a husky tone, that
she was the cause of your change of residence.
Verily yes, said Mellows, for besides, that I was never
wholly and blindly given to the tenets of the New Plymouth
church, which, to my poor apprehension, savor more of strict
and absolute separation than
I understand you, said Maudsley impatiently, but what
of Esther Ludlow?
My wife was dying, my children were sorely ill, and almost
famishing  I was homeless, and we were all nigh unto perish.
But the house wherein I now dwell, and which, though lowly, is
not inferior to any except the mansion of the governor, I owe to
the generosity of that virtuous maiden, who, moreover, did
minister
unto my helpmeet when she was sorely stricken. The same
wise and charitable virgin, moreover, did pour out upon our
hearts the oil of Christian sympathy, when the Lord did take
away, one after another, all our blessed babes.
Indeed, said Maudsley, affected by the uncouth but
sincerely
grateful language, with which the devout weaver
acknowledged his obligation to Esther, have you been then so
unfortunate as to be left wholly childless?
Truly, the Lord gave them to me, and he hath taken them
away, answered Faint-not. I felt poor enough when they
asked me for bread, and I had naught to give unto them but a
stone. But they are dead now, Master Maudsley, and I feel
none the richer.
Maudsley addressed a few common-place words of consolation
to his companion, steadily, the meanwhile, pursuing his work,
at which he had been so diligent, that the grave was now
nearly finished.
A little more hollowed at the edges, I pray thee, said
Goodman Mellowes, indicating to Maudsley, with considerable
pedantry of manner, the mode in which the bottom of the grave
should be finished. Ah, I have some little skill at the
business
,
albeit I was, by trade, a weaver, and have also, in the
wilderness, performed the functions of goatsherd.
Truly, the shades of evening are approaching, continued
he, in a brisker tone, and it is time that she should be brought
hither. Her grave is ready now. Alas! poor Esther Ludlow!
Maudsley sprang from the grave as if he had heard the
archangel's trumpet. An indefinite, icy feeling, had withheld
him from questioning his companion as to the health and present
condition of Esther. He thought, if she had been ill or
suffering
,
that the garrulous grave-digger would probably have
enlightened him on the matter, and yet he feared to hazard a
direct question.
At the last words uttered by Mellowes, a sudden light seemed
to flash upon him, and it seemed to him, that he had now,
blindly obeying the instigations of a fiend, actually come
hither, upon the night before his departure from New
England
,
to dig, with his own hands, the grave of his beloved.
He confronted the grave-digger with a countenance of ashy
paleness.
Tell me, he cried, in a voice which was chocked to a
whisper, and which was yet distinctly and fearfully audible, is
this the grave of Esther Ludlow?
God forbid! exclaimed the weaver, who believed that his
eccentric companion had lost his wits. This grave is intended
for Dame Endicott, the spouse of the worthy governor. Esther
Ludlow, God be praised, is alive and well.
Maudsley staggered backward, almost insensible, and sank
for a moment upon the ground. His frame enfeebled by long
illness, and his mind exhausted by emotion, had both lost much
of their elasticity. He found time to recover himself, however,
as his companion continued,
Dame Endicott hath passed away, the virtuous spouse of the
worthy governor of this colony. In my mention of the name of
Mistress Ludlow, I did but compassionate the unavailing
exertions
of that pious virgin, to arrest the heavy blow which hath
VOL. II. 13
fallen upon this worthy family. But stay, they are bringing the
corpse hitherward, continued he, looking towards the
settlement
;
yonder come the mourners, the worthy governor and his
friends, attended by Master Ludlow and his virtuous sister.
Maudsley recovered his composure at once. He had come
hither, determined to avoid all communication with any of the
settlers, most of all, with the Ludlows. He was unwilling to
meet the melancholy company, which was already slowly
picking its way across the rugged clearing towards the rude
burial-place. He accordingly gave a few hurried directions to
Mellowes, earnestly forbidding him to mention their interview,
or even to hint that he was still in the country. Upon parting,
he presented the weaver with a considerable sum of money
which he had about him, and for which, as he was to leave
upon the next day for England, he had no further occasion.
Instead, however, of leaving the neighborhood, he concealed
himself beneath the foliage of a white-pine tree, which grew in
the immediate vicinity of the grave, and calmly awaited the
arrival of the corpse. Since fate had so willed it, he was even
willing to look once more upon the face of Esther, although
he had not purposed it, and till that moment could not have
believed himself possessed of the necessary courage.
While he was thus establishing himself in a position where he
could see without being seen, the company had reached the spot.
Four men bore the coffin, which had been hastily and rudely
fashioned of rough boards, and gently deposited it in the grave
which Maudsley's hands had dug. But a few other persons
were present, besides the bereaved Endicott, Walter Ludlow,
and his sister.
The snow was falling fast. Ludlow offered up a fervent,
extemporaneous prayer, but the services were necessarily
hurried, for the storm was rapidly increasing. As the last
words of the prayer were spoken, the grave-digger threw the
first spadeful of hard and frozen clods upon the coffin. The
stern visage of the governor was convulsed by the harsh and
rigid sound, and a single tear ran down his iron cheek. He
commanded himself, however, and stood, an image of simple
and pathetic dignity, erect, uncovered, offering up a silent prayer
for support in that hour, but unbowed by the misfortunes and
the difficulties which were thickening around him.
It was not my design, said he, in a calm voice, that she
should accompany me in our first voyage to this inhospitable
wilderness. I would have urged her to tarry at the house of her
kinsman Cradock, until the rough places had been smoothed for
her feeble footsteps, but she would not be gainsayed.
As Endicott paused, overcome for an instant by his emotion,
Maudsley at last heard the gentle voice of Esther, which fell
upon his ear like music, although he could not accurately
understand
the words of consolation which she addressed to the
mourner, in a low and murmuring tone.
As Esther ceased speaking, the company slowly left the spot,
the governor remaining a little after the rest, and then walking
homewards with unfaltering step.
When they had all departed, Maudsley stole forth, and stood
for a moment by that lonely grave.
He had been so near to Esther, during the whole ceremony,
that her robe had been waved against him by the wind; he had
looked upon her face, he had listened to her voice; and now that
she was gone, and that he stood alone upon that desolate spot,
his heart seemed to be dead within him.
Upon what slender threads hang the destiny of blind and
erring mortals! A few simple words might have been exchanged
between the grave-digger and himself, which would have swept
forever the delusions from his brain, and restored happiness to
his stormy soul. Twenty words which might have been spoken,
instead of the wandering discourse which had really occurred
between them, and much of the mystery might have been
dispelled
forever, which now seemed to envelope his fate. But
the words were not spoken, and a wintry sea soon rolled between
the lovers.
Maudsley had carefully observed the exact place where Esther
had stood, and he now knelt down and passionately kissed the
print which her foot had left upon the snow, with which the
earth was already covered. A wreath of the lowly, trailing
evergreen grew upon that spot of ground. He tore off a little
twig, and placed it carefully in his bosom. He then stood till
the rapidly descending flakes had obliterated every vestige of
Esther's presence, and then he left the place.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE FALCON'S LAST FLIGHT.
On
a bright morning in September, 1630, Sir Christopher
Gardiner and Thomas Morton sat together in a small apartment
of the Merry-Mount palace.
More than eighteen months had elapsed since the events
which have been last related, but although the political aspect
of affairs had much altered during that interval, the relative
position
,
and the individual fortunes of the principal personages who
have figured in these pages, had not yet been materially changed.
Morton, against whom nothing of importance had been found
in England to warrant his detention, or to justify any
interferfence
with his rights as an Englishman, aided, moreover, by the
intervention of influential friends, had returned to New England
during the past year, in company with Isaac Allerton, the
confidential
agent and leading financier of the Plymouth colony, who
brought him out from England in the capacity of secretary.
The banishment which had been inflicted upon him accordingly
proved but temporary, and upon his return, he had forthwith
established himself at what the Puritans called his old nest at
Merry-Mount.
The number of his retainers or subjects, as he facetiously
called them, had, however, very much diminished during his
absence, and, with the exception of the faithful Bootefish, the
Canary Bird, and one or two stragglers who dwelt in the
adjacent
huts, the merry potentate now reigned in solitary grandeur
Peter Cakebread still remained in the employment of Sir
Christopher Gardiner, who had himself been absent from the
13*
neighborhood of Massachusetts, no human being knew where or
wherefore, and who had returned to his old haunt, still
accompanied
by the mysterious Jaspar, whom he called his cousin, a
short time previous to the period at which this chapter opens.
The room in which they sat was Morton's sanctum. The
rude rafters were adorned with trophies of the chase, with Indian
weapons, and with countless implements for fishing, hunting
and hawking. A broken-winged eagle, partly tamed and wholly
melancholy in his deportment, hopped disconsolately about the
floor, presenting a pathetic emblem of deposed and degraded
majesty, but occasionally displaying in his hoarse and indignant
scream, and the furious blows of his remaining pinion, that the
wings of his spirit at least were not yet wholly broken. Upon a
rough table, stood a flask of some very transparent fluid, two or
three pewter mugs, and a much thumbed copy of Horace, bound
in vellum; but by far the most interesting objects in the room,
were two hawks, which stood upon their perches, one very near
the head of Morton's couch, and the other a little farther
removed
.
Morton, who was certainly the very first, and probably the
very last, person in Massachusetts who ever indulged in the
graceful diversion of hawking, was an adept in that art, which
was at that moment in the zenith of its glory in Europe,
although, in consequence of the improvements of fire-arms, it
fell, before the close of the century, into total disuse.
He was at that moment, while conversing with Sir
Christopher
,
busily employed in preparing a couple of feathers or flags,
as he technically called them, which were to be imped or inserted
into the wing of one of his favorite hawks, who had sustained
some trifling damage during his most recent exploits.
And so you tell me, said he, continuing the conversation
which had commenced some half an hour before, that you
have never visited Shawmut, since the catastrophe to which you
allude?
Never, answered the knight, with a gloomy expression;
and by heaven! it seems as if an evil demon dwelt in that
lonely spot, into whose clutches I must be delivered soul and
body, should I dare to enter his accursed circle.
'T is strange, said Morton, holding up the point of his
feather to the light, and examining it with critical nicety, and
yet you tell me that it was a fair and legitimate duello, and
that Peter Cakebread officiated afterwards as sexton, and in
humed the body as decorously as circumstances allowed?
Gardiner made a slight gesture of assent, but remained in
dark and frowning silence.
Poor Harry Maudsley! continued Morton, in a voice of
unaffected sorrow, an unlucky chance sent him to this
wilderness
.
Poor fellow! I had a sincere sympathy with him. He
was the only human creature whom I ever met with in this
pagan wilderness, who had a real appreciation for the polished
strains of Flaccus. I would to heaven he had remained at
home, where, as I have been informed, his connections were
highly respectable. Hadst thou ever any acquaintance with others
of the Maudsley family, Sir Kit? concluded he carelessly.
No more of this! cried Gardiner, with sudden and
passionate
emphasis,  no more of the stripling! Alive, he wilfully
crossed my path till I crushed him against my will. Dead,
he haunts me like a curse. No more of this, I say!
The knight sprang to his feet, and strode impatiently about
the narrow apartment, with the supple, muscular restlessness of
a caged tiger. At last he flung himself upon a seat again, and
said in an altered tone, and with assumed tranquillity,
The lunatic Blaxton dwells still upon his peninsula, and
still alone, I think you tell me.
Aye, answered Morton, observing, without comment, the
singular agitation of his companion, unless he hath removed
since the beginning of the week, which is not likely. Still I
think he shows signs of great impatience since the arrival of
Winthrop's colony at Charlestown, as the Mishawum
promontory
,
it seems, must now be designated.
And Walford has not yet been forced from his
dwelling-place
?
Not yet, answered Morton, laying his feathers carefully upon
the table, and walking round the chamber in search of some
implement, which seemed to have been mislaid; Walford still
remains, but, by Jupiter, he hath met with but churlish
treatment
from the psalm-singers, who have taken such forcible
possession
of Canaan. I fear he will soon abandon the place in
disgust.
He shall not go yet, by Saint John, replied the knight, I
will not be fooled any longer thus. As for John Oldham,
Exactly, interrupted Morton, John Oldham, who is my
very good friend and gossip now, having been, as you know,
appointed by the Plymouth brethren to be my jailor; John
Oldham
,
who was thoroughly instructed by me touching the legality
of his own lease, and of the Gorges patent in general, hath
brought all the influence he could to bear against the
Massachusetts
company, but I am satisfied now that it is to be
unsuccessful
.
By heavens! said the knight, impatiently, they shall yet
be overturned root and branches. If Sir Ferdinando had been
ruled by my counsels, all this business would have never
happened, this whole territory would, at this moment, have been
in his undisputed possession, and I should have been
Governor-General
of New England. But it is not too late yet, and the
knight is already awaking from his folly.
With submission to your better judgment, Sir Kit,
answered
Morton, who, with characteristic philosophy, had already
begun to look upon the prostrate position of his airy castles,
with something of a child's indifference, at the destruction of
his card palace, so soon as the first ebullition of spleen is over,
and who now seemed exceedingly interested in the amusement
for which he was industriously preparing, I very much fear
that the right worshipful Sir Ferdinando hath grown
marvellously
lukewarm in the matter. He hath wasted so much gold in
this business, that he hath begun to draw his purse-string very
tightly. Your vigorous demand for men and money somewhat
appalled him two years ago.
He is no such niggardly coward, I tell you, Morton,
replied Gardiner, peremptorily. His letters still speak warmly
and encouragingly.
Perhaps so, answered Morton, but it is still my opinion
that Sir Ferdinando's zeal hath very much abated of late.
Since the last triumph which the Puritans achieved in
obtaining
so suddenly and secretly the transfer of the charter itself
into New England, our friends have been very much
disheartened
,
and look, I fear, upon our enterprise as hopeless.
So many people of wealth and station, both among those who
have emigrated, and those who remain in England to assist the
colony, make their party very strong.
By heaven, his zeal shall not cool, while I have a voice to
warn him, cried Gardiner, angrily.
Well, well, said Morton, carelessly, thou mayest be in
the right after all,  `
Nil mortalibus arduum
,'  but I own that
things are looking slightly complicated. Here, Ajax! come
here, my old hero! With this Morton whistled in a peculiar
note to one of his hawks.
There were two of these birds stationed upon their perches
in the room. Of these, the one which was nearest the bedside,
was hooded and belled, having not yet been so thoroughly
trained as his companion. It was a large peregrine falcon,
the bird which, after the ger falcon, which is unknown in
Massachusetts, was most esteemed for his strength, docility,
and audacity. Being a haggard, that is to say, a bird who
had been taken after he was full grown, and had
accordingly
hunted upon his own account, he had been more
difficult
to reclaim and man, although, under the skilful tuition
of Morton, he was already admirably and almost perfectly
trained. As, however, he still retained a little of his native
wildness, Morton kept his perch near his bedside, that he might
constantly call to him and arouse him frequently during the
night, so that he might never forget the sound of his voice or
the habit of obedience. He was also, unlike his companion,
not allowed to use his eyes when at home, and as he stood there
reposing upon his perch, with his leathern hood, surmounted by
an artificial crest of plumes, drawn closely over his head,
through which only his curved and martial beak was allowed to
protrude, with his wings hanging motionless at his side, exposing
to view his broad chest, whose lighter-colored feathers were
plaited closely upon each other like a shirt of mail, with his
sinewy legs terminated by immense yellow pounces and long
golden spurs, he presented a fanciful resemblance to some fierce
warrior monk, brooding in slothful and gloomy captivity.
The other bird, a little larger in size than the falcon, was a
goshawk, who sat quietly but unhooded upon her perch,
glancing
restlessly at every thing around her, with her large hazel
eye. Being an eyess, that is to say, a bird whom Morton
had taken from the nest, and brought up in natural tameness,
she was as obedient to her master's voice as the best trained
spaniel, and as thoroughly accomplished a creature as could have
been found, at that moment, in either hemisphere. The bird's
eye flashed quickly, as she heard her master's whistle, and
fluttering directly from her perch, she settled upon Morton's
fist. The sportsman fondled the noble creature, stroked her
back caressingly with his hand, and gave her a few bits of meat,
from the scattered fragments of his own breakfast, which still
remained upon the table.
'T is a gallant hawk, by St. John, said Gardiner, looking
at the bird with admiration, and fit for an emperor.
Pardon me, Sir Christopher, not for an emperor, said
Morton; and although I know you skilled in the generous
craft, yet I find you not so conversant as a knight of your degree
should be, with the scale of precedence among falcons. An
eagle is for an emperor, a ger falcon for a king, a peregrine
falcon
for an earl .
For an earl! cried Gardiner; and what do you then
with yonder fellow in the leathern night-cap, for he is a peregrine
if I know a hawk from a
From a hernshaw, as the immortal swan of Avon hath it,
interrupted Morton; but you forget that when thou art Prince
Palatine of Massachusetts, I am to be Earl of Merry-Mount.
In the mean time I have even solaced myself with manning and
reclaiming yonder fellow, who, from as wild a haggard as ever
preyed upon crows and pigeons, is now as well bred a falcon as
ever flew.
And what is a simple knight to do for a hawk? said
Gardiner
,
humoring his companion, who loved nothing better than
to indulge the quaint vein of pedantry, which, upon all sporting
topics, so particularly characterized his mind; what is a poor
errant knight to do for a hawk, if the great dignitaries have thus
monopolized the varieties?
Marry, the sacret is for a knight, answered Morton, and
the devil a one is to be found in New England.
Then the knight must even content himself with the
goshawk
,
answered Gardiner, and if there be many like that
fellow upon your fist there, I could even content myself with the
exchange.
So the bird hath been injured? continued Gardiner,
looking with a sportsman's interest at the wing which Morton
had now opened, and in which he was inserting the two feathers
which he had prepared in a most artistic manner to replace two
which had been broken from the pinion.
Slightly, answered Morton; but there, my trusty warrior,
thy wing is imped, and thou art whole again, off to thy perch.
As Morton spoke, the obedient bird fluttered to his station again,
where he remained as motionless as before.
Let me now entreat your attention, said Sir Christopher,
with much earnestness. As you value my friendship, and the
fulfilment of your ambitious hopes, beware of prematurely
offending
these Puritans of Massachusetts, as thou hast done those of
Plymouth.
Marry, Sir Christopher, I am schooled, answered Morton;
but touching my ambitious hopes, their wings have been
marvellously clipped of late, and indeed, I have received some
warnings of a contemplated invasion of my dominion, under the
auspices of the great Joshua himself.
And who in the devil's name is the great Joshua?
demanded
Gardiner.
The great Joshua Temperwell,  heaven save the mark,
know you not the great Joshua? replied Morton. Who should
he be but the great governor of the Puritans, the man who hath
borne out into the wilderness the ark of the covenant, videlicet,
the charter of the Massachusetts Bay Company, who should it be
but the great King Winthrop, John the first, Dei Gratia?
And do you mean that you have been threatened with an
attack on the part of Winthrop? asked Gardiner impatiently.
Even so, was the reply; they hold solemn courts over at
Mishawum yonder, in a lumbering tenement which they call the
great house, where they wag their grizzled beards in each others'
faces, and ponder unutterable things, with all the gravity of
owls. I have a shrewd notion that they mean to cite me before
their august tribunal, although what crime I have committed I
have not yet discovered.
They will not dare to do so, by heaven! cried Sir
Christopher
;
the rebuff which the accusations brought against you by
the Plymouth brethren met with must have taught them wisdom.
I know not. These same brethren are never taught
wisdom
,
answered Morton, seeing that they are all born into the
world as wise as serpents, if not as harmless as doves.
As he spoke, Morton shouted to his attendant Bootefish,
Come hither, thou prelate, thou grave and reverend
dignitary
,
he cried, and attend us in our sports. Although the
canons of the church most expressly forbid hawking to the clergy,
and thou art in training for a bishop, yet we well know that the
clergy have been devoted to the amusement from time
immemorial
,
and despite the prohibition. Perhaps 't is not the only
forbidden pleasure which holy men have permitted themselves.
Now, Sir Kit, if thou wilt descend to the marshes, thou shalt
see how a New England hawk can fly.
I am here, your worship, answered Bootefish, presenting
his rubicund visage at the doorway.
Bring us then the poles and the game-bags, most reverend
bishop, and hold thyself in readiness to take charge of my hawks
when our sport is over. The Bishop of Ely, in bluff King
Henry's day, excommunicated seven persons who stole his falcon.
Do thou not only excommunicate, but flagellate any living man,
be he pagan or Puritan, who should dare to meddle with my
hawks.
So speaking, Morton, who had already hooded Gaunt, now
proceeded to hood and bell Ajax, and taking the haggard upon
his own fist, he brought the other to Sir Christopher, saying,
Although I kept Gaunt in Tom Walford's smithy for ten
days, to tame him with the sound of the hammering, yet is he
VOL. II. 14
not yet manned enough to sit upon other fist than my own.
Therefore you will even take Ajax, and a better goshawk never
flew a flight.
Willingly, answered Gardiner, but to tell you the truth, I
marvel at your nomenclature. Both these hawks being female,
as they should be, the female of all falcons being the fiercest
and strongest, 't is strange you should thus accommodate them
with names of the other gender.
Thou art right, answered Morton, and 't is a humor of
mine own. The only matter in the noble craft of hawking
which mislikes me, is this very unsexing of the species Sooth
to say, I never saw a tercel gentle, in company with his
ferocious
spouse, who was, sans compliment, his better half, without
offering up a silent thanksgiving, that among my other
misfortunes
,
that of matrimony hath not yet befallen me. Such
unequal and uncomfortable matches are sometimes the lot even
of the lords of creation. What think you of the institution of
matrimony in general, Sir Kit, both as regards the genus falco
and the genus homo?
The countenance of Gardiner looked ferocious and forbidding
again, as Morton, who seemed peculiarly unlucky in his allusions
that morning, made this careless query. He answered nothing,
however, and the Lord of Merry-Mount, not observing his
companion's
mood, continued,
'T is for this reason, he said, that I choose, thus
arbitrarily
,
to designate my favorites. I choose not to associate any
thing ferocious with the female idea, which, to my mind, should
never awaken any images but the gentlest and most caressing.
And accordingly, if
Doth the pestilence still continue in the bay, among the
settlers at Naumkeak and Charlestown? said Gardiner,
abruptly
changing the conversation.
Yes, the poor devils are undergoing a severe seasoning,
answered Morton, leading the way out of the palace, followed
by Gardiner and BootefishThey are dying very fast of the
scurvy and fever. No people but Puritans could bear such
peppering
,
but they are a generation apart, I believe, and would
live through all the plagues of Egypt.
And I suppose they have poor medical attendance, and a
scanty supply of drugs, said Gardiner, who seemed to take
a particular pleasure in dwelling upon the sufferings of the
settlers.
Why, as to that, answered Morton, they have the
illustrious
Doctor Noddy, the great soul-saver, and body-snatcher of
New Plymouth.
And who and what may the illustrious Noddy be? said
Gardiner, preacher or physician?
Both the one and the other, answered Morton, the
illustrious
Noddy, whom mortals call Fuller, is, as we should say at
Clifford's Inn, a `
qui tam
' doctor, administering quite as much
to the spiritual as the bodily ailments of his patients  one, in
short, who maketh a point of preparing his victims for heaven,
as a compensation for abridging their allotted period upon
earth.
Would he might send them all, men, women, and children,
every crop-eared prophecier of them all, even to Abraham's
bosom, cried the knight savagely. By heavens! I could hug
the very pestilence, which has strode hither to fight so fiercely
in my behalf! May they wither like frost-bitten weeds! may they
perish like famished wolves, the prowling hypocrites!
A cordial anathema, replied Morton, in a cheerful tone,
but I hardly sympathize with your ferocity. I am not of an
atrabilious temperament. Perhaps I should have been more
useful
if I had been less good-natured. What they intend against
me, I know not. The Plymouth brethren would have had me
hung, but marriage and hanging go by destiny, and the hemp
is not yet grown that is to serve me for a neck-cloth.
I have already spoken to you concerning the necessity of
caution upon these matters, answered Gardiner, but one word
more concerning this pestilence. You say that this Noddy or
Fuller is the only quack whom they are provided with. Hath he
skill in his craft?
Unquestionably, said Morton, he cured the great Captain
Littleworth, whom the settlers call John Endicott, of a desperate
disease.
I was not aware, said Gardiner, that Endicott had been
afflicted by any illness.
He was troubled, said Morton, with a chronic disease
called a wife, and Doctor Fuller relieved him thereof
handsomely
.
Aye, I heard, said Gardiner, that Madam Endicott sank
early under the climate. I did not know the part which Doctor
Fuller played in the matter.
T was his masterpiece, continued Morton. But now,
Mistress Gaunt, if it like Sir Christopher better, I will even give
thee one trial in the air, before we look for any game.
They were standing at this moment upon that long, elevated
knoll, to which the name of Merry-Mount peculiarly belonged,
and upon which the hands of its sovereign had erected, and the
hands of Endicott demolished, the first May-pole ever elevated
in Massachusetts. The scene around was still unchanged.
The barren cliff, destitute of trees, was covered with a scanty
herbage, and adorned with a few stunted golden-rods, a goodly
store of mullens, and a profusion of the aromatic weed called
everlasting, which loves the most gravelly and barren soil.
From this elevated summit the eye wandered with delight on
that magnificent September morning, over the panorama of land
and ocean, which glowed and sparkled in the bright sunshine
and the invigorating breeze.
Morton, who had been caressing the beautiful falcon, which sat
upon his fist, during his rambling conversation with Sir
Christopher
,
now advanced a few yards into the wind. He then stopped,
turned about, and suddenly unstriking her hood, tossed her
into the air with an encouraging shout. The falcon expanded
her strong wings with an impulse of delight, and rose directly
over head, mounting in airy circles higher and still higher, till
diminished to a hardly perceptible point, she hung stationary for
a moment, in the blue depths above. Then, as if reconnoitering
the world below, and searching for a quarry, she sailed slowly
along with gently flapping wings, until, apparently disappointed
in her observations, she commenced again her spiral ascent till
she was lost to view. Morton now whistled. The piercing note
seemed to penetrate the arch above. There was a moment of
suspense, during which nothing was visible in the sky, and Sir
Christopher, who had been watching the falcon's motions with
eager interest, shook his head suspiciously at Morton, as if to
intimate that the haggard had borne away her bells after all, and
was not likely to obey her master's whistle. Morton answered
the look with a confident smile, pointing upwards as he did so.
At that moment the black point was again visible, at the next
there was a rushing sound, and the hawk falling through the
air with closed wings, and with the speed of lightning, suddenly
settled, as if by enchantment, upon her master's fist.
Bravely done, sweetheart! said Morton, patting and
fondling
the obedient bird. I'd trust thee with a thousand golden
guineas, had I so much filthy lucre; and now to look for
something
to strike at. If a gaggle of geese would come by now, for
it is time they should begin to congregate hither on their journey
southwards  but who comes here? the gentle Jaspar, as I
live, continued Morton, who had been hooding his falcon
again, and who now courteously saluted the new comer.
I had almost grown weary of waiting, said the youth,
14*
acknowledging the civility of Morton, and had I not known
that the long and unutterable ponderings between you and my
cousin were something tedious, I should even have broken in
upon your consultations. However, my patience hath been
well rewarded. Of every thing which is delightful in the world,
a falcon's flight is most delightful.
Spoken like a young cavalier, said Morton gaily, and
now let us descend upon the marshes.
With this the sporting humorist led the way down the hill,
and advanced along the creek, which meandered through the
salt marsh, by which his domain was separated from the ocean.
They now began to move very cautiously, because, as the season
had already commenced, during which those meadows, and
particularly
the neighborhood of that creek, were the resort of
innumerable water-fowl, including many of the varieties which
yield the greatest amusement in falconry, Morton feared to flush
the game before he desired it.
Having no spaniel just at this moment at Merry-Mount,
said he to Sir Christopher; I have even brought the dignified
Bootefish along with me to spring the fowl. Robin Bootefish,
by the way, is destined for my chief falconer when I receive my
earldom.
Besides which, added Gardiner, thou art thyself to be
hereditary grand falconer of all the Massachusetts.
I have no objection, answered Morton, to any number of
dignities, but a truce to trifling now, for this business must not
be neglected.
Bootefish now advanced carefully, at a considerable distance
in front of the others, holding a long pole in his hand.
Gardiner held the goshawk's jesses loosely in his fingers, and
held himself ready to unstrike her hood, as Morton designed
that Ajax should fly at the game, which was first started, in
order to afford a lesson to the haggard.
As had been rightly conjectured, Bootefish had not advanced
very far, before he came suddenly upon a stray black duck, who
happened to be feeding by himself in the plashy ground near the
creek. The fowl rose screaming into the air, to the height of
some dozen yards, and then flew in a straight line, and with
great rapidity, almost directly over the heads of Morton and
Gardiner. The knight, as quick as thought, jerked off the hood
from the goshawk, and tossed her after her prey. The
well-trained
creature, her eyes flashing upon the quarry with
unerring
instinct, flew like lightning at her victim. Straight as
an arrow flew the duck, with the velocity of the wind. With
incredible swiftness the falcon pierced the air in his pursuit.
Five minutes elapsed, and the pursuer and the pursued, flying in
a perfectly straight line at the rate of a mile to the minute, had
entirely disappeared from view. The sportsmen, using their
long poles to assist them in leaping continually across the
winding
creek, in which exercise none was more adroit than Jaspar,
followed as nearly as possible in the direction first taken by the
duck, which was obliquely across the marshes, towards the sea.
Morton paused at last, and shook his head. The duck had
flown so low, so straight, and with such wonderful rapidity, that
he deemed it almost impossible for the hawk to have overtaken
him. As the party stood, however, breathless with their violent
exercise, very near the margin of the sea, a black speck in the
air became suddenly visible to the eagle eye of Gardiner, who
pointed it out to his companions.
You are right, by Jupiter, Sir Christo! cried Morton,
the quarry has doubled upon her pursuer, and has lost the
advantage of his straight flight. Ten thousand pounds to a
guinea, he is a dead duck in five minutes.
As Morton spoke, the quarry flew again over their heads, at
about double the height at which he had started upon his
course, and with somewhat diminished rapidity. He had
evidently
become disconcerted and confused by his fears, and now
flew wildly and with frequent windings. The falcon, steady and
unrelenting as destiny, followed close upon him, gaining at every
turn. It was now that the chase became keenly interesting.
The quarry, flying swiftly still, but in irregular circlings, and
hotly pursued by her enemy, was easily kept in sight by the
active sportsmen, who dashed hither and thither, running and
leaping in every direction taken by the game. The airy chase
rapidly approached its termination. The unfortunate victim,
distracted and despairing, flew with diminished vigor. Already
the wings of her enemy seemed to overshadow him, when
suddenly
the falcon rose high into the air above his head, mounting
in short and rapid circles.
Mark now, Sir Christopher, said Morton, looking with
delight at the motions of his favorite, mark now how
beautifully
she is going to stoop.
The words had scarcely left his lips, when the peculiar,
hurtling
noise was heard, and the goshawk, falling through the air
like a meteor, struck the quarry with her pounces, and despite
its struggles, flew upwards, holding it aloft in triumph.
Beautifully trussed, by Jupiter! cried Morton, whistling
loudly as he spoke.
The obedient hawk descended to her master's call, and laid the
palpitating body of her victim, whom she had beaten to death with
her muscular pinions, directly at her master's feet. That done,
she settled upon his fist again, shaking her silver bells, and
turning her lustrous eye upon his, as if to read his approbation
there.
Prettily done, Mistress Ajax! said Morton, who had in
the mean time consigned the other falcon for an instant to
Bootefish
,
that he might hold and caress the goshawk for an instant.
He had hardly resumed possession of the haggard, who was
intended by him to fly at the next game which was started, when
a hoarse cry of whauk, whauk, whauk, sounded suddenly in
the air, far above their heads. Quickly as lightning did Morton
launch the falcon into the air.
Now, my gentle peregrine, show the mettle you are made
of, cried he, for yonder comes the first gaggle of geese I have
seen this season. Strike me now one of those screamers, goose
or gander, I care not, and prove to me that the pains taken for
your education have not been all in vain.
The falcon, who flew that day for the first time without a leash,
rose like a rocket into the air. Singling, without hesitation, one
from out the noisy flock of some twenty or thirty wild geese, who
were swiftly winging their way from the north, not expecting
such inhospitable treatment upon their arrival, he scattered
confusion
and dismay among them all. Uttering discordant screams,
the flock flew hither and thither, seeking each to escape, by the
best means it could, the fearful enemy.
Looks yon falcon now, cried Morton, as all the sportsment
together dashed off in the direction taken by the hawk, looks
she not like a glorious old piratical Norman baron, pursuing
a shrieking horde of base-born peasantry? Upon them, my
jovial freebooter, down with the churls. Gloriously struck, by
Jupiter!
While he was speaking, the falcon, true to her breeding and
her instinct, had selected and overtaken her quarry. Then
suddenly
stooping, she extended her enormous pounces, seized her
victim with prodigious force, and broke its neck with one blow
of her beak. Finding the dead body of her game too heavy to
be raised aloft for an instant, and yet desirous of obeying her
master's whistle, which sounded as soon as she struck the
quarry, she was obliged to fly obliquely to the ground, bringing
with her the dead fowl, which she obediently deposited at her
master's feet.
A hawk of a thousand, cried Sir Christopher, looking
with admiration at the gallant bird; call her haggard no longer,
for my life for it, there never flew a stauncher or more obedient
falcon than she hath proved herself.
Truly hath she done no discredit, answered Morton, to
her trainer, the future grand falconer of the Massachusetts.
So saying, he rewarded the hawk by tearing out the
palpitating
heart of the game, and presenting it to her. The hawk
having devoured the morsel with relish, was now again hooded,
and the party proceeded in search of more game.
There was no lack of it that day. Those wide marshes which
skirted the sea abounded in water-fowl, and it was the
commencement
of the season when many varieties are just making
their appearance on their way from the north. Ducks,
brantgeese
,
curlews, were started from their feeding places in every
direction. The hawks behaved well, the peregrine falcon
established
her reputation forever, and the party had as much sport as
they desired.
They had been reposing for a little time, being somewhat
tired themselves, and desirous of affording some respite to the
indefatigable falcons. Indeed, both Gardiner and Jaspar had
been quite satisfied with their morning's amusement, and were
upon the point of abandoning the sport altogether. Morton,
who was never weary of the chase, and was particularly devoted
to falconry, reluctantly consented to accompany them.
A little sport was, however, in reserve for the party. As they
were passing leisurely along the border of the creek, upon their
way toward Merry-Mount, they suddenly surprised an enormous
blue heron, who stood fishing in the stream. It was some
unusual accident which had allowed them thus to surprise this
melancholy, hermit bird, who is as keen-sighted as he is solitary.
The lonely fisherman, vexed at being thus disturbed in his
privacy
,
rose into the air, uttering a few morose and inharmonious
screams, and with outstretched bill and neck, and long legs
dangling behind him, sailed off before the wind.
The heron was of the largest size, standing nearly five feet in
height, measuring more than six from wing to wing, and being
at least double the weight of either of the hawks.
Quickly did Morton jerk the hood from off the haggard
falcon's
neck, and toss her down the wind, after the stately quarry.
Bind me yon moody, long-legged misanthrope, cried he,
as he whistled off his hawk, kill me him handsomely, and like
a gallant falcon as thou art, and thou shalt win a crown of glory
both for thy master and thyself.
'T is no child's play, either, cried Sir Christopher, as they
all eagerly followed the heron's flight, for the fellow will stand
at bay if he is caught, and thrust with that long bill of his
like a gladiator, so that the falcon will need all her mettle and
the whole weight and strength of her pounces.
Never fear the peregrine, cried Morton gaily, though
somewhat out of breath; my life on her courage and her
success!
The heron had risen high in the air, and then flown off before
the wind, with a powerful and rather rapid stroke. The falcon
gained upon him very fast, but seemed somewhat wary in
approaching
him. Although not courting a combat, but on the contrary
evidently desirous of escaping his enemy by ignoble-flight, yet
there seemed something dangerous in the melancholy bird,
which made the high mettled falcon cautious in her attack. As
she neared the quarry, however, which she did within a very
few minutes after she had been first launched in his pursuit, she
seemed to be thrusting forth her mighty talons to grapple with her
prey. Then, as if altering her intention, she suddenly rose
spirally far above the heron, till she was almost entirely lost from
view.
During all this time, Morton, who had advanced far beyond
his companions, stood gazing eagerly and almost breathlessly
upward.
In a moment, while the heron, somewhat perplexed, was
steadily beating the air in the same direction which she had at
first taken, the hawk suddenly appeared, falling as it were out
of the heavens, from some invisible height, and swooping down
upon her prey. When within a few yards of the quarry,
however
,
she suddenly turned upon her wing, recovered herself, and
slowly mounted again.
How magnificently she cancelliers, cried Morton, still
gazing intently upwards, and wholly rapt in the issue of the
sport.
There was no answer, but Morton would have heard none,
had it been made.
The heron meanwhile, somewhat puzzled by the manuvres of
his adversary, doubled upon his course, and now flew in rather
a circling and hesitating manner.
Again the rushing sound struck the ear, and the falcon
stooping again from a prodigious height, fell like a thunderbolt
upon her prey. This time there was no cancelliering, but
descending
in a concentrated mass, she struck the quarry full in
the back with her ferocious talons. The heron, desperately
wounded, and struggling vainly to elude her clutches, at last
flew slowly off, bearing his audacious enemy upon his shoulders.
The falcon, meanwhile, strove to break the neck of her foe by
repeated and powerful strokes of her beak, and made no effort to
alter the direction of their flight. These ferocious blows were
for a few seconds skilfully parried by the heron, who twisted
hither and thither his long flexible neck, and dexterously foiled
the murderous attack. Finding it difficult, however, to continue
this game much longer, no longer hoping for safety in flight,
and suddenly inflaming himself with the courage of despair, the
heron, by an unexpected and dexterous movement, extricated
himself for a moment from his enemy's pounces, threw himself
backwards, and furiously attacked his enemy with his long,
sharp, powerful bill. Now had the falcon need of all her
strength and spirit. The enemy, colossal in comparison with
herself, was animated by fury and despair. Desperate and
incessant were the lounges dealt her by the heron, who handled
his long bill like a rapier. Gallantly did the falcon parry the
furious thrusts, and return blow for blow. The champions
were not unfairly matched, the falcon making up for her
inferior
length and weight by superior concentration of muscle and
greater strength of wing.
Eagerly did Morton, totally lost to every thing in the world
below
,
gaze upwards at the combatants, who now hung suspended
in air a few hundred yards above his head. The aerial duel was
desperate, but short. The falcon, full of wrath at being thus for
the first time baffled, rose again for an instant into the air. She
then descended with all the force and fury of her nature upon
the quarry, recklessly received a desperate thrust, which pierced
her through and through, and at the same instant smote her
adversary
to death with a furious blow which she was thus enabled
to inffict upon his spine. At the next instant, both hawk and
heron fell headlong to the ground, and lay locked in a deadly
embrace at Morton's feet. Morton stooped eagerly down,
extricated
his favorite from the deadly weapon of her antagonist,
which still transfixed her, tore her talons from his palpitating
body, and placed her in his bosom. The fearless falcon turned
her glazing eye upon her master, with an expression full of
spirit and affection, shook her pinions gallantly for a moment,
and then was still forever.
Thy last flight is flown, my matchless haggard, said
Morton
,
with a tear in his eye, gazing with unaffected sorrow upon
the body of the falcon, and then laying her down side by side
with her powerful enemy, who lay stone dead at his feet.
Ye shall be buried together in one grave, said he at last,
after contemplating the pair long and mournfully. My poor
VOL. II. 15
hawk, who came to my whistle day and night! Sawest thou
ever a falcon in all the world, who stooped more gallantly,
Master
Jaspar? concluded he, turning suddenly round.
Shame upon thy lewd and cruel practices! cried a voice
at his side, which sounded very unlike that of Gardiner or of
Jaspar. How often, O, thou Master of Misrule, wilt thou
provoke us in the wilderness, and grieve us in the desert?
And who the devil art thou, cried Morton in
astonishment
,
who art thus prophesying upon the salt marshes?
Morton might well have been surprised, for as he looked about
him, there was not a trace to be seen of Sir Christopher and
the gentle Jaspar, and in their places he found himself
surrounded
by a party of grim-visaged Puritans, armed to the teeth,
who evidently intended to devote themselves that morning
exclusively
to himself. So absorbed had he been in observing the
struggle between his falcon and the heron, that the party had
advanced upon him and made him their prisoner, before he was
in the least aware of their approach.
Sir Christopher Gardiner, however, whose eagle eye, keener
than that of hawk or heron, had observed the party at a long
distance, as, after having apparently made an unsuccessful
search at Merry-Mount, they descended upon the marshes, had
eluded their observation, and, accompanied by his cousin, had
glided unperceived away, at a time when Morton, in his
eagerness
,
had advanced to so great a distance that it was wholly out
of the knight's power to give him warning. As Sir Christopher
had repeatedly, but fruitlessly, reminded his reckless companion
of his danger, and as he had no desire unnecessarily to expose
his character to suspicion, by allowing himself to be found in
the company of one whom the Puritans considered so
disreputable
and odious, he had felt no hesitation in thus disappearing as
rapidly as possible.
Morton, being used to such scenes, saw at once that all
resistance
would be useless. Moreover, after the first surprise was
over, and he had found himself captured beyond all
peradventure
,
his thoughts reverted to his dead falcon. That he was
arrested did not surprise him, and he had long since exhausted
his indignation at the tyrannical persecution which the Puritans
seemed determined to inflict upon him. He should soon
extricate
himself, he thought, from this new dilemma, but who could
restore to life his gallant hawk, who he had been training so
long, and who was as dear to him as the apple of his eye.
Looking
with profound contempt at the rigid countenances of his
captors, he again raised the dead body of his favorite from the
ground, and placed it in his bosom. Absorbed in his melancholy
reflections, he stood there fondling the creature, whispering and
whistling to her, as if his endearments could recall her to life,
and hearing not a single word of the long exhortation with
which the leader of the party was indulging him.
Finding his eloquence so utterly lost upon the hardened
sinner, Captain Underwood broke off in his address, saying only
in conclusion,
Thou wilt follow me now, and that obediently, O, thou
Master of Misrule, else shall it go hard with thee!
And whither, most peremptory of Puritans? said Morton
carelessly, still caressing his hawk.
Even to Charlestown, even unto the magistrates who have
ordered thy instantaneous arrest, now effected by their unworthy
servants.
And what have I to do with the magistrates of Charlestown,
or they with me? replied Morton; truly, I have as little relish
for their company as they for mine.
Verily, answered Captain Underwood, Governor
Winthrop
,
the deputy, and all the assistants, hold a solemn court
to-morrow, to which thou art formally cited, then and there to
answer for thy various misdemeanors. Verily, the magistrates
do intend to erect their authority throughout the land. They
shall smite their enemies in the hinder part, and put them to
perpetual reproach.
So saying, the captain of the party led the way, and his
soldiers, taking Morton in their midst, started on their march
to Charlestown.
CHAPTER XV.
THE SUZERAIN OF MERRY-MOUNT DEPOSED.
Upon
the day succeeding his capture upon the marsh,
Thomas Morton, in custody of two or three tall fellows in buff
jerkins and steel head-pieces, stood in the corner of the large
room in the Great-house at Charlestown. This building, which
had been constructed with especial care, by Mr. Graves, during
the previous year, expressly to serve as a government house, was
a timber-work mansion of very respectable dimensions, and
stood upon the open plain below the Mishawum hills. In its
neighborhood were huddled together a miscellaneous collection
of booths, tents, and wigwams, in which the emigrants had
established their temporary residence, and in which they were
suffering dreadful ravages from the sickness which still prevailed
with unabated fury. As nearly the whole population were upon
the point of removing to the south side of the Charles River,
where, at least, they could promise themselves a supply of
wholesome water, which was denied to them at Mishawum, the
infant village of Charlestown presented rather the appearance of
a temporary encampment, than of an organized town. Still,
however, the forms of government were rigidly observed, and
the governor, with most of the magistrates, who resided in the
Great-house, although active and benevolent in relieving the
sufferings of the people, still maintained, throughout all the
difficulties which beset them, an elevated and decorous
deportment
,
which invested their responsible offices with a certain
patriarchal air of authority, and which inspired the people with
additional feelings of confidence and respect.
15*
The potentate of Merry-Mount, with the good-humored
expression which habitually characterized his face, was looking
carelessly round him, whistling and talking to himself, besides
making, occasionally, an unsuccessful attempt to draw some one
of his attendants into conversation. The magistrates had not
yet made their appearance in the apartment, although they were
soon expected, as the third Court of Assistants, which had been
held in Massachusetts since the arrival of Winthrop with the
charter, was to be held that morning. Besides the armed
attendants upon the magistrates, who answered Morton's
flippant
remarks with forbidding silence, there were clustered
together, in the different corners of the room, a few stragglers,
who appeared to be awaiting the arrival of the court, and who,
in the mean time, were conversing in a low tone with one
another. These persons all wore tall, steeple-crowned hats, and
sad-colored garments.
The seat of government is to be fixed at Trimountain,
yonder, said a leathern-visaged, sinewy-looking individual,
addressing a companion who stood near him; at least, I
understand
that the governor, as well as the worshipful Master
Johnson
,
have already decided upon removing thither immediately.
Aye, Goodman Faunce, replied the individual addressed,
who rejoiced in the appellation of Jonathan Jellett, and I
have likewise decided to take my staff in hand and accompany
their worships. The mortality which prevails upon this
promontory
is appalling. Verily it trieth the heart and the reins.
Truly, the pestilence shooteth its arrows among us
unsparingly
,
answered Faunce, but it is in vain; the Lord is
the rock of our refuge.
'T is said, said a third person, who had not yet spoken,
that the company have determined to re-baptize yonder
peninsula
of Trimountain, which the heathens call Shawmut, seeing
that it is likely to become a goodly town, and a large.
And by what name do they propose to baptize the
promontory
,
Goodman Pid? asked Faunce.
'T is to be baptized Boston, answered Pid.
In honor and commemoration, doubtless, said Jellett, of
the Lincolnshire folk, and of the pious and learned John Cotton,
who hath long time ministered in that ancient town, and who
is shortly expected hither to prophesy unto us even at New
Boston.
Aye, continued Pid, and doubtless New Boston will be
the centre and the metropolis of the Massachusetts. The site
is a goodly one, and the harbor commodious and safe.
I am of your mind, said Jellett. It hath, moreover, become
less necessary that one great fortified town should be built,
according to the company's first intention. The discomfiture of
the great Indian conspiracy, which hath so recently occurred,
and the peaceable deportment of the heathen at present, renders
an impregnable fort of less consequence.
Aye, Goodman Jellett, answered Faunce, the Sagamore
John, who revealed that great conspiracy a few months since,
hath merited richly of the Lord. But know ye, my brethren,
who it is, who is said to have been the chief instigator of this
foul conspiracy to cut off by savage hands the whole English
population of New England?
Is it the Sachem Chickatabot? demanded all the others,
somewhat impressed by the speaker's air of mystery.
Not at all, was the reply, the heathen chieftain is well
affected towards us. 'T is an Englishman, a vile and unworthy
renegade, a papist, and a secret emissary of Sir Ferdinando
Gorges, the arch-enemy of our company. Such an one it is
who hath fostered and guided the savage plot against us, thus
revealed by the friendship of the gentle Sagamore.
And who is this Englishman? demanded all the speakers,
with frowning faces and eager voices.
I confess, answered Faunce, that I do not know to
absolute certainty his name nor whereabouts. Still I am
informed that the company's officers have yesterday arrested
for various mal-practices a certain rantipole disturber of our
Canaan's peace. This man is called Thomas Morton, and I
say unto you, that, beyond all peradventure, if any Englishman
hath indeed thus foully conspired with the heathen against
the lives and happiness of the Christian settlers, Thomas Morton
is the man.
And I say unto thee that thou liest! cried the Lord of
Merry-Mount, who had been intently listening to this
conversation
,
and were it not for these importunate friends who hold
me so tightly, by Jupiter Tonans, I would make thee swallow
the falsehood again, with a few inches of cold steel to digest it
withal!
The leathern visage of Goodman Faunce expanded like a pair
of bellows, and he uttered an explosive ejaculation of
amazement
at this interruption. None of the party had observed the
presence of Morton, so intent had they been upon their own
conversation, nor was any one of them acquainted with his
person. As his whole appearance, however, indicated a
character
of an entirely different stamp from their own, they now
looked upon him with great curiosity, as he stood boiling over
with indignation at the foul calumny which he had just heard
concerning himself.
I say thou liest! roared Morton, continuing to vent his
indignation in words of ludicrous vehemence, while his guards
held him tightly in their arms, and vainly endeavored to stop his
tongue  I say thou art a slanderer! thou sour-faced,
steeple-stoppered
vinegar-cruet! What! is an Englishman's good name
and fame thus lightly to be dealt with by such cold-blooded,
canting
Silence, thou indecent and lewd babbler! cried the
men-at-arms
,
holding him tightly, and at last succeeding in stopping
his mouth, just as the door opened  seest thou not that their
worships are about to enter?
As these words were spoken, the magistrates, preceded by two
sergeants with halberts, entered the room, with grave visages
and stately step, while all the company present pulled off their
hats and made a respectful obeisance.
Governor Winthrop came first, a tall, erect figure in the prime
of manhood, whose plaited vandyke ruff, dark-flowing robes, and
magisterial chain, harmonized entirely with the simple and
natural
dignity which distinguished his presence. As he placed
himself upon a slightly elevated seat, behind a large table at the
upper end of the room, while Dudley and Johnson occupied the
seats upon either side, and the rest of the assistants arranged
themselves around the table, even Morton himself could not
look upon him without respect. The governor's features were
prominent but regular. The hair and beard were dark, the
complexion
olive, the hazel eye large and pensive, the forehead full
of gravity and deliberation. The whole countenance expressed
elevation of sentiment, earnestness and decision, tempered with
great gentleness, and somewhat overshadowed with melancholy.
All these characteristics dwelt particularly in the upper part of
the face. The eyebrows, which were delicately pencilled and
remarkably arched, imparted a singular character to the whole
physiognomy; and, in fact, the whole expression of the brow
and eye would have struck an imaginative person as that of a
man, whose thoughts were habitually and steadfastly directed to
things beyond this world.
Well contrasted with Winthrop was the erect, military figure,
and stern, rugged features of the deputy Dudley. The
low-country
soldier, the bigoted and intolerant Calvinist, the
iron-handed
and close-fisted financier, the severe magistrate, but the
unflinching and heroic champion of a holy cause, were all
represented
in that massive and grizzled head, that furrowed
countenance
,
that attitude of stern command.
Was it grief for the wife of his bosom, whose grave was still
green, the gentle Lady Arabella, who had left an earl's palace to
lie, after a few short months, in the same wilderness grave with
her husband; was it grief alone for that flower so early withered
on this inhospitable shore, which darkened the melancholy
countenance
,
and bent the slender form, of the youthful magistrate
who sat at Winthrop's left hand? Or was a dim consciousness
of his own impending fate mingled with his grief for the
departed
?
Did Azrael's wing, hurtling so near him, already
overshadow
his soul? Gazing with an air of abstraction, Isaac
Johnson sat at the board with his brother magistrates, but his
thoughts seemed to be far away. His pale face and retiring
figure mingled with the sterner and ruder heads of Sir Richard
Saltonstall and the other assistants, and presented a pathetic
contrast to them all.
After the teaching elder of the new church, which had so
recently been gathered upon that spot, the Rev. John Wilson,
had offered up a fervent exhortation, the record book of the
company was opened, and the governor read a brief report of
the proceedings of the court which had been held during the
previous week.
The next Court of Assitants will probably be holden, my
brethren, said he, addressing his associates, upon the same
spot wherein we are now assembled. All subsequent ones will
take place in the town hall, which is now well nigh completed,
upon the opposite peninsula of Trimountain. It is desirable
that, as soon as may be, a general court of all the freemen of
the company should be holden, but I would suggest that it be
deferred until the people have established themselves at
Trimountain
.
The suggestion was received with approbation.
Touching the names which are to be respectively borne,
continued the governor, by the various plantations now, with
the Lord's help, commenced, it was reserved to the present
court to act thereupon. Mr. Deputy hath some proposition to
make upon this head, as I have been given to understand.
Dudley arose, and read an order as follows: Ordered, that
the plantation at Mattapan be henceforth known by the name
of Dorchester; that the town farthest up the Charles River, be
called Waterton; and that the plantation at Trimountain, be
called Boston.
The order was unanimously accepted by the court.
After a few other legislative matters had been disposed of,
Deputy Dudley arose and proposed that the persons convicted
at the last court, should be brought in to receive their sentence.
No objection being made, the sergeant proceeded to call for
David Phippen.
David Phippen, a lean-favored, unshaven, and marvellously
unprepossessing individual, was then brought forward to their
worships' table, and was thus addressed by the governor:
David Phippen, thou having been found guilty of gross and
repeated drunkenness, art hereby sentenced, to the end that thou
mayest soon amend thy life, and for the glory of the Lord, to
receive forty lashes at the whipping-post, and to wear a red D
around thy neck for the space of thirty days  the time and
place of punishment to be appointed by the court. Take him
away, sergeant.
But your worships,  stammered the culprit, evidently
desirous of making some observations upon the subject.
Silence, drunkard! thundered the grim deputy, looking at
the trembling Phippen with an indignant countenance. Take
him away, sergeant, and obey the governor. Call Robert
Dibble
!
Robert Dibble, a hirsute, somewhat uncleanly but
good-humored
and honest looking personage, being brought forward,
Goodman Dibble, said the governor, thou having been
convicted
,
upon thy own confession, of having killed a partridge
upon the Sabbath, contrary to the express injunctions of Moses,
art hereby sentenced by the court to receive forty stripes save
one, at the whipping-post.
But your worships, interposed the criminal, my good
woman was sore afflicted with the prevailing sickness, and I
thought a bit of wild fowl
Take him away, sergeant! said the deputy, who seemed
to take a grim satisfaction in dispatching as much of this work
as possible, while, on the contrary, the gentler governor read the
sentences of the court, which he was obliged to deliver, with
manifest repugnance; call Master Zaccheus Smeedley.
Master Zaccheus Smeedley, said the governor, as the next
culprit was brought before the board, thou having been convicted
of the heinous sin of stealing from the Indians, and having
confessed
the same, art hereby sentenced by the court to forfeit
thy title, and to be henceforth called plain Zaccheus Smeedley.
Take him away, said the deputy, and call Humphrey
Rednape.
Morton, who had been listlessly observing the course of
criminal
jurisprudence adopted by the colony, and awaiting with
some curiosity the decision of their worships upon his own case,
now pricked up his ears, as he heard the name of the last culprit
announced.
Humphrey Rednape, who had long ago left the domain of
Merry-Mount, having deserted his sovereign soon after his first
deposition by the military power of Standish, and having
afterwards
led a vagabond life in different parts of the country
till his late arrest, now presented himself before the magistrates.
The worthy unicorn retained a lingering relic of his swash
buckler air, but he was evidently in a state of decay, and
presented a bedraggled and chopfallen appearance.
Quantum mutatus ab illo Hectore!
muttered his former
suzerain, as he looked attentively at the criminal.
Humphrey Rednape, said the governor, in a solemn voice,
thou hast been accused of divers and sundry offences, whereof
habitual drunkenness is among the least. Especially thou hast
been convicted of the high and unpardonable crime of censuring
and blaspheming our church, and of reviling the magistrates, for
the which offence the court adjudges thee to be branded upon
the forehead, to receive fifty lashes at the whipping-post, and
after execution of said sentence, to depart without the limits of
the patent, not to return again, upon pain of perpetual
imprisonment
.
Numps, Numps, poor devil! muttered Morton,
compassionating
the unlucky predicament of his former vassal; could
not thy lesson, learned at the Plymouth whipping-post, make
thee wiser? `
Cynthius non aurem vellit et admonuit
.
' Could
not Apollo twitch thee by the ear? But I forgot, perhaps he
pulled the wrong one, which hangs upon Plymouth pillory,
and,
Silence! roared Dudley, looking towards Morton, who was
thus soliloquizing, in an almost audible tone; silence! and
hear the governor. Thy time will come soon enough, lewd
babbler!
A loud noise and scuffling, at the door-way, just at that
moment
,
attracted the attention of the court, and a sergeant was
ordered forth to inquire into the disturbance. Just at that
moment
,
however, the door was flung violently open, and a man of
gigantic dimensions, twirling a sledge-hammer in one hand, and
holding the grinning head of a wolf, from which the blood was
still dripping, in the other, strode into the apartment.
Ye have fined me two pounds, cried the new comer,
flinging
VOL. II. 16
the ghastly trophy upon the council-table, and ye may even
take your payment out of yon brute's pretty face, or ye get
nothing from Thomas Walford.
The magistrates looked with some surprise at this
unceremonious
proceeding upon the part of the reader's old acquaintance,
the Mishawum blacksmith, while he in the mean while
continued
,
with much ferocity,
Ye have placed a bounty upon the scalps of wolves, or else
perhaps ye would have taken payment out of my hide, as I see
ye do daily with the miserable creatures who submit to your
saintly authority. Before long, perhaps, ye will set a bounty
upon the scalps of Episcopalians, or of blacksmiths. Ye have
hunted me like a wolf, and perhaps ye mean that I shall die like
one. I have committed no sin, and yet ye deal with me as if I
were a felon, because I am not of your communion, or your
company.
Peace, brawler! roared Dudley, venting his indignation at
last.
Peace! peace! where shall I find peace? cried the
blacksmith
,
glaring at the deputy, with an evident inclination to
demolish his skull with his sledge-hammer  while the
granite-faced
magistrate met his furious gaze with an expression as stern
and unflinching as his own. I was peaceful enough by my
solitary forge, till ye intruded upon my settlement, and destroyed
my peace. Of what crime am I accused? continued he,
suddenly
turning to the court?
Thou art accused and convicted, said Winthrop, gravely,
of confronting and maltreating the company's officers, thereby
bringing the authority of the magistrates into contempt. The
company regret to have brought matters to such a pass with
thee, and would have been well pleased hadst thou been
contented to abide peaceably and lovingly within their patent,
with acknowledged of their jurisdiction. The company do
not desire to deal harshly with thee, but thou claimest to hold
thy land under an adverse title to our own. Furthermore, thou
art the agent of John Oldham, a stubborn and litigious man,
who hath not ceased to create trouble for the company. Still
the magistrates are disposed to be gentle with thee, and for my
own part I declare sincerely that I would willingly be thy friend,
if thou couldest be disposed to dwell peaceably within the
patent.
The governor's soft answer seemed to mitigate the
blacksmith's
wrath. At any rate, he did not seem disposed to argue
the land title, at that moment, with their worships, and
accordingly
having made a respectful obeisance to Winthrop, and
exchanged a ferocious look with the deputy, he turned towards
the door, satisfied, for the moment, with the easy manner in
which he had paid his fine.
As he was about departing, his eye fell upon Morton, who
was standing near the door-way, and who was at that moment
recognised by Humphrey Rednape, as the sergeant was leading
him away.
Beshrew my heart, said the blacksmith, good-naturedly,
how camest thou in this plight, my worthy gossip?
How indeed! said Morton, demand rather, how can a
living man keep out of a scrape, now that the kingdom of the
saints be fairly established. Here be three of us now, who are
no better esteemed than the wicked, Numps Rednape, thou, my
indomitable Vulcan, and myself, who, sooth to say,
Silence! roared the deputy, thoroughly enraged at the
flippant conduct of Morton and the insolence of the
blacksmith
.
Remove the criminal, sergeant, and call Thomas
Morton.
There was a considerable sensation among the spectators, as
the name of this last culprit was announced, for the fame of the
uproarious monarch of Merry-Mount had spread far and wide
throughout the bay. The magistrates looked with a severe
expression upon him, as he advanced with his usual air of
careless confidence, and the straggling groups, who were
stationed in different parts of the chamber, clustered together
to look with curiosity at the prisoner.
Thomas Morton, said the governor, gravely, as the
criminal
stood unabashed before the magistrates, thou hast been
convicted of high and unpardonable crimes.
Convicted, am I? interrupted Morton, convicted before
trial. By Jupiter Tonans, that may be the law as laid down in
Deuteronomy, but it would not sound so well at Clifford's Inn.
Your charter, most worshipful governor, requires you to
administer justice according to the laws of England.
Peace, and listen to the governor! cried Dudley, in a
voice of thunder.
So I intend to do, may it please the worshipful magistrates,
continued the imperturbable Morton, but the governor must
even borrow the archangel's trumpet to outbray the voice of
this respectable person, whom I take to be the crier of the
court, and who, with submission, seems to me unnecessarily
vociferous in proclaiming silence.
Thus coolly rebuking the grim deputy, Morton turned
demurely to the governor, who said in reply to his first
observation
,
We do not intend to argue any legal points with you. Let
it suffice, that we are aware of the responsibility of our position,
but that we are determined that no man in the land shall treat
our authority with contempt, or abide within our territory
without acknowledging the lawful authority of this company.
To our king and to our God we are responsible. To thee we
intend but to announce our decision, regarding thee as one who
hath forfeited all right to a formal trial and conviction, by the
manifest notoriety of his manifold offences.
Would it be entirely superfluous, said Morton, on the
part of the Court, to give the criminal a trifling hint of some
few of the high crimes and misdemeanors he is charged withal?
Although convicted without trial, it would be a gratification to a
pardonable curiosity, could I be instructed as to my offence,
before receiving sentence.
Thine own conscience must inform thee of all thy atrocious
acts, interrupted Dudley, fiercely; let it suffice that thou art
thoroughly known to be a graceless reveller, a lewd
mischief-maker
,
and a ravening wolf.
Sayest thou so, my gentle lambkin, cried Morton, filled
with indignation at the injustice with which he considered
himself
treated, and venting it as usual in the most rigmarole terms.
Callest thou me a wolf indeed? By Jupiter, then have I
fallen among the most truculent and blood-thirsty lambs that
ever nibbled in Old Canaan or New,
Inter audaces lupus errat
agnos
,  as Flaccus hath it.
Peace, peace; listen to the governor, cried several of the
magistrates in a breath, indignant at the prisoner's insolence,
and determined once for all to put an end to the scene.
Thomas Morton, resumed the governor, in consideration
of thy manifold crimes and misdemeanors, whereof the principal
have consisted in distributing fire-arms and ammunition among
the Indians, contrary to his late and to his present Majesty's
proclamation; in lewd and riotous behavior, and in divers
depredations
and cruelties exercised towards the savages; for these
and other offences, the court ordains, that thou be set in the
bilboes
at such time and place as they shall afterwards direct;
that thou be afterwards imprisoned, until such time as the
company
shall find a vessel to convey thee back to England; that
thy house at Mount Wollaston be burned to the ground, in
16*
order that the habitation of the wicked be no more seen in
Israel; and all thy worldly goods be confiscated, as a
compensation
to the Indians, for the injuries which they have suffered at
thy hands.
Tantne animis celestibus ir?
cried the culprit,
astonished
and indignant at the severe sentence thus communicated
to him  To be set in the stocks, I Thomas Morton of
Clifford's Inn, Gentleman, Lord of Merry-Mount, and Sachem
of Passanogessit, my worldly goods to be confiscated, my house
to be burned? Wherein, I pray thee, right worshipful governor,
consist these mighty offences by me committed against the
peace and comfort of the savages?
Thou hast unjustly taken a canoe from one of them, said
Winthrop, and complaint to that effect hath been entered
against thee. Furthermore, it hath been proved that thou hast
discharged fire-arms against them and wounded several, for
refusing at once to furnish thee with the said canoe, and to row
thee therein across the river of Wessaguscus.
O Jephthah! Judge of Israel! O Minos! Radamanthus! and
all the puisn justices of Pluto's grim dominion, cried Morton
in a whirlwind of eccentric indignation, is this the
jurisprudence
practised in the kingdom of the saints? Then may the
Lord deliver me into the hands of sinners from this time forth
and forever! Now could I find it in my
Silence, silence, thou lewd, impious, blasphemous
babbler
!
cried Dudley, indignant at the prisoner's boldness.
I will not be silent, cried Morton, with rising rage, by
heavens! I will tell thee the truth to your grisly beards; my
tongue shall wag for once, even if ye bore it with red-hot irons
afterwards.
Have a care, cried Dudley, lest thou be taken at thy
word.
I tell ye, continued Morton, that it is all one long,
ludicrous
patchwork, this your list of charges against me. I know
your hatred of me; I know ye suspect me; I know ye fear
me. Even in the babble of your chamber here have I learned
the foul imputations against my fame. Ye suspect me of
fostering
and encouraging the late Indian conspiracy against the
Christians. If I were guilty of such a crime, hanging and
quartering were too good for me, but
Thomas Morton, interposed the Governor, no such
charges against thee have been preferred to this court; neither
do I, speaking in my individual capacity, entertain any such
suspicions concerning thee.
And so then, resumed the prisoner, I am really to be
punished for cruelty to the salvages, I their sagamore, suzerain,
shepherd, pow-wow! Why, the creatures love, reverence, and
obey me. They frisk round me like lambs; they will bleat
their hearts out with grief when they see my palace in flames,
and
Enough of this, interrupted Winthrop; the court hath
declared its sentence. Nothing can alter its resolution. Its
decress are binding, and they who are aggrieved by its acts have
their remedy at home, but not here within our patent. All
present complaint therefore is idle, and I counsel thee in the
most friendly manner not to aggravate thy offence by
unnecessary
recalcitration and recrimination.
Aye, I suppose I should go down upon my marrow bones,
persisted Morton, and offer humble and hearty thanks that ye
have left my head upon my shoulders, or at least my ears upon
my head, after the atrocious crimes of which I have been
convicted
and condemned without a trial. But I promise ye that
the bowels of the land shall be stirred for this; the king and
council shall hear of it, and may my soul perish in
everlasting
Take him away, take him away, he blasphemeth, roared
the deputy.
Remove the criminal at once, added Winthrop, gently but
decidedly.
And with this the men-at-arms led the Lord of Merry-Mount
into confinement.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE GENERAL COURT.
It
was the middle of October. An autumnal day, such as
exists only in the western hemisphere, was shining upon
Shawmut
,
or, as it must now be designated, Boston.
The stately groves, which adorned without encumbering the
picturesque peninsula, the scattered trees of colossal size which
decorated its triple hills, wore the gorgeous drapery of an
American
fall. Unlike the forests of the older world, which, thinly
clad in their beggar-weeds of brown and russet, stand shivering
and sighing in the dark and misty atmosphere, the monarchs of
the western soil had arrayed themselves in robes of Tyrian
purple
and crimson, scarlet and gold, and like reckless revellers in
some plague-struck city, attired in all their carnival bravery, and
beneath a vault of crystal radiance, were awaiting the destroyer's
stroke. The recent pilgrims from the older world, wandered
through these glowing and glittering woods with admiring eyes.
The forests seemed like the subterranean groves with which the
African enchanter charmed Aladdin, where rods of blossoming
rubies, and boughs overladen with topaz, emerald, sapphire, and
diamonds, dazzled the eye with their luxuriant and intertangled
magnificence, and where every footstep fell upon countless heaps
of crushed but sparkling jewelry. Or, as the eye rested upon
some hill, covered from base to summit with its radiant foliage,
where every prismatic color seemed flung at random in one
confused
and gaudy mass, a vagrant fancy might have deemed it
nature's mighty palette, with all the blent and glaring colors
wherewith she paints the rainbows, myriads of which seemed
struggling and wreathing themselves through the forest branches
to float into the cloudless heavens.
There is no power in language to represent, certainly not to
exaggerate, the brilliancy of an American forest in autumn. The
precise reason for the peculiarity which the foliage exhibits, has
never been satisfactorily ascertained, but every species of tree
and shrub seems to have a tint peculiar to itself. Upon that
memorable morning, which may be called the birth-day of the
Massachusetts metropolis, the woods which decorated the
promontory
,
or covered the chain of hills which encircled it, were
still virgin from the axe, and were robed in all their natural
glory. The oak still retained his foliage undiminished, but
every leaf, though green in the centre, was edged with scarlet,
and spotted with purple; the sumac, bare and leafless, lifted its
crimson crest; the grape vines hung around every cliff festoons
of clustering coral; the red maple, first to be transfixed with
the frost-arrow, stood with every leaf crimsoned in its blood;
the hickory looked like a golden tree transplanted from some
vegetable mine, as it displayed its long leaves of pale metallic
yellow; the birch looked like a flaming torch, fit for the hand of
autumn's goddess, when seeking through the world her ravished
Proserpine; while mingled with and contrasting solemnly with
all, the dark pines held on high their plumes of fadeless green.
Such was the scenery which surrounded the infant village of
Boston. Since the date of the last chapter, nearly all the
inhabitants
,
accompanying the governor, most of the magistrates,
and the minister, Mr. Wilson, had removed to the triple-headed
peninsula, leaving only seventeen male inhabitants at the opposite
promontory of Charleston.
Blaxton, who claimed the whole of Shawmut, both by grant
and by occupation, had however himself invited the settlers
thither, having been touched by their sufferings, and, as it then
seemed, the inadequacy of their first location to supply their
wants. He still dwelt at his hermitage, separated by the whole
breadth of the peninsula from his new neighbors. His cottage,
as we have already described, was placed upon the edge of the
western cove, while the lowly church, the rude town-house, the
market-place, and the thatched cabins which constituted the
little village, were placed upon the eastern or seaward verge of
the promontory, nestled beneath the commanding summit which
was soon afterwards fortified upon one side, and protected from
the northern gales by the tall cliff which rose upon the other,
and which still holds the ancient tombs of the Pilgrims.
Walter Ludlow and his sister had some time before removed
to the new settlement, which was evidently destined to become
the principal position in the new colony.
Henry Maudsley was still absent, but a change had come over
the relative position of the lovers during the weary months of
their separation. Communication by letter, which it had been
absolutely necessary for Maudsley to make to Walter Ludlow,
had led to some mutual explanations. Maudsley discovered the
extent and the wilfulness of his errors at a moment when it
seemed too late. Still, if he had remained in New England, it
might have been even longer before the perverse fate which
seems to delight in perplexing lovers, would have allowed them
fully to understand each other. Moreover, as has been already
hinted, a total revolution in his feelings upon the subject
concerning
which they had been so disunited, had taken place
Circumstances, which were in the very process of
development
,
had contributed much to this change, which the love of
Esther had commenced. The example of Winthrop, Johnson,
and others, had made a deep impression upon his excitable
imagination. Moreover, he had been recently brought into
intimate connection with many of the leaders and eminent
persons
concerned in the Massachusetts emigration, who remained
in England. Had not an imperious necessity forbidden, he
would, upon first receiving the letter which so suddenly and yet
so simply unsealed his eyes, have abandoned a country which
now had assumed an entirely different aspect in his sight, have
hastened across the ocean, never to return, and have united his
destiny forever with that of Esther.
Alas! at the very moment when this revulsion first commenced
in his feelings, he had found it impossible to indulge and to
foster
it; and, now that a total change had indeed come over him,
now that the groundlessness of his fears and suspicions had been
explained; now that none of the obstacles which had formerly
impeded the current of their loves, existed, a new and almost an
insurmountable one seemed to have interposed itself, which time
only could remove.
It was, however, a source of happiness to Esther, even in this
the period of their separation, that now at least, and for the first
time, her lover and herself understood and confided in each
other. She felt a firm and unwavering hope, now that their
hearts and souls were indeed united, that their destinies ere long
would mingle with each other, and flow on together to the end.
At this moment, however, she had cause for real anxiety, for
a long and an inexplicable silence upon the part of Maudsley,
had given rise to doubts of every thing but of his truth.
Other exiles of note, besides Walter Ludlow, had recently
taken up their residence at Shawmut. Among others, the
eccentric Maverick, the first slaveholder of Massachusetts, had
established himself and his negroes upon Noddle's Island, where
he had built himself a fort, defended by four pieces of artillery,
and where he treated all comers with a generous and noted
hospitality
.
Among others, he had entertained Governor Winthrop
and his friends, upon their first arrival in the bay, although his
politics and religion were opposed to those of the company, and
although, in the course of time, but little cordiality existed
between
the new comers and himself.
The first general court had been that day held at the new
metropolis. It was an assembly of all the freemen of the
corporation
in person. The rude town-hall, where they had been
gathered, stood where now stands that respectable edifice, which
having been successively state-house, city hall, and post-office,
has at last retired in its old age from public employments, and
devoted itself to private affairs. The thatched and humble
church where Wilson ministered, stood nearly opposite; while,
around the open field between, which served as a market-place
for the little village, and which accommodated their pillory,
stocks and whipping-post, were clustered the mud-walled cabins
where the settlers had established themselves, in anticipation of
the coming winter.
A stream of solemn visaged personages had poured out at last
from the rude capitol. The court was over, but many stragglers,
in their steeple-crowned hats and sad-colored garments, loitered
about the agora, or, accompanied by their demure wives, were
wandering among the primitive groves which covered the greater
portion of the peninsula.
A good deal of earnest conversation was going on among the
loiterers in the public square. Besides many very important
matters of a purely political nature which had been discussed,
several topics had been broached at the general court, which
threatened to sow the seeds of future dissension among the
colonists. The great points of the compatibility of offices,
whether ruling elders should be magistrates, and the reverse,
whether the political influence of the ministers required
enlargement
or contraction, whether the civil power was justified in
punishing breaches of the first table, and many other kindred
topics had been touched upon in the town-hall, and were
discussed
with great fervor by the straggling parties who were still
sauntering in the October sunshine.
Several respectable individuals, among whom might have been
VOL. II. 17
observed Goodman Faunce, with his friends Jonathan Jellett
and Peter Pid, stood under a mighty oak which spread its
rainbow
foliage over half the square.
Being all freemen, they had of course been present at the
general court, the regular organization of the assembly
requiring
the personal attendance of all those who were free of the
corporation, until the increasing numbers, a few years later,
required the introduction of the representative system.
The General Court was in reality the only legislative body
under the charter, although the Court of Assistants, which had
been designed by that instrument to wield only executive and
judicial functions, had already begun, by a patriarchal
assumption
of authority, to exercise the law-making power of its own
will. So little of the democratic element, however, seems to
have existed at that early day in Massachusetts, that this
usurpation on the part of the magistrates, unconscious as it
almost seems to have been, excited no jealousy upon the part
of the freemen, to whom the legislative power exclusively
belonged, and at this very first general court, holden at Boston, it
had been unanimously voted, by simple erection of hands, that
in future the freemen should choose the assistants, by whom
the governor and deputy should be chosen from among
themselves
,
and that, furthermore, the said governor, deputy, and
assistants, should have full power to make the laws, and to
choose officers to execute the same. Such a quiet and
voluntary
abdication of political power on the part of the popular
body in favor of their rulers, is unexampled, and speaks volumes
in favor of the patriarchal, pure, and unambitious characters of
those early rulers. How often in the world's history has such
unlimited power been placed in a few hands, and been restored
without a struggle, and without the faintest attempt to establish
a regular and unlimited oligarchy!
The respectable Faunce, however, seemed to have a
glimmering
notion of the tendency of the measure which had so recently
passed by acclamation, and was taking some pains, now that the
vote was taken, to point out its consequences to his companions.
The worshipful governor, said he, is free from
self-seeking
,
and desires nothing but the temporal and eternal
advantages
of the colony. But look ye, my friends, the
government
may come in time to be administered by hands which are
not so clean, and I, for one, should be well pleased to have a
voice in the making the laws which are to govern me, the more
so as his majesty's charter hath given me the right to do so.
Thou wert even a caviller in politics, Goodman Faunce,
answered Jellett; now I confess for my part that I feel but
little calling for such knotty subjects. If the worthy and
worshipful
magistrates are willing to take this troublesome burthen
off our backs, why I must even feel beholden to them for their
kindness. They know more of law-making than we do. To
make laws, brother Faunce, is a trade, I take it, like any other.
Now if it comes to mending a kettle or a stew-pan, I, being by
temporal calling, a tinker, may very
Nonsense, nonsense, exclaimed Faunce, with some
excitement
,
although I have the deepest veneration for the character
of our worthy magistrates, or rather for our chief magistrate,
for truly there are times when the deputy is little more than a
vessel of wrath, and is a hard-handed man at a bargain,
moreover
,
while the governor is as generous as sunshine, still I say
do I mislike this laying the reins on the back of a horse,
however
good-tempered he may be. The best of us are but sinful,
and the bit will get between the teeth.
It is highly generous upon the part of their worships,
modestly suggested Peter Pid, to take this troublesome office of
making laws, as well as of seeing to their execution. Few
would be willing or able to do this double work in a holy cause.
But they are competent. Issachar is a strong ass, though he
coucheth between two burdens, concluded Master Pid,
intending
to be complimentary to the magistrates.
Dismissing the discussion of the recent vote of the assembly
as a topic, upon which, perhaps, too many words had been
wasted, although without their consciousness, it had effected a
political revolution in an instant, the three worthies passed to a
warm, although somewhat unprofitable discussion of some
knotty points in divinity, which had already begun to distract
the metaphysics, and consequently the politics of the colony.
Goodman Faunce, much to the horror of his associates, broached
the doctrine of justification by sanctification, which he doughtily
defended, while Pid treated the doctrine of good works with
indignation, and stood manfully out for a covenant of grace.
Several persons, both male and female, joined the party in the
discussion, and the sun was high in the heavens before it had
terminated. In the meantime, however, as the usual hour for
such ceremonies approached, the centre of the market-place was
cleared, in order that punishment might be inflicted upon several
persons who had incurred it during the past few weeks. All the
whipping and branding, however, which had been ordained by
the last Court of Assistants, had been dispatched upon the
preceding
day, so that the whipping-post was idle. Culprits,
however
,
who had committed offences of a lighter nature, were now
led forward.
First of all came a beadle, leading along two women, with
their hands tied together, and with their heads and faces covered
with an iron framework, one bar of which was ingeniously fitted
across their tongues, compelling them to keep their mouths
open, and the unruly member quiet. These were notorious
scolds, a kind of culprits which the wisdom of those patriarchal
days punished in common with drunkards, vagrants, Quakers,
Antinomians, and other disturbers of the public peace. After
being solemnly paraded up and down the market-place for half
a dozen times, each was tied in a chair, and seated before the
door of her own house, where she was to be left till evening.
Next came a quizzical figure, led along by a sergeant armed
with a halberd. It was a famous toper, undergoing punishment
for his manifold deviations from the path of total abstinence.
He was attired in what was called the drunkard's cloak, and
which was nothing more nor less than a beer-cask, with the
lower end knocked out, so as to allow him to use his legs, with
a hole through the other, through which appeared his head, and
two apertures in the sides through which his hands were thrust.
Thus coopered up in the emblem of his sins, the culprit was
several times solemnly paraded up and down the square, and
then tied to the whipping-post, which stood very near the stocks.
As the culprit had, however, upon this occasion, been only
sentenced to public exposure till nightfall, and not to personal
castigation, he was left standing in his cloak at the post, to
endure the jibes, the rebukes, or the silent pity of all the
inhabitants.
In the mean time, this being the day appointed for Morton's
penance, and the hour of noon having arrived, a sergeant, with
four men-at-arms appeared, bringing with them in durance
vile, the luckless Lord of Merry-Mount. He apppeared to
have used all his philosophy to show himself superior to his
fate. He walked along between two severe looking Puritans,
with a firm and dignified step. His countenance wore its
usual frank and bold expression, although an occasional nervous
twitch at the corners of his mouth, showed that a sense of
humiliation
was working within him. He allowed himself,
however
,
to be seated upon the rough log, lifted one leg after another
to be inclosed in the appropriate apertures, and saw the plank
duly let down and fastened without a struggle.
When he was thus properly ensconced in his ignominious
position, the soldiers left him to his fate, to be a mark for the
17*
curiosity or malevolence of all who passed across the
market-place
until evening.
The knowledge that the celebrated Master of Misrule at
Merry-Mount was that day to be set in the stocks, was, of course,
very general among the settlers, so that he had sat there but a
very few minutes, before half the inhabitants of Boston, besides
many from the neighboring plantations, thronged to that
wilderness-square
to look at him.
He preserved his equanimity, however, as if determined not to
let the Puritans observe how deeply he felt his degradation.
Quid omnium vultus in unum me truces?
muttered he,
quoting his favorite Horace to the last. Why the devil are ye
all gaping at me? Saw ye never a gentleman and a cavalier in
unfortunate circumstances before? Look your fill, I beg ye;
ye have won the day, ye rascally croppies, so even enjoy your
triumph.
With these and other similar ejaculations, uttered, however,
in an inaudible tone, did the deposed potentate vent his spleen
and console himself in his downfall.
He had not sat there long, before he had been examined and
commented upon by nearly all the inhabitants, after which, the
first curiosity having been appeased, he was left at times in total
solitude, interrupted at intervals by the visit of some straggling
wayfarer.
As the square was for a moment empty, the Lord of
Merry-Mount
cast his eyes upon the rueful individual in the wooden
cloak, who stood upon the other side of the field.
The careless look, however, which he threw upon his brother
in affliction, became a fixed and concentrated stare, as he
suddenly
recognised the familiar features of the individual who
stood there in such fantastic plight.
Hey-day, he cried, and would have rubbed his eyes for
greater certainty, had his hands not been tied behind him;
hey-day
,
is it thou, indeed, most cherished of my vassals. Is it thou,
indeed, my butler, my Bootefish?
Proh pudor!
This be that individual, your worship, answered Bootefish,
for it was no other than that worthy person, who was
terminating
thus ignobly a vagrant career in different parts of New
England
,
which he had begun upon Morton's first capture by Miles
Standish; this be the individual, if a man in a wooden jerkin
like this can be called by that honored name. This be the way
the bloody psalm-singers have coopered up your faithful
Bootefish
.
Truly they hate us of the true church, your worship.
Ah, they have got the upper hand of us, said Morton,
and they show no generosity in their victory. And yet, by
Jove! I could laugh at the figure we cut here. Here sits the
potentate upon his throne, and there stands the prelate in his
robe. What a termination to our golden visions!
Truly, your worship, I have had no visions of late,
answered
Bootefish, but of the whipping-post. And yet, may I be
damued! if I would not take that as soon as this. To wear a
hogshead under my jerkin is what I have ever done, thus
carrying
out, as best I might, the merciful intentions of nature. But
a hogshead outside is a disgrace which I cannot brook. A
pretty figure do I cut, forsooth, in this ridiculous cask.
Not a whit, not a whit, said the indomitable Morton, gaily.
It becomes thee like a robe of honor. Was not Cur de
Lion kept in a cage? Did not Diogenes live in his tub? Nay,
thou lookest like the ancient philosopher, seeking among these
sour-faced Puritans for a man; and for a lantern, hast thou not
that radiant nose of thine?
As Morton spoke, several persons crossed the square, looking
sadly and earnestly, first at one of the culprits, and then at the
other. Last of all came Walter Ludlow and his sister,
accompanied
by an individual with the most peaked and pointed hat,
the most staid and starched collar, and the most dismal cloak
that could be found in the whole patent.
The step of Esther was less elastic, and her countenance more
dejected than it had ever been. A shadow was upon that
beautiful
face, as if projected from afar by coming evil. She threw
a hurried glance of sincere compassion at the criminals, and
past hastily onward with her brother towards their new domicile,
which, much superior in character to the rude hovels around,
had been constructed in part of the materials brought from their
old residence at Naumkeak, and stood more than half a mile
south from the church, and not far from the governor's green,
where Winthrop's mansion was soon afterwards erected.
The individual, however, who accompanied the Ludlows was
observed to lift his hands, and to roll his eyes upward with a
kind of holy horror, as the prisoners met his view. The
Ludlows
passed on, but this person still lingered in the square,
influenced, apparently, by curiosity, or by a desire of
administering
a rebuke to the two unhappy culprits. He stood for a
moment in the centre of the square, looking alternately at
Morton and at Bootefish; heaved a deep sigh, and then
seemed almost to prostrate himself upon the ground. Whether,
contrary to Puritanic custom, he intended kneeling down in
prayer in behalf of the prisoners, did not for a moment distinctly
appear. He said not a word, however, but rising up, a moment
afterwards, he suddenly flung a cabbage-stalk at Bootefish with
such unerring precision, that it hit him full upon the nose; and
then turning round, he bestowed the same favor, although with
less success, upon the unfortunate Lord of Merry-Mount. Then
lifting the steeple-crowned hat from his head for an instant, he
disclosed the grinning, malicious face of Peter Cakebread;
uttered a shrill laugh, and, gathering up his long black cloak
about his waist, he threw a somerset, such as was never
executed
before or since in Puritanic garments, and then left the
square.
Alas! muttered Morton, whom this last indignity, inflicted
by the meanest of his former vassals, wounded deeply  alas!
is this the end of all my splendid visions? Was it for this that
I have abandoned my country and my profession? Was it for
this that I gave up the lord keeper's wig? To sit in the stocks
and be pelted by Peter Cakebread? My race is run; my sun is
set. Still, although the saints have conquered the sinner, shall
they not crush his spirit? Do your worst, ye chosen of the
Lord! degrade his person, confiscate his worldly goods, ye
terrify him not,
`Si fractus illabatur orbis,
Impavidum ferient ruin.'
CHAPTER XVII.
THE KNIGHT'S LAST SCHEME.
Several
weeks after the occurrence of the last scenes which
have been depicted, Esther Ludlow was walking in the
neighborhood
of her new home. Her destiny seemed still perverse.
Now that the great cause, to which her soul had been devoted,
had triumphed over every obstacle, and had already established
itself upon foundations never to be shaken; now that she could
have gone exultingly forth, like Miriam, with timbrel and song
of triumph, was she yet oppressed with a deep sense of her own
personal disappointment? A change had come over her destiny
during the interval which had elapsed. Maudsley was still
away, and nothing concerning his fate had reached her for a
long time. But although an ocean rolled between them, their
hearts were no longer separated by an unfathomable gulf of
suspicion
and mutual distrust.
Maudsley had left New England, believing that Esther's
affections
had been alienated from him, doubting, indeed, whether
there had ever been the faintest response upon her part to his
deep and absorbing passion. He had, however, previously to
his departure, allowed himself, as we have seen, to send a solemn
warning to her, touching the character of the man who appeared
to have exercised over her some mysterious and unnatural
fascination
.
He would have been incapable, moved by jealousy
alone, to have traduced the character of one, concerning whom
he knew little, while he suspected much; but even had Esther
been nothing to him, he would still have felt it his imperious
duty to warn her of her danger, such reliance did he place
upon his presentiments, his dim reminiscences, and the
fragmentary
knowledge which he had acquired through Cakebread's
treachery. Neither did he hesitate, although a delicate sense
of honor would at first seem to have forbidden it, to make
full use of all the information conveyed to him by that crafty
knave. The reader will judge in the sequel, whether the nature
of the circumstances did not more than justify him in such a
course.
The very first letter received by him after his departure from
New England was from Walter Ludlow. His own answer paved
the way in the most natural manner possible, for a full and free
explanation on the part both of the brother and sister. The
clear sunlight of truth dissolved all the misty phantoms which
had disturbed his reason, and he bitterly acknowledged and
deplored the wilful and blind impetuosity by which he had both
suffered and inflicted so much distress.
But Esther was happy, when she reflected that her lover now
sympathized fully, deeply with her own feelings; and his letters,
which reached her at long intervals, breathed at once the most
passionate devotion to herself, and the most ardent affection for
the great cause which, in accordance with the enthusiastic
temperament
of that age of religion, his impressionable spirit had
felt itself suddenly called upon, as was St. Paul's, by a
supernatural
voice, to reverence, and with all his heart to serve. Still
his absence was protracted, and although Esther was aware that
matters of deep import had occupied him, and required his
presence in different parts of Europe, yet she felt sick at heart,
when she reflected upon the many dangers that might still lie in
his pathway.
Reflecting intensely and sadly upon these matters, Esther
lingered that morning in the leafless grove which extended
westerly
from her new abode. A presentiment of coming evil, for
which she could not account, and which she could not shake
off, weighed upon her spirit, as the coming thunder-storm
oppresses
and surcharges the yet cloudless atmosphere.
The radiant autumn was no more. Bleak December, with
its long nights of stormy darkness, and its short hours of pale
and broken sunshine, sat upon its gloomy throne. The day was
chill, the landscape brown and dreary. Suddenly Esther heard
a step in the forest; she looked up, and for the first time in
many months saw the form of Sir Christopher Gardiner. The
warning images which had thronged her brain for the past hours,
now seemed to have had their meaning. They seemed suddenly
to have been compressed and concentrated into one threatening
phantom, and that phantom wore the form of the hated and
mysterious knight. She had thought him absent, never to
return; she had almost deemed him dead, at least she had
schooled herself into the conviction that his dark countenance
was never again to be bent upon her own, that his stealthy step
was never again to cross her path; when lo! at the very instant
when her soul was most gloomy, when her heart hung like lead
in her bosom, at that very instant Sir Christopher Gardiner stood
before her. 'T was strange, she had certainly seen him, gliding
beneath the leafless branches of an oak. That spare, Arab-like
figure, those dark and frowning features, could not be mistaken;
and yet, as she looked again, he was not there. Could he have
passed her by without observing or without recognising her?
Had he gone forward to the house which stood at no great
distance from the spot? Was the apparition but a creation of
her boding and disordered fancy? Had the earth suddenly gaped
and swallowed him? It was a mystery, but every thing
connected
with the knight was a mystery. All that she knew was,
that she had seen him within ten yards of the spot where she
stood, and that now he had disappeared.
While she was thus ruminating upon the strangeness of the
circumstance, she felt herself suddenly seized from behind,
with determined although gentle force. She would have cried
aloud, but even as in the motionless tortures of a night-mare,
her tongue clove to the roof her mouth. She would have
struggled, but her limbs refused to obey her will. A sensation
as if, after all, she was but suffering the short-lived agony of a
waking dream, overpowered her. In an instant afterwards her face
was muffled in a cloak, her arms were bound, and thus pinioned,
blinded, and deprived of all power of motion or utterance, she
found herself rapidly borne away she knew not whither. Within
five minutes afterwards, she felt herself gently deposited upon a
seat, and after a brief delay, she learned by the rocking motion
and the noise of dashing waves, that she had been placed in a
boat, and was now upon the water. Whither, wherefore, or in
whose company, she knew not. Not a whisper reached her ear,
not a ray of light pierced the thick veil by which her vision was
carefully shrouded. Gardiner's dark image rose again to affright
her soul, and she entertained not a doubt that he was the author
of this fearful misfortune, which had now befallen her, and seemed
to threaten her destruction. Whether the knight, still brooding
angrily over her absolute and peremptory rejection of his
addresses
,
had returned after so long an absence to wreak that
vengeance upon her which he had so darkly and obscurely
threatened at their last and decisive interview; whether she had
fallen suddenly into the hands of some prowling party of savages;
whether she was now floating in a canoe, to be borne away into
fearful captivity in the remote wilderness; whether she was to
be placed on board some outward bound vessel, of which she
knew there were one or two to set sail immediately from the
colony, to be borne beyond the ocean, she knew not; and she
lay shuddering, praying and anxiously expecting her doom with
horror as intense as could pervade, without absolutely
overmastering
and destroying, a solitary woman's reason.
An eternity of anguish seemed to have passed over her,
although
VOL. II. 18
she could not form with the slightest accuracy an opinion
as to the actual length of time which had elapsed since her first
capture, when the sails of the boat seemed to be flapping
heavily
,
and then to be furled around the masts. Directly afterwards
the light keel seemed to touch a pebbly shore, and she was then
again lifted from her position, and borne rapidly away.
After a few moments, a door seemed to open, and she was
carried within a building. She was then placed with great
gentleness
upon a cushioned seat, and directly afterwards, the cords
which bound her were loosened, and the cloak by which she
was muffled was removed. For a moment she dared not to open
her eyes, and she sat collecting all the energy which was left
her, before she should venture upon the new scene of horror
which doubtless was impending. At last she looked wildly and
fearfully round. She found herself in a strange apartment,
spacious
but uncouth in its appearance, evidently the abode of
civilized men rather than of savages, but resembling in its
equipments
nothing which she had ever before seen. She deemed
herself alone, and was uttering a devout thanksgiving for even
this momentary respite, when a stealthy step struck her ear,
and then she found herself in the company of Sir Christopher
Gardiner.
We meet again, Esther Ludlow, said he, in a gentle and
melancholy tone, we meet again, never to separate.
Esther, as pale as ashes, looked in his face without power of
reply.
Since we were last together, resumed the knight, I have
dwelt amid savage scenes, and with men more savage than the
deserts where they dwell. I intended to beat down, to
annihilate
the passion which had taken possession of my soul. The
idleness to which the wilderness has doomed me has, I suppose,
rendered the feeling uncontrollable.
Spare me a repetition of these odious professions, said
Esther, looking at the knight with a pale and impassible
visage.
I have but very few words to speak, Esther, he continued,
and those will soon be spoken. I intended, both for your sake
and my own, to conquer a fatal passion. I have not been used
to hear words of contempt and repugnance from woman's lips,
and yet I endured your disdain without resentment.
Till this moment, interrupted Esther, her blood mounting
with indignation at the calm and measured language of her
persecutor
,
till this moment I hardly knew what disdain and
hatred were. Heaven forgive me that I want words to express
my loathing for you now!
I have already told you, he continued, that such language
from your gentle sex is new to my ear. I never knelt so long
in abject adoration to living creature as I have done at your feet,
and I have received nothing but reproaches. I resign all hope
of your love
Then release me, restore me, if you are not in truth a very
demon, said Esther.
Pardon me, continued the knight, I fear that my habits
of life, and the philosophy in which I have been schooled,
have rendered my character incomprehensible to a person as
single-hearted and pure-minded as yourself. You are now within
my power.
If you are a man, exclaimed Esther, you are incapable of
abusing that power.
If I were not a man, coolly resumed the knight, perhaps
I should be. You are, I repeat it, absolutely in my power. I
am a man bound by no ties, recognising no laws, obeying the
will of no living creature but my own, respecting nothing,
fearing
nothing, loving nothing, but yourself.
May God in his wrath blast such blasphemous love! said
Esther, with ungovernable scorn.
Your hatred keeps pace with my hourly increasing passion,
resumed the knight; fate is proverbially perverse to lovers.
Let me then waste words no longer. You are, at this moment,
the mistress of your destiny. Let me remind you that, upon
one subject in times gone by, there was sympathy between us.
To be the creator of an empire in the desert, was a great
thought, which created the same lofty emotion in your bosom as
in my own.
You know better even than myself, replied Esther, that
pretence of sympathy between us is a mockery, but most of all,
upon the subject to which you allude. I have learned to despise
your hypocrisy and falsehood in all things, in nothing more than
this.
We, perhaps, have contemplated the same object from
different
points of view, continued Gardiner, but let that pass.
Let me now inform you, that before a few months are over, this
whole wilderness of New England will call me undisputed
master. The whole rich province of Massachusetts is, at this
moment, a manor, belonging to me alone, and transmissible to
my descendants forever. All the efforts of these besotted
Puritans are silently inuring to my benefit, and this infant
empire, with all its inappreciable future of wealth and grandeur,
belongs to me alone.
These are the ravings of a madman, said Esther, looking
with mingled fear and wonder at the dark countenance of her
companion.
Believe it not, beautiful Esther, he continued, with a little
more excitement of manner, but in the same deliberate accents.
I am no enthusiastic visionary. My kingdom is of this world.
My schemes are positive, solid, material, not the delusive
raptures
of a dreamer. I repeat that, at this moment, the choice
is in your own hands.
You can offer me nothing but misery, perdition, infamy,
said Esther, who seemed to feel the icy hand of death upon her
heart, as she contemplated her forlorn position.
I have received letters within these three hours, continued
Gardiner. Had not the incorrigible and mischievous
recklessness
of one of my agents, thrown many obstacles in my way,
my plot would not have been so long in ripening. Know,
however, that the boasted patent of your colony is not worth
the parchment upon which it is written, that thousands of men
and millions of money are to be instantly placed at my disposal,
and that ere six months have past, I shall be proclaimed
hereditary
Lord Proprietor and Palatine of Massachusetts, and
Governor-General
and Admiral of all New England.
Is the blessed charter indeed revoked? murmured Esther,
feeling, in spite of her own fearful position, a pang of regret at
the downfall of the great cause.
Aye, the charter is worthless and already annulled!
exclaimed Gardiner, scrupling not to hazard a falsehood, which
he, however, believed would shortly become a truth, and it is
now for you to decide. Forget the disdain and the hatred with
which you have repaid my passion, and condescend to partake
the power, to share the councils, and to direct the destiny of
one who adores you, as man never worshipped before.
Never, never! cried Esther, shutting her eyes and holding
up both her hands, as if to hide some dreadful vision.
Be not too hasty, quietly resumed the knight, the wife of
the Lord Palatine of the Massachusetts, will hold no mean
position
,
and have no little amount of human happiness within her
high control. Wild though her domains, at this instant, may be,
an empire which stretches across a continent, and plants its feet
upon two oceans, is worthy to occupy an ambitious soul. Of
this wide territory you shall be mistress.
Your words are vain and idle, replied Esther, with cold
and icy contempt, now that I understand your trifling and
18*
vulgar ambition, your sordid schemes, I loathe you more than
ever. I never will be your wife.
Then live to be my hand-maid, my bond-woman, my slave!
cried the knight in ungovernable passion, refuse to be the
sharer, the controller of my destiny, and since it likes thee
better, be the plaything and the solace of my lighter hours.
You are at this moment irrevocably within my power. I accept
not your decision now, but accord you six hours of deliberation.
Escape is impossible, and I leave you to deliberate at your
leisure.
Uttering these concluding words in a gentler tone, the knight
subduing his emotion by a powerful effort, arose, saluted Esther
respectfully, and then left the apartment. His prisoner heard him
fasten the door securely behind him, and then, exhausted with
the agitating events and emotions of the last few hours, she
sank back almost insensible.
How long she remained in this condition she could not tell.
A keen sensation of her fearful position suddenly aroused her
from her trance. She found herself still alone, and collecting
all her strength, she moved rapidly about the apartment,
examining
the doors and windows, to see if there were no possibility
of escape. Alas! every thing had been too securely fastened, and
the efforts of a weak, solitary woman, were utterly hopeless.
The house where she was a prisoner, and which was no other
than the deserted palace of Merry-Mount, was surrounded, as
she saw, by an expanse of hill and dale in one direction, by the
boundless forest in another, and by the sea upon the third. But
although she saw no means of making her way homeward,
utterly ignorant as she was of the place of her imprisonment,
yet a death in the forest would have been welcomed with rapture
in preference to the doom which seemed impending over her.
But she at last felt convinced that escape from the room where
she was a prisoner, was utterly hopeless. Exhausted and
despairing
,
she again fell into a half insensible state. It seemed to
her that her reason was slowly yielding to the fearful excitement
of that day, and an irresistible and benumbing lethargy seemed
taking possession of her senses.
In this apathetic and bewildered state she remained for hours.
She was at last again aroused to a consciousness of her
situation
by a movement upon the outside of the door. In another
moment, Sir Christopher Gardiner stood again in her presence.
She shuddered convulsively as he approached, but had no
strength to utter a syllable, when he inquired in the most
courteous
and honied accents, if she were not inelined at last to
relent in her determination. Gardiner, vexed at her silence,
paced up and down the room, his brain whirling with a thousand
conflicting passions, but ever and anon paused in his disturbed
and impetuous career, to satiate his eyes with a long, ardent
gaze at his victim's beauty.
Suddenly he threw himself with apparent frenzy at her
feet.
Why will you compel to crime, he exclaimed in passionate
accents, one who would willingly live your slave forever?
Maddened by your beauty beyond control of every law, divine
or human, even thus abjectly do I implore you to recall your
fatal decision.
Tears of wild passion flowed like burning lava down the
knight's dusky cheek, he wrung his hands in frantic
supplication
,
he kissed her feet, her garments, he raised his eyes towards
her face, as if he lay in devout prostration before an enshrined
divinity.
Not to me, kneel not to me, murmured Esther faintly,
finding a voice at last, not to me, but to thy God. Pray to the
Omnipotent, to crush in his mercy, the demon to whom thou
hast devoted thyself, soul and body.
An indescribable sneer succeeded the softer expression upon
Gardiner's swarthy features. He sprang to his feet, and extended
his arms towards Esther. At that instant a shrill and peculiar
whistle was heard without.
Confusion! muttered the knight, springing to the door.
What means Skettwarroes by this sudden signal?
Thrusting his pistols hastily into his belt, and drawing his
rapier, he threw open the door, and advanced cautiously a few
steps outside. Quick as light did Esther, recovering all her
energy, follow his footsteps through the doorway before he had
time in his surprise to draw the bolts. She was ready to brave
every unknown danger, rather than remain an instant longer in
the hated presence of her persecutor. Gardiner had already
strained his eyes in every direction, but had seen no trace of
the suspected enemy. The shadows of a winter's afternoon,
however, had already gathered over the boundless forest, by which
the house was inclosed on three sides, so that it was difficult
precisely to ascertain from whence the danger was to be
anticipated
.
He had answered the signal of the faithful Skettwarroes, who
occupied the look-out upon the watch tower, and with whom he
exchanged a few unintelligible words, when suddenly he
observed
that Esther had already reached and unfastened the small
door which opened through the palisade. He sprang forward
like lightning, dashed through the gate in her pursuit, and seized
her in his arms just as she was on the point of plunging into
the forest.
By your leave, lady mine, said he, I cannot relinquish
my prize so readily, though 't was a pretty sortie, I confess.
Esther screamed and struggled with all her spirit and strength.
The hope of escape, which had been so nearly accomplished,
yielding thus suddenly to despair, seemed to produce a frenzy
in her soul, and to endow her frame for an instant with
preternatural
strength.
Exhaust thyself not, said the knight, with these idle
struggles. Indeed, thou must back to thy cage again, my pretty
bird of paradise. Nay, nay, be wise, there is none to help
thee, beautiful Esther.
'T is false, cowardly ruffian! suddenly exclaimed a voice,
hoarse with passion, but whose well known accents fell like
music upon Esther's ear. At the same time an elastic form
bounded like a tiger from the thicket, seized Gardiner by the
throat, and hurled him to the ground. Esther uttered a feeble
exclamation, and then sank insensible into the arms of Henry
Maudsley.
The knight, although taken by surprise, was upon his feet
again in an instant. He strode forward to punish the intruder,
who, occupied at that instant with the fainting Esther, seemed
hardly capable of defending himself. Suddenly, upon perceiving
the features of the supposed stranger, the knight paused, with
his sword uplifted in his hand, and stood motionless as if
changed to stone, with features grown suddenly rigid in their
passionate convulsions, and with eyes gleaming with strange and
unnatural fire.
In the mean time, while Maudsley stood, with the senseless
form of Esther in his arms, frantically imploring her to look up
for a single moment, and while the knight stood spell-bound and
immovable before him, several figures emerged from the forest,
and silently ascended the slightly elevated, but upon one side,
somewhat precipitous platform or ledge, upon which the groap
was accidentally stationed.
Before the knight could recover his self-possession, he saw
himself surrounded by six or seven well armed soldiers, who had
been sent by the magistrates to arrest him.
They stood in a circle around him, looking towards
Maudsley
for further orders. An unarmed person in Puritan hat
and cloak, who had accompanied the party apparently in the
character of guide, seemed desirous of concealing himself from
observation.
Gardiner at last seemed to awake from his trance, and to look
around upon the grim figures, who, arrayed in steel cap and
corslet, and armed with matchlock and rapier, had gathered
in such formidable numbers about him, with an expression of
contempt.
Little do I regard the malice of these crop-eared
blood-hounds
,
he muttered, grasping his rapier convulsively in his
hand; the living move me not, no, nor the dead!
No! continued he in a hollow voice, with features
expressive
of a profound horror, but with an attitude of desperate
determination  no, though the grave gives up its dead;
though hell itself hurl back its victims to affright me, even then
and thus do I defy thee, Harry Maudsley!
The knight would have sprung forward, but at a nod of
Maudsley, three men-at-arms laid hold of Gardiner, who
submitted
patiently to be held for a moment, while Maudsley
spoke.
Be assured, said he, that 't is no preternatural apparition
who addresses you, but a man in flesh and blood, as real as your
own. There will be ample leisure hereafter to explain why and
how my recovery from the wound received at your hands was
kept a secret from you
Verily, Sir Christopher, cried a shrill voice suddenly
interrupting
Maudsley at this point, verily, I made a grave as you
desired upon the solitary beach, but the tenant, look you, was
wanting, so I even buried the secret within it, and closed my
mouth and the grave at the same moment.
Perfidious liar! exclaimed the knight, starting as if a
serpent had stung him, and glaring furiously at the malicious,
mocking countenance of Peter Cakebread, who had hitherto
eluded his observation.
Nay, nay, most worthy chevalier, continued the
mischievous
Cakebread, with a leer and a chuckle, thou didst procure
me once an ignominious and most painful chastisement. I have
made thee wait a long time for payment, but I was even
determined
to leave no stone unturned, to return the obligation in
one way or another. Vengeance is mine, and I will repay, saith
the Lord! a text which I learned from my new masters, although
I do not yet correctly apply my learning, perhaps.
If then, cried Gardiner, turning furiously towards
Maudsley
,
you have, in truth, escaped the death to which I supposed
you long since a victim, you can now, at least, have neither right
nor inclination to defer an instant longer, the conclusion of our
quarrel, which, if it had not been deadly before, would have
been aggravated by to-day's events. Order these armed
attendants
of yours to retire.
No, Sir Knight, said Maudsley, who had gently deposited
upon the ground, and wrapped in his cloak, the partially
recovered
form of Esther, and who had now advanced close towards
his former antagonist  No, even if a mighty change, such as
you could neither understand nor dream of, had not changed the
whole complexion of my life, and made me more cautious, at
least, of shedding blood in private quarrel, still would I scorn to
lift my sword against such a thing as you are proved to be.
Insolent reptile! exclaimed Gardiner, fiercely.
All taunts are idle, continued Maudsley. I met you
once as a knightly gentleman, in honorable combat. I stand
here now commissioned to arrest you as a malefactor.
What means this insolence? exclaimed the knight, in
husky tones, and with a strange pallor upon his swarthy cheek.
Your own guilty soul tells you my meaning plainly enough,
exclaimed Maudsley, yielding at last to his long suppressed
rage. Know then that I have not in vain concealed my
existence
from you; know that I have not in vain employed the long,
weary, perplexed months of my absence. I have unravelled the
whole web of your villany, and have returned to brand and
chastise you, as you deserve.
The boy raves, said Gardiner, with a hollow laugh.
Aye, blaspheme not, struggle not, deny thyself not,
continued
Maudsley. As surely as thou knowest me to be Henry
Maudsley, so surely do I know thee to be Sir Fulk de Gorges,
expelled and branded brother of the knights Hospitaller of St.
John of Malta, husband of Lady Clara Hoveden, husband of
Edith Maudsley, and murderer of her father and herself. Are
you answered now?
The knight's dark eye seemed to emit sparks of fire as he
glared at Maudsley, but he was still silent.
Aye, aye, cried the shrill voice of Cakebread, and know,
moreover, that all your papers are at this moment in the hands
of the magistrates. A divine hand hath directed my humble
researches, and the magic rod hath revealed to me the golden
treasures of Shawmut. The officers have paid a visit, under my
guidance, to your hermitage upon the bay. They have secured
the person of the fair Magdalen Groves, commonly called your
cousin, Master Jaspar, and have burned your house to the
ground. All your plotting with the savages, particularly your
foul connection with the great conspiracy revealed this summer
by Sagamore John, and of which you are now known to be the
instigator, all, all is discovered. Aha, aha, Sir Knight! whose
back will catch the bastinado now? tell me that, tell me
that.
The malicious creature, who at that moment looked like a
very imp of hell, uttered a mocking laugh as he concluded,
which, more than all which had been said, seemed to madden
the knight's brain to frenzy, and to endow him with a giant's
strength. His game was up, his plots baffled, his person revealed,
his crimes divulged, the avenger panting for his prey. There was
no safety but in flight. Exerting his great muscular agility, he
threw off his three captors by a sudden and dexterous movement,
discharged a pistol unsuccessfully at Maudsley, stretched the
grinning Cakebread, desperately wounded, at his feet, with the
other, and then, with the suppleness of a tiger, threw himself
with one prodigious bound over the precipitous rock upon which
they stood, and plunged into the almost impenetrable thickets
below.
By this movement, sudden, bewildering, apparently
impossible
,
and which had hardly occupied a second, Maudsley, to his
astonishment and rage, beheld the felon, whom he had toiled so
long to convict and to apprehend, again escape him. Half a
dozen shots were fired in quick succession; but evidently in
vain, and then the whole party, excepting Maudsley, dashed off
in hot pursuit.
However ardently he desired the capture of the knight,
a legion of demons at that moment could not have moved him
from the rock. The beautiful Esther, who had remained as
it were in a kind of bewildered trance, suddenly revived, as
he hung despairingly over her. Their eyes met.
Dearest, dearest Mandsley, my preserver, my saviour! she
murmured, extending her arms gently towards him. Maudsley
could not speak, but their lips clung to each other in a first and
long embrace.
There sat the lovers, upon that rock in the wilderness, and
for an instant they forgot every thing but their deep love, and
their boundless joy at this meeting.
It was with a joyful although superstitious feeling, that
Maudsley suddenly threw the fated chain around Esther's neck,
which he had taken from the ground, where it had fallen during
her last struggle with Gardiner near the palisade. He reminded
her that he had sworn to return from the uttermost parts of the
earth, should that talisman inform him that danger threatened
VOL. II. 19
her, and he now urged her to accept it as a pledge that
their hearts were no longer entangled in mysteries, but at
last were united. They could have remained for hours
together upon that lonely spot, but their interview was
interrupted
after but a few moments' duration. Half the party, who
had been in pursuit of Gardiner, returned breathless and
unsuccessful
.
It had been agreed that the others should continue the
search all night. The adventurer, however, possessed such an
intimate knowledge of the country in that neighborhood,
beside being upon such intimate terms with many of the
wandering savages, that it seemed probable the pursuit would
be a protracted one, although Maudsley convinced Esther
that his eventual apprehension must be certain. He bitterly
regretted his want of adroitness in thus allowing the object,
for which he had spent so many weary months of labor, to
slip from his grasp, when he had already clutched it; but he
swore to rest neither day nor night, till the malefactor was
apprehended and brought to justice.
In the mean time, those of the party who had returned to
Merry-Mount, prepared to execute that part of the order of the
court in relation to Thomas Morton, which had hitherto
remained unfulfilled. The magistrates, as will be recollected,
had decreed that the luckless Lord of Merry-Mount should be
set in the stocks, that he should be afterwards imprisoned until
sent to England, that his property should be confiscated, and
his house be burned to the ground, in order that the habitation
of the wicked should no more be seen in Israel. Morton was
now in prison, hourly awaiting his transportation to England,
and every other part of the sentence had been executed,
excepting
the ordained destruction of the Merry-Mount palace. This
had, for a variety of reasons, been deferred, and the party who
were that day charged, by the magistrates, with the apprehension
of Gardiner, had likewise received orders to proceed afterwards
to Morton's domain, and to destroy his house.
They had already burned Gardiner's house to the ground,
after having searched there unsuccessfully for its tenant, before
proceeding to Merry-Mount. As has already been intimated,
they had there captured the unfortunate Jaspar, and had,
moreover
,
taken possession of a large collection of papers, including,
as it afterwards appeared, a voluminous correspondence between
the knight and Sir Ferdinando Gorges, in which their various
intrigues and machinations were set forth, even to the minutest
details.
The party had then proceeded to Merry-Mount, where their
adventures with Sir Christopher have been already narrated.
By Maudsley's orders, they now proceeded to set fire to the
palace, as well as to all the log huts and hovels which were
scattered about Morton's domain. The buildings had previously
been ransacked, by order of the magistrates, and every thing of
importance removed. After the flames had fairly enveloped all
the buildings, Maudsley carefully conveyed Esther to the
pinnace, which was moored near the shore, and accompanied
by the men-at-arms, embarked for the village of Boston. A
gentle breeze was blowing, and the little vessel danced swiftly
along the waves. Esther and Maudsley sat gazing at the
burning palace, which, built of light and inflammable materials,
was already a sheet of fire, and presented the appearance of an
extensive conflagration. The twilight was already approaching,
the air was chill and mirky, the red flames glared wildly and
fitfully athwart the lowering heavens, and were reflected with
sullen radiance from the darkening waves. Suddenly, as they
turned for a moment in another direction, they saw the large
hull of an outward bound ship, which was passing very near
them. A solitary person, his figure darkly painted against the
twilight, stood upon the quarter-deck, and seemed to be gazing
sadly and earnestly at the distant flames. The vessel was the
ship Whale, just starting upon her wintry voyage to England
the solitary spectator of the conflagration was the captive Lord
of Merry-Mount.
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE HERMIT IN THE ASSEMBLY.
The
magistrates were assembled, next day, in the rude
town-hall
.
William Blaxton, the hermit of Shawmut, had crossed
the craggy eminence which rose between his still sequestered
retreat and the lowly village of Boston, in order to hold an
interview
,
at their request, with the government of the colony.
His connection with the Gorges patent had ever been rather
nominal and accidental than real, and since the arrival of the
new settlers, and the summary measures which had been taken in
regard to Morton, Walford, Gardiner in New England, and
Oldham at home, he had dismissed from his thoughts the
subject
concerning which he had been used occasionally to hear
discussions from the mouths of Gardiner and Morton. He had
certainly never much interested himself in the merits of the rival
claimants to the dominion of Massachusetts. He considered
himself as a pilgrim in a wilderness, a hermit in a desert, and
he had a whimsical but profound contempt for every species of
human authority. He had allowed himself to be whirled by an
eddy entirely aside from the rushing current of human affairs,
and he had long since devoted his existence to solitude and
nature. Had he foreseen that the band of emigrants who, in
small companies and at different intervals, had been arriving
during the last two or three years, were so soon to lay the
foundation
of a permanent empire, and so soon to scare the spirit of
sylvan solitude from the lovely peninsula where he had
established
his home, it is probable that he might have attempted
some means of counteracting their plans by any fair and amicable
19*
arrangement that was possible. He considered himself the
sole proprietor of Shawmut, or, as it was now called, Boston, by
right of occupation. He was the first Englishman who had ever
slept upon the peninsula, and he had dwelt there in undisturbed
dominion during five or six years. His gentle nature, however,
having been touched by the sufferings of the colonists at
Charlestown, he had voluntarily gone over to the governor and
expressly invited them to his peninsula, assuring them of the
sufficiency at least of fair water-springs, which were so much
wanting at Mishawum. Although the governor of the colony
considered that the dominion and property of the soil of
Shawmut
belonged unquestionably to themselves, yet the just and
magnanimous mind of Winthrop could not brook the thought of
any injustice towards the hermit, although the question of
summarily
ousting him from his adverse possession was fiercely
contended for by the more intolerant of the brethren. The
town had been, however, commenced, and the lots were soon to
be apportioned; but it was determined by the governor that an
ample portion of the territory should be assigned to Blaxton,
which, in a worldly point of view, now that a permanent
settlement
had been made, would be of more value than the whole
peninsula, had it remained a wilderness. It was not probable,
however, that considerations like these would have any great
weight with the whimsical hermit. He already feared that his
dearly loved solitude was lost to him forever, should he remain
at Shawmut; but he shrank at present from the thought of
relinquishing a spot where he had dwelt so long.
It was for the purpose of conferring with the magistrates upon
matters of this kind, that he had made his appearance in the
town-hall that morning. The conference had been long and
desultory
,
for the character of Blaxton was singularly uncongenial
to that of the majority of the magistrates, and they had found
not a little difficulty in understanding each other.
It is therefore understood, said Winthrop, with whom the
hermit seemed to feel the most sympathy, it is understood that
fifty acres be set apart for your own use, Master Blaxton,
including
the tract more particularly occupied by your domicile.
Acres, acres, muttered Blaxton, dreamily, the thought of
admeasurements, and fences, and allotments, confoundeth me.
I had forgotten that men carved up and subdivided in petty
portions
the green and beautiful earth. I have sojourned so long in
the boundless wilderness, where my territory was wide as the
continent as unfettered as my thoughts, that I am become a
child, and can hardly understand the ways of men.
But we mean nothing but brotherly dealing, said Winthrop,
fair dealing and strict justice.
I never dreamed, said Blaxton, in a pathetic tone, that
my boundless territory would be contracted. I looked to have
dwelt with my orchards, and my books, and my young fawn, and
my bull, in undisturbed and harmless solitude. This new world,
they tell me, is very wide. Was there not room enough for ye
all? Could ye not leave the hermit in his corner?
Your fifty acre lot, said Winthrop, practically but kindly,
will soon be of more account and value than twenty wilderness
promontories like this
What tell ye me of value? interrupted the hermit,
pettishly
.
I tell ye I am like a child in affairs of this world. I
have dwelt so long in the wilderness, that the voices of many
men sound strangely to me. I love my kind I believe, and would
serve them if I could, but look you, I cannot live with them.
My soul lacks air, and cannot brook confinement. I am a
peaceable man, and have never injured living thing, and yet my
spirit rebels at all law, and cannot bear the dictates of any
power but those of the Most High.
Laws, my reverend friend, remonstrated Winthrop, are
surely necessary to the preservation of society. Shall wolves
and lambs, lions and kids, dwell together, and yet the fiercer
animals not be restrained?
I cannot abide with ye, I fear, said Blaxton, following, as
was his wont, his own train of thought, and heeding little the
words which were addressed to him; I cannot obey the laws of
man's making. 'T is for this I left my fathers' graves, and buried
myself in the desert. I am not of your religion neither.
We shall soon bring thee round, interrupted Dudley,
peremptorily
;
we will have no spies in the company, no recusants,
no blasphemers of our church. We have not come hither to find
surplices and copes in the wilderness, nor to hear the
massbook
chanted in the forest.
Gently, brother Dudley, interposed Winthrop, our
reverend
,
learned, and contemplative friend hath acted towards us
in a most friendly and Christian spirit; let us have no
contentions
upon religious matters yet.
Men are law-makers and tyrants by nature, continued the
hermit, even as tigers are carnivorous. When the lion
dandleth
the kid, shall I hope to repose calmly in the lap of civil
authority. No, my masters, said he, facing the magistrates in
an attitude of simple dignity, and slightly elevating his voice,
no, my masters, I came from England because I could not obey
the Lord bishops; but I fear I cannot dwell with you, for I
can never obey the Lord brethren.
Dudley frowned as the eccentric solitary made this last
observation
,
and was upon the point of uttering some harsh rejoinder,
when the door opened, and the sergeant announced that the
prisoner, whose presence their worships had desired, was now
in attendance.
Let her be brought before the court, said Winthrop; and
a female was accordingly introduced, wearing a thick veil, and
wrapped in a dark mantle, which quite concealed her form.
Thus attired, she stood in front of the magistrates' table.
In the mean time a number of colonists, directed thither
partly by curiosity, partly by other motives, had found their
way into the hall. Among the rest were Maudsley and the
Ludlows, who gazed upon the proceedings with great
earnestness
.
The prisoner will declare her name, said the imperious
voice of Dudley.
An indistinct murmur was heard, which failed to reach the
ears of the magistrates.
The prisoner will remove her veil, said Dudley.
The order was complied with, and the woman throwing
aside her veil, revealed a face of extraordinary loveliness.
It was a strange, almost a patriarchal scene. That rude
apartment thronged with its earnest, darkly-habited spectators,
the stern, but expressive heads of the magistrates, and in the
midst of all, and gazed upon with breathless curiosity by all, the
shrinking figure of that young, beautiful, desolate woman.
Blaxton, who had been upon the point of retiring, as soon as
his conference with the magistrates was concluded, had been
accidentally detained for a few moments within the hall. As
the prisoner lifted up her veil, his wandering eyes happened to
be turned in that direction. As her countenance met his view
he was observed to turn pale as ashes. Incapable for the
moment of speech or motion, he stood for a brief interval
transfixed
and horror-struck, as if a thunderbolt had suddenly
descended from heaven. At last he aroused himself, and feeling
that a solution of many mysteries which had perplexed him, was
near at hand, be glided close to the prisoner, and gazed long
and wistfully upon her.
Art thou not Magdalen Groves, of Boirdly? said he at last.
I am, said the woman, gently but firmly, answering the
gaze of Blaxton with an earnest and imploring look.
They told me thou wert dead, said the solitary.
Thou wert deceived, basely, treacherously deceived,
answered
Magdalen, in a low and trembling voice.
And hadst thou part and lot in the deceit? asked the
hermit.
There was no reply. The woman sighed heavily, but was
silent.
I am answered, said the hermit, the mystery is solved.
And so without saying a single word further, he took his staff
and went forth to his hermitage again.
The examination of the prisoner now proceeded. A variety
of interrogatories were addressed to her, but her answers were
brief and unsatisfactory. She knew nothing, she said, of the
present retreat of Gardiner, and trembled violently at every
question concerning him or his plans. All that could be elicited
from her in answer to their various queries, was, that she
believed the knight to be a Catholic, and that she had
understood
him to be descended from the family of Stephen Gardiner,
the celebrated Bishop of Winchester. Touching Sir
Ferdinando
Gorges, she knew nothing, and she had nothing to
communicate
concerning the intrigues of Thomas Morton, with
whom she acknowledged some slight acquaintance.
The possession of the papers which had been so recently
delivered to the magistrates, and which had been found in
Gardiner's
house, seemed to throw so much light upon the whole
history of the Gorges plot, that it seemed to them unnecessary
to pursue the examination of the prisoner further. Her conduct
was so close and impenetrable, and she really seemed to know
so little concerning the designs and the whereabouts of the
knight, that it seemed necessary to defer all further hope of
entirely unravelling the business, until the apprehension of Sir
Christopher Gardiner, as we must continue to call him, who was
not yet taken, and who was supposed to have fled to the savages.
The prisoner may be removed, said the governor.
Let her be kept in prison, and watched strictly, said
Dudley, till her paramour be taken. Remove her at once,
Sergeant Underwood.
Perhaps, said the governor, wishing to deal in more gentle
fashion with the prisoner, there may be some virtuous and
well-disposed Christian matron who may be willing to take upon
herself the custody and the care of the prisoner, till such time
as the court may again require her presence.
There were a number of females present, among whom were
observed the two respectable matrons who had not long
previously
been exhibited with their heads in a cage. All,
however
,
more especially that worthy pair, tossed their chins in the
air, and manifested a superfluous quantity of indignation at the
contamination thus suggested.
The sergeant was approaching to lead the unfortunate
prisoner
away, when Esther advancing from the corner where she
had been watching the whole proceeding with tearful eyes, said
modestly to the governor,
If the magistrates permit, I will readily offer the shelter of
my roof to our unfortunate sister. My brother and myself will
deal kindly with her, and will be responsible for her appearance
when the court desire it.
Magdalen Groves, who had stood like a statue of ice during
the latter part of this scene, chilled to the heart by the freezing
looks which met her upon every side, at hearing these few
words of womanly and Christian sympathy, trembled violently
from head to foot, and would have fallen, had not Esther received
her in her arms. For a few moments the unfortunate and
deserted woman seemed overcome by silent but convulsive
emotions.
After a time, however, she recovered her composure by a
strong and energetic effort, and then, supported by Esther, she
silently withdrew from the hall.
CHAPTER XIX.
AN ADVENTURER'S FORTUNES.
Sir
Ferdinando Gorges was the head of an ancient family,
which deduced its origin, in unbroken masculine descent, from
Fulques de Gorges, a Norman Knight, who came into England
under the banner of William the Conqueror.
A younger branch of the house, swerving from its allegiance
to the red rose of Lancaster, had been ennobled in the reign of
Edward IV.
More than a century afterwards, an intermarriage had taken
place between the two principal branches of the family. Lord
Gorges of Ashford, the representative of the barony, and Sir
Ferdinando Gorges, the acknowledged head of the family, were
cousins. Both were rich, and both were devoted to the cause of
church and king. Sir Ferdinando had never been married;
Lord Gorges of Ashford had espoused, early in life, a daughter
of Hugh Gardiner, of Clopton, a Somersetshire gentleman, who
was descended from a brother of the celebrated Stephen
Gardiner
,
the supple and subtle Bishop of Winchester, in the
reign of Henry VIII., and of his successors.
From this marriage there had sprung several children. The
youngest, the honorable Fulk de Gorges, had been a wayward
and unmanageable creature almost from his birth. Rebellious
and yet subtle, scheming, incomprehensible, perverse, licentious,
deceitful, he had been, during his wild boyhood, a constant
source of anxiety and sorrow to his parents. At the age of
seventeen, he had quitted his paternal mansion in a fit of
ungovernable
anger, and had passed a few wandering months upon the
continent. By means of his father's powerful influence, he was at
the expiration of this time admitted, at his own ardent desire, as a
page in the order of the Knights of St. John, at Malta. Although
the order, like all other monastic institutions, had been deprived
and abolished in England, under Henry VIII., yet Englishmen of
rank were still admitted into the fraternity, and the young de
Gorges, finding no difficulty in proving the necessary four
generations
of nobility, was entered in the commandery of Toulon,
of course in the language of England.
His bravery, his remarkable talents, his great skill in the
profession
of arms, whether exercised upon sea or shore, soon won
him an exalted place among the Hospitallers. The impetuosity
of his temper, the mischievous restlessness of his brain, and the
licentiousness of his manners, remarkable even in an order
already signalized in its decay by extraordinary depravity, had,
however, acquired for him almost as much distinction among his
brethren, as had his nobler qualities.
In many a bloody fight with the pirates of Dalmatia, the
mercenaries
of Austria, or the squadrons of the Sultan, he had led
the war galleys of his order to victory. Disappointed, however,
in his election to the post of grand master, for which he had
skilfully and almost successfully intrigued, he had abandoned
himself to an uncontrollable rage; had torn the cross from his
shoulder, trampled it under his feet, insulted his brethren, and
made his escape by a stroke of unparalleled and fortunate
audacity
,
before the punishment for his unpardonable conduct could
be inflicted upon him.
After this epoch he appears to have dwelt for a long time
in Venice. It is, however, quite impossible, and would be,
perhaps, irrelevant to attempt even a hurried sketch of his
adventurous life. His memoirs, could they have been given
to the world, would have formed a checkered, mysterious,
and romantic piece of biography. For the sake of
indicating
VOL. II. 20
only the manner in which his fortunes had been connected
with those of several personages who have figured in our pages,
we will but briefly glance at a few points in his career. He had
dwelt long in Venice. As already hinted at in some of the
earlier chapters of this work, he had been the chief instrument
of the celebrated mock conspiracy against the republic, and real
plot against Naples, in which the Duke d'Ossuna had reposed
implicit confidence in the crafty Englishman alone. As a
barefooted
monk, moving unsuspected from city to city, he had
passed to and fro between Naples and Venice, and his identity
with the brilliant and gallant Cavaliere di San Giorgio, by which
name he had been known as a celebrated commander of picked
condottieri in the service of the republic, had never been
suspected
.
Although the conspiracy had proved unsuccessful, the
chevalier had found no reason to regret his connection with the
Duke d'Ossuna, who was munificent in his gratitude, and who
remained always his most useful and powerful friend. He had
subsequently to these events, while employed upon a secret and
confidential mission from the republic to the court of Rome,
become acquainted with an English family of rank then residing
in Italy. Lady Clara Hoveden fell desperately in love with
the accomplished Cavaliere di San Giorgio, who accordingly
bestowed upon her his monkish hand in marriage. Perhaps he
might have obtained a dispensation from the Pope, but he
apparently did not consider it worth his while; for, after a few
brilliant years, during which his wife inherited a peerage in her
own right which added a lustre to their position, and a princely
fortune, which he demolished in princely fashion, he one fine
day decamped, nobody knew whither, leaving only a few debts,
and a letter for Lady Clara. In this epistle, remarkable for its
eloquent brevity, he informed his cara sposa, that the vows taken
at his entrance into the Hospital of St. John rendered their
mutual vows at the altar of comparatively little value. It was
no act of generosity upon his part to absolve her from her
obligations, because, in reality, they had never existed.
At this epoch, he disappeared in a cloud to rise again in the
east, and although nothing was absolutely known about him, it
seems certain that he had for several years worn the turban, and
acquired much celebrity in the armies of the grand Seignior.
His oriental residence seems to have confirmed him in a
natural
taste for polygamy, and accordingly, after various adventures
of flood, field, and bower, which befel him during his six or
seven years' residence in the east, we find him in the year 1623
leading a second English bride to the altar. This occurred in
Paris, where he had made his appearance as Sir Fulk de Gorges,
as suddenly as if he had been thrown there out of a volcano.
Nobody knew whence he came. Many disputed his identity
and denied his claim to the name he bore, although such
freethinkers
were singularly cautious in expressing their skepticism
to his face. His father, who had not heard of him for nearly
fifteen years, had lately died, having first taken the precaution
to disinherit him of his younger brother's portion. His striking
appearance, romantic history, mysterious character, and brilliant
qualities, made a vivid impression upon the young and
impressionable
mind of Edith Maudsley, whom he met at the court
of Versailles. Her father, the representative of an ancient
and wealthy family in Wiltshire, had but two children, Henry
Maudsley and herself. His consent was reluctantly gained to
the marriage of his daughter with the singular adventurer who
had fascinated her; and had not her brother been, during this
period, serving in the Low Countries and in Germany, it was
probable that the marriage, notwithstanding the satisfactory
evidences of his rank which Sir Fulk was enabled to adduce,
would have been violently set aside. Henry Maudsley, however,
was unfortunately in little communication with his family or
with any one at that time. It happened to be exactly the epoch
of his first and unsuccessful love for Esther Ludlow, and at that
time, engrossed by his own emotions, he was fiercely courting a
soldier's grave in a foreign land.
To hurry briefly to the conclusion of this rapid sketch of the
knight's biography, the newly married couple passed a year very
happily together, partly upon the continent, and partly at
Maudsley
Court and in London. During an occasional tour by
himself
in the land of his nativity, it so happened that Sir Fulk fell
in with the beautiful daughter of an English clergyman, whom
he had once known in Italy. The father, who had been
chaplain
to a British embassy, had resided many years in Tuscany,
and his daughter, naturally of a romantic turn, educated in a
romantic land, was both by temperament and circumstances
exactly the person to be fascinated by the graces of the
all-accomplished
chevalier, with whom an acquaintance, began in
her childhood, upon the banks of the yellow Arno, was suddenly
and unexpectedly renewed in the solitude of Shropshire.
She was at the time acquainted with a worthy but
eccentric
young man, a graduate of Cambridge, who had recently
taken orders in the church. Her father had been desirous that
she should have been united with him, although the young man,
who was no other than William Blaxton, afterwards the
eccentric
hermit of Shawmut, does not appear to have been much
more violently inclined to the match than was the fair Magdalen
herself. They were however acquainted, and but for this
accidental
visit of the adventurous Sir Fulk de Gorges at this
obscure
village, the tenor of the lives of both might have been far
different.
This incident happened to occur but a few weeks previously
to a great domestic catastrophe at Maudsley Court. It so
chanced, that a certain Lady Hoveden (sometimes called di San
Georgio), one day made a pilgrimage to that retired manor
house. Although her Alpheus, reversing the ancient fable, had
sunk, as he thought, to the bottom of the Mediterranean, to
escape his Arethusa, he had been traced through all his
doublings
,
and the deserted and insulted peeress, after years of
baffled pursuit, had almost come up with the traitor at last.
The consequences of an interview between Lady de Gorges
first and second, may be imagined. The gentle Edith
Maudsley
,
learning that she had not only been married to a monk, but
that the monk had already another wife, was wholly unable to
survive the blow. The fearful intelligence was like fire to
her brain, and she died in a delirious fever within a few
weeks. Her father, old as he was, went forth to seek his
daughter's destroyer, who, as already stated, was then absent.
A fearful mystery, and one that was never fathomed, hung over
the old man's fate. All which was known, was, that he had been
last seen in the presence of Sir Fulk de Gorges. Nothing more
was known, nothing more could ever be proved; but the old
man, living or dead, was never seen again. When Henry
Maudsley returned to his father's house, he found it desolate.
His sister was laid in a dishonored grave, and his father had
perished by an unknown fate. He had searched long, and in
vain, for the miscreant whose fearful crimes had entailed so
much misery upon a happy fireside, so much disgrace upon an
ancient house.
Sir Fulk's person was unknown to him, although he had a
vague impression of having seen him, when he himself was but
a child. It was, therefore, rather the awakening of a vanished
sensation, than a pure antipathy, which, as we have seen,
occasioned
him to doubt and suspect the unknown adventurer when
he first met him in New England.
Maudsley, however, sought for the fugitive in vain. Sir Fulk,
fortunately for himself, had been, as we have before stated,
absent
from home at the memorable interview between his two
wives; and after a frantic and prolonged search in England and
20*
on the continent, Henry Maudsley had been obliged for a
season to desist from the pursuit.
In the mean time Sir Fulk, assuming the name of his
maternal family, had appeared in Madrid as Sir Christopher
Gardiner. His friend, the Duke d'Ossuna, who, better than any
one else, was aware of the frequency with which he assumed a
variety of characters, and the ability with which he supported
them, was not at all surprised or unwilling to recognise, in the
English Chevalier Gardiner, his old and trusty acquaintance,
the Cavaliere di San Giorgio, and proved as well disposed
towards his former confidant as ever.
It was observed by the curious impertinents of Madrid, that
the chevalier was attended by a young and very handsome
page, who appeared exceedingly attached to his master, and
desirous of avoiding the acquaintance of others. Magdalen
Groves had, in fact, fallen an easy victim to the inconstant and
capricious knight, who, at the very moment when the two noble
dames, whom he had led to the altar, were disputing the priority
of their claims to his hand, found it excessively amusing to
carry off this romantic damsel, in the very face of the furious
pursuit which he knew would be opened upon him.
Deceived by a false marriage ceremony, the unfortunate girl
had willingly followed the fortunes of the mysterious object of
her idolatry. Unlike the two other dames, to whom his troth
had been plighted, Magdalen, upon being frankly informed,
upon their arrival at Madrid, of the true position of matters,
asked but a single question. She was born to be the slave of
passion, and all she worshipped in the world, was love. If she
was loved, a Puritan could not have looked upon wedlock's
symbols with greater indifference, than she did both upon
symbols and reality. She felt no resentment for the treachery
which had been practised upon her, because she still allowed
herself to be persuaded that love, imperishable love, the
golden treasure for which she was willing to sacrifice her all on
earth, and all her hopes of heaven, had been the cause of all,
and that it still remained unchanged, unchangeable. To her
the whole world was henceforth nothing, and she would rather
have lived the slave of that unworthy knight, than the wife of
an emperor. Without a murmur, therefore, at the intolerable
deceit to which she had been a victim, and which she was now
called upon to practise with regard to others, she allowed a
fictitious and circumstantial account of her death to be reported
in her native village. The tale, supported by forged
testimonials
,
was made to appear so credible, that her few relatives
and friends were entirely deceived. A simple monument,
recording her virtues and her early doom, was erected in the
obscure church-yard at Boirdly, and many a prayer for the repose
of Magdalen Groves was uttered by sincere but deluded lips.
The other adventures of Sir Fulk de Gorges, or, as we prefer
still to designate him, Sir Christopher Gardiner, we pass over
in silence. We would simply observe that, some two years after
his flight from England, his first interview with Sir Ferdinando
Gorges occurred in Madrid, and that after a certain time spent
in studying the old knight's character, and in discussing his
New England schemes, Sir Christopher decided upon revealing
himself to his kinsman, after first exacting from him a pledge
of secrecy. Sir Ferdinando found that he had, at last,
discovered
exactly the man for his purpose. Sir Christopher
found an inexpressible charm in these projects of enterprise,
in a new and untried field. His adventurous temperament
and intriguing disposition, were all excited by the vigorous
conceptions of his kinsman. It was an age of romance and
adventure. Their deliberations were held in Spain, the land
of chivalry, their projects were to be carried out in the
fabulous
El Dorado of the West. Bent upon rivaling Cortes and
Pizarro, Sir Walter Raleigh, and John Smith himself, Sir
Christopher engaged enthusiastically in the projects of Sir
Ferdinando. It was, moreover, especially convenient for him
to absent himself, for a term of years, from Europe. He had
exhausted the golden Orient already, the West was full of
new and enticing adventure. After considerable delays, the
necessary arrangements were made, and Sir Christopher,
accompanied
by his page and a few servants, among whom was
Skettwarroes the Indian, who had been captured in America,
sold as a slave in Spain, and rescued by Sir Ferdinando, made
his first appearance in the Massachusetts.
The rest of his adventures the reader knows. How all his
plans were baffled, how his gorgeous visions faded before the
obscure and repulsive reality, how the enthusiast of worldly
pomp and power, saw with bitterness the foundations of an
empire laid before his eyes, by enthusiasts of a deeper and
a sterner sort, while his own energies were doomed to rust
in the most harassing inactivity, all this has sufficiently
appeared
.
If this early chapter of New England annals has any
meaning in it, it certainly illustrates the peculiar character
of the Massachusetts settlement. Colonies of every other
variety had been sent to that inhospitable region, but not an
impression had been made upon its iron bosom. It was
reserved for exalted, unflinching, self-sacrificing, iron-handed,
despotic, stern, truculent, bigoted, religious enthusiasts, men
who were inspired by one idea, but that a great idea, and
who were willing to go through fire and water, and to hew
down with axes all material, animal, or human obstacles, in the
path which led to the development of their idea; it was reserved
for such men to accomplish what neither trading companies, nor
fishing companies, nor land companies, nor schemers of
satrapsies
,
nor dreamers of palatinates, were able to effect. It was a
great movement, not a military, nor a philanthropic, nor a
democratic
movement, but a religious, perhaps a fanatical movement,
but the movers were in earnest, and the result was an empire.
The iron character of these early founders left an impression
upon their wilderness-world, which has not yet been effaced; and
the character of their institutions, containing much that is
admirable, mingled with many objectionable features, has
diffused
an influence, upon the whole, healthy and conservative,
throughout the length and breadth of the continent.
We have witnessed, moreover, the singular manner in which
the fortunes of Gardiner became entangled with that of the other
leading characters who have figured in these pages, and the
striking fatality by which he was so suddenly brought face to
face, in that lonely desert, with the avenger of his crimes.
Hardly less singular was the re-appearance, to the eyes of the
dreaming Blaxton, of one whom he had known in her innocent
youth, who, he thought, had long been consigned to the
tomb, and for the repose of whose soul he had himself offered
many a prayer. It was no wonder that the vision had at first
appalled him, and that he had found it difficult, for a long time,
to shake off the impression that he had been in communion with
a visitant from the spiritual world.
As for Henry Maudsley, at the moment when he left the
shores of New England, believing that the mysterious knight
had found the means of ingrtiating himself in the affections
both of Walter Ludlow and his sister, he had received but a
clue only to the character of the adventurer, by the papers
brought to him by Cakebread. It was impossible for him to
resist the sacred voice which seemed to cry out to him from the
tomb, to lose no time, and to omit no possible step which might
lead to the unravelling of these dark mysteries. Convinced,
however, as we have seen, that the heart of Esther was
irrevocably
lost to him, he had not trusted himself to see her before
his departure; and moreover, even if a full and free
understanding
had taken place between them, which might easily have
happened, he would have felt under a no less imperious
necessity
to hasten across the sea, without delay, to commence at
once an investigation into matters of such deep import.
We have seen how the very first letter from him which
reached the Ludlows, opened the way for a full and candid
explanation
of all causes of difference between himself and Esther.
Thereafter, the interchange of letters was as frequent as in those
days was possible between the old world and the wilderness; but
Maudsley, in the prosecution of his inquiries, was obliged to
consume more time, and to traverse a greater space than he had
at first anticipated. When he at last made his appearance
again at so opportune a moment, in New England, he had
fortified
himself with the necessary proofs and documents to warrant
the apprehension of Gardiner, and his transportation to England
for trial. His chagrin at the evasion of the knight at a
moment
when he was himself so busily occupied in sustaining his
long-lost Esther, may be easily imagined.
CHAPTER XX.
MAGDALEN'S REQUIEM.
The
afternoon of the day upon which the examination of
Magdalen Groves before the magistrates had taken place, was
gloomy and threatening. No snow had yet fallen since the
commencement of the winter, but there were now indications
of a storm.
The unfortunate and deserted woman accompanied Esther,
with whom as well as with Maudsley, it will be recollected, she
had had previous but mysterious interviews, to her own
residence
.
Her mind seemed, however, in an apathetic condition,
as if the severity of the blows, which had been inflicted upon
her, had left her almost insensible. Her replies to the kind
words spoken to her by Esther, Walter Ludlow, and Maudsley
were brief and unsatisfactory. She appeared humble and
grateful
,
but incommunicative and preoccupied. In answer to various
suggestions, she constantly repeated that she would seek out her
cousin, as she continued to call Sir Christopher Gardiner.
It was naturally difficult for persons, so differently situated
with regard to that adventurer, to hold any very satisfactory
communion together, but Maudsley was determined that his
victim should be enlightened as to his true character and his
perfidy. Of his former adventures and crimes she had some
knowledge, but they had made no impression upon her. She
had, however, more than suspected the nature of his feelings
towards Esther, and had been nearly driven to madness in
consequence
;
but the knight, with his usual crafty eloquence, had
been enabled at last to lull her jealousy to sleep, and during
their absence from Massachusetts, there had, of course, been
nothing to awaken it again.
Maudsley, however, convinced that it was for the eventual
repose of the deceived and deserted woman to be enlightened at
last upon these topics, now, as briefly and tenderly as he could,
gave her the true history of the previous day's adventure at
Merry-Mount, of which she had been in profound ignorance,
and informed her, moreover, of the proposal which Gardiner had
made to him in a whisper, at their memorable meeting upon
the beach at Shawmut.
The unfortunate woman received these tidings with a frozen
stare, as if the poniard which thus struck her to the heart
was so keen, that it destroyed her without inflicting a
positive pang. She made no reply. Her eye seemed hot and
tearless; she trembled slightly, but uttered not a syllable of
complaint or reproach. The slave of love, she who had
sacrificed
all for love, who had pardoned treachery, coldness, cruelty,
while she still believed herself the object of love, now saw
herself
,
beyond all possibility of doubt, both despised and hated.
At her urgent entreaty, she was left to herself, for a little
while. The night had already set in. The wind howled
dismally
through the leafless groves which surrounded the
Ludlows'
cottage. The indications of the afternoon had not been
deceptive, and a driving, blinding, snow-storm combined with
the raging wind and the benumbing cold, to make a fearful
night. It seemed impossible that any living soul would willingly
brave the terrors of such a tempest.
At about ten o'clock Esther looked into the room where
Magdalen
was still sitting, or rather crouching in the same attitude
in which she had been left. As she, however, manifested
considerable
repugnance to any communication at present, and
seemed still in a stunned and almost a lethargic state, Esther
thought that it was useless to force upon her common-place
consolation which was thus decidedly rejected. Earnestly
imploring
her, however, to address herself to God for support and
consolation, and gently advising her to seek repose, if not sleep,
as soon as possible, she withdrew for the night.
About an hour afterwards, Magdalen, who had still remained
motionless, in her solitary position near the hearth, where huge
burning logs threw a fitful glare about the rude apartment,
suddenly started to her feet, as if the whole truth had suddenly,
and for the first time, glared upon her, with a horrible and
unquenchable light.
I will seek the traitor, said she to herself, in a low, hoarse
voice. Without another word, and with noiseless steps, she went
from the room, opened the outer door, and then glided forth,
like a ghost, into the midnight storm. The snow, whirling thick
and fast before the hurricane, had already, like a white deluge,
changed the face of the wilderness. She moved on without a
sensation of fear, for she found something congenial in that
opaque and boundless gloom, while the wintry cold and the
driving
snow felt grateful to her burning brain. For many minutes
she moved along, abandoning herself as it were to the fierce
delight of mingling with an elemental tempest, as wild and
desolate as that which was sweeping her soul. At last the
excitement of her brain gradually began to yield before the
benumbing effects of the cold, and the difficulty of making
her way through the heavy drifts and the constantly increasing
storm. How long and how far she had wandered, she knew
not; but at last the fury of her emotions seemed to have abated,
a delicious calm came over her, she sank upon the ground,
breathed a prayer of forgiveness for herself for her enemies,
and so fell asleep for ever. The driving hurricane wrapped
her as she slept in an icy winding sheet, and the wintry wind
sounded her requiem in the tossing pine branches.
VOL. II. 21
CHAPTER XXI.
CONCLUSION.
Within
the territory of the Plymouth colony, upon the banks
of the Namaskett River, six figures lay closely concealed in a
thicket of alders. Two of the individuals thus lying in ambush
were officers in the service of the Massachusetts company,
Captain
Underhill and Lieutenant Dudley; the other four were
savages. The six composed a hunting party, which, after
months of unremitting search, had at last come up for the first
time with their game. The game was Sir Christopher Gardiner,
and after having been often baffled, they were at last upon his
track.
Immediately upon his disappearance, as related in some of the
preceding pages, the government of Massachusetts had sent in
pursuit of him. He had, however, escaped their vigilance, and,
assisted by the Indians of his neighborhood, with whom he had
maintained friendly relations, he had nearly succeeded in making
his escape to Virginia. The winter had, however, proved so
inclement that he had been obliged to defer his expedition
thither, till the opening of the spring, and in the mean time, to
lead a wandering life among the savages.
Information had, however, been brought to Governor
Bradford
of Plymouth, by some of the Indians inhabiting that colony,
of the place where the knight kept himself concealed.
Communications
upon the subject of the fugitive, and upon the
importance of securing his person, having previously been
exchanged
between Bradford and the Massachusetts governor,
orders were given by the magistrates of Plymouth for his
immediate
arrest, and a considerable reward promised to his captors.
Many of the Plymouth Indians, desirous of earning the proffered
bounty, were very willing to undertake the adventure, provided
the price were set upon his scalp.
Such was the knight's reputation for desperate courage and
skill, that the attempt to secure his person alive, as was proposed
by the magistrates, was considered a very hazardous
undertaking
.
As all, however, who engaged in the pursuit, were
absolutely
forbidden by the government both of Massachusetts and
Plymouth to take his life, the chase became more hazardous
and less attractive.
Had the price been set upon his head, it was probable that it
would very soon have been brought before the tribunal. As his
living person was required, it became at last very doubtful
whether he would be secured, and it was even supposed by many
that he had already effected his escape to Virginia.
Upon a bright morning in the latter part of April, the party
already mentioned lay concealed in the still leafless thickets
which bordered the Namaskett River. Intelligence had been
brought to them by a treacherous Indian, in whom Gardiner had
been obliged to repose confidence, that he was that morning to
descend the river in a canoe. The party lay with their ears
close to the ground, listening and watching like blood-hounds
for the faintest symptoms of his approach. At last, from a
considerable
distance above them, the light drip of an oar fell upon
their ears. It was evident that the scout had not deceived them.
The Englishmen had their rapiers and fire-arms, as usual, but
the savages were provided only with long poles, to which strong
hooks were attached. As the necessity of taking their game
alive had been so strongly impressed upon the party, the Indians
had been deprived of their customary weapons of war, lest their
forbearance should be too heavily taxed.
After a few breathless moments of delay, the canoe came
slowly floating down the stream. It was Sir Christopher
Gardiner indeed who sat within that frail, birchen bark, but how
changed in appearance from the brilliant Sir Fulk de Gorges.
His dress was squalid, his features, emaciated by fasting, vigils
and exposure, were almost overgrown by his coal-black beard;
while the fierce light which shone from his sunken and
cavernous
eyes, seemed an unholy and sepulchral flame. He appeared,
however, calm and self-possessed, and his head, at the slightest
rustle in the bushes, turned with its quick, snake-like
movement
,
seeming almost to anticipate the arrival of every sound.
No sooner had the canoe floated past the lurking place of the
party, than, at a nod from Captain Underhill, two of the savages
plunged into the stream, and swam boldly towards the knight.
Although the movement had been as stealthy and as noiseless as
possible, Gardiner confronted them in an instant with his match
lock at his cheek. The Indians hesitated a moment, and then
one of them advanced. In another instant, there was a flash, a
report, a yell, and the blood of the foremost savage dyed the
placid waters of the river. The other Indian dived below the
surface, and regained the shore. The knight profited by the
interval to re-load his piece.
In the mean time, however, the two other Indians, running
along in advance of the canoe, which was slowly floating down
the sluggish river, had in their turn leaped into the water, and
were now close upon the enemy; while at the same time the
savage who had at first retreated, finding himself supported
by his companions, had again advanced to the attack, and the
three, armed with their long-hooked poles, now surrounded the
canoe.
At this moment Captain Underhill emerged from the thicket,
and, standing upon the edge of the river, called upon Sir
Christopher
Gardiner to yield to the authority of the Massachusetts
company. To this the knight replied by a bullet, which struck
a birch tree, within a few inches of the captain's head.
The tiger stood at bay at last, and it was evident that he
meant to sell his life as dearly as possible. The odds were now
five to one, and two of the five were well-armed Englishmen.
Had the party not been hampered by their instructions to secure
their fugitive with as little injury to his person as possible, the
combat would have been of very short duration. As it was,
before Gardiner had time to reload his matchlock, the three
sayages
had adroitly succeeded in overturning his boat. The knight
fell into the stream, and unfortunately his gun and his rapier,
which he had drawn but laid down for a moment, while engaged
with his fire-arm, both sank in the water. He had now no
weapon but his dagger, with which he desperately defended
himself, at the same time that he made an effort to swim to the
opposite shore. The boldest and most active of the savages,
however, strove to intercept him, but Gardiner, closing with
him in the middle of the river, dealt him such a wound that
he sank below the surface with a terrific howl, and was
afterwards
observed crawling, more dead than alive, upon the sandy
margin of the stream.
Meanwhile, however, the other Indians had been furiously
belaboring
the knight with their long heavy poles, with which they
inflicted many severe and benumbing contusions, and both at
last succeeded in fixing their hooks in different parts of his
dress. At the same moment Captain Underhill and Lieutenant
Dudley plunged into the stream, and swam straight towards him.
Thus, in the middle of a deep river, beset by two savages and
two armed Englishmen, and having himself no weapon but his
dagger, did the desperate knight gallantly maintain the unequal
combat. It was evident, however, to himself as well as to his
enemies, that his time was come. Fairly harpooned, as it were,
and almost dragged under water by the savages, stunned and
bruised by the blows which they had showered upon him,
and attacked by two fresh and vigorous enemies, escape was
now impossible. A surrender, however, he did not contemplate.
21*
On the contrary, he kept himself floating and almost motionless
in the water till Underhill was within his reach, then suddenly
clutching him by the throat, he raised his dagger with a last and
desperate effort. At that very instant, Dudley, who had
approached
him upon the other side, struck the weapon, by a
sudden movement, from his grasp. Thus disarmed, Gardiner
threw his arms around Underhill's neck, locked him in a
fierce embrace, and sank with him into the stream. Here the
two, clasped in each others arms, might have reposed till the last
trumpet sounded, had not Dudley directed the savages to drag
at Gardiner with all their strength. The harpoons held, the
savages soon gained the margin of the narrow stream, and with
great exertion, but in a brief space of time, succeeded in
dragging
the bodies of Gardiner and Underhill from the river, and
laying them upon the bank.
Underhill soon recovered, but it was for a long time doubtful
whether the suspended animation of the knight would be
restored
.
After a long interval, however, during which the two
unwounded savages watched for his recovery with great anxiety,
fearing lest, with his departing spirit, should slip from their grasp
the reward for which they had so vigilantly toiled; after a period
of great uncertainty and suspense, Gardiner at length recovered
his senses. His iron frame was, however, fairly prostrated,
although his heart remained as stubborn and undismayed as
ever.
This tale, protracted far beyond the extent originally
anticipated
,
now draws to its close. Sir Christopher Gardiner, after
his capture, as above related, was brought, by Underhill and
Dudley, to Boston, where he was kept in strict custody until
despatched to England to answer for his various private and
political crimes. In the same vessel with himself, was sent
prisoner, one Philip Ratcliff, originally a servant of Matthew
Cradock, who had been guilty of uttering reproaches against
the church of Salem, and company of the Massachusetts. For
this offence, the government had cut off his ears, whipped him
severely, and banished him from the territory. Gardiner,
although himself a prisoner, had remonstrated with the
magistrates
upon the severity of this punishment, and in consequence
of his exhortations, the branding, which had formed a part of
the original sentence, was omitted.
Upon the arrival of Gardiner in England, he met with no
punishment. The proofs of his principal offences were wanting.
Maudsley, upon mature consideration of the effect of such a
proceeding, and at the earnest solicitation of Esther, declined
to prosecute him before the criminal tribunals, and Lady
Hoveden had died some years before. Under the name of Sir
Christopher Gardiner, and in his altered person, there were
none in England to recognise the once celebrated Fulk de
Gorges, excepting always his kinsman Sir Ferdinando.
Gardiner found that his friend Morton had been right, in
supposing that Sir Ferdinando had grown lukewarm in the
New England schemes. Morton, Gardiner, and Ratcliff,
however
,
continued for some years to prefer complaints before the
Lords of the Privy Council, against the government of the
Massachusetts colony, in which they were sustained by Gorges.
The despotic nature of their government, as illustrated in the
savage punishment inflicted for a few idle words upon
Ratcliff
,
was handled against the colony with considerable effect.
A petition, exhibited by Gardiner, Gorges, Mason, and others,
against both the Plymouth and the Massachusetts company, was
heard before the privy council, and afterwards reported to the
king. They were accused, by the petitioners, of an intention
to rebel and to cast off their allegiance, and to be wholly separate
from the church of England, and that their ministers and people
continually railed against the church, state, and bishops. A
general government was urged as a remedy. The colony was,
however, powerful. Sir Richard Saltonstall, Mr. Humphrey,
and Mr. Cradock, were heard before a committee of the council,
and defended the cause of Massachusetts with such ability and
earnestness, that all thought of a
quo warranto
against the
charter was relinquished, and an order of council passed,
expressing
approval of the general conduct, both of the
Massachusetts
and Plymouth governments, and pledging the crown to
sustain their liberties and privileges as by charter granted, with
any thing further that might tend to the good government,
prosperity, and comfort of the people there of that place.
Sir Ferdinando, whose son had, in the mean time,
married
Lady Frances, daughter of the Earl of Lincoln, and
sister to Lady Susan Humphrey and Lady Arabella
Johnson
,
became probably less inclined to quarrel with a colony
with some of whose most eminent names he was thus intimately
allied. Tired with his fruitless and expensive exertions, he,
after a time, contented himself with modelling and arranging his
province of Maine in the most aristocratic and feudal fashion,
obtaining, in 1639, a confirmed grant of the whole province
with the title of Lord Palatine. The great council of Plymouth
had previously (in 1635) surrendered their charter, the renewed
attempt to divide the whole territory of New England into
lordships, with a revocation of the Massachusetts patent, and
an appointment of a general governor, having again failed.
Gardiner never returned to New England. The Lord of
Merry-Mount returned in 1643, having, in the mean time,
enraged the colonists by his satirical performance called the
New English Canaan. He was kept in prison for a year,
fined 100, which he was unable to pay, and nothing but his
old age and craziness saved him from the whipping-post.
He went to Agamenticus within the palatinate of Sir
Ferdinando
Gorges, and living there poor and despised, died within
two years after.
Thomas Walford, the smith of Mishawum, remained but a
short time in Charlestown. The same year in which our story
closes, he and his wife were ordered to depart out of the limits
of the patent, before the 20th October, under pain of
confiscation
of his goods. His offence was stated to be contempt of
authority, and confronting officers. Two years afterwards his
goods were sequestered and placed in the hands of one Ancient
Gennison, to satisfy some debts owed by him in the bay. He
removed to Piscataqua (Portsmouth) where he became an
important and respected citizen. His wife, twenty-five years
afterwards, when the bloom of youth had faded, was presented
by her neighbors as a witch, but, the palmy days of
witch-hunting
not having arrived, she was not only acquitted of the
charge, but recovered damages against one who had called her
by the odious name. The blacksmith lived to a good old age,
and left, at his death, a competent estate to his children.
Bootefish and Rednape, soon after the lamentable decease of
their compeer Peter Cakebread, emigrated to Virginia, whither
the Canary Bird had flown before them. The domain of
Merry-Mount
was divided off in lots, and settled principally by citizens
of Boston.
As for the hermit Blaxton, he soon found it impossible to
exist among what seemed to him the uproarious multitude,
which now thronged his sylvan peninsula. He lingered
irresolutely
for a year or two, as loth to leave the scenes endeared to
him by his long and solitary residence, but at last he made up
his mind that there was no room left for him in his much loved
Shawmut, and so, taking his pilgrim's staff in hand, he wandered
forth into the wilderness again.
Upon the east bank of the river, which still perpetuates his
name, a pyramidal mound of alluvial earth rises to the height of
seventy feet. Near that mound, then covered with majestic
forest trees, the exile again pitched his tent. His cottage he
called Study Hall; the mound, which became his favorite haunt,
he called Study Hill. Thither he brought his library and all
his worldly goods, there he planted his orchard again, and there
he lived to a good old age, and died with singular good fortune,
a few weeks previously to the commencement of the bloody war
of Philip, in which his house was laid in ashes, his collection
of books and manuscripts destroyed, and nothing spared but his
grave.
Maudsley and Esther Ludlow were united in the summer of
1631, and the happiness of their union more than atoned for the
misfortunes and trials by which it had been preceded.
And now, patient reader, if haply a spark of sympathy
for the heroic souls, who in sorrow and self-denial laid the
foundation of this fair inheritance of ours, hath been
awakened
in thy bosom; or if but a single hour of thine own
weariness or sadness hath been solaced by this feeble picture of
a buried but an unforgotten age, my humble end will have been
answered.
With a gentle pressure of thy hand, I bid thee farewell
forever.